<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1881</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAD0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Despatches: The lords of the dance
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTINA LAMB
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   OLINDA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DAY THREE of carnival and all sense of normal waking hours has long been
suspended along with even the slightest notion of reality. Five phantoms and
a transvestite walk past and a carnival queen lies snoring inelegantly on
the next table. My tutu is slipping and the delicately etched rose design on
my right cheek has become an unseemly smudge of red and black.
The moment seems opportune for drifting off in a daze induced by cachaca,
the local sugar cane spirit not completely dissimilar to methylated spirits.
But it is not to be. Down the narrow cobbled street comes a battery of
drummers heralding the approach of six huge figures with inanely grinning
plastic doll faces, twirling brightly coloured miniature umbrellas. The
carnival queen jerks awake, leaps off the table and rejoins the throng. All
around people are starting up again like clockwork toys that have suddenly
been activated. In the trees a confused flock of birds restart the dawn
chorus.
Carnival in the north-eastern Brazilian town of Olinda is not for those
without stamina. The festival lasts two weeks and proceeds at a relentless
pace. The frevo beat is far faster than samba and combines an unnatural
amount of hipswaying with violent martial art kicks. Locals talk admiringly
of the old man who died inside one of the papier mache dolls, dancing until
the end.
While Rio's more famous carnival has become a multi-million dollar spectacle
with samba schools trying to outdo each other with stunning costumes,
high-tech floats and laser displays, in Olinda it remains a carnival of the
people where no-one can avoid joining in.
The costumes are homemade and choreography is an unknown word as numerous
blocos (groups of dancers and drummers) crowd into the streets for days on
end. In the Rio Sambadrome locals are discussing the relative merits of
twice champion samba school Mocidade's depiction of dreaming. In Olinda
disorganisation reigns. At the town's Four Corners crossroads a parade of
clowns and Charlie Chaplins crash into a huge spider on sticks and a group
of transvestites doing aerobics.
In spite of its shoestring budget carnival in Olinda is far more picturesque
than Rio's more artificial affair. The old colonial town, founded in 1535
and put under a Unesco preservation order, is the perfect setting with its
ice-cream pastel painted Baroque architecture, pink stucco houses, numerous
palm trees, palaces and churches on a hill overlooking the sea. The winding
streets are festooned with paper streamers, lanterns and carnival masks.
Everyone is drinking, dancing and falling in and out of love.
Forget about 25 per cent a month inflation and the third year of recession.
Ignore the four-figure notes now needed to buy a beer. This is when Brazil
comes into its own as what has been described as the last happy nation on
earth. Brazilians know how to party better then anyone on the planet and,
while the country's football no longer gives any reason to celebrate,
carnival is the perfect excuse to release all the tension in a yearly
blow-out.
Brazilians love to tell the tale of an IMF mission arriving during a recent
carnival expecting to find the nation in gloom and instead, seeing all the
festivities, thinking they must have got the wrong place. Frivolous it may
sound but many sociologists believe the reason that the country with the
world's largest income gap and one of the highest inflation rates has not
exploded in revolution is this very ability to revel at will.
Olinda is the perfect example. While Brazil's south became industrialised
and grew rich, the north-east has become synonymous with poverty and
backwardness. Its health indicators have earned it the name Brazil's
Ethiopia. Its people continue to be exploited by sugar barons. Real income
dropped 17 per cent over the last year and the health minister has admitted
that there is cholera in the region.
This misery has provided a fertile source for colourful legends and carnival
brings this to the fore. Many of the blocos are based on maracatu which
mixes religious figures with circus characters. Others are heavy with Indian
and African heritage, the dancers clad in paint and feathers. The umbrellas
used for balance are thought to be a throwback to the canopies used to
transport African kings. Many are dressed as half man half horse, to
symbolise Lampiao, a local rebel leader, or the colourfully decorated cow
Bum Meu Boi. Mingling among it is like being part of a cast for 20 different
operas all taking place at the same time.
A more recent addition to the festivities is the 'trio eletrico' - flat
topped trucks from which bands or speakers blare out frevo music to add to
the general frenzy. Even the military police have converted their vehicles
for the occasion.
But then it is carnival time and nothing is quite what it seems. The bahias,
women in huge hooped skirts and white embroidered turbans, on closer
inspection turn out to be men, betrayed by their hairy legs. In fact many
macho males seize the opportunity to put on women's clothing and make-up.
There are always more discoveries to make if one is prepared to venture
further underground to the heart of neighbouring Recife. On the Monday night
of carnival, in the innermost alleys of the city, one of Brazil's oldest and
most traditional parades takes place - the Night of the Silent Drums - in
honour of dead ancestors. The drums are not silent in spite of the name but
are accompanied by religious chanting and the ringing of cowbells.
On the few occasions the locals stop their frenetic activity it is usually
for feijoada - a stew of black beans and every conceivable part of pig from
trotters to ears. Not for the squeamish, this local dish originated as slave
food using parts of the pig that the masters had discarded.
If the hedonism becomes too intense and one can take no more of the rhythms
and colours of Brazil, there is the perfect antidote in the form of the
nearby beaches on the prison island of Itamaraca. Lie on the silvery sand of
Fort Orange under a tall coconut palm and let small boys cook freshly caught
lobster and pour ice-cold beer. For intellectual exercise one can ponder on
the strategic logic which prompted the Dutch to position their fort front of
a sandbank - making it impossible to view enemy ships entering the bay. I
concluded it was a fortuitous decision - had they not done so the Portugese
invasion might not have been successful and we would have been doing clog
dances instead of frevo.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1882</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJADZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Private View: No black and white answers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTIAN TYLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
'THE CROCODILE does not die under the water so that we can summon the monkey
to his funeral.' Both animals are African, suggests this Akan proverb from
Ghana, but each has very different customs.
So what does 'being African' mean? Compare the answer of the Johannesburg
housewife and the Hausa chieftain, and discuss.
Or ask the professor from Harvard. He will say there is no African
literature, no African culture, no African race, as such. It is not that
these phrases are meaningless, but that, being based on tradition, myth or
lies, they are usually useless and sometimes dangerous. And the same holds
for the rest of humanity.
Nineteenth-century scientific theories which held that race, culture and
ability were somehow 'in the blood' have been discredited. Yet their
influence continues to be felt: in the 'multiculturalism' controversy in the
US, for example, in the resurgent racism in western Europe, in the
nationalist wars in the Balkans and Caucasus.
The Harvard professor is Kwame Anthony Appiah, a philosopher who lectures on
Afro-American studies, and who illustrates the absurdity of the cruder
categorisations.
He is African: he was born 37 years ago in Ghana. His late father Joe
Appiah, a leading lawyer, was a friend and later a critic of Kwame Nkrumah.
His uncle, Otumfuo Nana Opoku Ware II, is king of the Asante.
He is also English: his mother Peggy is the daughter of the former Labour
Chancellor, Sir Stafford Cripps. During the holidays from his English public
school, Bryanston, Appiah would go home to Kumasi in Asante. He also spent a
lot of time with his grandmother, Dame Isobel Cripps, in the very English
village of Minchinhampton, Gloucestershire.
In the US, he is black - that is, when he is not white. On his first visit
an FBI officer, on learning that he had flown in from London, told him to
enter 'white' on the form.
He is a Noel Coward fan, which he admits is a bit odd, given Coward's
jingoist style. 'I suppose I like the funny mixture of reverence for English
institutions and taking the mickey,' he said. 'It's a very English thing.'
Appiah's mixed parentage is not his only qualification for exploring the
race question. He went to Clare College, Cambridge, as a medical student,
studied genetic theory then switched to philosophy, winning a double first
and doing his doctorate in linguistics. The result is his fifth book, a
difficult but provocative account of African culture called In My Father's
House.
I asked him if he ever asked himself what race he was.
'No. Other people have views about it. In America I'm black - that's how
race works and I don't let that worry me.'
In your book you don't use the word 'black' much, I said.
'No, I don't. I don't care too much about the terminology because I think
all terminologies are misleading. In a world in which many of us are the
products of marriages of people from different places, it makes less and
less sense to feel one has to have an answer to that question. I feel very
much at home in Gloucestershire, I have to say. I can go to the graveyard in
Circencester and see graves of ancestors of 600 years ago. But I also feel
very much at home in Ghana.'
What colour would you call yourself?
'A useful term is 'a person of colour''.
But you are just as much white as you are black.
'Yes, I know. But that's not how it works.'
The asymmetry is a little unfair, isn't it?
'The asymmetry is tied up with ways of thinking I don't believe in.'
Is it offensive?
'It depends who does it, and why. I mean, it's ignorant. But then people are
constantly doing things to each other which are ignorant.'
Appiah agreed it was inevitable that at some point he would write a book on
the philosophy of race and culture. I asked him whether he had been able to
tackle the subject objectively.
'I can't claim to be disinterested. I have a lot at stake. And it's
important for people like me to think things through just to protect
themselves and those they care about. But if I say something that isn't true
or I make a bad argument I want to be told.'
He said his research had thrown up some surprises: he said he was stunned to
discover how large a part race thinking played in the development of
literature in the US. Another surprise was how straightforward the
biological facts were when you studied mankind from the inside instead of
the outside.
You claim there is no such thing as race, I said. Doesn't that fly in the
face of commonsense?
'Yes it does.'
What do do you mean by it?
'There are, of course, people who look different from each other -
differences in skin colour, hair colour, the shape of the face - their gross
morphology. Our modern conception of race was formed by great 19th-century
scientists, including Darwin, in an attempt to explain these differences.
The theory they came up with was that we are divided into a small number of
groups and everything important about people flowed, biologically, from
their membership of the group. That is what is not true. It's just not the
case.
'There are massive similarities, and the key things that matter to us about
people - ideas, religions, cultures, family - all turn out not to flow from
biology at all.
'When people said race mattered, they meant Africans couldn't write sonnets
or compose chamber music because it wasn't 'in the blood'. Anyone who knows
anything knows now that's not true. But people don't widely enough
appreciate how wildly wrong it is. They say 'Well, there's still character.'
'The fact is if you take a little child from Zaire and bring her up with an
Irish-American family in Boston, so far as culture goes - with the exception
that she'll have an experience of racism that the other kids in the family
won't have - she will be as capable of doing all the things that matter as
any other child.'
Darwin and the rest might have been right, Appiah said. It was a sensible
hypothesis at the time. But like a lot of 19th century science, it turned
out to be wrong.
What people really mean by 'race' depends on where they are: they might be
talking about differences of colour, culture or just wealth.
'If races were real, the explanation would be the same everywhere, but it
isn't. It's rather like witchcraft: some of the things people call
witchcraft really do happen, but that's the one explanation I'm not going to
give, because I don't believe in witchcraft.'
Sociologists used to describe societies with large immigrant populations as
'multiracial'; today they prefer 'multicultural'. The relabel- ling has not
eased the tension either in western Europe or the US. Appiah thinks the
present fashion in the US for each ethnic group to discover a culture for
itself and then to assert it politically is misguided - and racist.
'That's the way to perdition. On the other hand, the right-wing response
that we should all buy into the one, monolithic, European-derived western
tradition which has given us everything we have in America is equally false.
It's just not true that everything in America has come that way. Think of
jazz.'
The issue was real enough, but most of the debate was bogus. 'If you sketch
out this Noah's Ark view, in which you should have two of every kind, you
can see it's crazy.
'What's going to happen? Are you're going to say: 'Sorry, you're Jewish and
you can't marry that Catholic boy you've fallen in love with'? It's just not
going to work. People are going to blur and blend, not just by
intermarriage, but by being friends and co-workers and fellow students.
'So, inevitably - and one may regret this - there will be a certain
homogenisation of global culture. In London now you can see Japanese Kabuki,
which you couldn't 100 years ago. Not only can you see it, but with a bit of
help you can make some sense of it. Just as the Japanese can now be visited
by the Royal Shakespeare Company.
'Your own culture is changed. That doesn't mean we all become the same, any
more than all the people in Minchinhampton, a tiny village, are the same.
They all have different stories to tell.'
What strikes him most about his black students at Harvard is how American
they are, especially when a foreigner criticises their country. They should
not be blamed, however, if, being so recently allowed into the elite white
universities, they wanted to move the furniture around a bit.
You say there is no black American literature.
'Put it this way. I don't think it is an interesting literary category.'
You're a philosopher and half-African. Is there no such thing as an African
philosopher either?
'Only in the geographical sense. I prefer to define one as someone who is
concerned with philosophical issues as they relate to Africa.'
Your book is quite hard to follow, I said. Can a philosopher like you really
make an impact on an issue like this?
'Not by myself. I am now inclined to feel, having done the thinking, that
the task is to tell it in other ways: so I talk on the radio and to policy
people.
'The great hope of the European Enlightenment was that philosophers could
work things out. It was Marx's idea and Lenin's too. And it hasn't worked.
It hasn't worked for the same reason why democracy is a good idea. Nothing
in social life really works unless a lot of people believe in it. Hearing
from the mountain is not a way of coming to believe.
'I really do think - and this is much easier to say after the last two years
in eastern Europe - that these are the problems of our time. The idea that
our differences come from inside, that they flow from the blood, is a very
dangerous way of thinking.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1883</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJADYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Best laid plans of men and mice: The significance of
Disneyland for the British election
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DOMINIC LAWSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN AN election campaign dominated by photo opportunities, sound bites, and
staged and scripted interviews, it is refreshing to see a politician look
shocked.
It happened last week to Tony Blair, Labour's shiny-faced employment
spokesman. While in full spate advocating higher pensions for all, he was
cut off at the knees by a softly-spoken working-class Welsh housewife: 'I
don't know why you want to give us all this extra money,' she said. 'We'll
just go and spend it on a trip to Euro-Disneyland.'
Mr Blair, whose features anyway have the rubbery consistency of a cartoon
character, looked like Mickey Mouse would if Mini Mouse told him she was
going off with Donald Duck. While the Labour party is quite prepared to
argue that tax cuts lead to undesirable expenditure on pleasurable foreign
imports, it had clearly never occurred to them that good working-class Welsh
pensioners might perpetrate similar treachery.
But I have no doubt that the lady was right. Euro-Disney will syphon off
more discretionary pounds, once it opens next month, than any competing
English, or even Welsh, attraction. In 1988 I was invited by the Disney
company to tour Disneyland in California, and Disneyworld in Florida. I
think the occasion was Mickey's 60th birthday. To celebrate Disney
executives had covered 320 acres of an Iowa cornfield with the image of
Mickey Mouse's head. They called it the 'Little Mouse on the Prairie.'
Meanwhile in California and Florida the executives who all wore Mickey Mouse
watches showed me maps of Europe covered with concentric circles showing
population densities, and average speeds of public and private travel. They
somehow seemed to converge on a blob about 20 miles east of Paris.
'1992' they said.
'How convenient,' I trilled. 'The year the Channel Tunnel opens.'
'Oh really,' they replied in a tone nicely mixing boredom and disbelief.
Well Mickey is on time, at least. It is hard to over-emphasise the military
precision with which the Disney company orders its affairs. And like the
military, the greatest precision attaches to the tiniest details.
Four years ago, at the Disney University in California - yes, there is such
a place - I stumbled across a document which governed the exact physical
appearance to be adopted by employees. Under the section Women (Hair) it
said: 'Hair below shoulder-length should be worn combed away from the face
so that it will not fall forward or over the face while performing normal
job duties. Side tendrils, if worn, should not extend below the bottom of
the ear lobe. If a yarn or hair ribbon is worn it should be no wider than
one-half inch or longer than four inches when tied. Stick-pin barrettes
(both leather and plastic) and knitted chignon (bun) holders are not
acceptable.'
For EuroDisney everything has been thought of. The Disney employees dressed
up as Mickey Mouse will not be allowed to ruffle the hair of little European
children who come running up for affection. This is because Disney is
concerned that one such child might be undergoing chemotherapy, and be
wearing a wig.
Mickey will not have a tail. This stems from an incident eight years ago
when a visitor to Disneyworld in Florida pulled too insistently at Mickey's
tail; Mickey picked the boy up and hurled him through the air. The parents
took Mickey to court. No such incident will ever be allowed to break the
monotony of perfection at Euro-Disney.
This perfect monotony is in fact the great US invention. In any other
business it is simply called mass production. It is why the Heinz baked
bean, the Kellogg cornflake, and, many years ago, the Ford motor car,
conquered the world. The Disney company, with complete success, has applied
the US principles of mass production to the appearance of human beings.
In this election campaign the party media managers are attempting to achieve
the same standards of flawless, rehearsed consistency with their charges,
the politicians. But unfortunately for them, the public want men, not mice.
Dominic Lawson is editor of The Spectator.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1884</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJADXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Arts: Some like it Wilder
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID MURRAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THAT'S THE trouble with re-doing Some Like It Hot. Almost everyone who goes
to the Prince Edward Theatre will have seen Billy Wilder's movie comedy -
and presumably enjoyed it as much as everybody else, if they are going
again. Even with a better show, and with generous good will, the interval
was always going to be a-twitter with odious comparisons. Yet for what it
is, the show is not at all bad (though in the first half the frantic
determination of the cast suggested that they might have their doubts);
quite a lot of people may enjoy it.
Tommy Steele directs and takes the Tony Curtis role in a musical version
first tried in New York in the early 1970s: score and lyrics by the reliable
Jule Styne and Bob Merrill, book 'based on the screenplay'. The sea-change
has been been considerable, whether on the Atlantic crossing or during the
original musicalising - probably both. Certainly the film was richer and
stranger; making time for all the singing and dancing here incurs much
trimming and simplifying, and some of the new repartee is of numbing
crudity.
Though film can manage things that the stage cannot, the designers of the
show (Terry Parsons and Nick Richings) strike back vigorously with a bright,
brisk series of period-tacky sets, and then a terrific car-and-cycle chase
which cheekily uses film. The chorus of Hoods, Broads and Musicians look
satisfyingly peculiar, and downright etiolated in their Florida swimsuits -
not a bit like a well-scrubbed, sedulously tanned Broadway chorus.
Norman Maen first assigns them a leggy nightclub-dance, preening and funny,
and then gives the men an antic number for 'Penniless Bums', one of Styne's
neatest contributions. Later the choreography grows more ordinary, though
the dancers do their best to give it a specious fizz. Better than
end-of-pier, but an aeon behind A Chorus Line: and wasn't that 20 years ago
already?
A basic proposition of the movie was that the Curtis and Jack Lemmon
characters were doleful, harried and - with good cause, in view of the
pursuing gangsters - perpetually nervous. When Steele bounces on with his
phosphorescent grin, a sort of Bermondsey Cat's smile which at each entrance
seems to precede him by a good two feet, the premises are instantly altered.
He brims with winning confidence, agelessly sparky and trim. (Just once in a
while, the effect was slightly macabre.)
Since he has to have a big tap number, the title song is enlisted for the
purpose and everybody else joins in. Coming late in the action, that puts
the story on hold when it needs to be hurtling along. Furthermore, it leaves
Steele and his sidekick Billy Boyle - large and discouraged but comically
graceful, even subtle - doing full-dress professional drag acts, without a
shred of excuse in the story nor their hapless characters. British pantomime
takes over.
Mandy Perryment strives gamely to recapture the dizzy Marilyn Monroe
persona. On opening night she began like a Speak Your Weight machine on
fast-forward, but later she relaxed enough to emit some bemused human
signals. Her lusty, fuddled old Croesus is Royce Mills, who sports an
arthritically horny edge and can sing, and there are ripe supporting
cartoons from Veronica Clifford and Edward Phillips.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1885</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJADWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Arts: Brussels sprouts new music - Dusapin's Medeamaterial
at Ars Musica 92
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW CLEMENTS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRUSSELS in March may not be quite as unprepossessing as Huddersfield in
November, but it still seems an unlikely location for what has become one of
Europe's most significant festivals of contemporary music. In terms of scale
and enterprise Ars Musica now rivals Strasbourg, Donaueschingen and the
Venice Biennale, and if it still remains scarcely known by the British that
cannot be because of its neglect of British music - James Dillon was a
featured composer last year, Ferneyhough is strongly represented this, while
Jonathan Harvey's works have been included in each of the four festivals so
far.
Though centred on Brussels, events take place in Liege as well, utilising
the resources of the conservatories and of Belgian Radio, together with an
impressive roster of visiting ensembles. Ars Musica 92 runs from March 9 to
April 2 and carries the title of La Voix du geste; this time
Charleroi/Danses and the Plan K visual arts events have been brought under
the same festival umbrella, and the involvement of the Theatre de la
Monnaie's with its new double bill of Dusapine and Purcell adds yet a
further strand.
There are retrospectives this year of Kagel, Kurtag and Nono, but the most
important premieres belong to younger generations, and to Pascal Dusapin
especially. This weekend his huge 'operatorio' La Melancholia will be heard
in Brussels after its premiere in Paris. Together with the Monnaie's staging
of his opera after Heiner Muller, Medeamaterial, it bring Dusapin's
development right up to date.
In Britain we know the music of Dusapin (born in 1955) from a handful of
performances, chiefly by Richard Bernas and Music Projects. His larger-scale
pieces, including an opera Romeo et Juliette, premiered in Strasburg in
1988, remain unexplored here. Yet as one of the leading lights of a talented
generation of French composers, and one of the very few pupils of Iannis
Xenakis, he amply deserves further exposure. The new opera, roughly an hour
long, is a fascinating, sustained piece of theatre. Medeamaterial is a short
prose text by Muller, part of his trilogy about the Jason and Medea myths.
It is essentially a monologue built around Medea's final moments, ending
with the murder of her sons and her own suicide.
Dusapin confines the brief contributions of the Nurse and her husband Jason
to off-stage pre-recorded voices, and concentrates musical attention upon
Medea. In this stage version directed by Jacques Delcuvellerie with designs
by Johan Deanen, she has an onstage double, a silent actress, as if a
modern-day Medea summons the shade of her classical antecedent to articulate
her own despair while she writhes around the stage her soprano alter ego
delivers the monologue. It is a tour de force for the singer, the compelling
Hilde Leidland, and for Dusapin, who paces it wonderfully, extends some
beautifully judged vocal lines, and underpins them with the most telling
discreet orchestral textures. There are brief instrumental interludes,
strange otherworldly, vaguely Moorish dances in which the quartet who seem
part of the contemporary Medea's entourage circle and menace her shade, but
otherwise the piece moves on a smooth musical curve that seems almost
self-contained.
The Dusapin was commissioned by the Monnaie specifically to be coupled with
Dido and Aeneas, making up a double bill of operas about tragic Classical
heroines. So Dusapin's imaginative scoring uses the same period-instrument
band, the Orchestre de la Chapelle Royale from Paris, conducted by Philippe
Herreweghe, and the same chorus in the pit, the Collegium Vocale of Ghent,
as well as a staging very obviously twinned with that concoted by
Delcuvellerie for Dido.
But whereas the Medea story was projected into the present, Dido and Aeneas
kept its period trappings, with much use of frames within frames  -
proscenium arches replicating themselves upstage, a bank of television
screens endlessly reproducing images of breaking waves, guttering candles,
falling rose petals - and a good deal of camp stage business. The central
performances were strong and sensible, especially Marianne Rorholm's cool
and secure Dido, and Donna Brown's elegant Belinda: but Ralf Popken's
Sorceress was miles over the top and he/she was abetted by two witches
(Michele Patzakis, Zofia Kilanowicz) with Dolly Parton-style cleavages
(false, one assumes) and accents to match. It was the Dusapin, though, that
one remembered, for its consistency and confident pacing, much more than for
its mise en scene.
A much less ambitious piece of Dusapin, Stanze for brass quintet, opened a
concert last Saturday evening by the Ensemble Intercontemporain under Ingo
Metzmacher in the magnificent concert hall of Belgian Radio's old
headquarters. Their programme also included Magnus Lindberg's Joy, which the
London Sinfonietta brought to the Queen Elizabeth Hall two months ago, and
Barraque piece somewhere in its programme, and Temps restitue remains the
most arcane and rarely heard of his half dozen completed pieces.
Like all of Barraque's works based upon Hermann Broch's impenetrable novel
The Death of Virgil, it had a protracted gestation, first completed in the
late 1950s and reaching final form ten year later. In performance now it
seems costive, highly wrought and rather brittle. There is the high dramatic
density that is so thrilling in all Barraque's scores: the sence of extreme
emotion forced into tight structured paragraphs, the extravagantly lyrical
vocal lines, the explosive writing for percussion. But here it was abrupt
and never convincingly sustained, coming across as certainly the most
problematic of Barraque's works, and the first to make one doubt his special
stature that has been taken on trust for so long.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1886</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJADVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Arts: Characters do furnish the play - A starry Heartbreak
House
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MALCOLM RUTHERFORD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
YOU CAN see why George Bernard Shaw thought Heartbreak House was his best
best play. It is even more evident from the preface than from the piece
itself. The former is all about the state of England, Europe and the theatre
before and during the first world war. The play was written during the war,
but performed only afterwards.
The preface explains why. The last act features a German bombing raid, the
exhilaration of which is almost welcomed by some of the performers. Shaw
wrote that on any night the Germans might have turned it 'from play into
earnest, and even then might not have waited for their cues.'
The preface is a very serious piece of writing. 'Only those who have lived
through a first-rate war, not in the field, but at home, and kept their
heads, can possibly understand the bitterness of Shakespeare and Swift, who
both went through this experience.'
The play takes a long time to build up. Shaw is writing about what he called
the 'cultured leisured Europe before the war.' He claimed that 'power and
culture were in separate departments', though with the occasional overlap.
Heartbreak House, the place rather than the play, is where the overlap
sometimes happens. The family is eccentric, living beyond its means, with
servants but no money. Meals have become a problem. The family entertains a
businessman cum cabinet minister. He, too, turns out not to have any money
and, what is worse, to be lacking in social graces. He runs away, and is
killed in his shelter when the bombs fall.
Where the play excels is not in the portentousness of an image of old
England, but in the collection of characters. They are all marvellous parts,
and that is largely what Trevor Nunn's new production at the Haymarket is
about. Almost everyone is a star and if they were not already established,
they would be after this show.
Vanessa Redgrave plays Hesione, the elder and more eccentric of the two
Shotover daughters. She can have enjoyed few greater pleasures on stage than
when she speaks the line: 'You are the most uninteresting man on earth.' Ms
Redgrave is devastingly good throughout. Felicity Kendal plays her younger
sister, Ariadne. For my taste, her voice has become too high for the part.
That shows when she comes to the famous lines about the house lacking
horses. She seems more accustomed to the salon than the saddle.
Nevertheless, she looks terrific and moves superbly.
Even the smaller parts glow, down to Joe Melia who has wonderful 10 minutes
in the second act as ther burglar. The disappointment is Paul Scofield as
the 88-year-old Captain Shotover. I do not think that it is his fault. It is
just that this is the part where the play shows its age: the sententiousness
and the excessive length of the piece begin to obtrude. In the old days it
might have been the central role. Nowadays nobody is much interested in the
old man's experiments and bum philosophy any more: Heartbreak House seems
more a play about the women, including the young Ellie Dunn (Imogen Stubbs)
as well as the two sisters.
Trevor Nunn does not just stick the stars on the stage; he also directs, and
never more so than in some of his stage groupings. Shaw said that the play
harked back to King Lear and his three daughters. Nunn's production and his
handling of the women reminds one much more of the witches in Macbeth;
certainly not hags, but dangerous when let loose and even more so when
conspiring together.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1887</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJADUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Arts: Dance of death, betrayal and remorse - Clement Crisp
hails 'The Judas Tree', Kenneth MacMillan's new work for the Royal Ballet
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CLEMENT CRISP and ANDREW CLEMENTS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SIR KENNETH MacMillan's The Judas Tree was given its first performance by
the Royal Ballet at Covent Garden on Thursday night. On its most immediate
level it concerns harsh and all too familiar incidents of urban brutality.
Jock McFadyen has made brilliant designs of a building site - ladders,
walk-ways, unfinished walls, two derelict motor cars - peopled by a group of
workmen under a foreman (Irek Mukhamedov).
A girl, Viviana Durante, is brought in, sexually predatory and flirtatious,
who provokes jealousy between the foreman and one of his friends (Michael
Nunn). She is eventually subjected to gang-rape by the men, is killed, and
the foreman accuses his friend of her death. The friend is murdered. The
foreman hangs himself. The girl reappears as a grieving memory and reproach
for what has happened. The curtain falls.
Violence is the common-place of life in many cities: last week a report told
of appalling gang-rape in the Halles district of Paris. MacMillan's argument
 -and it is one sustained with extraordinary choreographic imagination - is
that beneath the animal crudities of the incident, we may learn about the
human condition, and a continuum of human suffering and remorse. This he
relates through a series of emotionally resonant images, and through actions
mysteriously and subtly revelatory of his larger theme.
Betrayal is explicit in the narrative. In Mukhamedov's staggering
performance - the role is black in tone, but shot through with the man's
need for love and his mistrust of that love - we know both sympathy and
despair (but mainly sympathy) for this combination of brute power and
vulnerability. With Durante we see a girl whose sexual bravado and
street-smart personality are a mere shell which is shattered by her terrible
suffering. In her relationship with every man on stage (she is one woman
faced with 14 men) we must consider both the battle between the sexes and a
battle for sexual equality - or supremacy. When she first appears, she is
carried in under a white sheet, and at moments throughout the action she
dons this as a symbol of her untouched and, I would suggest, inviolable
femininity, which must eventually be recognised as that of a mother. That,
at the end of the piece, she acquires yet another identity - the grief-laden
figure of the Stabat mater - is the haunting last note of the ballet.
For, at the deepest level of MacMillan's creation, lies the historical
Judas. The references are fleeting, but clear. After the girl's death - and
it has been mysteriously presaged by Mukhamedov's drawing round her
recumbent body with chalk, just as police used to outline the body of a
corpse - Mukhamedov betrays and accuses Nunn with a kiss. Nunn's body is
placed in one of the ruined cars at the back of the stage - a latter-day
Christ in his tomb - and Mukhamedov, like Judas, hangs himself. It is then
that Durante, draped in the unstained white of the cloth, stands like the
Virgin Mother.
These various levels of interpretation would be mere cleverness were they
not shown to us in dance of the most searching - and revealing - imagery.
Identity, motive, feeling, speak through movement unfailingly expressive.
Durante's ambiguous relationship with Mukhamedov and Nunn is made clear to
us as Nunn carries her above the recumbent Mukhamedov, her feet treading
over the his body. (A woman aggressively 'walking over men' is a recurrent
image). The weak 'friend", so well played by Nunn, is given a questioning,
ambiguous solo in which his indecisions are exposed. (He finds refuge with
Durante under her white sheet, who thereby becomes a mother-figure.) The
group of workmen indulge in games, races, that speak of suppressed sexual
energy, undirected physicality, ill-defined but pungent menace. Mukhamedov
is by turns dominant - astonishing in physical prowess - and broodingly
dangerous as he 'fingers' a character in accusation.
There is much to discover in the dance. With The Judas Tree MacMillan has
again challenged ballet's perceptions about its own identity: he shows the
human condition, in actual and symbolic terms, as the central matter of a
dance theatre that he continues to enrich. He has also brought two welcome
new talents to the Opera House stage. Jock McFadyen's designs are bold,
sure.
Brian Elias' score is powerful as drama atmospheric in sonorities, providing
an urgent motor force for the action. The Opera House orchestra under Barry
Wordsworth were fine advocates for it, in an evening which also brought
distinguished accounts of Stravinsky's violin concerto and Bizet's symphony
in C. Of these, and their bright danced performances, I shall hope to report
after a further viewing of this triple bill - which I would urge
dance-lovers to see. The interpretations given by Durante, Mukhemedov Nunn,
and their colleagues in The Judas Tree are magnificent.
Brian Elias' score for The Judas Tree, writes Andrew Clements, is a
sustained and often striking achievement, far more direct in its imagery
than his earlier orchestral works. Given a totally free hand by MacMillan,
Elias has produced a continuously unfolding span of music, whose events were
apparently informed by a private scenario of the composer's own devising,
but one which makes perfectly coherent sense as an abstract musical
argument.
With a five-part structure containing a set of variations, fully worked slow
movement and a tumultuous coda which pulls together many of the musical
threads, there is more than a hint of a latter-day symphony behind The Judas
Tree. It is a feeling enhanced by the carrying-over of thematic shards from
one section to the next binding the structure ever tighter.
Many of the ideas are vivid; much of the melodic writing, for woodwind
especially, has a sharp tang. Doubts about the pacing creep in shortly
before the climactic coda, for the fourth section seems heavy on noisy,
routine rhetoric in contrast with the thoughtful plotting of the earlier
argument.
There is plenty to absorb however, and ample substance to justify a transfer
to the concert hall, where the proof that Elias' images are as compelling
and haunting as MacMillan's choreographic ones could finally be tested.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1888</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJADTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Arts: Strong on the Renaissance - Nicholas Powell sums up
the mood at the Maastricht Art Fair
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICHOLAS POWELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WITH attendance up by 20 per cent on 1991 and business reportedly well in
excess of last year, the week-long Maastricht European Fine Art Fair should
bring some continental economic cheer to its 31 British participants by the
time it closes tomorrow evening.
The show has been attended by 144 dealers from ten countries. Buyers were
mostly Belgian, Dutch and German, along with some Italians and Spaniards.
Highly specialised art collectors came from as far afield as the US, Japan
and Hong Kong: dealer Edward R. Lubin from New York, specialising in
Renaissance works of art, said he had chosen Maastricht as opposed to the
more ostentatious Paris Biennale antiques fair for his first European venue,
for precisely that reason.
Curators were busy buying, too. During the first 48 hours of the fair, the
Antwerp gallery, J. Zeberg, sold a 15th century Nottingham alabaster
sculpture and a magnificent Fontainebleau walnut cabinet, c 1580, to
European museums.
This year, Maastricht sported a new jewellery department grouping the
world's four biggest firms, in which the brightest sparkles came from Harry
Winston's shamelessly camp lifesize pair of Judy Garland's ruby slippers.
There was real art in the fair's other new section, 'Gravura,' comprising
five stands devoted to works on paper and books. Siegfried Billesberger,
from Munich, had brought along extremely fine German and Italian drawings
and rapidly sold a Van Gogh pencil sketch to a Spanish collector for a hefty
DM200,000. Wolseley Fine Arts from London fielded an attractive choice of
late 19th century and early 20th century French drawings.
Maastricht's Textura section, the biggest and best quality concentration of
textile dealers anywhere in the world, this year housed Renaissance
specialist Bernard Blondeel from Antwerp, selling among others a pair of
late 16th century Mille Fleurs tapestries from Bruges for Pounds 600,000.
Maastricht remains unaccountably afflicted with poor quality contemporary
art stands, and there is still little furniture to be seen. Prinz und
Moeller from Hamburg, however, had lots of very glossy Biedermeier and
Gloucestershire dealer, Michael Golding, of Huntingdon Antiques, is showing
an outstanding selection of late medieval and renaissance English furniture,
which British museums would, presumably, kill for, if they had any money.
Old Master paintings and drawings, occupying roughly half the stands in the
fair, remain very much the hallmark of Maastricht, and there are some great
and unusual works poking through the acres of Dutch tulips in vases and
merrymaking Flemish peasants. The London firm, P &amp; D Colaghi, returned to
Maastricht after missing last year with a poignant and exquisitely coloured
Holy Family by Hendrick Bloemaert, signed and dated 1635, which sold to a
private collector within hours of the opening. Galerie d'Arenberg from
Brussels were on the look-out for sellers as much as for buyers, and had
ideal museum material to hand with a 'Noli me tangere' by Janssens Wildens,
c 1620 for BFrs10m and a Virgin and Child by 17th century French painter
Simon Vouet for BFrs28m.
Other dealers had trimmed their sails to suit a North European clientele.
Galerie de la Scala from Paris brought Dutch drawings and two extraordinary
paintings - Saint Gregory by the 17th century Dutch artist, Matthias Stomer,
at FFrs2m and a very rare 17th century work by Jacob Cuyp, better known for
his portraits, of two leopards (entitled 'Two Tigers') for FFrs3m.
There were exceptional art objects on display, too. Galerie Neuse from
Bremen showed Augsburg silver and beautifully fine South German baroque
ivory sculptures. Axel Vervoordt, who deals from his own castle near
Antwerp, made his booth into a sort of 'wunderkammer,' lining it with 18th
century French bookshelves laden with an eclectic choice of objects and 18th
century silver.
Old Masters dealer Richard Green from London, who has shown at Maastricht
since 1972, sold six paintings this year. He said trading for art up to
Dollars 0.5m was no problem. It was proving less easy up to Dollars 1m and
tricky above that figure, he said. 'The quality is excellent. This is a top
fair, which lives up to its expectations. It's not only what we sell that
counts, it's the aftermath, the ongoing interest, the deals that happen
afterwards which are important.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1889</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJADSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Arts: Politician from another era - Radio
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BA YOUNG
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NEWS AND commentaries on the rival manifestos and so on are properly dealt
with daily on other pages; but Radio 4's The Politics of Choice, presented
by Robin Lustig on Tuesdays and Saturdays, is different. It guarantees that
no active politicians will take part. The idea is to hear from a democratic
sample of voters what matters they think important, then try them out on a
panel of non-political experts. The producer is to banish 'the spokesmen,
the spin-doctors and the sound-bites' altogether, and evaluate each question
on commonsense rather than political conviction, a novel form of election
coverage. Circumstances kept me from Tuesday's debut, but there is over a
fortnight's more campaigning yet.
It was a pleasure last night to turn to a politician of another time and
another country in Radio 3's Malraux - the Man and the Mask. To be Minister
of Culture under de Gaulle may not at this moment seem an outstanding
political fulfilment; but Malraux's promulgation of music and theatre, even
his splendid campaign for the cleaning of public buildings, are achievements
any such minister might be proud of. (If only he could be on a Politics of
Choice panel]) Both in his own original work and in his criticism of
others', he attracted mistrust as well as admiration, but he was a
provocative figure either way, a sort of French blend of Michael Heseltine
with Graham Greene. Richard Maynes's profile, in which he included the
voices of many contemporaries, as well as Malraux's own brisk talk, was as
stimulating as its subject.
'I found Shakespeare extremely easy,' Janet Suzman said to Sue MacGregor in
last week's Conversation Piece (Radio 4, Sunday). 'In Shakespeare you're not
playing sit-com characters, they're much larger than you are.' Miss Suzman,
who graduated from Johannesburg to the RSC, said other, wiser things, and I
hope her feelings for the South African theatre will have survived Tuesday's
vote. But there was better talk about Shakespeare in Radio 3's Replay on
Sunday, an interview with Tyrone Guthrie recorded in 1964. Sir Tyrone went
from memories of Ben Greet to his twelve years at the Old Vic. If I had a
bigger house, I'd have a library of Replay tapes. This week's Conversation
Piece was with a lady Detective Chief Inspector. I wouldn't collect those.
I did not care for Louis McNeice's Columbus play last month, nor did I much
like Craig Warner's A Sense of Things Moving Forward (Radio 4, Sunday),
which covers some of the same ground. Warner's arrogant Colon (Columbus to
us) regards his new lands chiefly as a source of gold, which is in fact
lacking. He sends Queen Isabella a cargo of 500 brown slaves instead; they
die on the trip, he is sacked. But the Pope takes his side - unaware,
perhaps, of his cruel activities in his new territories, such as hanging
Torres, the linguist who could not teach the natives how to conjugate
irregular verbs, and allowing natives to die from their execution
unbaptised. The Queen forgives him on his deathbed. There is a fanciful
element in the writing, that takes in ghosts and dreams. Andy Jordan
directed; he was lucky to have Ben Kingsley as his Colon, and I imagine that
Frances Barber's curious screaming Queen must have been a directorial
emphasis.
Wally K. Daly's The Broken Butterfly (Radio 4, Saturday) was the sequel to
his Butterflies Don't Count, which I mentioned last week, but it didn't make
it clearer. The murderer who had confessed and been refused absolution had
been convicted, then escaped from gaol. Sure that the priest had shopped
him, he resolved to kill him, killing having become part of his political
life. The story, with an IRA background, was rousing, but sometimes too
black-and-white. It did indeed end with a shooting in a confessional, but
not the shooting of the priest. David Hitchinson directed both plays.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1890</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJADRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Arts: From Diner to Bugsy - Screen / Nigel Andrews talks to
film director Barry Levinson
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIGEL ANDREWS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CONSIDER THIS American career story. A man starts out writing sketches for
comedy shows on local TV. He graduates to scripting for Mel Brooks and gets
to stab Mr Brooks in the shower in a cameo role in High Anxiety. He turns
director with a cult teenage-recall film called Diner. He follows with two
giant box-office hits called Good Morning Vietnam and Rain Man. He turns
round and makes a tiny autobiographical film, Avalon. He then turns round
again and summons ten Oscar nominations with a big-budget, Warren
Beatty-starring gangster film called Bugsy.
That Barry Levinson, in both career and habitat, is a rule unto himself is
clear from his office at 20th Century Fox: lots of friendly clatter, plastic
coffee-cups and a tousled Mr L who eats out of takeaway Chinese cartons.
Levinson - I met him before Bugsy had opened, let alone won a Golden Globe
and Critics Prize for Best Film of 1991 - gives the impression of running a
cottage industry. But as a film-maker he is more and more fascinated by the
way humble human values are corrupted by dwarfing ambitions or cultural
tyrannies. Avalon was about the curse of TV on postwar family life. Rain Man
was about the potential curse of a yuppie's greed on an autistic brother.
And the potent black-comedy elements in Bugsy come from the inner clash
between Siegel's vestigial seam of charm and innocence and his giant streak
of malevolent ambition.
'What fascinated me is, here was a gangster who wanted to be a film star,
who used glamour to disguise his more sociopathic behaviour. I'd always seen
gangsters as East Coast: overcoats, hats, the Godfather look. I'd never seen
a 'Hollywood' gangster before, a man who needed that finesse and facade in
order to function.
'Bugsy Siegel wanted to be an actor. But he failed, so he became another
kind of star. He built the Flamingo Hotel, which was the foundation stone of
Las Vegas, and he took the Hollywood glamour to the desert where he played
host to the entertainers.'
But doesn't the film itself, especially in presenting Siegel in the
ladykilling form of Warren Beatty, risk glamorising evil? 'No, I don't think
so. The danger is that society itself allows these men to exist. A killer
doesn't walk around a party looking like a killer. He can be handsome,
debonair; the fact that he is among us and unobserved is what's
frightening.'
So is the volatile performance the director has coaxed from Warren Beatty.
Typically of a Levinson film Bugsy itself is as mixed-mood as its main
character. 'If it works, it's because we've totally broken up the gangster
genre. We're more humorous, more romantic, but along with that there's a
darker side. It might offend some people who think 'Oh you can only be a
comedy or a romance or a thriller.' We're all of those things.'
Bugsy, Oscars regardless, has paid for its sophistication by performing
unspectacularly at the box office. But then Levinson, with a few lapses, has
consistently seemed more interested in selling truth than in selling
tickets. Even when sucked into the rubbish zone, as with Young Sherlock
Holmes or the more empty-headed parts of The Natural and Good Morning
Vietnam, he has struggled out again and tried to renew his identity. His
Baltimore trilogy - Diner, Tin Men, Avalon - is a unique attempt by a
high-profile American director to make a plain-spun movie series about his
own home town.
The big films help to finance the small. 'There's nothing worse to a studio
than a director saying 'I want to do a personal film.' It's almost offensive
to them. So by doing a Rain Man, it lets you do an Avalon.' And Avalon is
all about the kind of processed thinking that mass entertainment encourages
and that the studios, Levinson implies, subscribe to.
'The key to that piece was television. TV, I believe, has had an effect we
cannot yet understand, in undermining families and all kinds of values. I
remember the TV coming into my family's house, all wrapped up like a
wonderful gift, and everybody gathered round. I remember visiting my
grandfather; he was all alone with the TV on in the background and I
thought, 'There is a story here.' An entire sense of communal living has
disappeared. People start having their trays in front of the TV; the family
dinner, that kind of togetherness, becomes a thing of the past.'
The curse of television doesn't stop with the family. 'Because of TV today
we want to understand everything instantly or we want nothing to do with it.
Take advertising. You have to sell your movie in a 30-second slot. How do
you do it? You can't. So you simplify and coarsen what it's about. I have a
fear we will end up with an age of Batmans and Terminators and whatever else
is high, high concept. I think we're seeing the death of complexity when
films like, say, Treasure Of The Sierra Madre won't get made any more.
'People have been brainwashed to want great simplicity. How else do you
explain that here in America in the 1990s abortion is a major political
issue? When there are so many world concerns - famines, wars, economic
crises - we're hammering away at abortion. It's because it's an emotional,
quick issue and everyone can take sides about it. It's the TV culture.
Everything has to march to the signal and tempo it sets.'
The same hatred of pre-fabricated ideas and rhythms influenced his direction
of Rain Man. Inheriting the project from Spielberg, who had worked on it for
months but was then obliged to go and make Indiana Jones 3, Levinson risked
studio odium by throwing out much of the stuff his predecessor had left
behind.
'The biggest change was getting rid of the adventure elements. Chases,
fights. I said, 'Let's just have two guys on the road.' There's ambitious
Charlie, who's got a soft centre. And Raymond, the immovable autistic. Let's
have the con man try to con the guy who can't be reached. At some point he,
Charlie, will have to turn back on himself because the other guy won't
respond. It's like hitting a ball at a wall. So that was what we did. Made
it a character study, pure and simple.'
Which is what at heart Bugsy is. The question is: what sort of character?
I'm still preoccupied with the glamorised gangster question. Bugsy is part
of a flood of Mafia and mobster films issuing from Hollywood during the last
twelvemonth. What is the attraction? And what does the phenomenon tell us
about the world or America itself?
'We are this young country,' answers Levinson after a pause, 'with no
history. We didn't have kings or queens. We didn't have King Arthur. So
we've invented our own mythology, which has become part of the genres we
work. It may be part of our sick society that we keep dredging up this
criminal past. But there is a fascination. Maybe we have to know ourselves
thoroughly before we can cure ourselves.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1891</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJADQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Arts: Perth keeps its cool - A laid back festival down under
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTONY THORNCROFT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   AS DIANA Ross name-dropped her way into the next song
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
'Lionel Ritchie wrote this for me in memory of Marvin Gaye' - a kookaburra
cackled mirthlessly from an awning gum tree. Has the great soul singer
reincarnated as an Australian bird? Fanciful, but no less fanciful than
watching the Queen of Motown flashing her Versace see-through al fresco in a
winery in Western Australia.
Each year the Leeuwin Estate goes black tie, jetting in a musical legend,
perhaps Dame Kiri, perhaps Dionne Warwick, for a gala event which is filmed
and then sold throughout the world. It is a wonderfully clever marketing
ploy. The annual promotional budget for Leeuwin wines becomes
self-liquidating.
Diana Ross was vintage stuff. She shrugs off the Supremes early on in a
medley; she mechanically airs the latest album; then actually tingles nerves
with 'The man I love' sung straight to a jazz trio. But her biggest number
these days is motherhood. After over 30 years and 50 albums the music has
become routine; the buzz is from communion with the audience. Diana was soon
thrusting deep into the real people at the sides, plucking out babies to
croon over. As she brought us up to date with her family Ms Ross totally
cracked the mystery of stardom. It was a double whammy - smoothly performed
crooning by a natural woman.
The Leeuwin concert coincides with the Perth Festival, a pleasantly low key
event which for 40 years now has pepped up the pristine West Australian
capital. Perth is a city remarkably at ease with itself and its Festival is
especially laid back. There is the odd grumble that the over-lapping arts
fest at Adelaide attracts most of the attention, but Perth sounds the right
cultural notes - Sir Harrison Birtwistle was composer in residence - without
trying the patience of the locals.
This sang froid in a perfect climate was best shown in Perth's respectful
interest in the French performance art troupe Ilotopie. They spent much of
their time walking the streets like mechanical zombies dressed only in
fluorescent body paint. For their performance in a shopping mall they
douched each other in colourful blancmange. Congenitally impervious to this
kind of thing, I admit to a frisson of excitement as the most virginal of
brides, polyvinyled white to the tip of her bouquet, stood motionless in a
cage while her jilted lover poured colourful slodge all over her from above.
In Adelaide the city lived up to its Methodist roots by arresting two
members of Ilotopie for immodesty.
Even Cementville, performed by the Actors Theatre of Louisville, failed to
shake Perth's good nature. This began sleazy and became progressively more
squalid. Four women wrestlers slump into their rat infested locker room in
Cementville, Tennessee, which is a dead ringer for Pittsville, Arizona. One
has problems with drink; one with money; one with girl friends. The other is
black, a big enough problem in Tennessee. None has problems talking dirty.
There is something irresistibly visual about plays featuring women
wrestlers: think of Trafford Tanzi. But there the actresses were ring wise;
this bunch were unconvincing experts in the head butt or the half nelson.
Writer Jane Martin enthusiastically throws in schlock after schlock, notably
the Knockout Sisters, a tag team of druggies called in as crowd pleasers,
whose mother herds them into the ring shouting 'Do it for the white trash'.
What with a bitten off penis; a crushed pet dog; shootings and strips; drugs
and dementia, Cementville has all the charm and delicacy of cock fighting in
the back of beyond. And yet . . . it has a certain hysterical vivacity and
with more confident actors would travel well.
Australians are currently racked with guilt at the treatment of the
Aboriginal peoples. There is one positive result - every encouragement is
given to Aboriginal artists to reach an audience. The Perth based Black Swan
Theatre asked one Aboriginal, Jack Davis, to write a loosely
autobiographical play which is performed by another, Stephen Albert, and
directed by a third, Andrew Ross.
Wahngin Country, which translates as 'Talking Country', offers the insights
of an Aboriginal vagrant. We meet him, literally, first waking up in the
bushes in the campus of the University of West Australia and then follow him
across its lawns to the bench where he passes the day. This is a monologue
of the half life of the urbanised, culturally bereft, black man, accompanied
by a plaintive didgeridoo. The trouble is that such a life is necessarily
boring. His best friends, as he points out, are Johnny Walker, Jack Daniel
and Jim Beam, his adventures as limited as his possibilities. Occasionally
Davis allows his character to break into poetry and then you can catch the
folk memories of a lost race. But Wahngin Country never quite becomes drama,
staying an interesting diversion on a warm Australian night.
On a modest budget, Perth provides a leisurely, civilised, arts festival. It
loses some vivacity by hiving off its fringe, Artrage, to another part of
the year, and although it makes obvious financial sense to share overseas
arts troupes with Adelaide - 16 events featured at both festivals - it
lessens its impact. But then Perth is quite happy to be the city apart,
looking geographically and economically towards South-east Asia rather than
the Pacific, certain that its well mannered rhythms of life are far
preferable to the gaudy frenzy of distant Sydney.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1892</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJADPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Arts: Home sweet home - Off the wall
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTONY THORNCROFT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FORGET GALAS at the Garden, or exclusive parties at Glyndebourne: the latest
buzz in arts sponsorship is decidedly populist. BT and Mobil have just
launched on to the market tours of two of the oldest warhorses in the
theatrical repertoire, Agatha Christie's Witness for the Prosecution and
Brandon Thomas's Charley's Aunt.
The companies are not Angels; they are not so silly as to invest in either
play. Instead they are giving Pounds 100,000 (plus in Mobil's case another
Pounds 100,000 to spread the promotional word) to independent producers for
the joy of being associated with the projects  - and to ensure that they
succeed.
Touring is a very expensive and risky business these days with the result
that theatregoers outside London rarely get to see a play with more than one
set and a handful of actors. Witness, which boasts a cast of 22 (including
prominent TV names like John Barron and Prunella Gee) and two sets, has not
been on the road for almost two decades, while Charley's Aunt travels with
ten players, including Frank Windsor and Gabriella Drake, and three sets.
They are penetrating to places which have not seen such extravagance for
years.
Witness in particular is an heroic venture, on the road for over 40 weeks
rather than the usual 12, and playing theatres in Inverness, Lincoln, and
the like. Some are so small that producer Charles Vance reckons he would
lose Pounds 9,000 even with every seat sold: the BT money makes it feasible.
Both companies will use the plays for some gentle local hospitality, but the
main thrust is to prove to employees, who will receive discounted tickets,
and shareholders, that sponsoring the arts is not an elitist indulgence for
the directors but a joy for all.
For BT the switch is particularly pointed. Until this year the plays it
progressed throughout the land were by Shakespeare and were performed by the
RSC. The RSC is still looking for an alternative sponsor with Pounds 185,000
to finance its threatened small venue regional tour of Richard III.
Stoll-Moss seemed happy this week with the Pounds 12.8m it got from selling
its freehold of the Coliseum to its tenants, English National Opera. It
reckoned that its chances of getting a worthwhile increase in the Pounds
350,000 annual rent after the expiry of the ENO lease in 1996 were low, and
that the outcry that would have followed the eviction of the company, and
the challenge of finding another tenant for a huge, listed, national
treasure, were frightening.
Anyway, Janet Holmes a Court, the Australian who owns Stoll-Moss since the
death of her husband, is a theatrical groupie, sympathetic to the future of
the ENO. At the moment her artistic and financial interests go nicely hand
in hand. The West End is riding the recession fairly well and January was
the best ever month financially for Stoll-Moss. There is no intention of
selling off any of the eleven theatres left in the group. Indeed the hunt is
on for new purchases.
This is proving a pleasantly traumatic month for the ENO. Last week it
announced 'Visions and Voices', its attempt to get pop composers to develop
along operatic lines. Last Tuesday it received its freehold. And on Thursday
it announced Almeida Opera, a co-venture with the Almeida Theatre. This is a
July festival of two contemporary operas, one with music by Nigel Osborne
and words by Howard Barker, based on the life of Goya, and another, Mario
and the Magician by Stephen Oliver, which has been waiting some time for a
British premiere.
This is a happy event for both companies. The Almeida received some rare
criticism last year when it axed its contemporary music festival - it can
now satisfy this select audience - while the Contemporary Opera Studio at
the ENO has largely been confined to weekend workshops in rural retreats; it
now gets a London showcase. If the response is good these small scale operas
will tour the country and enter the international arts festival circuit.
It will be nice if they have some future since the 19-day event is costing
over Pounds 300,000. The fact that contemporary composers are prepared to
labour long to create works with such a limited guaranteed life span
underlines their poor job opportunities. As things are the festival is still
not fully funded. It is looking for a donor with Pounds 50,000 to make
possible the planned production of Mary of Egypt, with music by John Tavener
and words by Mother Thelka. Mother Thelka is the abbess of a Yorkshire
monastery and has become the favoured lyricist for Tavener, who now
concentrates on religious music.
With such a flood of announcements ENO has cancelled the big annual event
scheduled for next week - the disclosure of its financial statement and
artistic plans. Nothing sinister in that. Director Peter Jonas expects to
show a profit on a difficult year. There is also a good chance that he will
make life even harder for Covent Garden by using the money the ENO saves on
paying rent to reduce ticket prices.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1893</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJADOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Books: The FO mandarins decoded - Robert Mauthner enjoys
some diplomatic inside knowledge
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT MAUTHNER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
INSIDE THE FOREIGN OFFICE by John Dickie Chapmans Pounds 20, 338 pages
MORE THAN any department of state, the Foreign and Commonwealth Office has
succeeded in shrouding itself in an aura of mystique and elitism which has
elicited both the admiration and irritation of the public and Parliament. In
the words of the latest work attempting to break down its hallowed portals:
'Those on the inside are bound by a code of confidentiality which inhibits
the disclosure of affairs of state in any detail that might be damaging to
the best interests of the country. Those on the outside . . . are not
normally trusted to have access to anything or anyone in the Foreign Office
which could result in the outside world getting to know what is really going
on inside.'
Things are not quite as bad as they are sometimes painted, however. Foreign
Office mandarins, though often imbued with a sense of their own superiority
 -just like those of the Treasury or the grands corps in France - have
proved to be more accessible during the last decade or two. Nowadays, some
are even prepared to talk to journalists they know well, ('off the record,'
of course), though the knowledge imparted in these conversations is only
rarely of the kind to produce banner headlines.
John Dickie, the immensely experienced, if sometimes endearingly irascible,
Diplomatic Correspondent of the Daily Mail from 1960 until his retirement
last year, has been more successful than most of his fellow mortals in
penetrating the veils of secrecy which envelop Sir Giles Gilbert Scott's
impressive Victorian palace in King Charles Street. One of the last of the
dying breed of Fleet Street prima donnas, Dickie, habitually sporting a
carnation even in the desert, can claim to have covered most of the major
international events and conferences of the last 30 years. He has liberally
drawn on his long experience, complemented by as many as 150 interviews with
senior diplomats, international civil servants and politicians, in his book,
Inside the Foreign Office.
This is a painstaking and thoroughly researched study of both the way the FO
works, the personalities and policies of the Foreign Secretaries who have
led it, from Lord Home to Mr Douglas Hurd, and some of the most dramatic
events in which they and their officials were the leading actors, the work
highlights both the department's strengths and weaknesses.
In particular, Dickie tempers his admiration for the intellectual brilliance
of some of the most outstanding mandarins of the period covered - Sir
Nicholas Fenn, Sir Michael Palliser, Sir David Hannay, Sir John Kerr, to
name but a few of those earning a place in the author's hall of fame - with
telling statistics underlining the restrictive nature of the FO's
recruitment system. In spite of recent efforts to broaden the selection
process, the great majority of candidates recommended for appointments in
the Diplomatic Service - about 70 per cent over the last few years - still
come from Oxford or Cambridge, while women continue to obtain no more than
30 per cent of the places , at the very most. Without professing to be a
political history of the 30-year period during which the author had a
grandstand view of the conduct of British foreign policy, the book affords
some illuminating insights into what happened behind the scenes of major
events. The patience and dedication shown by Lord Carrington and his
officials, including the present Ambassador to the US, Sir Robin Renwick, in
negotiating against tremendous odds the Lancaster House agreement leading to
the independence of Zimbabwe, is analysed in some detail, as is the same
Foreign Secretary's failure to read the writing on the wall before the
Argentine invasion of the Falklands.
As one would expect from a journalist, amusing anecdotes are not lacking
about 'the helmsmen' at the Foreign Office, but he never descends into
caricature. Thus Lord Home, whose nomination as Foreign Secretary in 1960 by
Harold Macmillan was described by the Daily Mirror as 'the most reckless
political appointment since the Roman Emperor Caligula made his favourite
horse a consul,' is shown to be a particularly tough and effective
negotiator with the Russians, as demonstrated by his expulsion of 105
suspected Soviet agents. Neither is George Brown's often intemperate
behaviour allowed to distort the picture of a Foreign Secretary
wholeheartedly dedicated to getting Britain into the European Community.
The much-publicised conflicts between the Foreign Office and 10 Downing
Street during Margaret Thatcher's last years of office are put in their
proper historical perspective. The author stresses that this phenomenon is
nothing new. Churchill dominated Eden at the Foreign Office, while he, in
turn, did the same to Selwyn Lloyd. Wilson did not hesitate to take over
foreign policy in spite of the resentment of his Foreign Secretaries Michael
Stewart and George Brown. But at the end of the day, even Mrs Thatcher
surrounded herself with Foreign Office mandarins as her close advisers,
including, notably, her all-powerful private secretary, Charles Powell. She
may not have liked the institution, but she certainly respected and liked
its top of the range products.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1894</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJADNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Books: Movie anecdotes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIGEL ANDREWS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FRED ZINNEMANN: AN AUTOBIOGRAPHY by Fred Zinnemann Bloomsbury Pounds 25, 254
pages
LIFE IS TOO SHORT by Mickey Rooney Hutchinson Pounds 16.99, 367 pages
NO MINOR CHORDS by Andre Previn Doubleday Pounds 14.99, 148 pages
CRONENBERG ON CRONENBERG edited by Chris Rodley Faber Pounds 12.99, 190
pages
MOVIE autobiographies are one of the mysteries of the age. Why do sensible
people like you or I squander our hard-earned book tokens on the burblings
of Filmdom's famous, few of whom can string together a cogent literate
sentence?
Yet whenever stars and directors let the air out of their egos in print,
they find a queue of fans anxious for the exhalations. Fred Zinnemann's new
autobiography helps to explain why. Although at first glance the book seems
little more than 200 pages of mild-mannered reminiscence, which 'grew out of
conversations with the film critic Alexander Walker', there are seams of
gold.
First, the reminiscences are adorned with photographs, many taken by
Zinnemann or from his own collection. Here are the visual footnotes to movie
history: Gary Cooper lunching on location with the cast and crew of High
Noon (his frowning gaze zeroes in on what looks like gopher stew and
dumplings); Jane Fonda in Julia playing a scene with an unknown newcomer
called Meryl Streep; an unknown camera assistant called Nicolas Roeg, later
to direct Don't Look Now, looking pensive on the set of The Sundowners; a
not-unknown Frank Sinatra acting up between takes on From Here To Eternity .
. .
Minor revelations, but they add up. So do the trouvailles in the text. Did
you know that Zinnemann was an extra in All Quiet On The Western Front? That
Harry Cohn once defined a documentary as 'a picture without women.' That
Joan Crawford was first choice for Deborah Kerr's saucy role in From Here To
Eternity? That the Method-trained Rod Steiger unbalanced Oklahoma] in
Zinnemann's view by acting too sympathetically as the pantomimic villain
Jud. That Zinnemann walked out on directing Hemingway's The Old Man And The
Sea when the studio wanted to use a motor-driven dummy marlin?
Anecdotes. But the anecdotes work at recontouring film history. They may
also recontour Fred Zinnemann's place in that history. Not because the
author blows trumpets on his own behalf: his style is as self-effacing with
pen as with camera. But Zinnemann's undervalued moral honesty, also as
evident on page as on screen, looks more appealing as time moves on.
High Noon, his best film, was once the butt of right-wing ridicule for its
syndicalist-socialist picture of a sheriff who needed - or thought he needed
 -his townspeople's aid to quash the incoming baddies. Howard Hawks,
outraged at this insult to the lonely hero of Western myth, made Rio Bravo
as a riposte: a film in which John Wayne goes around town refusing people's
help. But today, like all Zinnemann's best work, High Noon has the
simplicity and integrity of great realism. It is the film of a man who grew
up knowing tyranny, in an Austria threatened with Nazism, and who learned
that popular entertainment could be as potent a weapon as any in fighting
it.
The 'Why do we buy?' test applied to Mickey Rooney's Life Is Too Short gets
a different answer. Yes, here is cinema history re-mapped. We have candid
pal's-eye glimpses of Judy Garland, Ava Gardner (first wife), Frank Sinatra
(first wife's third husband) and others in that incestuous Lotusland we call
Hollywood. But no, this autobiography tells us nothing about Rooney himself
except that being Irish he will talk you into the floorboards.
The writing style is out of another Mickey (Spillane) by the News of the
World. 'Cannons exploded in my brain. When the cannons stopped, I leaned
over and embraced Ava. I moved my lips close to hers and then, for the first
time, she opened her mouth to mine and we tasted each other. I explored her
mouth and she explored mine. Our passion grew . . .'
Soon with one bound they are tearing off each other's filmy garments and
declaring eternal love. The marriage lasted just under a year. Why do we buy
this book? Because beneath the catchpenny style and revolving-door romances
there are peer-group glimpses of the famous or fascinating - Gable, Chaplin,
Astaire, the young Elizabeth Taylor - that we will find nowhere else.
Andre Previn's No Minor Chords needs no cine-archaeologist's reason to read.
This portrait of the artist as a young Hollywood composer (1948-1964) is
mischievously entertaining. Previn, who bears a physical resemblance to a
mouse in search of high-quality cheese, knows a tasty story too. As in
Rooney's book, everyone in and around Hollywood seems to connect up with
everyone else.
Here are LB Mayer trashing Jascha Heifetz ('He shouldn't play pieces no
one's ever heard of]' he grumbles after hearing the Sibelius Violin Concerto
at the Hollywood Bowl); the penny-pinching Heifetz himself holding a yard
sale of the gifts he has received on concert tours; Heifetz's friend Arnold
Schoenberg all but setting the dog on Previn after being beaten by him at
ping-pong . . . Plus Sam Goldwyn delivering Goldwynisms, art connoisseur
Billy Wilder being chastised by his wife for buying Egon Schieles ('Good
God, Billy, just once can't you buy a landscape') and Vincente Minnelli
having a peacock poked in the behind so it will fan its tail for a crucial
scene in Gigi. All human life, and more.
It is a far cry from the cerebral memoirs of scream specialist David
Cronenberg. In Cronenberg On Cronenberg the director of The Fly, Dead
Ringers and the forthcoming Naked Lunch talks about the art of horror, the
horror of art (in his native Canada) and the reason why it does us good to
contemplate murder, mutilation and mutation. Why should you buy this book?
Because it shows that 'down-market' movie genres can sometimes be explored
and enriched by an up-market movie intelligence.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1895</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJADMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Books: 'Fall and Expulsion of Adam and Eve'
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The newly cleaned 'Fall and Expulsion of Adam and Eve' by Michelangelo in
the Sistine Chapel, Rome, taken from an new, illustrated book by Robin
Richmond 'Michelangelo and the Creation of the Sistine Chapel' (Barrie &amp;
Jenkins, Pounds 18.99)
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1896</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJADLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Books: Courage to stay out of the closet
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL DRIVER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EUROPEAN GAY REVIEW, VOLS 8/9 Verlaine-Rimbaud Publishers Pounds 11.95
WOULD YOU read a journal with such a title in the crowded compartment of a
train? It is a sad truth, but as editor Salvatore Santagati has found to his
literal cost, the blazoned word 'gay' is a great loser of subscriptions. I
put myself to the test for the purposes of this review, and only with
difficulty restrained the impulse to hide the cover of this thick new double
issue as I browsed through it on the Northern Line.
That is a pity, for Santagati has created and sustained (for some six years
now) an interesting, readable, importantly eclectic and cosmopolitan
publication, always conscientiously 'European' if not outrightly global,
'gay' in an unfrivolous, untitillating, wide-ranging sense. The epithet here
betokens an informing sensibility rather than an absolute specificity of
subject matter or a political project, and though the various essays,
stories and poems tend to further the journal's ongoing broad inquiry into
homosexuality, they are offered firstly for their literary merit, and ask to
be read by all.
For a time Santagati agonized about the propriety of dropping the troublous
titular word altogether - plain The European Review would still be an honest
description of the organ - and it was not an Arts Council funding
stipulation or anything like that which induced him to keep it, but a belief
in sticking to his guns. In fact he has ceased applying for Arts Council
support: meeting the bureaucratic conditions cost more money than the grants
were worth. The Review does attract a small amount of approving high-class
sponsorship, notably from Yves Saint-Laurent; but essentially it has to pay
its own way, and apparently breaks even.
Among our enduring literary journals - they are precious few - the EGR
stands out both for its content and elegant design. William Cookson's Agenda
and Miron Grindea's Adam have alike an appearance of white plainness, and
the content of the respective latest issues might be described in a not
dissimilar way. The London Magazine looks smarter and maintains a certain
interest, but is almost too old a friend now; while Granta has succumbed to
glossiness both of form and content.
I should declare my hand - I have contributed to a previous issue of the
EGR. But I do not think I am biased in singling out the journal's appearance
for praise, or in suggesting that its content is more wide-ranging and
rewardingly unpredictable than that of its rivals. I have in any case
criticisms on both counts. For instance, though the cover, type-face and
illustrations of the latest issue are beautifully chosen, the text itself is
a litter of misprints, a record of over-hasty proofing.
The contributions are as stimulatingly varied as in previous volumes. Big
names are again jostled by lesser ones, and the majority of items are
special to their context rather than Granta-like slices of forthcoming
books. Santagati has been remarkably successful in persuading famous writers
to produce for him, Thom Gunn's essay on Allen Ginsberg in Volume 5 being an
outstanding example; and if there is nothing here of quite that calibre, we
can satisfy ourselves with translations of work by three distinguished
deceased Italians: poems and a little story by Sandro Penna, a letter to
Penna by Eugenio Montale ('I love your aphrodisiac poetry a lot'), and a
vivid emotional review of Penna's stories by Pier Paolo Pasolini.
There is a substantial chunk of the editor himself - two stories, a suite of
poems and photographs, and a reworking of a passage from St. Augustine.
Santagati is an Italian who has elected to write in English as a matter of
creative vocation, and achieved results that, while often risking bathos,
have a raw and sensual directness of utterance and a formal simplicity that
are original. 'Frosted Eyes' does not quite work as a story but powerfully
expresses an appalled urban weariness. The autobiographical 'A First Spring
in Sicily' is the pure quivering of an unbandaged soul.
Perhaps the editor obtrudes himself more than is seemly; but there are many
other items here to ponder on, whether Andrew Holleran's amusing and sad New
York story, 'Pornography and Funerals', Gregory Woods's discussion of the
poetry of Yannis Ritsos, the fiction and conversation of Swiss writer
Christoph Geiser, or Jeremy Reed's fruitcake of an essay about Proust's
reliance on drugs. One will after all be too absorbed in reading to notice
the looks of strangers on a train.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1897</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJADKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Books: Desert cities gamble with change
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEPHEN AMIDON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ALL RIGHT, OKAY, YOU WIN: INSIDE LAS VEGAS by David Spanier Secker &amp; Warburg
Pounds 16.99, 275 pages
LOS ANGELES: CAPITAL OF THE THIRD WORLD by David Rieff Jonathan Cape Pounds
17.99, 270 pages
UNLIKE WRITERS such as Tom Wolfe or Hunter Thompson, who see Las Vegas as an
opportunity for satire, David Spanier chooses to give us the straight dope
on the place in his loving, informal account, All Right, Okay, You Win:
Inside Las Vegas. Casting his eye over its daily life, he depicts a city
that is shedding its image as a venal pleasure dome in an effort to become
legitimate. Gone are the days when Bugsy Siegel and his mobster friends ran
the casinos, now replaced by corporate-minded, law-abiding entrepreneurs
whose 'family entertainment centers' just happen to include slot machines
and poker baize. And instead of some pin-striped Mafioso at the baccarat
table you are more likely to see a grim Japanese businessman.
The irony of all this legitimacy, of course, is that a high-tech,
squeaky-clean Las Vegas might be a contradiction in terms. By replacing Tony
the Ant and Jimmy the Weasel with Mickey the Mouse, the people who run Vegas
may be sacrificing the city's unique allure in order to make it just another
knob on America's increasingly bland national entertainment console.
Spanier chronicles this metamorphosis with an unblinking, kindly eye. He is
as good on the small print as he is on the big picture, showing us, for
instance, the distinctly unglamorous life of the 'soiled doves', the
prostitutes who work more or less legally on the Strip as an adjunct to the
gambling. There is also a fascinating chapter on sign making, which has
grown into a multi-million dollar business as rival casinos try to out-shine
one another with garish neon creations. Spanier is at his best describing
the mechanics of gambling, showing how the big casinos walk a fine line
between fleecing their customers and treating them like gods. In Vegas, it
would seem, chance is an exact science - it is no surprise to learn in this
lively, informative book that the man hired to design the modern slot
machine was an engineer who had previously spent 20 years at NASA.
David Rieff's Los Angeles: Capital of the Third World depicts another desert
city undergoing rapid transformation. Rieff's premise is that LA, swamped by
immigrants from the Third World, will soon be a non-white, non-Eurocentric
city with closer ties to Tokyo and Mexico than London or New York. Resident
whites are confronting this fact with varying degrees of bemusement, from
those who throw up electric fences around their properties in anticipation
of a coming race war to others who see it as a blessed opportunity to
recruit cheap household help (who are now referred to as 'enablers', as in
'now that I have a maid, I'm able to take up jogging'.) Either way, it is a
change that even the most blinkered of Beverly Hills residents is going to
have to confront eventually.
Rieff's account is exhaustive and often fascinating, offering up compelling
facts such as the astonishing news that the LA public school system now has
pupils who speak 82 different languages. He is also very good at portraying
the rather pathetic attempts of liberal whites to deal with the changing
face of their city - sampling spicy cuisines and mariachis music seems to
suffice for most. And yet, though he is alive to the dangers inherent in
this demographic upheaval, Rieff remains bullish on its possibilities,
seeing the legendary sunniness and mutability of native Angelenos as well
suiting them for finally adapting to the inevitable.
What is lacking here is a view from the 'other side'. By relying so heavily
on statistics, published sources and interviews with resident whites, Rieff
fails to give a clear sense of what exactly it is that LA's new immigrants
are searching for. The emphasis on trend spotting and incisive sociology
results in a strangely underpopulated book; a few case studies on individual
immigrants would have helped provide a picture of the faces behind the
numbers. After all, it is easy to assume they all want a piece of the
American Pie: the question that remains unanswered in this otherwise fine
book is what sort of pie that might be once somebody else is doing the
cooking.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1898</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJADJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Books: A many-sided man of letters - An admirable new
edition of Johnson's correspondence
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY CURTIS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE LETTERS OF SAMUEL JOHNSON: VOLUMES I-III, 1731-1781 edited by Bruce
Redford Oxford Pounds 25 each, c400 pages
THE JOURNALS OF JAMES BOSWELL 1761-1795 selected and introduced by John Wain
Heinemann Pounds 20, 412 pages
THE POPULAR conception of Dr Johnson, derived from Boswell's Life, as the
great fulminator and layer down of the law, becomes modified when his
letters are read consecutively. A new edition of his correspondence, the
most complete so far, brings out the many-sidedness of the man: Johnson the
loving husband with a sick wife, replaced soon by Johnson the widower who is
in spite of his own grief a constant support and morale-raiser for his
friends and fellow authors, men and women. Then there is Johnson the
freelance who is his own literary agent; and Johnson the dedicated classical
scholar, part of an erudite network of friends and colleagues regularly
exchanging information. All these Johnsons come through more powerfully than
ever before.
Many of the letters are well-known - not just from previous scholarly
editions, mainly the one in 1952 from Oxford by RW Chapman - but also from
Boswell and from being printed in full in books such as John Wain's Johnson
on Johnson where the texts of letters are taken from the Chapman edition.
'Chapman', said Wain, 'worked on Johnson's letters from 1919 to 1952; what
he did not know about them, I for one am content to go on not knowing.'
Not everyone, though, was so content with the Chapman edition. The American
Johnson specialist Bruce Redford, professor of English at the University of
Chicago, has been hard at work with his students for many years on an
entirely new edition of the letters of Johnson and now we have before us the
bulk of it in three volumes. This is called the Hyde Edition: it derives
from the Hyde Collection partly formed by Mary Hyde Eccles (Lady Eccles)
without whose scholarly enthusiasm this new edition would not have been
possible.
The first volume begins in 1731: Johnson, recently down from Oxford without
a degree, writes from Lichfield to Edward Cave, editor of The Gentleman's
Magazine, trying to interest him in taking some work. By the third volume
Johnson has become a famous man, having made his name with the appearance of
his Dictionary in 1757. He writes in 1781 to his friend Mrs Thrale, the
brewer's widow, assuring her that his affection for her is not diminished.
Before his death three years later he will break with her completely.
Redford found Chapman's edition inadequate in several respects. In his three
volumes Chapman printed, all told, 1,515 Johnson letters. Redford has
discovered 52 more and he 'strongly doubts the authenticity' of four printed
by Chapman which he has dropped from the canon. A recurrent problem for any
editor is Johnson's hand-writing, which is often difficult to decipher.
Chapman spotted mistakes made by earlier editors but then went on to make
some of his own. His 'Mr J Combe', for example, in a letter of 1770, turns
out in reality to have been Henry Thrale's nephew, Ralph Plumbe.
Clearly then, Chapman's has now been superseded by this new edition. It will
be completed by a further two volumes in 1994, one of letters from 1782-84,
and one containing appendices and a comprehensive index. The ordinary reader
will wish to ask, is all this no doubt admirable scholarly work of editing
going to alter our view of Johnson radically? Many of the texts of the
letters do in fact appear here in exactly the words they appeared hitherto,
including such famous letters as the one in February 1755 to Chesterfield
about the Dictionary ('Seven years, my Lord have now past since I waited in
your outward Rooms or was repulsed from your Door . . .') and the one to
James Macpherson of January 1975 in which Johnson spiritedly refused to
retract a single word of his view that the Ossian manuscripts never existed
and that the whole thing was a fraud - as indeed it was.
Nonetheless, Redford says of his edition that it 'aims ultimately to provide
the materials for a fresh assessment of Samuel Johnson, man of letters'.
Previous editors have, in Redford's view, seriously misinterpreted Johnson's
tone in his letters to Hester Thrale, and by reading them in this edition we
may now see how crucial these letters were to Johnson's discovery of his own
potential. They do not represent a great man humouring a tiresome woman, as
earlier editors tended to think, but are evidence of a deep mutual bond.
Among the material not included at all in Chapman, there are printed here 12
letters to the novelist Charlotte Lennox, author of The Females Quixote.
These, says Redford are 'outstanding in biographical significance'.
The Lennox Collection of 42 letters came to light in the Dunfermline branch
of a Scottish bank in 1964 and was acquired by the Houghton Library, where
the letters were edited and published by Duncan Isles. His work is fully
acknowledged in the copious footnotes to the Hyde Edition. When read in
Isles's edition in the Harvard Library Bulletin, the dozen Johnson letters
in the Collection - the ones printed here by Redford - are seen to dovetail
with letters to Mrs Lennox from several other eminent men, such as Lord
Orrery, David Garrick, Samuel Richardson, 18th century English gentlemen who
went out of their way to aid this gifted woman writer.
This is not to underestimate the importance of placing those letters written
specifically by Johnson to Mrs Lennox in the chronological context of his
entire correspondence and to find confirmed the admiration that he had for
her lively mind. This enhanced view of their relations is one of the fresh
perspectives opened for all Johnsonians by the appearance of this new
edition.
Johnson and Boswell speak nowadays with two different voices to two
different audiences. One voice addresses the professors and post-graduate
students whose field is 18th century English literature. The other voice
speaks to the audience represented by - in Johnson's own words - the common
reader. Boswell's journals have always been issued in two separate editions,
a popular one with a minimum of apparatus, and a scholarly one with the full
panoply of footnotes and textual glosses.
The latest book in the popular series is the one-volume selection from all
previous editions of Boswell's journals edited by John Wain. Boswell's
amorous hopes and disappointments, encounters with the famous and the lowly,
as he set them down, are one of the greatest literary bombshells to have
exploded in our century. From them Boswell emerged as a person in his own
right quite separate from Johnson. We can conveniently sample his whole
character here.
A sense of the need for a book about Johnson not seen exclusively through
the eyes of Boswell prompted Wain to write a fresh life of Johnson in 1974
and in 1976 to edit the book Johnson on Johnson (the 1000th volume in
Everyman's Library). The common reader might find the view from its nursery
slopes a useful preliminary vantage-point before scaling the majestic
heights of Redford's great new edition of Johnson's letters.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1899</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJADIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Books: Inside the mind of an elusive president
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ZARA STEINER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE JUGGLER: FRANKLYN ROOSEVELT AS WARTIME STATESMAN by Warren F Kimball
Princeton Pounds 16, 304 pages
WARREN KIMBALL, an American diplomatic historian best known for his
definitive edition of the Churchill-Roosevelt letters, has set himself what
many would consider an impossible task. He has sought to identify the basic
assumptions that underlay Franklyn D Roosevelt's wartime diplomacy and
post-war strategy.
Kimball argues throughout this collection of individual essays written at
different times that, behind the President's rhetorical posturings and
tactical manoeuverings, there was a constancy of purpose. By looking at the
broad shape and long-term intentions of Roosevelt's specific policies,
Kimball convincingly lays to rest the old canard that the President was
merely reacting to daily events; but he also attempts the far more difficult
task of defining 'the juggler's' vision of the post-war world, an amalgam
between the ideological, the pragmatic and the practical which Kimball calls
'Roosevelt's Americanism'.
Each essay, based on extensive work in the American archives and with a
broad knowledge of the Anglo-American secondary literature, has been
reworked to throw new light on the central theme. Kimball writes with verve
and energy ; even the extensive footnotes hold one's attention. This book is
guaranteed to provoke debate but of a productive kind that will interest
British as well as American readers.
If there was a consistency in Roosevelt's activities, it was neither obvious
to his wartime allies or even to his fellow citizens. From his own studies
of lend-lease and the Morganthau Plan that defeated Germany, Kimball is
fully familiar with the strongly supported case for Roosevelt's elusiveness
and changeability. The president's treatment of Churchill and Stalin was
such a strange combination of ruthless realism and egoistic optimism that
conventional characterisations have to be abandoned. Roosevelt's hopes that
the 'good neighbours' policy of the western hemisphere would become the
model for relations between the great and small countries in the rest of the
world involved a whole range of unspoken assumptions that have to be teased
out of the president's wartime policies.
Kimball rightly insists on Roosevelt's central role in directing American
diplomacy despite the smokescreen with which he often surrounded himself. A
surprisingly good case is made for the president's consistent espousal of
certain causes: his strong and continuous opposition to colonialism and his
belief that decolonisation and independence would be an inevitable result of
the war. In this essay on 'Roosevelt and Colonialism' and in his treatment
of the president's appraisal of the Soviet Union's future importance in
maintaining the European peace, Kimball makes large claims for Roosevelt's
prescience.
It is certainly true that some of the assumptions behind Roosevelt's
actions, whether successful or not, appear to have been vindicated by the
events of the last years. Roosevelt assumed that the Soviet Union would
recognise in time the virtues and superiority of the American system and
would eventually follow the paths of democracy, capitalism and free trade.
Similarly, the Russians, eastern Europe and the British, freed from their
crippling colonial inheritance, would learn from the special relationship
that the US had created with their continental neighbours. Roosevelt's
post-war planning envisioned evolutionary change though hardly, in the
Soviet case, the 40 years it has taken.
The Cold War years pushed Franklyn Roosevelt off the centre of the
historical stage. Our present image of the president, both in terms of his
domestic and foreign policy, was fashioned in the 1960s when the New Deal
and Roosevelt's Soviet strategy was subjected to scathing criticism. These
diplomatic essays may represent the beginning of a more balanced
appreciation of this great, if highly controversial, leader.
Kimball's attempt to systematise Roosevelt's thinking , as the very title of
his book acknowledges, is bound to be flawed. Roosevelt never articulated a
cohesive philosophy and prided himself on his unusual dexterity. Essays of
this kind are suggestive rather than conclusive, and so this rethinking of
Roosevelt's war aims is to be warmly welcomed but the verdict remains 'not
proven'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1900</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJADHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Books: Aspects of love . . .
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By AC GRAYLING
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LOVE AND ITS PLACE IN NATURE by Jonathan Lear Faber &amp; Faber Pounds 20, 243
pages
IN THIS brilliant and imaginative reworking of the central ideas of Freudian
theory the philosopher Jonathan Lear arrives at surprising and optimistic
conclusions about the human condition. This is a book which is destined to
provoke controversy, not just among those with a lively professional
interest in its theses, but among the general educated readership for which
it is written.
Freud's revolutionary ideas contain, says Lear, three elements: a science of
subjectivity; the discovery of an archaic form of mental functioning; and
the positing of a basic force of nature. Lear argues that the significance
of these ideas was not fully apparent to Freud himself, because his orthodox
attitude to science, understood on the positivist model as the discovery of
facts in an objective world, prevented him from grasping the true nature of
the unconscious mind and its relation to conscious mental activity. A
'science of subjectivity' cannot proceed in the standard objectivist way,
Lear argues; understanding mental life requires a different approach. His
reworking of Freud's theory provides him with the premises for his striking
new suggestions about what such an approach involves.
For Freud, the unconscious contains fully-formed thoughts which their owner
represses because he cannot bear to acknowledge them. Curing someone of
psychological illness is accordingly a process of bringing repressed
thoughts to light so that they can be accepted. For Lear, by contrast, the
unconscious is not a repository of repressed thoughts but an 'archaic' mind;
it is the locus of primitive, inarticulate, preconceptual mental activity,
which can only be brought into consciousness by a process of development
rendering it capable of clear expression. Psychosomatic symptoms and the
content of dreams both furnish examples of archaic thinking. Resolving
difficulties which arise at this level involves not the uncovering of
fully-formed thoughts, therefore, but evolution of the primitive mental
material into more developed form, resulting in a unification of thought and
feeling which enables the sufferer to understand, and therefore to be freed
from, the cause of his suffering. For Lear, as for Jung, psychoanalysis
cures by bringing understanding, which in turn results from the cultivation
into consciousness of what was hitherto inchoate.
Lear's rethinking of Freud's concepts of the unconscious and the nature of
psychoanalytic therapy provides him with materials for what he takes to be
an even more important task: understanding how healthy individuals evolve.
Freud had postulated a powerful force in nature which he called 'Eros', love
or the life force, a pervasive expression of which is sexuality, but which
he also characterised as love for parents, siblings, friends, and the world
at large. In an absorbing discussion Lear argues that this principle is
central to an explanation of how people achieve individuality, developing
away from their primitive identification with others - typically, their
parents - and acquiring a full conception of the self. This happens, says
Lear, not as a result of the frustrations which in Freud's theory prompt the
'reality principle,' but - precisely the reverse - because the development
of the infant's conscious mind is stimulated by his parents' responses to
his needs for nourishment, comfort and information. A satisfactory parent is
one who meets such needs, thereby ensuring that a normal history of survival
and growth unfolds. Because children die if they are not well-enough fed,
tended and informed, it is a condition of their existence that the world
should be a loving enough place to make their existence possible. Moreover,
as the child matures further, not just his parents but his world must be
concerned and responsive enough to his changing needs for that development
to continue. Since people achieve individuality only if the world is a
loving enough place, and since most people do indeed mature, it follows that
the world is, in at least the right degree, a loving world. And since
individual development is a two-way process, with the growing individual
caring about and interacting with the world, the world in its turn must
likewise be lovable.
This is the surprising and optimistic result of Lear's ingenious argument
and if it is right, we are much mistaken about the kind of world we inhabit.
He is a highly skilful philosopher. His fluent handling of the
psychoanalytic literature in general and Freud in particular is equally
skilful and assured. He has given us an exciting, original, highly readable
book which is bound to spur debate and to change thinking in both philosophy
and psychoanalysis about the nature of personhood and its relation to the
world.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1901</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJADGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Travel: Hard ride on the world's highest road - Andrew
Anderson climbs the Khyber Pass and travels across northern Pakistan in
search of Shangri-La
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW ANDERSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT WAS all too perfect. The moon hung heavy over the governor's mansion.
Peacocks strutted on verdant lawns. The elite of the Khyber Rifles Regiment
brought down the flag. The Last Post echoed mournfully. And the governor's
servants, dressed in sculpted turbans resembling upturned candelabra, served
us sandwiches with the crusts cut off.
The governor of the North West Frontier Province of Pakistan bore a
startling resemblance to Douglas Fairbanks Jnr. His pyjama suit was
beautifully cut, his moustache doubly so, and although the scene seemed
quintessential British Empire he looked proud of his new country and prouder
still of its past.
This was the centre of the ancient Buddhist kingdom of Gandhara. It was
overrun by the Kushans in the first century AD, brought under Moslem control
in the 11th century, then later governed - but never really conquered - by
the Moghul emperors, the Durranis of Afghanistan, the Sikhs of Lahore, and,
from 1849 to 1947, the British.
The latter, fearing a Russian invasion, tried to manipulate the
feud-obsessed Pathans by playing the myriad tribes off against one another.
They tried bribery, threats, taking hostages: the Pathans largely did their
own thing - mainly fighting among themselves and anyone else who got in
their way, often with murderous success. It was in this guerrilla-friendly
wilderness that the British swopped their bright red uniforms for
inconspicuous khaki, from the local word kakhi, meaning dusty.
Today Pathans still stroll through Peshawar, capital of the NWFP and home of
the governor, with rifles slung under their cloaks. The Russians have fled
neighbouring Afghanistan, but the Tribal Areas - backing on to the Afghan
border - are still full of tribal Mujahideen, now largely engaged in
smuggling and gun-running, still exchanging 'a blow for a pinch' in their
innumerable family feuds.
Peshawar is a town with a split personality: a modern university and a Pearl
Continental hotel, the serenity of the (British-built) Mall, and, in the Old
City, a mass of choked streets, rickety shops and wild-eyed Pathans. In the
Khyber Bazaar billboards depicting gory extractions point the way to the
street of dentists; brass and copper merchants beat a timpani of welcome off
Qissa Khawani Street; the money changers squat amid piles of filthy notes in
Chowk Yadgar, the central square, pocket calculators poised.
If the Pearl Continental is too bland, Dean's Hotel, on Islamia Road, offers
basic rooms with a touch of colonial nostalgia, plus the boast that 'Winston
Churchill slept here'. (He probably needed extra blankets). Salatin's, on
Cinema Road, offers first-class Pathan fare - meat kebabs, chicken shashlik:
vegetarians face a lean time in most of Pakistan.
Twenty kilometres from Peshawar, towards Afghanistan, lies the Khyber Pass.
Although officially off-limits, permits can be obtained through the Ministry
of Tribal Affairs in Peshawar. An armed escort is required, and the Pakistan
Tourist Development Corporation can help.
The road winds first past choked camps of Afghan refugees, outcasts from
their war-torn country and a terrible drain on Pakistan's economy. The
refugees have built their own areas of commerce, mainly smuggled goods
bearing western brand-names - there is even a Khyber Pass branch of 'Marks
and Spencers'.
The Pass starts at Jamrud Fort and climbs into the Tribal Area, nominally
under Pakistan control but a place that lives by its own laws. From the
plain great crags of jagged rock rise up to tear at the sky, the rocks
splintered by the heat and cold of furious seasons; nothing moves, nothing
appears to grow, or seems capable of survival in this awful wilderness.
Daubed on the rocks are regimental badges and mottoes of British regiments
which served there. One cannot imagine what the khaki'd youths from Devon or
Cheshire made of it all, alternately shivering and boiling in their
rock-hewn lookouts, waiting for the cold blade of a Pathan. The graves of
the victims (of cholera, mostly) dot the landscape.
The pass is now guarded by the Khyber Rifles, whose HQ is close to the top
of the pass. An eyrie of a border post overlooking a few miles of no-man's
land before the Afghan border marks the limit of lawfulness. Beyond this,
the tribespeople and Mujahideen come and go as they please, riding shotgun
in Japanese flatbed trucks, smuggling drugs and goods of every description
to the bazaar of Landi Kotal hard by the border post, where hashish is sold
by the bucketful and tourists' armed escorts nervously stick flowers in
their rifle barrels to show they come in peace.
There is peace aplenty further north than the NWFP: pincered between India
and the Chinese border, the Himalayas on one side and the Karakorams on the
other, lies the gorgeously rugged Northern Territory.
One of the world's most exciting commercial flights takes you - weather
permitting - from Islamabad to Skardu, flying towards K2 and past the
looming bulk of Nanga Parbat, before barrelling down a narrow valley,
turning on a sixpence and landing on a flood plain of the young River Indus,
2,300m above sea level, at Skardu, capital of Baltistan. The (heavily
subsidised) fare of Rs300 (Pounds 7) is a bargain.
Skardu is the gateway to some of the world's finest trekking and
mountaineering areas. The town is little more than a collection of shacks,
but the setting is spectacular: the great oval sand-basin of the Indus
floodplain, ringed by mountains on all sides, the bluest of skies. All sense
of perspective is lost amid the dizzying peaks.
Some 30km from Skardu, on the road to Gilgit, is the Shangri-La Tourist
Resort, an up-market hotel built in a style best described as mock-dodgy
Chinese, but in a gorgeous setting around icy Katchura Lake. Rooms start
from around Rs850; for a little more you can bed down in a converted Dakota
aircraft that crash-landed on the Indus sands in the 1970s and was hauled by
man-power to its present site.
Further north, pointing its pot-holed finger all the way to China and
beyond, lies the 1,000-km-long Karakoram Highway, acclaimed by Pakistan as
(yet another) Eighth Wonder of the World. This one almost deserves the
accolade: built over 20 years at a cost of hundreds of lives, it defies
countless earth tremors to provide a trade artery along a route that dates
further back than the Silk Road.
Driving up the KKH is a heart-stopping experience. The 'road' from Skardu to
Gilgit, which joins the KKH at the Alam Bridge, is a useful primer. It hugs
the Indus gorge all the way, carved or blasted out of the rock walls that
tower above it, with the river silently sweeping or raging and roaring
hundreds of metres below. Huge, gaily-painted lorries groan along its length
for days on end; meeting one requires the most delicate of passing
manoeuvres. Those wishing merely to be frightened should sit on the right of
the bus. Those wishing to be terrified should sit on the left.
Most travellers stop to de-jangle their nerves in the frontier town of
Gilgit before steeling themselves for the next leg of the KKH through Hunza
and on to the the snowbound Khunjerab Pass, at 5,275 metres the world's
highest metalled road. Gilgit has an interesting market, to which wiry
mountain men walk for days to sell their goats; a good modern hotel in the
Serena Lodge; and can be reached by a spectacular small-aircraft flight
(Rs245) from Islamabad, although this again often falls victim to bad
weather. Like Skardu, the setting is wonderful: the town is held hostage by
towering peaks.
Beyond Gilgit, the KKH is shadowed on the opposite bank of the Hunza River
by part of the original Silk Road, a dizzying goat track hacked into the
mountainsides and punctuated by now-rotten footbridges. Much of it has
disappeared, crumbled by earth tremors that strike this area of colliding
geological plates every three minutes. The KKH, too, is often blocked, but
quickly cleared by bulldozer. In one area hundreds of tiny garnets lie
scattered amid the debris in the road. You can gather handfuls, though it
will not make you rich: a polished string can be shop-bought for a few
pounds.
Past Rakaposhi (7,788 metres) the KKH wends into the wrenchingly-lovely
Hunza Valley, inspiration for Shangri-La in James Hilton's novel Lost
Horizon. After the desolation of the past hundred kilometres the valley
opens up like a dreamscape: tiny, terraced fields rippling down the
mountainsides, bordered by dry stone walls; graceful, slender poplar trees
slashing vertical accents in the crystal air; the peaks of Rakaposhi, Ultar
and Distaghil standing sentinel over all. In autumn, the valley is splashed
with red, ochre, burnt umber and orange; in spring, wild flowers grow in
profusion.
No wonder the people - Ismaili Muslims mostly, although the practice of
fairy worship clings on in some valleys - look content, though their lives
must be harsh. They may not live hundreds of years, as Hilton wrote and many
believed, but their diet - largely apricots - seems ambrosial enough.
In Karimabad, the local capital, the (now-abandoned) old palace of the Mir,
head of the family that has ruled the area since the 11th century, gazes
over an enchanted arena of soaring peaks, green terraces and thriving
orchards, roofed under an eggshell sky. Apparently there is no word for
'stress' in the local dialect.
In London, the Pakistan Tourist Development Corporation is in Suite 433,
Holborn House, 52-54 High Holborn, London WC1V 6RB, tel: 071-242-3131.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1902</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJADFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Travel: The town that lives by the gun
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW ANDERSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DEALING in death has been good for Darra. At first sight, this tiny, dusty
hamlet strung out along a 'main' road 35 kms south of Peshawar, in
Pakistan's North West Frontier Province, seems indistinguishable from all
the other tiny, dusty hamlets in the area. Until one goes shopping . . .
'Kalashnikov?' smiles the gap-toothed proprietor of Ali's Arms Store. 'Very
good weapon, very good. But now not so good. Now we make the barrels from
poor building steel, which melts. Or this: Lee Enfield. Very good gun, very
strong. Or this one: Luger, same as Germans. Very good gun, very cheap.
Ammunition no problem. You want one?'
Darra is the arms factory of the NWF Province, a one-stop, drive-in
ammunition dump for local tribesmen (mainly Pathans), ex-Mujahideens from
Afghanistan, political militants, rivals with scores to settle, people with
expensive 'shipments' to protect, even the occasional foreign 'guest'.
The whole village, hundreds of people, and many more in the area, is
dedicated to forging - even down to the serial number - almost every type of
weapon, new and old, invented in the world's munitions factories. The
Pakistan police and army have no authority here. Cash is king. The Soviets
may have pulled out of nearby Afghanistan, but business in Darra is still
booming.
In every roadside stall Lee Enfield rifles old and new are lined up in their
dozens. Wicked little Uzis hang on rusty nails next to shiny M16s. World War
Two Sten gun copies are tucked in every corner. Revolvers and pistols of
every kind are stacked high: Lugers, Berettas, snub-nosed Mausers, Colt
.45s, Walther PPKs. Bullets spill from cardboard boxes. Shells rattle on the
shelves. Prices start from about Pounds 30 for a perfectly decent, perfectly
deadly, Saturday Night Special.
Try before you buy, everyone else does. The street echoes with gunfire as
tribesmen heft a prospective purchase, swing it to their shoulders and send
a stream of bullets into the hills that loom over Darra. Tight knots of men
mull over the merits of stock and trigger action. Delivery is usually
'arranged' later, away from tribal customs posts.
Afraid of loud noises? Silencers can be arranged. Or how about a blade?
British Commando knives, SS daggers, bayonets, stilettos - all sharpened on
the spot and very cheap. Brass knuckle-dusters, coshes, bandoliers,
holsters: name your price.
Ingenuity abounds. Rifle mechanisms are hidden in walking sticks. An
officer's swagger stick conceals a needle-thin rapier. Cheapest of all -
yours for Rp100 (about Pounds 2.20) - is the pen gun. Unscrew the barrel,
drop in a .22 bullet, reassemble, pull back the spring-loaded barrel top,
press the clip to release the spring and the 'toy' splits the air with a
deafening bang.
Off the main street are the gun 'factories', shacks generally specialising
in one part of the production process. Here is the man who can hand-rifle a
gun barrel, here the man who makes the trigger mechanism. Boys of six or
seven squat in the dust polishing walnut stocks to a glistening sheen. In
one shack an anti-tank rocket launcher is propped against the wall, complete
with shells. Are they live? The stallholder shrugs: he knows a window
shopper when he sees one.
There is a small mosque off the main street. In a guest room a village elder
offers us sandwiches and garish sponge cakes, and the sweetest of almonds.
The Pakistani government prefers to keep Darra off the official tourist
track, but the villagers are getting used to their crowd-pulling notoriety,
and permits and guides can be obtained - after a little bureaucratic
wrangling - through the Khyber Political Agency. Independent travellers can
often get through simply by donning the 'disguise' of an Afghan hat and
cloak - but it is not recommended.
After high tea, more locals demonstrate their machine-guns, then it is our
turn. I am too frightened, but others in my group grab the weapons
gleefully. The air fills with thunder. Empty cartridge shells rain down. The
locals laugh and clap. I retreat behind a pillar, feeling sick.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1903</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJADEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Property: Old King Cole lived here . . . - Essex, a county
of wide contrasts behind its Flash Harry facade
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID HOPPITT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A BLANK expression greeted our request for singles to Gawdelpus at London's
Liverpool Street station ticket office. 'Say again, guv,' said the chirpy
Cockney behind the glass.
The Cockney accent is alive and well, living largely in Essex; but the
dialect and sense of humour seems to be waning. Years ago, a ticket-seller
would have known instantly that we wanted to travel to Saffron Walden. Why
Gawdelpus? It derives from the ancient market town's Latin motto 'Deo
adjuvante floremus' (which translates as 'God help us to flourish' or, to be
more precise, 'With God's help we flourish').
Saffron Walden is a place of streets and alleys (called 'twitchells')
bordered by handsome jettied houses. Along with other Essex country towns,
plus the countless quaint and timeless villages, it is very different from
most outsiders' perception of the county.
Many who have the misfortune to live south of the Thames look upon Essex as
flat and uninteresting. Few have visited it and fewer still have walked,
ridden or cycled over its rolling hills and valleys. True, Essex is short on
mountains and coal mines and the front and back doors (Leyton and Purfleet)
do not appear on many chocolate boxes; but, once over the threshold, there
is Epping Forest, the 5,600-acre picnic spot for Londoners.
Essex is a county of contrasts; dead cars and other junk in fields near
Romford are testament to its proximity to the London sprawl. Further out
among the villages, though, are some of the finest timber houses in the
land, many exhibiting the best of the pargetter's art (decorative
plasterwork done originally with a concoction that included cow dung, stable
urine, grit and horse hair, all mixed or trodden by a village maiden])
In the great Essex earthquake just over a century ago, it was these timber
structures that withstood best the shaking (opponents of timber-frame
housing please note). King Cunobelin (Old King Cole) chose Colchester as his
capital; the Romans built a city there; and the Normans built their largest
castle keep.
Essex man (and, more recently, Essex woman) has become the butt of as many
jokes as vicars and parrots; most are way off the mark. Flash Harry and
Cheryl hardly reached Essex proper. Real Essex man seldom moves away; many
travel but most return. Theirs is a county of misty fishing hamlets, sudden
villages with Morris dancers and cricket greens, real pubs with real ale,
and even a few real ploughmen. It is a county with culture in plenty plus a
little candy floss at Southend, the Londoners' Blackpool.
Nature is not bountiful with rainfall in Essex (it has the lowest in the
country) but there is enough to keep Constable's beloved river Stour flowing
through the green fields of Dedham. The county is not well-endowed with
stately homes, either, but it has at least 1,000 moated country houses -
more than any other. There are also more horses there than elsewhere.
Before the property boom, many people with more money than taste discovered
that Essex offered better value, property-wise, than any other home county.
They moved with their families, their Mercedes, their au pairs and their
ponies to the green paddocks of Ongar (and the like), and the jokes started.
Now, the bubble has burst and they cannot afford the mortgage; unemployment
in Essex has risen sharply in the past year. Result - repossessions and
bargains galore (plus more than a few Dobbins for sale).
John Gibson, of Savills, says buyers have an especially wide choice of
farmhouses in Essex but only the near-perfect are selling. Mediocre
offerings have slumped in value by as much as 30 per cent. 'Curiously,'
Gibson adds, 'there are now cash buyers living in rented accommodation
because they can't find the right house; this is because many owners of
really good houses, old rectories and the like, decided not to sell in this
market.'
One of the most seasoned property men in the county is Roy Chapman, former
joint senior partner of Abbotts who now runs his own show in the village of
West Bergholt. 'I said last year things would improve out here and, sure
enough, the market is on the move; but only when people are realistic about
prices. The reduction in interest rates, coupled with the incentive provided
by the temporary removal of stamp duty, has at long last brought some
confidence to the market. Young people, first-time buyers especially, are
taking advantage of the situation. Those who have jobs now have the capacity
to buy, and sensible ones are getting in quick before the market recovers
strongly, as it assuredly will.'
Hambro Countrywide is another to have noticed a change. It says there has
been a significant increase in inquiries since the beginning of the year and
the number of prospective buyers has trebled in recent weeks.
House-builders, too, are showing signs of cautious optimism, especially
those catering for the first-time buyer.
At Grays, Alfred McAlpine Homes is offering flats and houses at Anchor
Point, a skip from the station, right on the waterfront and only a short
drive from Dartford Tunnel. They are attracting a lot of interest.
One-bedroom flats cost just below Pounds 50,000 while Pounds 59,000 buys a
two-bedroom house with two balconies facing south over the water.
Three-bedroom homes cost Pounds 70,000.
For something a little larger, Cala has homes with three and four bedrooms
beside the cricket green at Shenfield, with prices starting at Pounds
144,950. Moody Homes also reports a stir in the market, especially for more
spacious homes in a village setting; two, each with five bedrooms, have just
been sold for around Pounds 300,000 in Ingatestone.
Moving further up-market, John D. Wood suggests a price of Pounds 250,000
for the delightfully-named Cherry Garden, a Grade II-listed, 16th century
house at Burnham-on-Crouch. There is also a field with consent for six
detached houses, at Pounds 330,000.
For around Pounds 650,000 there is Gills Farm, in Epping Upland, which is
described by Savills as being in the perfect location if you like being
surrounded by rolling countryside with a healthy population of deer. There
are more than five acres, a tennis court and swimming pool and plenty of
outbuildings. Definitely something for the real Essex man.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1904</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJADDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Property: Realism keeps the Broads in business - Norfolk
prices have come down and distress sales are dropping fast
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN WORRALL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The Norfolk Broads are spread down the eastern half of Norfolk, a series of
lakes born partly of medieval peat diggings and some slow, connecting
rivers. Long an area for waterborne holidays and recreation, effectively
they became Britain's 11th national park in 1989. In planning and navigation
terms, they are now administered by their own special statutory body, the
Broads Authority.
Tourism, naturally, has made the villages - strung along the 125 miles of
navigable waterway - the stuff of retirement dreams although few of those
dreams come true. One local agent reckons that while 70 per cent of
footfalls through his door are visitors thinking of moving into the area,
less than 10 per cent of them actually make the effort to do so. Many of
those then find the pace of life too slow after, say, Essex or Hertfordshire
and, eventually, return whence they came.
The trouble for them is that moving back is not so easy at present. Norfolk
house prices have dropped by more than 30 per cent since their 1988 peak;
probably the biggest price reversal in the UK. Indeed, houses are cheaper
now than for many years, according to David Richardson, managing director of
Hockleys of Norwich.
'With lower interest rates, the removal of stamp duty from most purchases
and moderate increases in real incomes, housing costs in real terms are
probably at less than half the level of three or four years ago,' he says.
But the market seems to be grasping that fact. Richardson notes that the
number of sales achieved by Hockleys in Norfolk as a whole, in the 12 months
to February 1992, was 77 per cent up on the previous 12 months.
Waterfront prices probably start as low as Pounds 35,000 for one-bedroom
leasehold timber cabins beside the River Thurne at Potter Heigham, each with
its own mooring and easy access to ice cream and fish and chips.
Two- or three-bedroomed properties of similar ilk might fetch up to Pounds
60,000 - particularly if they are of sufficient substance to pre-date the
start of planning controls in 1948, thus escaping the restrictions on their
annual periods of use. That is the holiday and weekender market. Upwards
from those prices, though, buyers rarely will get change from Pounds 100,000
for a brick-built waterfront freehold, even on the smallest navigable
backwater.
In Wroxham, the prime pitch - which, together with Hoveton, across the River
Bure, forms the heart of the Broads - houses in Beech Road were fetching up
to Pounds 650,000 at the peak of the market (although, at that level, buyers
were getting a residence of true quality, with several acres).
Buyers in the middle and upper price ranges tend to be local professional
and business people, or locals who have moved out and are moving back in
their retirement. They have a reasonably wide choice.
At Dilham, towards the northern extremity of the Broads and three hours by
boat from Wroxham, Pounds 119,000 would buy a detached three-bedroom brick
bungalow with a 50ft quay-headed mooring (through Woolwich Property
Services).
In Hoveton, a relatively modest Pounds 125,000 would buy a three-bedroom
timber-framed chalet built in the 1970s (now available through the Stalham
office of William H Brown). Just upstream, at Belaugh, Strutt &amp; Parker
requires Pounds 245,000 for a five-bedroom barn conversion with 50ft of
mooring.
Agents say that waterfront prices have been relatively resilient; in
general, they put the markdown from the top of the market at perhaps 25 per
cent. Inevitably, though, there has been inertia as vendors continued to
hope; some present offerings still illustrate substantial compromise.
Orchard Mead is a house in Ropes Hill, Horning, a village just downstream
from Wroxham and Hoveton. With four bedrooms, two bathrooms, mooring,
boathouse and slipway, it was valued at Pounds 290,000 four years ago.
In September 1991, it entered the market at Pounds 210,000 (through Woolwich
Property Services) but there was little interest until it was reduced, in
the first week of January, to Pounds 180,000. It then received three offers.
Similarly, Hockleys recently sold the Little House, Lower Street, Horning,
for Pounds 170,000. The property, which was once divided into two flats, has
seven bedrooms, a 50ft quay-headed mooring and covered boat dock. At the
peak of the market, its value was close to Pounds 250,000.
Now that vendors have come to terms with the need for realistic pricing,
they are in no mood for further messing about. 'Soft' deals are much thinner
on the water.
Melvyn Stone, manager of the Wroxham office of Woolwich Property Services,
says: 'There is still a false idea that, in this market, any vaguely
reasonable offer will be accepted, but the supply of distress sales has more
or less run out. Most people who now want to sell will do so only at
something fairly close to the asking terms.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1905</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJADCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Property: Essex Factfile
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Major towns, with distance from London; rail travel time; annual season
ticket price (first class in brackets);and house prices by Hambro
Countrywide (1. Two-bedroom starter; 2. 3 br semi; 3. 4 br detached; 4.
country house with paddock).
Chelmsford: 30 miles; 30 mins; Pounds 1,680 (Pounds 2,520). 1. Pounds
50,000; 2. Pounds 68,000; 3. Pounds 105,000; 4. Pounds 340,000.
Colchester: 52 miles; one hour; Pounds 2,052 (Pounds 3,080). 1. Pounds
42,000; 2. Pounds 54,000; 3. Pounds 85,000; 4. Pounds 300,000.
Southend: 42 miles; 55 mins; Pounds 1,796 ( Pounds 2,696). 1. Pounds 43,000;
2. Pounds 68,000; 3. Pounds 110,000; 4. Pounds 360,000.
Brentwood: 20 miles; 25 mins; Pounds 1,280 (no first); 1. Pounds 55,000; 2.
Pounds 75,000; 3. Pounds 165,000; 4. Pounds 380,000.
Area: 907,331 acres.
Population: 1.5m.
Unemployment: 10.7 per cent.
Community tax average: Pounds 234.28.
Access to countryside: 3,500 miles of footpaths and bridleways (including 30
miles added recently added to bridleways' system). Ways through Essex
pamphlet from County Hall.
Libraries: 54 full-time; 36 part-time; 28 village centre; 17 mobile.
Administration centre: County Hall, Chelmsford CM1 1LX.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1906</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJADBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Gardening: Plant of the Week
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ARTHUR HELLYER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Helleborus orientalis
This is the hardy herbaceous plant which gardeners call Lenten Rose, though
it has no connection with true roses. In its numerous varieties it can be in
flower from January until May. In fact, Lenten Roses are hybrids between
several species of hellebore, which have handsome, evergreen, broadly
fingered leaves and cup-shaped flowers, in colour varying from white and
cream to deep maroon, often delicately speckled or veined within. However,
they have a tendency to hang down so that one must tip the flowers up to
appreciate the delicacy of their markings. Lenten Roses make dense clumps of
rather tough roots, are best left undisturbed for years, and usually spread
by self-sown seedlings, which are likely to vary in colour. They enjoy shady
places but will grow right out in the open and are totally unfussy about
soil.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1907</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJADAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Gardening: So sweet, but often dowdy - Daphne, a plant of
variable character
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ARTHUR HELLYER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DAPHNE brings images of fragrance and unreliability, yet neither is true
entirely of the dozen or so species found commonly in gardens. In fact, it
is extraordinary how much these vary in character: some evergreen, others
deciduous, some scented very sweetly and a few not at all, or only very
slightly. And although most are beautiful, there are one or two that are
distinctly dowdy.
Two daphnes grow wild in Britain. One of them, D. mezerium, is a favourite
in gardens, especially with cottagers who seem to have the knack of growing
it well. It is fairly rare in the wild but the other native, D. laureola,
the spurge laurel, is common enough in woods on alkaline soils.
Although not exciting, D. laureola is worth a place in the wild garden for
its ability to thrive in dry shade and the limiest soils. It is a leafy
evergreen that grows from 2ft to 4ft high with curling clusters of small,
greenish-yellow flowers which sometimes are honey-scented and always appear
very early in the year - from February to April. You can scarcely go wrong
with this daphne.
You could say much the same of D. mezerium, which does grow freely in some
gardens and even spreads by seedlings which are self-sown from the handsome,
scarlet berries (which are very poisonous and usually produced freely).
The habit of the bush is distinctive with stiffly-upright stems,
lance-shaped deciduous leaves, and small purple flowers clustered close to
the stems. They are very fragrant, as are those of its beautiful, pure-white
variety.
D. mezerium is a rare, protected plant that is found wild on limey or chalky
soils, usually in woods, although generally it is grown in the open in
gardens. The difficulty with this fine plant is that it is apt to die
suddenly and without obvious cause. Cottage gardeners seem to succeed with
it, perhaps because they often let it choose its own place to grow and then
leave it alone.
Probably the best daphne with which to make a start - because it is
beautiful, likely to succeed and lives for a reasonable time - is a hybrid
named D. burkwoodii Somerset. It makes a very freely-branched bush, 3ft to
4ft high and generally a little more through, with narrow, light-green
leaves and abundant, lilac-like pink flowers that are very fragrant.
It is a semi-evergreen which likes sunny places and most reasonably
well-drained soils, with a preference for those containing lime. It flowers
in May and sometimes there is a second, smaller display early in autumn.
Daphne cneorum, known as the Farland Flower, was one of the parents of D.
burkwoodii and could be considered the most beautiful of all daphnes. There
is a pure-white variety but the natural, rose-pink type is the favourite. It
makes an evergreen, wide-spreading bush which, while only about a foot high,
can reach several feet across.
The small and sweetly-scented flowers are produced with immense freedom in
May. D. cneorum certainly likes limey soil but it grows freely in the Royal
Horticultural Society's garden at Wisley, Surrey, where the soil is sandy
and rather acid. What it does require is moisture at all times of the year
and failures, which are fairly frequent, may be due very largely to drought.
Then there is Daphne blagayana which has much larger, evergreen leaves. In
spring, there are clusters of very sweetly-scented, creamy-white flowers at
the ends of the long sprawling stems that make it very suitable for rock
gardens.
Daphne petraea is a true rock plant: a tiny, tufted evergreen rarely more
than 3in high which grows wild on inaccessible cliffs in the limestone alps
of the southern Tyrol. For the garden, there is a variety named Grandiflora
which has flowers of superior size. They are rosy-pink, sweetly-scented gems
which individually are like those of D. cneorum although the plant is, of
course, very much smaller.
Indeed, its size means it needs to be protected from slugs and other foes.
Thus, rock plant enthusiasts usually grow it in pots or pans containing
gritty, sharply-drained soil (including limestone chippings) in an unheated
greenhouse or frame. This is not an easy plant to buy but it can be obtained
from Potterton and Martin, the Cottage Nursery, Nettleton, Caistor,
Lincolnshire.
Perhaps the best smelling daphne of all is D. odora, but it is not as
free-flowering as some of the others and it is not completely hardy in all
parts of Britain, although it will survive a few degrees of frost. The
lance-shaped leaves are evergreen, quite large, and a fine, glossy hue.
There is a variety named Aurea-Marginata, with an attractive golden margin
to each leaf, which is actually a little hardier than the plain green type.
D. odora produces quite large clusters of flowers in two shades of
reddish-purple from December well into the spring (which is much too early
for safety in most British gardens). So, this is an ideal small plant for a
conservatory; but for years I grew the variegated variety successfully in my
Sussex garden against the south-facing wall of the house.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1908</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAC9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Gambler who beat Trump at casinos: Steve Wynn staked it all
on kitsch, writes David Spanier, and won
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID SPANIER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
OUT OF the desert, the Mirage arose. One night, there was a vast empty lot.
Next day, on this shimmering crossroads marked by a thousand points of
glitz, appeared the most dazzling structure the Las Vegas Strip had ever
seen.
'It's what God would have done,' Steve Wynn liked to quip, adding
irreverently, 'if He'd had the money.'
Wynn had another one-liner which went down well with business audiences.
'What do you do when you owe the bank Dollars 500m and, on the first day of
the month, you can't meet the interest charges?' Pause. 'Absolutely
nothing]'
In reality, Wynn's dream of a casino took three years to build. But it went
up so fast, it did seem like a mirage. He is a showman first and a
businessman second, albeit an operator who staked more than anyone had ever
risked before in building a casino-hotel. It cost Dollars 620m when it
opened in November 1989, and that was just for starters.
Donald Trump had also coveted the site but Wynn turned him down. They were
friends, but not really friendly. Trump, in a stinging phrase which Wynn's
wife, Elaine, has never forgiven, once accused Steve of being a classic
under-achiever.
The Donald, as his wife, Ivana, liked to call him, was left to build his own
dream of a casino in Atlantic City, New Jersey. It was called the Taj Mahal
and was billed, with characteristic hype, as the 'eighth wonder of the
world.'
The contrast between these two places, the Mirage and and the Taj Mahal, is
the story of casino gambling in the 1990s: in effect, a long-range duel
across the tables between the two main personalities in the gaming industry,
Wynn out west and Trump out east. Rivalry is not, perhaps, the right word -
although one man has emerged as leader of the gaming industry and the
other's main casino is in chapter 11 bankruptcy - because Wynn himself has
never seen their competition in personal terms.
The two men share a flamboyance of character but their approach to casino
gambling, which has set the style in their opposing resorts, has been
radically different. Wynn is glossy, lively, funny, mercurial, fast-talking,
hard-driving, a man who has lived gambling since his boyhood.
'Since the day I took my first breath, I have been a kid who has never had a
meal, a dollar for tuition or a piece of clothing on my back that didn't
come from gambling,' he claims.
On his first visit to Vegas, as a 10-year-old, he was dazzled by its
glamour. Unfortunately, his father had a weakness for the dice and went
broke. It was a useful lesson.
'If you wanna make money in a casino,' Wynn says, in a classic formulation,
'own one.'
The Mirage is his answer.
The opening was a local affair. The whole town was agog to see the inside of
the place. Long lines of people, waiting in the sun, pressed against the
green cordon of security guards. At five to noon, the line buckled. And at
five past, the place was jammed. The people poured in, baseball caps
bobbing, bomber jackets billowing, T-shirts flapping over Day-Glo bermudas,
trainers thudding below pale pink pants and blue jeans - the whole rag, tag
and bobtail of a holiday crowd on the spree.
No one had ever opened a casino of this super-colossal size before - SNAP] -
just like that. All of a sudden, the air was filled with noise. The slots
were whirring and chunking, line after line of them, the coins rattling
around like sea shells in the tide. This heavy-metal rhythm was overscored
by a sort of moaning, siren-like scream from a bank of super-slots, shouts,
greetings, laughter and, above it all, snatches of rock music, loudspeaker
anouncements, bells ringing, metal clashing. The sweet sound - as it has
proved, month after month - of success.
Overnight, the Mirage became the focus of the Las Vegas Strip. On a basic
Y-shape of three towers, 30 storeys high, it contains 3,000 suites and
rooms. In front, a home-made volcano erupts into the night sky every 15
minutes. Inside, a tropical rain forest, under a glass atrium, leads guests
into the casino, glittering light-and-dark. Behind a glass wall roam white
tigers, by the lagoon cavort dolphins. It's kitsch, it's over the top, it's
fun.
The Mirage won over Dollars 409m from gaming and made Dollars 251m from
hotel and other income in its first year, an unparalleled success. The
operation needed to generate income of this magnitude because it has to make
more than Dollars 1m a day simply to meet its interest and running costs.
Wynn is not under any illusions about the task ahead. 'We dare not stand
still,' he says. 'It's exhilarating, like driving a racing car at high
speed. But another bend is always coming up to meet you.'
Trump, by contrast, lacked that intuitive feel for casinos that comes from a
lifetime in gaming. His whole experience was in real estate, which is
certainly a big risk but of a completely different kind. What attracted him
to gaming was the (apparently) amazing cash flow of casinos.
When Trump, nosing around Atlantic City late in the '80s, finally acquired
his first property, Trump Plaza, and then a second one, Trump Castle -
putting Ivana in charge - it looked an exciting prospect. And, indeed, it
might have turned out well enough - given the drabness of the place and New
Jersey's constraints on gaming - if Trump had not fallen for another
project, an extravaganza to outdo all other casinos.
The Taj Mahal, which was supposed to demonstrate the art of the deal, was an
unknown quantity. Its costs were out of control, the market was already
oversold; by the time, it was completed, it had cost the best part of
Dollars 1,000m. But if Steve could do it in Vegas, spending all that money,
then Donald was determined he could show them in Atlantic City. A banner
went up at the entrance to town for the grand opening of the Taj in April
1990: 'More than a Mirage.'
The Taj Mahal is big, certainly. Its 90 minarets shine out over the ocean
like coloured onion domes. The casino, bright with Indian motifs and
decoration, covers 120,000 sq ft. Its serried ranks of slot machines, like a
painted metal army rooted to the drill square, stretch out on all sides
under Viennese chandeliers. It drew the crowds - Trump's affair with film
starlet Marla Maples had made him a media celebrity - but the operation was
ramshackle.
The times, too, were changing. Within three months of its glorifed opening,
Trump was locked in a struggle with the banks to meet his various interest
payments. In its first full year of operation, the Taj reported losses of
Dollars 120m.
Atlantic City suffers compared with Las Vegas because it is not a
destination resort. People go to Vegas for vacations and trade conventions:
the gambling has become only a part - albeit by far the most lucrative part
 -of a shiny package which includes shows, boxing, sports, high action and
fast women, at a cut price. It is hard to see why anyone should want to go
to Atlantic City, especially in winter.
What now? Atlantic City might pull through, at a reduced level. There are
too many casinos chasing too few customers. The Taj, with one of Wynn's
former managers in charge, is doing better. It earned Dollars 29m this
January - no mean feat - but still below par. As anyone can see who visits
the place, it is essentially a decorated shed, blown up to mammoth size. Its
only message is: big is beautiful.
The Mirage, too, will find competition tougher in the recession but the
joint is still jumping night after night. Aware of the need to fight for
family appeal, Wynn is now planning to build a new casino, Treasure Island,
on 17 acres of the present Mirage parking site, at a start-up cost of
Dollars 300m. Launching the project, Wynn appeared in a pirate's hat. Only
in Las Vegas, one feels.
David Spanier's new book All Right, Okay, You Win - Inside Las Vegas, will
be published by Secker &amp; Warburg on Monday, March 23, price Pounds 16.99.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1909</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAC8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / As They Say In Europe: Milton Keynes for thrills
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES MORGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT HAS been one of those weeks when one feels nothing has happened in
western Europe and when the most interesting article was about the English
new town, Milton Keynes, on its 25th anniversary, in the Neue Zurcher
Zeitung. More of that later.
But the great debates continue and the most instructive is that started by
the 'D-Mark nationalists' in Germany. The question is, why only now, well
after the Bonn government signed the Maastricht treaty binding it to
European Monetary Union, are the Germans having serious doubts about the
project? Last year Britain was riven by EMU: today the topic plays no role
in the election campaign, and it is the Germans who are split.
It is the fault of the German press that the debate never got off the ground
before the decisive steps were taken. The left-wing papers had little
interest in the symbols of German nationalism - and the DM is the symbol par
excellence, while the papers of the right were anxious to support the
government at any cost. This created strains.
At Handelsblatt, the leading German business daily, editorial policy was
steered from Brussels. Continental correspondents at the European Commission
all go native on arrival. But the paper's international editor, Dr Klaus
Engelen, had different ideas. To call Engelen outspoken would be to do him
an injustice, but he failed to get his employers to change their minds. So
he has gone into print at home and abroad stating his views: 'I cannot
believe that by 1997 or 1999 the Germans will give up their Deutschemark and
allow the Bundesbank - a cornerstone and an essential feature of their very
successful economic, social and political system - to be dissolved in a new
European supranational institution, the European Central Bank' is the
sentence which turns up everywhere.
But what if he is wrong and it is all too late? The editor-in-chief of the
Suddeutsche Zeitung, Dieter Schroder argued that Germany's leaders had not
calculated that 'the groundswell of the new German nationalism could only be
strengthened when the fear was nourished that the highest good of the
nation, the Mark, was going to be sacrificed on the altar of Europe.'
But, said Schroder, the new public display of German nationalism had to be
conducted in a manner that would not to frighten the foreigners. They
assumed that the Maastricht Treaty could not be wrecked by the Germans -
'That would be a national and historic tragedy which would isolate Germany
for a long period and do considerable damage to the process of European
unity.' The conclusion was a bit lame - 'we must not burden the debate with
unrealistic demands and European 'Don Quixoteries.'' For once it seems the
British government got things right: European Monetary Union is far too
difficult a subject to be settled now. It is a pity that Mr Major and his
colleagues may not have much opportunity to savour this curious victory.
One hope that the government has of retaining power in this election is to
be found in Milton Keynes. It is the one constituency that has, amoeba-like,
split into two for this election, thereby delivering another Tory to the
House of Commons. That is probably the most interesting thing that has
happened in the 25 year history of the town so it was appropriate that it
should figure in the paper that strives to avoid the title of Europe's most
interesting daily, the Neue Zurcher Zeitung.
'Milton Keynes - the English Utopia?' was the headline for Charles
Ritterband's piece. He was particularly impressed by the railway station;
'The Keynesians are as proud of it as are the Gullener family when they come
into money in Durenmatt's play 'The Visit,' proud that all express trains
stop there between London and the great cities of the north.'
Ritterband has done more research on 'MK' than anybody in England: 'The
legend runs that Milton Keynes is named after the writer John Milton as well
as the economist John Maynard Keynes. Legions of speechmakers have extolled
Milton's democratic spirit and the pathbreaking research of Keynes as the
inspiration behind the town . . . But it is all nonsense.' In fact, it
emerges, Milton Keynes got its name from the original village. 'But where
that village got its name, nobody knows.'
James Morgan is economics correspondent of the BBC World Service.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1910</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAC7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Sport: Scenes from a season - Rugby Union / The Five Nations
Championship
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN HOPKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CAMEOS from the Five Nations' championship of the 1991/92 season, which ends
this afternoon:
Dublin, January 18. Wales surprisingly defeat Ireland, the World Cup
quarter-finalists. The one-point margin - 16-15 - is flattering to the
Irish. Welshmen are overjoyed and some former internationals, men who ought
to know better, are heard to remark: 'the Grand Slam next.'
The foyer of the Berkeley Court hotel five minutes' walk from Lansdowne Road
is crowded after the match. A Dublin student attending her first rugby
international is anxious to obtain the autograph of Ieuan Evans, the Welsh
captain. 'How do you pronounce his christian name?' she asks. 'The first
syllable is 'yi' as in yipes' she is told. 'Then you add the sound 'an' as
in 'and.'
Ten minutes later she returns, her cheeks flushed with pleasure. 'I met
Ieuan' she says, pronouncing the name almost perfectly. 'What a charmer. A
complete gentleman.'
The Irish players come down from their rooms and mingle graciously with
their own supporters and the few Welshmen who have gained entry to the hotel
of the Irish team. The Welsh are magnanimous in victory but the Irish, in
case anyone is in any doubt, are magnificent in defeat.
After the post-match dinner Alan Davies, the coach of the Welsh team, is
wandering happily around the foyer of the hotel savouring his first triumph
in the championship. A reporter congratulates him on victory and remarks
that he was lucky Tony Copsey, one of Wales's second-row forwards, had not
been sent off. Copsey was twice warned by the referee. Davies smiles
enigmatically and walks off.
Cardiff, February 1. The first home game in the championship for Wales is
marked by an outpouring of Welsh cliches. The Cwmbach male voice choir
brings some hwyl to the pre-match singing and song sheets are distributed
throughout the stadium. Players and officials from both teams are presented
to the Princess of Wales. Beverley Humphreys, an opera singer, leads the
singing of the national anthem.
This chauvinism is part of a campaign by the Welsh Rugby Union to promote
Welsh rugby. Other aspects of the campaign include naming the Welsh team the
Dragons and redesigning the national shirt.
One change brought about by Davies is consistency in selection. This Welsh
team is unchanged from the one that defeated Ireland. Wales show some fire
and verve in the second half but are 12-0 down at that point. Three
penalties by Wales in the second half are reminiscent of their revival from
6-15 behind in Dublin two weeks earlier. France win though, 12-9.
Dublin, February 15. Ireland, defeated by Wales and crushed by England, are
facing Scotland and 3-9 behind at half-time. Their stand-off, Ralph Keyes,
is booed by his own supporters for bad kicking. Long before the final
whistle spectators are leaving their seats. Mick Doyle, the former coach who
writes an acerbic column in the Irish Independent, was scathing after defeat
by Wales. 'Wales may be on their knees' he wrote 'but we are on our arses.'
After this latest defeat, 18-10, he is apoplectic.
Dublin is awash with Scots in kilts celebrating victory. They seem
impervious to the below-freezing temperature.
Twickenham, March 8. A dampness in the air does little to dampen the
occasion and drinks, jokes and laughter mixing well in the west car park
before the game. England are strong favourites to beat Wales and win a
second grand slam in a row, the first time this has been done since the
1920s.
As Will Carling makes yet another magnificent burst past Neil Jenkins he
reminds us that as an attacking full back he would be dynamite. The trouble
is he is dynamite as a centre.
England's performance is their worst of the season but for Wales there is a
word of praise from one of the gods. 'There is fight back in this side'
observes Gareth Edwards, the great scrum half. 'There is backbone that was
not there six months ago.'
Cardiff, March 21. Davies's period of office expires after the game between
Wales and Scotland this afternoon. He wants to remain as coach until after
the World Cup in 1995 and cool heads support him. Hot heads want more
success, however. Davies, they point out, has been one of the country's
least successful coaches, having lost five and won two matches since he took
over late last summer.
They are forgetting how bad Wales once were and how far the WRU have to go
to reach the level of competence of the RFU. Who will win in the struggle in
Welsh rugby, the Roundheads or Cavaliers, the cool heads or hot heads? We
must wait until April 2 when the general committee of the WRU meets to find
out.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1911</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAC6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Sport: The Spanish spectacular - Soccer
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER BERLIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE ONLY certainty for a soccer manager, it is often said, is that he will
be fired sooner or later. In Spain, it is nearly always sooner. Last
Saturday's immensely entertaining match between Barcelona and Atletico
Madrid, second and third in the Spanish championship, gave some idea why.
Both teams are closing in on Real Madrid who have frittered away an eight
point lead they built up early in the season under Raddy Antic. Antic was
appointed manager last April when the club lay a humiliating eighth in the
league. Even leading them to the top of the table brought Antic no job
security. After two consecutive league defeats he was fired, on the grounds
that his team was not providing the 'spectacle' Real fans required.
The pressure to succeed takes its toll even on those who keep their jobs.
The coaching career of Luis Aragones has been beset by psychological
problems. He once locked himself in a hotel room for three days and in his
brief reign at Barcelona he took to his bed for two days.
Even so, last summer he accepted a job offer from Atletico's Jesus Gil y
Gil, the most itchy-fingered of Spain's trigger-happy club presidents, a man
who had fired managers 11 times in his four years in charge of the club.
Before the season started the club flew in a psychiatrist from Texas who
said Aragones was suffering from 'phobic anxiety'.
By comparison Johan Cruyff, who succeeded Aragones at Barcelona, nearly four
years ago enjoys such job security that the club has been nicknamed 'Cruyff
FC'. But the stress and a 40-cigarette-a-day habit took their toll. Last
year Cruyff collapsed as his team marched to the title and he had to have a
coronary bypass.
The strange thing about Saturday evening's match was that neither team
played as if managed by men who knew one bad result could cost them their
jobs. They looked like the teams of coaches who trusted their players'
ability and intelligence. This is not a mistake English managers make. They
know that players get you the sack.
English managers have reacted to the increased pressure by trying to take
control of every aspect of the game. The more systematic English managers
dictate everything from the way their club's pitch is mown to how their
players drink their half-time tea. They leave nothing to chance and nothing
to players' initiative. The new breed drill their players so that every kick
is part of a strict plan.
Barcelona, by contrast, looked like a team whose only pre-game instruction
had been to 'go out and play'.
The Spanish sporting newspapers had been filled with discussions of the
teams' likely tactics, complete with colour diagrams, accurately predicting
Atletico's counter-attacking approach. The sort of coverage English fans
rarely see. the Barcelona players appeared not to have read a word.
Eleven headless chickens would have reacted to Atletico's relentless
pressure with more intelligence. Cruyff could only lament afterwards that
his players had not listened to a word he had said. Perhaps their minds were
on Wednesday's European Cup match against Dynamo Kiev which they won 3-0,
they certainly were not on the game.
Barcelona fell repeatedly into Atletico swift ambushes: three or four
players converging simultaneously on the ball-carrier. Barcelona failed to
adjust to the pressure. Their passing collapsed and their ball control
evaporated. Barcelona were, in the English parlance, playing too much
football and even as it failed it was enjoyable to watch.
For anyone used to the highly-drilled defence of the English Football League
the marking of both teams was lackadaisical. Throughout, Toni and Aguilera
of Atletico were allowed time and space on the wings to put in dangerous
crosses.
Schuster, a Barcelona old boy, dominated the game. He created Atletico's
first goal with a chip through to Manolo. The week before, Zubizarreta, the
Barcelona goalkeeper, had made the mistake which gave Real a precious draw.
This time he hesitated and was lost and for the rest of the game was subject
to merciless taunts from the home fans.
Manolo added a second ten minutes later and Atletico, with Schuster pulling
the strings, threatened to run away with the game.
Where the Barcelona players never had a pass available, Schuster always
seemed to have players open. Where the visitors dwelt on the ball, Schuster
clipped accurate passes with his first touch. When the route to an unmarked
player was blocked, Schuster would make the simple pass that was available,
adjust his position and make the telling pass when he got the ball back.
Schuster lacks the athleticism of Lothar Matthaus who currently controls the
midfield for the German national team. But where Matthaus often seems loathe
to appear eye-catching or spectacular, Schuster has the manner of the
classic midfield general. The ego which has soured his relations with
successive German managers is the characteristic which makes him such a
dominating figure on the field.
Schuster's self-confidence betrayed at the key moment. He passed under
pressure unerringly over 30m and 40m, yet unmarked on the penalty spot after
54 minutes he ballooned the ball over the bar. The miss cost Atletico a win.
With less than 20 minutes left Barcelona managed their first serious shot on
goal. Nadal, whose clumsy play suggested the Spaniards do have a soft spot
for donkeys, enjoyed a moment of grace, turning and cracking a shot past
Abel, the Atletico keeper.
Defending a 2-1 lead most English coaches would have ordered their teams to
defend. But, Atletico kept surging forward, often leaving only three
defenders to mark the most dangerous attacking trio in Spain.
Stoichkov, the best of that trio, got himself sent off for kicking an
opponent. It was a rare moment of malice in a game largely free of the
routine kicking and tripping which mar English soccer. But Atletico managed
to top that with their own moment of idiocy.
Abel showily tried to control a back pass with his thigh rather than catch
it with his hands. His knee got in the way and Bakero swooped to score,
earning Barcelona an ill-deserved draw which pulled them level with Real,
1-0 losers at Logronees, and bringing a balmy evening to a barmy close.
The large crowd in Atletico's Vicente Calderon stadium had certainly been
treated to a spectacle and they had enjoyed it hugely. Indeed, they had
fully played their part in it.
Even though the Vicente Calderon is the second stadium in Madrid behind
Real's Bernabeu, it still dwarfs every ground in the English football
league. Along one side the enormous members' stand straddles a motorway. The
other three sides are enclosed by a sweeping double-decker cantilevered
structure. The capacity is 62,000, all seated.
Sadly, like so many English grounds, it also a slum. Lumps are missing from
the concrete bench seats on the upper deck - a worrying sign since Gil, a
property developer, was sent to jail when a restaurant he built collapsed
killing 59 in 1969. Lights are missing on the stairs and the catering
facilities consist of a few shabby refrigerators containing cans of
Coca-Cola - at 200pta (Pounds 1.10) each - and beer which ran out at half
time. No wonder the streets outside are filled with vendors selling food
jostling for space alongside others selling badges and favours - many of
them Nazi and fascist emblems. In spite of this the wannabe hooligans with
their skinhead haircuts, English signs and Leed United flat caps were
prefered posturing to fighting. In the stands, the fans of the two teams
mingled without any tension.
Even though their team had thrown away a glorious victory the Atletico fans
were buoyant after the game. They crammed the Metro cheerfully singing songs
to their favourite side and, without apparent irony, chants about
Zubizarreta's shortcomings; jumping up and down so the ancient carriages
swayed alarmingly in rhythm. The folk heading into town for an evening out,
looked on amused. In Spain everything to do with soccer is a spectacle.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1912</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAC5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Motoring: Smart, sporty and it's an estate - BMW 5-Series
Touring
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STUART MARSHALL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SMART and luxurious estates have become an attractive alternative to
executive saloons. None comes smarter than the BMW 5-Series Touring, which
arrives in Britain next week.
BMW still cannot quite bring itself to call the Touring an estate car lest
it detract from the marque's sporting image, but that is exactly what it is.
The tailgate lifts to reveal a carpeted space that takes a couple of golf
bags and trollies with the rear seat in use, and something as awkward as a
large rotary mower with the seat down.
As the sill is wide, low and - unlike the 3-Series Touring - unobstructed by
rear light clusters, humping such things on board is not difficult. Four
retractable tying-down points come in handy when carrying things likely to
move around on their own.
It is not even necessary to raise the tailgate to get at the load space. If
you only want to drop in, say, some shopping, the rear window hinges up on
its own. Naturally, a sliding blind conceals from thieves what is put in the
load compartment. Removing the complete blind and roller, or lowering the
rear seat backs complete with headrests, is a one-handed job using touch
buttons.
In every way it is an urbane and civilised car. Unless you turn round and
take a look, you would not realise it was an estate, not a saloon. It feels
rock-solid on rough roads. Regardless of engine speed, there is no body
boom.
At present, two engines are offered: 2.0-litre or 2.5-litre, 24-valve
straight sixes with power outputs of 150 and 192 horsepower respectively.
These engines, introduced for BMW saloons 18 months ago, should return at
least 28 mpg (10.1 l/100km) in normal use and give a gentle driver more than
30 mpg (9.4 l/100km) on a journey.
They are said to cut servicing costs by nearly a quarter compared with the
old 12-valve units. Within a year, there will be 2.5-litre turbo-diesel
option.
A five-speed manual gearbox is standard with automatic transmission (also
five-speed) a desirable (if costly) Pounds 1,150 optional extra. BMW claims
the two-pedal cars have much the same consumption as those with manual
gears.
The 520i Touring I am now driving is everything you would expect a BMW to
be. The engine pulls silkily in high gear at low revolutions, and hums
sweetly at 5,000 rpm-plus in the gears.
As the Touring is significantly heavier than the saloon, standing-start
acceleration is adequate rather than kick-in-the-back. The 2.5-litre version
is, of course, more urgent. But providing you are willing to drop down into
fourth or third when necessary, the 2.0-litre car is a vigorous and refined
performer on a cross-country journey.
Every 5-Series Touring comes with ABS brakes, power steering, central
locking (with deadlocks on all doors), electric windows and door mirrors,
and a two-section powered sun roof.
Buyers of the priciest 520i and 525i SE (for special equipment) models can
delete the sun roof and, for only Pounds 350 extra, have air-conditioning
instead. This sensible option is not available on the cheaper ones. I think
it should be.
BMW GB reckons it will sell about 2,600 of the 5-Series Touring estates this
year at prices ranging from Pounds 20,950 for a manual 520i to Pounds 28,100
for a 525i SE automatic. Four-wheel drive versions - the first BMW has made
with right-hand steering - join the range in June.
They will have 2.5-litre engines and prices are expected to be in the Pounds
28,000 to Pounds 30,300 brackets.
What will the 5-Series Tourings be up against? Not just the market-leading
Volvos and the Audi 100, Citroen XM and Mercedes 200-300 estates you might
expect but also large hatchbacks (Granada/Scorpio, Rover 800 Vitesse and the
new Renault Safrane, for example). It will compete on price rather than
sheer carrying capacity; as a bulk carrier, a 5-Series Touring is no match
for the really big estates.
BMW GB also sees the Touring seducing some owners out of their Range Rover,
Shogun, Land Cruiser and Trooper recreational four-wheel drives. With its
up-market looks, a BMW 5-Series Touring has Smith's Lawn and Badminton
written all over it. And, with all-wheel drive, it would not need towing out
of a muddy car park, either.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1913</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAC4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Sport: Butch courts Miami and wins again - Tennis
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BARRETT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   EVERYBODY loves a winner
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
which is why Butch Buchholz, Tournament Chairman of the Dollars 2.8m (Pounds
1.6m) Lipton International Players Championships at Key Biscayne, is the
toast of South Florida. He has a success on his hands that has benefitted
the entire greater Miami area and he is understandably proud of it.
It seems a lifetime ago that I sat on the Centre Court at Wimbledon on a
sweltering afternoon in 1960 watching Butch as he writhed in agony with an
ankle injury that forced him to retire to Neale Fraser, the eventual
champion, after holding eight match points in their gruelling quarter-final
match.
Butch recovered from that setback and turned professional the next year.
When his playing days were over, he set about learning the business of
tournament promotion before spending four years as the Executive Director of
the Association of Tennis Professionals.
Today the jet black hair is streaked with grey, the 51-year-old figure is a
little fuller, but there is the same determination in the friendly gaze.
Determination is a quality that Butch has needed these past seven years. In
February 1985 his brave venture to stage a two-week tournament in
partnership with the ATP and the Women's International Tennis Association
(WITA) began at the elegant but unfinished Laver Racket Club in Delray
Beach.
That first Lipton, beset with financial problems and cursed with cold winds
and rain, nevertheless attracted nearly 123,000 spectators as Tim Mayotte
and Martina Navratilova became its champions.
The following year the tournament moved along the coast to Boca West and
193,000 attended the matches to see local heroine Chris Evert beat a young
Steffi Graf and waited patiently while Ivan Lendl wore down Mats Wilander in
a rain-interrupted match that took two days. But more financial difficulties
meant that the ill-starred event had to move again in 1987.
'That was a nightmare period,' remembers Buchholz. I had to find a new site
in no time flat and I went to Miami to talk to the officials at Dade County.
They showed me three or four sites, none of which seemed right, and in
exasperation said: 'Well, there's just one more - though you won't like it'.
'They drove me over the Rickenbacker Causeway towards Key Biscayne and as we
swooped down off the bridge towards the island with its private atmosphere
and semi-tropical vegetation I knew it was right. It had the special
ambience that made it different. But when we arrived at the proposed site I
could understand their reservations. It was a huge rubbish dump, old cars
and refrigerators among the garbage, and we had to hold our noses as we
looked it over.'
The aroma that assails you today as you stroll through the avenue of
maturing royal palms and orchid trees, bordered by flower beds bursting with
gorgeous blooms of impatiens, bougainvillaea and hibiscus, is different.
Wherever you turn in this tastefully tented site that caters to every
gastronomic whim and purchasing impulse, there is the smell of success.
Not that the move to Miami and the full commitment of Dade County to further
development ended the problems. Far from it, as Buchholz remembers. 'In 1988
the ATP announced their breakaway from the Pro Council and, despite our
long-term contract, they said I would have to reduce the tournament to 10
days and bid for the time slot like everyone else. That made Lipton nervous.
They had invested in a two week event and told me that our 31-year agreement
was at risk if we made the change.'
The problems were solved and the tournament is now a 10-day event. It is a
family business run by a strong team in which Butch's brother Cliff is the
tournament director. His 22-year-old son Trey is the operations manager with
an annual budget of Dollars 2m. The event has become a fixture in the tennis
calendar and a popular venue for aficionados from all over the world.
'Amazingly, 46 per cent of our spectators come from outside the three
counties of Dade, Palm Beach and Broward. Many come up from South America,
combining their holiday and shopping expedition with a visit to the
tournament.'
Some 25 sponsors invest between Dollars 80,000 and Dollars 3m each year
towards the Dollars 10m that it costs to stage the event. All of them are
excited about the latest expansion plans which include a state-of-the-art
stadium, seating 14,000 and costing Dollars 20.5m, which will be completed
for next year's event, having overcome the inevitable local objections.
'It is being financed by Dade County,' said Buchholz. 'We will pay a minimum
rent of Dollars 500,000 (a year) against 10 per cent of the gross over the
next 30 years and I shall be surprised if we do not pay it back twice over.'
'The really exciting thing is that in the first two days of opening the
sales office we had sold over Dollars 1m of box seats.'
The USTA has designated the site a Player Development Centre. Buchholz has
added eight clay courts and will soon start to prepare the three grass
courts that will sit comfortably alongside the 17 hard courts that the
tournament needs. Like the people of Miami, the USTA knows it is backing a
winner.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page X
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1914</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAC3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Food: Weighed in the scales - Giles MacDonogh casts a line
to catch some fishy British prejudices
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GILES MACDONOGH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WITH Lent upon us, the whole question of fish is raised again.
Most people, it would seem, use the religious fast for reasons of vanity;
hoping that 40 days of abstinence will shed pounds, or break an ugly habit
such as smoking. (The only Roman Catholic I know who is serious about
observing Lent is aware that she is not required to fast on Sundays or the
one or two religious feast days scattered through the period.)
Since the first week of this year I have ordained a self-imposed regimen in
an effort to break the monotony of a single man's diet of chops and steaks:
I now eat only fish at home. Thus far, in 25 days of fish diet, I have
consumed no fewer than 24 sorts of sea life.
My search for variety has been vindicated, but there are one or two
limitations. Certain fish are impractical for the working man.
Squid takes too long to prepare; halibut, sea-bass or lobsters seem too
self-indulgently expensive for a man by himself; certain fish, such as
turbot, come in too big a chunk. At times one is reduced to the supermarket
 -fish trawled on the high seas, deep frozen and tasteless.
This is far from ideal, but plaice and cod, of the pis-allers, are decent
standbys. (I should add, though, that it has been a long time since I was
tempted by a farmed trout.)
To a far greater degree than meat-eating, fish-eating seems to be governed
by a strong element of snobbery and fashion. Anxious to learn more about
this, I went to see Nicky Herman. As owner of the noted fish restaurants
Scotts, Overtons, Sheekeys and Drones, Nicky Herman is literally the biggest
fish in London.
Nicky called John Bertram, his executive chef, to join us. Together, they
buy all the fish for the group of restaurants. I asked both men why the
British were so pathetic about eating fish, compared to their Continental
cousins.
'English people don't like fish bones. They always ask you: 'Has it got
bones in it?' Or they ask for their fish to be taken off the bone.' In
Scotts - a somewhat plutocratic establishment - Nicky doubted if 10 per cent
of customers were prepared to eat a fish with small bones.
'Easy bones' form part of the attraction of halibut, sea-bass and turbot -
trendy fish, with snob appeal. Americans, apparently, are not prepared to
eat fish with the heads left on after cooking; the idea of being watched by
the creature they are consuming is too intimidating.
This reminded me that I had cooked a John Dory only a few days before, and
that I had been much amused by the doleful way in which the fish had seemed
to watch me as I wolfed the flesh from its back. When I had finished my
meal, only the lugubrious eye remained in place.
There is considerable snobbery directed against the cheaper range of fish -
those monsters of the deep which French housewives seem to be able to
transform into delicious meals at a moment's notice. Coley was regarded as
fish for the cat - and whiting not much better.
Hake, which went through a period of trendiness in Paris a decade ago, was
also viewed with apparent contempt. The only fish which had gone, as it
were, up-market, seemed to be cod. Only a generation ago cod was perceived
as a 'below stairs' fish.
The British are still extraordinarily conservative about fish. Scotts had
tried out very many French classic fish dishes without success: the sea-food
platter did not sell; no one had ordered haddock; the omelette Arnold
Bennett had been about as easy to sell as a plate of fresh herrings - that
is to say, impossible.
Nicky and John took me next door to the kitchens, where a selection of that
morning's purchases had been laid out.
Here were little red gurnards and big red sea-bream ('the Rolls Royce of
fishes', according to Nicky). Here lay the hideous monkfish - looking at it,
you can see why the Germans call it 'the devil's fish'. Here were sea-bream,
hake and whiting; lemon and Dover soles; a Greek sea bass; a multi-coloured
parrot fish; one of the season's first wild salmon and a pike.
It was interesting to try some of these, simply cooked, unassisted by sauce
or seasoning: the dry, straw-textured parrot fish tasted against a delicate,
milky sea-bass; a subtle flavoured red sea bream tasted in contrast with the
bony pike. Served a la meuniere, a pike's muddy river fish taste was less
easy to detect.
The interview ended upstairs in Scotts. After some of the largest native
oysters I have ever seen - Imperials, from Colchester - I tried some of the
new dishes on the 'modern side' of this traditional English fish restaurant:
red mullet fillets served with a mix of olive oil, olives, tomatoes, garlic
and basil; and a pretty dish of scallops with a finely chopped ratatouille.
It seemed as if a distinctly Mediterranean breeze had blown, ruffling the
ranks of old colonels who had drifted in to pay homage to their Dover soles
at the onset of Lent.
Information: Scotts Restaurant, 20 Mount Street, London W1. Tel:
071-629-5248. Open Mon to Sat 12 - 2.45pm (last orders) and 6pm - 10.45pm
(last orders). Sun 7pm - 10pm.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1915</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAC2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Food: Menus for creditors - Restaurant view
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICHOLAS LANDER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHY, IN THE middle of the recession, are so many new restaurants opening
their doors?
What do such varied names as Christopher's, Snows on the Green, Les Saveurs,
The Red River Cafe, Pied a Terre and L'Accento have in common? On the
surface very little - except that they are all restaurants which have opened
recently in London (along with a number of others) in what is considered to
be the worst recession for many years.
Is this because restaurants defy the laws of economics and survive in spite
of monthly drops in consumer confidence and spending? Sadly not. Most
restaurateurs, even those in the first flush of enthusiasm, quietly admit
that business could be much better.
But when these restaurants were planned business was a lot better. Even the
smallest restaurants require a great deal of time to materialise, and in the
1980s raising the finance for a new restaurant was the easiest part of the
package. Finding the site, getting provisional approval for the licence,
tendering for builders and waiting for them to finish and the Environmental
Health Officer to give approval can take 18 months and breach the overdraft
limit.
As soon as you approach this limit, opening day becomes even more urgent.
Because it is the most immediate answer to a new restaurant's cash problems
it is often not the restaurateur who decides when to open, but the bank or
other investors. This year, the high interest rates of the past 18 months
will have forced many to open in the traditionally quiet first quarter
rather than wait until spring.
Although these businesses are all restaurants they hide a wide variety of
ambitions and financial backers. Snows on the Green is the first restaurant
of a husband and wife team; Christopher's is a personal mission undertaken
by its proprietor, Christopher Gilmour, and a few friends, to bring good US
food to London. L'Accento is the type of good, very reasonably priced
Italian trattoria every neighbourhood should have; Les Saveurs, the most
lavish expression of French haute cuisine London has seen in a long time -
but one that has been entirely funded by a Japanese millionaire. The Red
River Cafe and Pied a Terre have risen on the sites of former, failed
restaurants, of which there have been many in the last year.
The restaurants which are opening at the moment are, however, the last
expression of the relatively easy borrowing requirements of the late 1980s.
Banks are much less friendly to those eager to open their own restaurant.
The consequences will be felt, if not this year, then in 1993.
The two chefs who in 1991 passed their industry's highest exams, and
qualified as Meilleurs Ouvriers de Grand Bretagne, are not opening their own
restaurants but, instead, are cooking in the more financially secure
environment of a big hotel. Stephen Doherty is head chef at the Grand Hotel
in Amsterdam, due to open in April, and Roget Narbett has just become senior
sous-chef at the Dorchester in London. There are two big restaurants
currently being planned for London - the rebirth of Quaglino's, and a new
restaurant at the top of Harvey Nichols - but they will be the creation of
either wealthy individuals or big corporations.
Restaurants used to be a relatively low-cost world to enter, particularly
for a husband and wife. Rising rents and rates have increased the break-even
point; customers' raised expectations have increased the capital required.
Now, falling returns have frightened off potential investors, and for the
moment the glamour has gone. Those who enjoy the thrill of a new restaurant
should make the most of those which have opened so far this year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1916</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAC1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Food: Luxurious penance - Fish for Lent / Recipes to convert
faint hearts to fish
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIPPA DAVENPORT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NOW THAT the British are eating less red meat, surely fish should fill the
gap? This is a good time to test that theory, for Lent is the traditional
season to forego meat.
I would not, however, risk serving a dish that is aggressively fishy to
guests whose tastes I do not know. Fins, tail, scaly skin, gills, gaping
mouth and lugubrious eyes gazing up from the plate can cause nervous diners
to panic, and the presence of bones might make them choke.
Bowdlerised versions - fish dishes using fillets, purees and flakes - are
better for winning converts to the pleasures of fish; witness the general
popularity of fish pie, fish cakes and kedgeree. The only trouble with this
trio is that its their associations with the nursery are strong. For a
dinner party, you might prefer recipes with a little more panache. The two
that follow are simple, but luxurious enough to guarantee no hint of Lenten
penance.
SCALLOP QUENELLES (serves 8)
Featherlight and creamy, these are the loveliest of all dumplings. Sauce
Nantua is the classic accompaniment, and it works well using prawns if you
cannot get hold of freshwater crayfish. Bearnaise sauce and beurre blanc are
quicker to make and also excellent, particularly if a handful of shrimps is
added just before serving.
Take care to measure quenelle ingredients carefully: the ratio of seafood to
cream and egg white is crucial. Quenelles traditionally are served fresh
from poaching, which is best, but cooks who like to avoid last-minute work
at the stove will be heartened to hear that they can be cooked ahead and
re-heated gently.
Ingredients. 1lb fresh scallops (this is the net weight needed after
trimming away black intestinal threads and hard white muscles); 4 fl oz
double cream; 4 egg whites; sprigs of fresh herbs (parsley, coriander,
chervil, tarragon or dill) to garnish for serving.
Method. Wash the scallops and dry well. Whizz them in a food processor with
the cream to make a very smooth puree. Scrape the mixture into a shallow
dish and season generously with salt and pepper. Using a fork, blend in the
raw, unwhisked egg whites carefully, a little at a time. Then chill the
mixture, uncovered, for a few hours.
Choose a saute pan or other pan with a large surface area (great depth is
unnecessary). Fill it with water, salt it and bring to a bare simmer. The
liquid should barely tremble or the quenelles may disintegrate as they cook.
Using a pair of dessertspoons, scoop and mould the quenelle mixture lightly
into plump, meringue-shaped ovals; about two dozen in all. Drop them into
the pan in batches, spacing them well apart, and poach gently. They will
take five-six minutes and should be flipped over with a perforated spoon at
half-time.
Drain the quenelles on kitchen paper and lay them in a single layer in a
shallow buttered dish. Keep warm while cooking the rest. Sauce them, garnish
with little bouquets of herbs and serve quickly.
Alternatively, if preparing ahead, let the quenelles cool in the buttered
dish. When cold, cover them with a dome of foil and refrigerate until needed
 -but remember to bring them back to room temperature before re-heating.
To reheat, bake (still covered with foil) at 375`F/190`C (gas mark 5) for
12-15 minutes - but no longer or the quenelles will lose their creamy
lightness. Sauce, garnish and serve.
THAI MANGO SALAD WITH SALMON (serves 6)
This comes from Sri Owen's Exotic Feasts (Kyle Cathie, Pounds 16.99), a
charming and user-friendly book of east-meets-west cuisine.
Ingredients. For the mango salad: 2 medium-sized mangoes, peeled and cut
into julienne strips;  1/2 teaspoon salt; 1 tablespoon lime or lemon juice;
some mixed varieties of lettuce leaves; 12-14 coriander or mint leaves.
For the fish: 6 salmon fillets weighing 3-4 oz each; 2 tablespoons peanut or
olive oil; 1 onion, sliced finely; 2 garlic cloves, crushed; 1 large red
chilli, seeded and chopped finely; 2-inch piece of lemon grass, outer leaves
discarded, chopped finely; 2-inch piece of fresh ginger, peeled and chopped
finely; 2-3 kaffir lime leaves, shredded finely (optional); 2 tablespoons
fish sauce (nam pla) or light soy sauce; 2 tablespoons white wine vinegar.
Method. Put the mango slices in a bowl and sprinkle with salt and lime or
lemon juice. Use the mixed lettuce and coriander or mint leaves to line a
serving dish.
Heat the oil in a large frying pan and fry all the chopped and sliced
ingredients, stirring all the time, for two minutes. Add the fish sauce (or
soy), vinegar and 4 fl oz hot water and simmer for another two minutes. Then
add the fish to the pan and let everything simmer for three to four minutes,
turning over the fish pieces once. Remove from the heat and leave to cool.
When the fish is cool, arrange the mango strips on top of the salad leaves
and lay the fish on top of the mango. Then pour the cooking juices over the
salad. Chill, but take the dish out of the fridge about 10 minutes before
serving.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1917</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAC0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Food: Small eats, China's delicious treats - Street Food /
Ken Hom samples the delights of Dim Sum and market stalls, and eats better
in the alleys of Beijing than in the tourist restaurants
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEN HOM
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ON MY travels in China, some of my favourite 'commercial' foods (that is,
not prepared at home) have been those served in snack shops, street food
stalls, and roadside food carts.
Many Chinese I spoke with seemed to agree that the most satisfying foods
outside their homes were found in places offering xiao chi - that is, 'small
eats,' or snacks. The streets and alleyways of China's cities and villages
are filled with mouth-watering aromas drifting from the many food vendors
who line the streets and roadside. Many of the markets are filled with these
vendors. Some shoppers eat their snacks while shopping, or simply buy them
to supplement their meals, perhaps to keep the children quiet while a meal
is being prepared.
Throughout China, soup noodles, prosaic but satisfying, constitute one of
the most popular snacks. These are easy for the food vendor to prepare and
there is never a lack of customers.
But there are many other popular snack dishes. One of the most cherished
'small eats' throughout China is jiaozi dumplings, those wonderful boiled,
fried or - less often - steamed pastries filled with meats, vegetables,
garlic, scallions; each with regional touches and variations. I have eaten
more of these dumplings - really a well-balanced light meal - than I care to
count, and enjoyed them all. In a market in Hangzhou I have eaten thick
noodles in rich soup; light, satiny rice noodle pastries in a street stall
in Guangzhou; spicy noodles from a tiny food cart in Chengdu: all quickly
and simply prepared, and delicious.
Cooking techniques range from stir-frying to steaming. Variations also exist
in what I thought were purely southern-style Chinese foods. For example, I
enjoyed a rice porridge with fresh corn, with a topping of chili sauce, at
several market villages in Sichuan.
Wontons, dumplings wrapped in a thin noodle wrapping, are found in numerous
regional forms. I have even had blanched noodles with wontons stuffed with
minced pork in a hearty broth; and the famous 'congee' rice porridge - so
popular in southern China - on many street corners of China.
Perhaps this habitual and sustaining snacking started because for so many
centuries officials and workers in the cities kept such long hours that
restaurants stayed open and vendors hawked their goods until late at night,
even until dawn.
Much of China's legacy of street foods and vendors remained intact until the
People's Republic of China was established in 1949, when it was decreed that
such private entrepreneurial initiatives were too 'bourgeois,'
individualistic (running against the collective efforts of the time) or
otherwise retrograde to be allowed to continue. Food stalls, vendors,
hawkers and even most restaurants disappeared, their employees directed into
other occupations or forced to migrate. The recent policy reforms of the
last decade have allowed and even encouraged the re-emergence of these
venerable institutions; already, many have recovered their previous levels
of culinary skill and service, as I was lucky enough to experience.
In Western China, walking around the so-called 'night markets,' where
delicious smoked pork treats are sold, open until the wee hours of the
morning to serve night shift workers and hungry people in general, I could
see that almost every identifiable part of the pig was available.
Wine shops sold bowls of what is called 'white wine' - a strong potion,
actually more like a vodka, brewed from a type of millet. I watched with
fascination as the local people strolled into the shops for a quick drink,
while others entered with jars and bottles to have these filled for home
consumption. It was evident that everyone appreciated the convenience of
these night markets.
In Beijing, long famous for its 'small eats,' night markets and street
stalls have sprouted like mushrooms since the government has allowed them
back in business. I was struck by the carnival atmosphere of the street
scenes, crowded with people sampling the assortments of local and regional
favourites on offer to them.
It is said (and I concur) that one may eat better at the sidewalk food
stalls in Beijing than at most of the fancy restaurants to which tourists
are shunted.
Freshly-made pulled noodles are boiled and served, as are homemade jiaozi
dumplings, Beijing sausage, Sichuan cold noodles, Tianjin turnovers, Lanzhou
noodles, Wenzhou fishball soup and Xinjiang mutton barbecues. I sampled all
of these at the Wangfujing street market in Beijing.
Far away from Beijing, in Chengdu, Sichuan, a different sort of 'small eats'
are consumed. A local Sichuanese friend took me to a place which specialises
in typical Sichuan snacks such as Dan Dan Mian - spicy noodles tossed with
chili and minced pork - which I consumed in two minutes amid the street
traffic; 'pearl balls,' a sweet glutinous rice pastry; and the famous
Chengdu Huntuns - dumplings known in the West as wontons, but tossed here in
a marvellously spicy sauce with a good sprinkling of roasted ground Sichuan
peppercorns.
I also sampled a light egg crepe filled with meats, and steamed pork
dumplings - all of these in the most appropriately named snack restaurant,
Lona Chao Shou ('The Dragon's Eating Place'), home of fiery and assertive
snacks.
The best and most famous of snacks hail from the south of China, in the
Guangzhou (Canton) region. This is the home of dim sum (meaning 'heart's
delight' or 'to touch the heart'). It has been carried round the world by
Cantonese emigrants.
Guangzhou is also the home of the tea house, the ultimate in 'small eating,'
specialising in snacks only - and in teas. The balmy subtropical climate of
the region, with its long summery days and calm nights, creates an
atmosphere of sociability in a situation of relative abundance: the
Cantonese, with reason, believe that their cuisine is the best in China.
They make the most of it as often as they can, and these shops are always
busy.
Dim sum snacks are available from early morning until the late afternoon,
with the busiest times in mid-morning and mid-afternoon.
Substantial breakfasts of fancy rice porridge with peanuts, meat, fish and
sauces are served in this region. Noodle soups are to be had here, as
elsewhere in China. But in this part of China meat is almost always included
along with noodles, and dumplings in soups are common. The portions are as
large as the equivalent of a light meal.
Foreign foods, especially Western-style baked breads, rolls, and pastries,
have been added to the selections. In the Canton region, these so-called
snacks are really more than that: they comprise a very substantial late
breakfast or heavy lunch. Elsewhere in China, however, dim sum remains
'small eats.'
The number and variety of the Cantonese regional snacks defy description. In
one tea house, more than 2,000 dim sum dishes are offered on a rotation
basis. Such exquisite savoury dishes include steamed dumplings with minced
pork and prawns; chicken soup with dumplings, steamed rice flour filled with
assorted meats; deep-fried beancurd filled with pork and shrimp; steamed
minced meat balls; and sliced beef liver with steamed shrimp dumpling.
The equally impressive menu of sweet dishes includes such items as crisp and
sticky sweet cake topped with almonds, bean-filled cakes, sesame balls in
sweet syrup, custard tarts, and sweet red bean paste soup. In northern China
these types of snacks are known as dian xin, the name referring more to
sweet dessert snacks than to the savoury ones in the south; a mandarin form
of dim sum.
For much of China's culinary history, snacks and street foods have played a
key role in Chinese social life. These places are, perhaps, akin to cafes
and bars in the western world.
During the Cultural Revolution there were justified fears that this feature
of Chinese life would be wiped out. But more prosperous times, combined with
economic reforms, have restored some part of China's food culture.
And today, street food stalls and their unique brand of snacks continue
their contribution to Chinese social life.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1918</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJACZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / How To Spend It: Curves of iron
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
IN THE currently fashionable interior, wrought-iron is usually much in
evidence. There is something about its malleability, its paradoxical
combination of visual spareness and brute strength which seems to appeal to
a new generation of designers. It lends itself to the curving lines the
Gothic and classically-inspired pieces require.
Once almost solely confined to garden and conservatory these days it is
marching into the most modish of interiors. From dining-chairs made from
wrought-iron combined with rattan - for Global Village - to the
sophisticated designs of Andre Dubrueil, wrought-iron is currently
undergoing a surge of popularity.
Suzanne Ruggles has been studying wrought-iron's potential and developing
ideas with a group of 10 different blacksmiths all over the country. The
results can be seen and bought in her shop at 90 Fulham Road, London SW3.
From her first range - a Gothic-inspired collection which included a
two-seater-sofa, a coffee table, side table, armchair and stool, she moved
on to other motifs, including a wheatsheaf settle, an oakleaf side table and
armchair and to her latest range, the neo-classical designs photographed
here, right.
Many of her pieces feature the now fashionable motifs of lyres, tassled
ropes, cabriole legs and twisted stems.
The sofa sells for Pounds 950, while the armchair is Pounds 450 (both
include the base cushion). The coffee table is Pounds 450 and the
plant-stand Pounds 190. The tall candlesticks (Pounds 95) and the sconce
(Pounds 55) are just two examples from a large collection of candlestands
and candelabra, many with a distinctly ecclesiastical air and many inspired
by medieval designs. There is a particularly fine plain curving chandelier
(Pounds 324) while candlestands come in many sizes and designs.
Standing on the plant-stand is a vase made from hand-blown iridescent glass
combined with metal which sells for Pounds 185, just one of the many
hand-crafted pieces commissioned from other designers by Suzanne Ruggles.
Look out for the strange floral sculptures by Kristine Gad as well for work
by Isabel Tennent and Caroline Le Cras who have been using traditional
techniques such as gilding, verre eglomise, lacquering and painted finishes
to produce a stunning series of frames and mirrors.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1919</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJACYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / How To Spend It: Spare rugs
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
PLUSH CARPETS and highly decorative floral motifs are not what the new
pared-down 1990s interior requires - honeyed wood or flat-weave kelims,
plain creamy woollen rugs or eco-sound seagrass matting is more the thing.
For a newer alternative it is also worth looking at a range of flat-woven
pure wool floor coverings by Roger Oates Design Associates.
Launched just two years ago the collection has taken off in a big way in
America and France where designers like Jacques Grange seized on it for its
air of understated quality and its slightly spare aesthetic look.
If you like Shaker-style, then this is the floor-covering for you.
The floor-covering is woven like very heavy cloth fabric and comes in a
range of two-tone herringbone weaves (which are most suitable for those who
want a very plain, uniform look) or a series of strongly coloured stripes.
The flooring is ideally suited for runners or for being made into rugs or
large carpets and it can also be used wall-to-wall.
Many customers think the striped versions are ideal for stairs but Roger
Oates is keen to point out that, although visually they may look the perfect
partnership, they are not hard wearing enough for the stairs.
For a plain effect look out for Venetian Hancock (it comes in lots of colour
combinations including two greens, a navy and two reds but I like it best in
the shades of biscuit) or the small random-textured stripe of Jaspe or
Lewis.
The strong stripes are Albany, Vernon, Hampton (photographed here) and
Charleston. Prices are about Pounds 60 a linear metre.
For a full-colour brochure, swatches and details of local stockists write
(enclosing Pounds 1.50) to Roger Oates Design Associates, Church Lane,
Ledbury, Herefordshire HR8 1DW. (Tel: 0531-2718).
In London the range can be seen and bought at Sinclair Till, 793 Wandsworth
Road, London SW8 and at Bernardout, 328 King's Road, London SW3.
For a more striking modern look for the floor it is worth looking at the
collection of limited edition - just 15 of each design - rugs commissioned
by The Contemporary Textile Gallery at Vigo Galleries, 6 a Vigo Street,
London W1X 1AH.
Many of our most distinguished textile designers, such as Sian Tucker and
Helen Yardley, have produced rugs for the gallery.
Many designs are very strong and a room would need to be planned around them
but some, like Suzie Pilgrim's pale Victor Pasmore-like abstract in cream,
black and mustard could fit into many an existing modern interior.
Prices range from Pounds 395 for the smallest rugs, while Pounds 650 is the
average price for rugs of 6 ft by 4ft.
The most expensive are just over Pounds 1,000. The gallery always holds a
constantly changing selection - as one design sells out, more arrive.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1920</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJACXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / How To Spend It: Sofa so good
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
WHEREAS five years or so ago sofas came plumply stuffed and covered in flora
of every shape and hue, these days they come classically proportioned and
covered in creamy canvas or one of the crisp cotton ginghams reminiscent of
New England interiors.
To coincide with Chelsea Design Week, Designers Guild has launched a
collection of sofas, ottomans and chairs covered in fabrics from Tricia
Guild's latest collection of striped and checked hand-loomed Indian cottons,
which she calls Orissa.
There are some 35 different designs and an example of each is on show at the
Designers Guild showroom at 271 and 277 King's Road, London SW3.
To go with the sofas is a selection of different stools, ottomans and boxes.
Those photographed (right) illustrate the mood of the collection. The
two-seater Canonbury sofa ranges from Pounds 1,280 to Pounds 1,540,
depending on the fabric chosen, while the Montgomery chair in the background
ranges from Pounds 695 - Pounds 770. The Brompton long stool starts at
Pounds 335 and goes on up to Pounds 395.
Photographed left is Kingcome Sofas' version of the classical 19th century
shape, the Howard. Kingcome have chosen to cover it in a creamy viscose
material by Manuel Canovas.
At 6 ft long, 42 in deep, 35in high the Howard will need 15.5 metres of
plain fabric to cover it and it sells for Pounds 1,580 (plus vat). See it at
Kingcome Sofas showroom at 302 - 304 Fulham Road, London SW10.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1921</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJACWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / How To Spend It: Design tour de force
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
ANYONE interested in furnishing options might like to know about Chelsea
Design Week which runs from tomorrow until Friday.
Some 20 companies in the interior design industry (all London-based and
including Designers Guild, Nobilis-Fontan, John Cullen Lighting, Liberty,
Colefax &amp; Fowler) keep open house to visitors every day from 10 am to 5 pm
(until 7.30 pm on Wednesday).
You can start your tour by signing up at any of the participating showrooms
( tel: 071-233-5971 for details) and from then on a fleet of cars will whisk
you from one port of call to another.
Harvey Nichols of Knightsbridge, London SW1 is bidding to become more than
just a source of designer labels for ladies who lunch. It is now a serious
contender in the home furnishing stakes.
This week it launched several more interior-design-linked concessions on its
fourth floor. Last year I reported on the arrival of the Ralph Lauren home
collection and the launch of the Mulberry At Home range - now there are 10
more concessions which greatly extend the choice on offer.
Global Village is there with its brand of sophisticated ethnic furniture and
artefacts. Belinda Coote's tapestries and hand-painted furniture nestle
besides Kenneth Turner's floral decorations. There are Persian carpets and
kelims in the oriental carpet department, fine linens and layettes at The
Monogrammed Linen shop, china and glass at Thomas Goode, decorative items
for home and garden from Un Jardin . . . en plus.
Wilson &amp; Gough have a marvellous selection of one-off hand-crafted pieces
for the home while Bougies la Francaise has candles, candles . . . and more
candles. Finally, there is Smythson, of Bond Street, for everything from
diaries to invitation cards and headed writing paper.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1922</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJACVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / How To Spend It: Why quality still counts - What makes the
90s house special
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LUCIA VAN DER POST
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN THE field of interior design things have been stirring. As we move deeper
into the 1990s all those totems of the eighties-style interior, the chintz,
the flounces, the bibelots, the general air of luxe, are now seriously
demode. Nineties houses are airier, fresher, simpler. Quality, not quantity,
is what really counts.
All this, of course, is hard on those who managed to scrape together enough
to pay for the last lot of chintz just in time to learn that it was - hey-ho
 -out of favour. The good news, though, is that the currently fashionable
interior, with its emphasis on simpler, fewer things of genuine quality, is
not only likely to give more lasting aesthetic pleasure but also to be, in
the end, cheaper on the pocket.
Do not, though, mistake simplicity for conformity. Simplicity, in decorland,
has various moods. In its most urban, most sophisticated and most extreme
form it leads to the bleakness of the minimalist interior, almost impossibly
bereft of the sort of visual comforts that most of us have become accustomed
to. No room there for the funny little vase your child made at pottery
classes, the strange glass tree the lady-what-does produced at Christmas or
the slightly naff ornaments that your in-laws are so fond of giving you.
Simple also means ethnic - not the old rough and ready ethnic of the macrame
plant-holders and the crudely woven baskets, but the sort of sophisticated
ethnic exemplified by Global Village's products and about which I wrote last
October. Tables from Rajasthan, forged iron and antiqued rattan chairs from
Asia, painted furniture from New Mexico.
Nearer home simple also comes in classical mood, all calm and light,
softened by flowing fabrics and natural or gently painted woods. New
England-style, too, with its dislike of ostentation, its emphasis on fresh
cottons and solid wood, on wrought-iron and folk-art is right in tune with
the current mood.
Most sensitive designers have already responded to the new feeling in the
domestic interior - Tricia Guild of Designers' Guild, for instance, has just
brought out a collection of sofas, chairs and ottomans which she shows
almost entirely upholstered in plain stripes and ginghams. From a designer
who originally made her name with a collection of some of the most
ravishingly pretty florals ever seen outside a garden this speaks volumes.
Photographed here below are just some of the ingredients that go to make up
the new 1990s-style interior.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1923</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJACUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Regulators may merge
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PRIVATE individuals could have a regulatory body devoted to their investment
business from April next year.
The new body would bring together jobs done by various regulators at the
moment, in particular Lautro (which oversees the marketing of life assurance
and unit trusts) and Fimbra (which is responsible for a motley array of
financial advisers, investment managers and insurance brokers).
The reason for the change: many independent advisers have been driven to
become sales agents of life assurance companies. Sir Kenneth Clucas, who had
been asked by the Securities and Investment Board, the chief investment
regulator, to study the problem, warned this week that the body could get
locked into a 'vicious spiral'. As members leave, the costs of regulation
rise for those that remain, forcing more members to leave.
Fimbra members are mostly paid by commissions, and cannot pass the costs of
regulation to their customers, said Sir Kenneth. He concluded: 'The demise
of Fimbra would be bound to threaten the continued availability of a wide
choice of financial advice.'
His recommendation is one watchdog to oversee both sales agents and
independents, thus sharing the costs of regulation. To this new
super-regulator could be added some of the investment managers currently
overseen by another body (Imro), together with insurance brokers who answer
to the Insurance Brokers Registration Council. The SIB broadly welcomed
these ideas and has set about creating a formation committee to bring the
new body into existence, so it has a fair chance of happening (though
without the support of a large proportion of life companies, it may never
get off the ground).
The result may not be a renaissance in independent advice. The SIB is
pondering proposals on how commissions paid by life companies are disclosed,
and the complete separation of independent advisers and sales agents. These,
say independents, still leave them at a disadvantage.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1924</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJACTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (Briefcase): Tax relief on study
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
I AM taking a part time evening course at the local College of Further
Education. The course is the BTEC National Certificate in Business and
Finance. The fees this year are Pounds 180 and textbooks cost Pounds 40. I
fund this myself. Is it possible to claim tax allowances for these
expenditures from the Inland Revenue?
No; the tax relief for certain expenditure on vocational training (announced
in last year's Budget) does not apply to payments made before the beginning
of 1992-93.
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1925</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJACSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (Briefcase): Interest on solicitors'
fees
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
FUNDS from a deceased relative's estate are being withdrawn from the
building society where my relative kept the funds by the firm of solicitors
handling probate. The cheque is to be made payable in the name of the
solicitor partnership. If that money is paid into the partnership's bank
account does the interest accrue for the benefit of the legatees or does it
'by custom and practice' accrue for the benefit of the solicitors?
The interest involved is quite substantial.
The interest will be accounted for as income of the estate, and does not
accrue for the benefit of the solicitors.
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1926</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJACRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (Briefcase): Carrying over capital
gains
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
I HAVE made quite a lot of capital losses this year. When I have off-set my
gains is it permissible to carry any remaining losses on for use in another
year? If so for how many years?
Yes, until you die. Ask your tax office for the free introductory pamphlet
on capital gains tax, CGT14. This tends to over-simplify the intricate and
arbitrary rules, but it is quite good as a starting point. In particular, we
have maintained that the rules laid down by Parliament for the deduction of
past year's allowable losses are more generous than the rules laid down by
the Board of Inland Revenue in the official instruction book for tax
inspectors. This point has not yet been decided in the courts,
unfortunately, because of the cost of fighting the Inland Revenue up to the
House of Lords.
In the case of a Mrs Schofield, for example, who sold antiques which she had
inherited before 1965, the question arose as to whether time-appointment
should be done before indexation (as most professional advisers and lawyers
consider) or afterwards (as the Revenue instruction book says). Mrs
Schofield won before a Special Commissioner, but lost in the High Court; she
won in the Court of Appeal, but - even though the three judges in that Court
were unanimous in dismissing the Revenue's arguments - the Board has
insisted on taking the case to the House of Lords. One can scarcely be
blamed for wondering sometimes whether the Board is incapable of accepting
the idea that it is not infallible as an interpreter of the words approved
by MPs in Acts of Parliament.
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1927</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJACQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family (Briefcase): Trouble in the pipeline
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MY NEIGHBOUR has renewed his entire water system, inserting pipework into
the party wall between us; I was never consulted, nor did I give any
approval for work affecting the party wall. We live in a 1950s terrace in
London, and the walls between the houses are two courses of brick, without a
cavity. Water noises now reverberate in the wall, so that anyone in the
adjacent rooms is disturbed when water is used next door.
I have approached the neighbour who is unhelpful. What rights do I have and
what can I do to end this imposition?
As your house appears to be in the area of the old London County Council you
have the protection of the provisions of the London Building Acts
(Amendment) Act 1939. Part VI of that Act requires certain notices to be
served on an adjoining owner before any work is done to a party wall, to
enable a Party Wall Award to be made. This evidently was not done. You
should consult a solicitor as soon with a view to taking steps to restrain
what is probably a trespass and certainly a nuisance. There may also be
sufficient nuisance from noise to enable you to enlist the local authority's
Environmental Health Department who can serve a notice requiring abatement
of a statutory nuisance under section 80 of the Environmental Protection Act
1990.
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1928</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJACPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Safer cheques
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BARCHARD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE CHEQUES ACT, a private member's bill sponsored by Conal Gregory MP,
became law on Monday.
It means that writing 'account payee only' on cheques makes it impossible to
divert them to a third party.
Cheques crossed in this way are now non-transferable and can only be paid
into the account of a named payee. If funds are wrongly paid out, the error
lies with the collecting bank. The original signatory and beneficiary of the
cheque are both protected.
Though the Act is now law, it will take three months before its commencement
orders are issued and it begins to function.
Several of the high street banks, including Barclays and Lloyds, say they
are considering issuing personal customers with cheques marked 'account
payee only.' Customers who want to issue transferable cheques - mostly small
traders in a few traditional markets - would be able to request old-style
cheques.
For the rest of us, the account would offer greater security from having
payment diverted by a fraudster, though there may be complications in cases
when a cheque issuer gets a payee's name slightly wrong.
But watch out. The change does not apply to another expression commonly
written on cheques, 'not-negotiable'. Not-negotiable is not another way of
saying that a cheque cannot be transferred. What it means is that if the
cheque is transferred, the new payee has no better claim over the payment
than the original payee - for instance if the cheque is stopped.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1929</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJACOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: High volume - Directors' Transactions
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS MACDONALD, Directus Ltd
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE stock market's cautious reaction to the Budget and the general election
announcement elicited the expected response from directors: the volume of
selling increased. Such a reaction may be due to concern about the
possibility of higher tax on capital gains under a Labour administration,
although that was not mentioned in John Smith's alternative Budget.
Trevor Hemmings, the director in charge of the leisure division at Scottish
&amp; Newcastle, has made sales totalling 3.6m shares. Scottish &amp; Newcastle
shares have climbed steadily from around 300p in mid 1990.
If further evidence of directors locking in substantial capital gains was
required, it was provided by Domestic &amp; General, the insurance company.
Martin Copley, the chairman and Howard James, the managing director, sold 1m
and 100,000 shares respectively at 950p, in both cases reducing their
holdings by around 40 per cent. Shares in Domestic &amp; General have risen
almost fourfold since the beginning of 1990.
We recorded unusually large purchases in BTR just after the announcement of
final results. Alan Jackson, the Australian chief executive, bought 100,000
shares at 386.5p while Kathleen O'Donovan, the finance director bought 2,000
shares at the same price. Jackson also chose to exercise an option to buy a
further 15,000 shares which he has retained.
Key to sectors: Brew = Brewers &amp; Distillers; BuSe = Business Services; Chem
= Chemicals; C&amp;C = Contracting &amp; Construction; Elns = Electronics; EngG =
Engineering General; FdRe = Food Retailing; InsB = Insurance Brokers; InsC =
Insurance Composite; InTr = Investment Trusts; Med = Media; Misc =
Miscellaneous; n/a = not applicable; OthF = Other Financial; OthI = Other
Industrial Materials; Prop = Property; Stor = Stores; Tele = Telephone
Networks; Text = Textiles.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
DIRECTORS' SHARE TRANSACTIONS IN THEIR OWN COMPANIES (LISTED &amp; USM)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                    No of
Company                Sector    Shares   Value    directors
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
SALES
Allied Textile          Text      5,000     21        1
Berry Birch &amp; Noble     InsB     35,000     32        1
British Vita            Chem    138,291    332        1*
Cable &amp; Wireless        Tele      5,733     35        1
Cater Allen             OthF      5,037     17        2
Concentric              EngG      7,500     21        1*
Domestic &amp; General      InsC  1,100,000 10,450        2
Edmond Holdings          C&amp;C    100,000     37        1*
Electrocomponents       Elns     31,125     83        1*
Fairway (London)        Misc     22,350     14        1
Greggs                  FdRe     14,500     57        2
Henderson Admin         OthF     75,000    511        4*
Marks &amp; Spencer         Stor     36,018    114        1*
Mercury Asset Man       OthF     75,000    273        1*
More O'Ferrall           Med    135,426    328        2
Plysu                   Chem     25,000     65        1
Property Sec Inv        Prop    350,000    350        1
Sainsbury (J)           FdRe     42,319    165        1*
Scot &amp; Newcastle        Brew  3,600,000 16,225        1
Securiguard             BuSe     38,638     56        2
Slingsby (HC)            n/a      9,000     13        1
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
PURCHASES
Aberforth SmCo (Wa)     InTr     50,000     27        1
BAT Industries          Misc      3,166     21        2
BTR                     OthI    102,000    394        2
Grand Metropolitan      Brew      4,958     45        2
Gt Portland Estates     Prop    100,250    157        2
PFG Hodgson Kenyon      Misc     36,000     15        1
Radius                  Elns    400,000    112        1
RIT Cap'l Partners      InTr     50,000     46        1
Sherriff Holdings        C&amp;C     45,000     25        2
St Modwen Props         Prop     80,000     13        1
TGI Group               Elns     94,000     38        3
Wates Cty of London     Prop     50,000     33        1
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Value expressed in Pounds 000s. Companies must notify the Stock Exchange
within 5 working days of a share transaction by a director. This list
contains all trans- actions, including the exercise of options (*) if
100% subsequently sold, with a value over Pounds 10,000. Information
released by the Stock Exchange 9-13 March 1992.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Directus Ltd, Edinburgh
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1930</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJACNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Minding Your Own Business: When computers help to bring home
the bacon - A couple whose rural idyll is funded by two very distinct
businesses
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICK GARNETT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AN ODD message echoes out from the answer phone at the McGrath's home in the
hamlet of Runnington.
'This is Somerset Computer Services and Dancing Pig printing and design at
the Bell and Birdtable,' it says. 'Whether it's computer services, printing
or meat and vegetables from the smallholding you are interested in, please
leave your telephone number.'
It is the dream of many to flee The Smoke and set up shop in a rural idyll
as far as is practically possible from the grind of big city life. Kieron
and Anne McGrath have done just that. They escaped London in 1981 and bought
a small house and a three acre plot in Somerset. Eight years later, when
Kieron no longer wanted to be away from home as a navigation technician for
a US oceanographic company, they added a computer service and desk top
publishing business in nearby Taunton to the smallholding.
The couple love living in the heart of the West Country and being their own
bosses. But it is not all milk and honey. 'There's a lot of hard work and a
lot of stress,' says Kieron. It is not wildly profitable either.' Last year
the computer and design business had a turnover of Pounds 30,000 and Kieron
took a salary of just Pounds 7,000. The previous year, turnover was Pounds
16,000 and Kieron extracted nothing.
Anne, a former buyer for Liberty's, readily concedes that making a living
out of a three-acre patch of turf is a pipe dream. 'If you can provide cheap
food for yourselves and enjoy working on the smallholding, then any profit
is a bonus.'
With pigs, sheep, ducks and hens, vegetables of the slightly more unusual
variety and flowers for commercial sale, the Bell &amp; Birdtable smallholding
sold Pounds 6,000 worth of produce last year on which it made a Pounds 1,000
profit. It does mean that shopping will not break the bank. 'Our weekly food
bill is about Pounds 10 to Pounds 15,' Anne says. What glues the couple's
finances together is Anne's yearly income of Pounds 6,000 from a trust fund.
Kieron bought an Amstrad computer for his own use in 1987 and found himself
drawn into helping friends wrestling with computer systems in their small
businesses. He had no experience of desk-top publishing but a chance meeting
with a graphics designer living across the field in Runnington started the
ball rolling and the two of them started working together at the end of
1990. Since then he has bought a Quadram by Trader Desk with a 40 megabyte
memory and an even faster machine, a Dan Technology with 210 megabyte hard
disc for Pounds 1,800. With a scanning device which can read a hand drawing
and transpose it onto a computer screen, Kieron says this gives him an
adequate desk-top publishing system.
Kieron is determined to keep the business in his own hands but the economics
do not work in his favour and he knows it. The two graphic artists he
employs charge Pounds 15 an hour. For many clients, Kieron adds a surcharge
of just Pounds 2.50 for the company's hourly rate. 'We have to be very
careful how much we charge. Companies down here are unhappy paying more than
Pounds 20 an hour. A few might go up to Pounds 25. You have to work hard
encouraging people to spend.'
Customers for the design business which uses the trade name Dancing Pig, and
counts for two-thirds of turnover, include the Rural Development Commission,
a Devon springwater supplier, a willow furniture maker in Bridgwater and a
local independent school. Contracts range from a leaflet or prospectus to
helping shift a 'corporate image', if that is not too grand a term for tiny
companies fretting about a naff logo or duff brochure.
Kieron is also worried about competition. 'There isn't much around here at
the moment but the cost of entry into this business is coming down and down.
I think we'll have to start offering some form of marketing service.'
For the time being, the little company has to cope with more mundane
problems. Forced to leave its premises - one office and use of the boiler
room in a local authority assisted block (rent Pounds 35 per week) - it is
moving to another subsidised location ten miles away. It is also making its
first foray into advertising, spending Pounds 400 for one year in Yellow
Pages.
Meanwhile, back at the ranch, Anne explains what she has to do to make even
a small profit. 'You must start vegetables off in optimum conditions and you
must offer customers something a bit different.'
For the first half of the plan, vegetables and flowering plants at the Bell
&amp; Birdtable spend the early part of their lives in a 'propagating'
environment - alias a former bedroom. Growlights consume a miserly 2.5p of
electricity a day and the heater sips a gallon of paraffin a week.
For the second part, Anne cultivates somewhat unusual vegetables such as
eight varieties of lettuce, purple and yellow beans, squashes and peppers.
It is pork though that is the biggest seller, the small-holding is home to
22 squealers.
'With commercial producers, pigs are usually killed at about 15 weeks, kept
in small pens, fed to put on weight quickly and producing soft meat with no
muscle,' Anne says. 'Thin skin makes for weak crackling. I keep my pigs
outside all the time to the age of six and a half months and feed them on
barley and soya mix with no animal protein. Many pigs are also fed whey but
I don't feed them any milk products.'
Anne sells her produce at the door and to local restaurants and pubs.
'Selling to shops is a dead loss because of the margins.' She has four
freezers, each bought for just over Pounds 200 and sells half pigs at Pounds
1.50 a pound, smaller leg portions going for Pounds 2.60 a pound.
Although decamping into the countryside has not proved lucrative so far, 'it
is a wonderful place to live though,' Kieron says.
The Bell &amp; Birdtable, Runnington, Wellington, Somerset TA21 OQW. Tel 0823
663080.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1931</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJACMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: The small investor and the big
takeover
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HARRY HOPKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IF THE terms are good, many investors are apt to see takeovers of 'their'
companies as money for jam. But perhaps they should think again.
In April 1986, I bought the shares of a small company called WSL Holdings.
Formerly Wolverhampton Steam Laundries, it had been reincarnated not long
before by putting together two companies running school tours abroad,
educational cruising and skiing. A teacher, I recall, could get a free trip
by taking charge of a certain number of children.
WSL, said Investors Chronicle, was 'the dominant firm in an attractive niche
market.' There could be additions but there was 'no intention of moving into
the mainstream travel business.'
Unfortunately, I was not the only person struck by WSL's possibilities. A
year later, the Granada group made a successful takeover bid, mainly in
shares. There was an immediate profit. But the 'attractive niche' had
vanished into a labyrinth winding through TV production, bingo halls,
property, video rental and so on.
Instead of a single-minded company with an intelligible design, I had
acquired a vast, complex undertaking which was difficult to follow and where
the 'swings and roundabouts' principle seemed likely to apply.
It is surprising how often this happens. Carried away by the immediate
profit, the small investor might fail to notice how far his intentions are
being subverted.
In the spring of 1987, for instance, shareholders of British Car Auctions
had every reason to congratulate themselves upon their shrewdness.
Second-hand sales were rising and the company had transplanted its simple
formula successfully across the Atlantic. It had no debt in England.
At this point, however, Michael Ashcroft's Hawley Group, which already had a
holding in BCA, made an all-share bid for the group. The stated aim was to
add another service leg to Hawley's contract cleaning, while providing
capital for BCA's US expansion.
Again, there was a satisfactory profit on the deal. That might have caused
shareholders to overlook the fact that AGMs would henceforth be held in
Hamilton, Bermuda, where the company was registered.
A few months later, Hawley took over a large electronic security group,
American District Telegraph, and followed by changing its company name to
ADT. At a presentation meeting for British shareholders, Ashcroft assured
those puzzled by this change that while ADT might mean little in England,
the initials had long been famous in the US.
Using a film and diagrams, he re-assured shareholders further that ADT was
bound for steady, sober growth thanks to the relatively recession-proof
supports of car auctions and electronic security.
This, however, was some time before the company embarked on a course of
investing its funds in a diversity of service enterprises such as BAA, LEP
Group and Christie's - in the latter case, just as the bottom was falling
out of the once-fabulous art auction market. BCA's former shareholders have
watched ADT's shares slide from over Pounds 12 to a low of Pounds 2.80 over
the past 14 months.
It is not only in the service industries that investors may find their
portfolios transformed willy-nilly. How many holders of John Brown, which
had transcended its great Clydeside ship-building past successfully, can
have dreamed they would find themselves sharing the conglomerate roof of
Trafalgar House?
Did the holders of Northern Engineering Industries realise they would vanish
into the maw of Rolls-Royce just when long awaited power-station contracts
were on the horizon?
Even without takeovers, though, investors may find the shape of their
portfolios changed almost out of recognition by new chairmen.
Take Grand Metropolitan. Some shareholders no doubt invested in it as the
hotel company its name suggests. They will recall how rapturously the
acquisition of Intercontinental Hotels was greeted - 'a leading hotel in
every city of the world.'
Yet, seven years later, they were being cleared out like old rubbish as (in
the words of the annual report) the new chairman, Sir Allen Sheppard,
carried out 'a complete realignment of the business portfolio.'
The small investor should perhaps take note of the word 'portfolio.' In this
case, he has benefited from the transformation of GrandMet into an
international food and drinks company based on hamburgers and a galaxy of
brand names. But such forced changes of focus are by no means always
successful.
Ask the shareholders of Barker and Dobson, who thought they had put their
money in boiled sweets and jujubes - handed out in sacks at the agm - but,
after the advent of John Fletcher as chairman, found themselves, to their
cost, the owners of an extensive chain of supermarkets.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1932</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJACLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Fund managers jump on the bondwagon -
International bonds for short-term investment
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THIS TIME last year, the unit trust industry was piling into a previously
under-exploited sector: international bonds. Unit trusts have always been
regarded in Britain as primarily an equity vehicle; but at the beginning of
1991 a series of the bluest-chip names in the industry, including Mercury,
Baring, Fidelity and Newton, launched bond funds.
The argument was simple. The world was near the trough of a recession, and a
recession traditionally is the best time to buy bonds. Yields are high,
offering good income initially. Then, as interest rates come down, investors
need a lower yield to tempt them into bonds. As yields go down, so the price
of bonds must rise, offering the prospect of strong short-term gains.
International bonds were favoured because British base rates were falling
already. Meanwhile, European interest rates were ready to fall, while
currency risks had been lessened by entry into the Exchange Rate Mechanism
(ERM). Also, international bond funds have a more favourable tax position
than gilt funds. So investors could look forward to a quick, tax-efficient
gain.
Has it happened? Not really. Over the past year, the average fund in the
sector has grown 9.3 per cent; nothing spectacular, although this does put
the sector slightly ahead of international growth equity funds, which have
put on 7.2 per cent.
Of the brave new bond funds from last year, Mercury's Global Bond unit
trust, now worth an enormous Pounds 145.6m, is ninth in the sector, having
grown 9.9 per cent. Baring's fund is up 9.4 per cent, Fidelity's 10.5 per
cent (seventh in the sector) but Newton's only 3.3 per cent (last of the 22
funds with a year's record).
The reason, of course, is that the recession has not ended on cue. The
pattern is not uniform across the world, but there are still several
economies which have yet to see significant cuts in interest rates. As a
result, some of the most attractive bond markets of a year ago -
particularly France - still seem poised to produce comfortable gains.
Peter Oppenheimer, chief international economic strategist at Hambros, sees
the world's economies as having reached different points in the recession.
He says: 'The axis is still split between those countries which are close to
some kind of moderate recovery in growth, and others which are still waiting
for cuts in interest rates.'
Most of the former are 'Anglo-Saxon' economies - the US, Canada, Australia
and, to some extent, the UK - and there is little hope of exciting growth in
their bond markets. But Oppenheimer foresees strong prospects for bond
prices in the rest of the world, particularly Japan and continental Europe.
He says the interest rate reductions which had been forecast for Europe have
been tempered by the ERM and, more recently, by a troubled wage negotiation
round in Germany. Economic troubles there have helped to keep other European
economies offering rather better rates than they would do otherwise; in
particular, Oppenheimer notes that France, which has a low inflation rate,
is offering real bond yields (above inflation) of 7 per cent. French bonds,
therefore, seem overdue for a strong rally.
He adds that when the Bundesbank does cut base rates, it usually does so
quickly and substantially. In each of the last two recessions, it cut four
percentage points off base rates in 12 months.
Oppenheimer's analysis is shared by many fund managers. Ian Ainscow of
Commercial Union - whose PPT Global Bond fund, aimed primarily at umbrella
funds, leads the sector over three years - says the fund is as underweight
as it can be in dollar bonds. It aims to beat the Salomon Brothers World
Bond index, 50 per cent of which is in dollar bonds, so this still requires
a heavy amount of US stock.
CU has twice the index weighting in France and is also heavily overweight in
Spain. And it has a heavy allocation of yen bonds, anticipating that the
Japanese economy is moving into a severe slow-down.
Mercury, however, believes that US bonds should continue to make progress
providing fiscal measures are not considered to be 'unduly aggressive.' But
its distribution at the beginning of the year included 33.9 per cent in
France, 11.5 per cent in Spain and 14.4 per cent in Japan.
So, the chance of a strong gain in the short term is still there. Whether
you should look at bonds as a capital growth investment for the long term is
another matter altogether.
Over the past 10 years, the four funds which have been going this long have
managed average growth of 165.6 per cent, according to Micropal.
International growth equity funds grew 256.7 per cent over the same period,
and UK growth funds 321.4 per cent. Traditionally, bonds have been prey to
the ravages of inflation although this may change in the 1990s, in the view
of some commentators.
The five-year figures, which reflect the full impact of the October 1987
crash on equities, show that while the sector has moderate attractions for
the risk-averse investor, they should not be overstated. Although the
average international bond trust beat a UK growth trust, the return for
investors since March 1987 was just 18.8 per cent (a compound rate of only
3.5 per cent per year).
The following view from Fidelity, therefore, seems to make sense: 'An
international bond exposure could be recommended for investors who expect
interest rates to continue falling but who are not confident enough to put
their money into equities yet.'
Do not, however, expose yourself to international bonds without examining
conventional and index-linked gilts first. They are better for the
security-conscious investor.
 -----------------------------------------------------
BEST INTERNATIONAL FIXED INTEREST TRUSTS OVER 1 YEAR
 -----------------------------------------------------
                        % gain
 -----------------------------------------------------
Norwich Int Bond          15.6
Whittingdale US Shrt      14.6
CU Worldwide Bond         14.2
CU PPT Global             13.2
Invesco Int Bond          12.5
 -----------------------------------------------------
Source: Micropal. Offer to bid with income reinvested
over year to March 2.
 -----------------------------------------------------
 -----------------------------------------------------
BEST INTERNATIONAL FIXED INTEREST TRUSTS OVER 3 YEARS
 -----------------------------------------------------
                        % gain
 -----------------------------------------------------
CU PPT Global            35.5
Abbey W'ldwide           29.7
S&amp;P Internat             22.3
Whiitingdale US Shrt     22.1
Beckman Int              21.7
 -----------------------------------------------------
Source: Micropal. Offer-to-bid with income reinvested
over 3 years to March 2.
 -----------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1933</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJACKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Why Lautro needs you
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NORMA COHEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IF YOU are one of the tens of thousands of investors who bought a
single-premium with-profits bond within the past two years, read this.
Lautro, the self regulatory body for the life insurance industry, wants to
know what you thought you were buying when you signed on the dotted line.
After reviewing the advertising literature of six of the largest purveyors
of this product - by far the most widely sold insurance product in 1991 -
they think you may have been misled. If you were, the product provider will
be required to explain matters fully to you in writing and if you are
dissatisfied, you may be eligible for a full refund.
While exact figures are hard to come by, the industry estimates that some
Pounds 3bn of these policies are outstanding.
Last week, Lautro sent a letter to all life companies with details it feels
may have been misrepresented to consumers in the sales pitch. It has asked
for copies of 'sales scripts' - the verbal assurances that were made to you
about the product - as well as sales literature,
In particular, Lautro is concerned that consumers signed up for the policy
believing that it was simply a higher yielding form of building society
deposit account, that the current high bonus rates were likely to continue
and that withdrawals could be made without loss of principal.
Also, Lautro believes the advertising too easily dismisses the ability of
the insurance company to cut your bonus. The possibility of a bonus cut
appears in the literature as the Market Value Adjustment Rate. What's that?
'And well you may ask,' said a Lautro official. The literature fails to tell
you that a bonus based on strong equity performance in a preceding year, may
be cut significantly if, for instance, future returns look likely to fall.
'The MVAF has been quite sparingly used in the life insurance industry,'
said Melvin Lay, valuations actuary at Norwich Union, which pioneered the
with-profits bond beginning in 1989. Furthermore, with-profits bonds have
been paying bonuses at an average 8.5 per cent after-tax yield, making them
look like very attractive alternatives for those who keep long-term savings
in building society accounts.
However, Lay says, the type of bonuses being offered by with-profits bonds
can only be achieved through equity investments.
Norwich Union has largely withdrawn from the market because of the effect
the cost of paying bonuses was having on its regulatory reserves.
The largest purveyor of with-profits bonds says it believes its literature
is not misleading. Tony Kempster, managing director at Prudential Holborn,
said the company has sold more than 20,000 policies and made only two
refunds to individuals.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1934</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJACJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: The radical Liberals - The Election
and You / The Lib Dem's far-reaching tax plan
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SCHEHERAZADE DANESHKHU
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IF YOU WANT radicalism, vote Liberal Democrat. The party's plans include a
complete overhaul of the tax and social security systems, setting them apart
from the Tories and Labour. Sceptics might argue that as the third party,
the Liberal Democrats have the luxury of putting forward ambitious plans
they know they are unlikely to have to implement.
The broad aim is to create a simpler and fairer system of taxation and
pensions to benefit those on low incomes at the cost of the very wealthy.
What follows is a broad summary of the main ideas.
Income tax and National Insurance: These taxes are to be integrated into
one. The 20 per cent tax band introduced by Norman Lamont would be abolished
and 1p added to the basic rate of tax, making it 26p.
Those earning up to Pounds 33,000 would pay 35 per cent tax on income (26
per cent in income tax and 9 per cent National Insurance); at Pounds 33,000
up to Pounds 50,000, the rate would be 42 per cent (33 per cent income tax
and 9 per cent NIC); those earning over Pounds 50,000 would pay 50 per cent
(41 per cent income tax and 9 per cent NIC).
The party estimates that 80 per cent of taxpayers would fall into the first
band. Pensioners and small savers would be entirely exempt from NIC.
VAT: Would be reduced by 0.5 per cent in 1993/4 and a further 0.5 per cent
in 1995/6.
Personal allowances: These would eventually be replaced by a tax credit
system. Individuals now deduct their personal allowance from their earnings
to obtain their taxable income. This benefits higher rate taxpayers in
particular because the allowance reduces that element of their earnings
which is taxed at the top rate.
Under the Liberal Democrats, tax would be calculated on gross earnings. The
'tax credit' would then be deducted from this figure. The effect would be to
equalise the worth of the tax credit between the various tax bands.
Married couple's allowance: This would be frozen and the Chancellor's
proposal to allow its transferability adhered to.
Capital Gains Tax: Radical reform again. The system of CGT exemptions would
be removed. A lower CGT threshold would be established but there would be
some transferability of allowances between income and capital gains.
Inheritance Tax: Like Labour, the Liberal Democrats want to reform this tax
to make the beneficiary, and not the estate, liable for IHT. You would be
given a Pounds 50,000 IHT exemption. If it is used up, you would then be
granted a Pounds 5,000 annual allowance which would roll-up for 10 years. So
the maximum IHT exemption at any one time for an individual would be Pounds
50,000.
The aim is to encourage wider distribution of wealth. If you left Pounds
150,000 to your eldest son, he would pay IHT on Pounds 100,000. But if you
left it to your three children, there would be no IHT. There would be
exemptions or concessions for family businesses.
Tessas, Peps: To be replaced eventually by a single savings scheme known as
a Registered Savings Account. This would be an account for tax purposes into
which cash deposits, shares or money for a pension, would be placed. You
would obtain tax relief at your marginal tax rate on the investment, with
the account enjoying relief on income and capital gains. There would be
income tax to pay once you realised the assets.
Pensions: The aim is to increase the basic state pension immediately. For
single pensioners, this would mean a rise of Pounds 5 a week and Pounds 8
for married couples. Means testing would end and everyone would receive the
pension by right. It would be funded partly through the abolition of the
State earnings related pension scheme (Serps), though those with Serps
entitlements would receive their Serps pension.
The retirement age would be 65 years for men and women.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1935</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJACIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Victim of a guillotine - The Election
and You
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE GUILLOTINE which cut through the Finance Act last week has claimed a
high-profile victim: the Cabot Square enterprise zone trust in Docklands.
The legislation necessary was not enacted and on Thursday, Olympia &amp; York,
the developers, decided to withdraw the issue, which had aimed to raise
Pounds 215m. Investors will be repaid all their money, plus interest.
It was an ignominious end to the most ambitious tax shelter scheme attempted
in the UK. O&amp;Y, and the trusts' sponsors, Independent Property Securities,
had relied on a new ruling that a building would qualify for EZ tax relief
even if it was already occupied by tenants. This failed to materialise.
Ten, Cabot Square, which the trust was to have bought, already has some
occupied floors, so the deal could not go through in its original form.
However, the trust could have been restructured so that investors only
bought the unoccupied floors. This would have been complicated, but far from
impossible.
There may have been other reasons why O&amp;Y threw in the towel. Takings, at
around Pounds 30m, seemed far short of target for a trust aiming at Pounds
215m.
Bad publicity about O &amp; Y's Canadian parent company's financial difficulties
did not help. Unfavourable press comment about the structure of the deal
(some unjustified), and hostility among intermediaries further damaged the
impressive marketing which O &amp; Y and the sponsors had devised.
How will this Pounds 215m hole in the market be filled? Laser Richmount,
last year's market leader, and US investment bank Merrill Lynch, both seem
likely to benefit.
The money coming out of Canary Wharf could lead to an influx to other
trusts. This, unfortunately, means that haste might be required, even though
the choice will be difficult. Important factors include:
the strength of the bankers' rental guarantees,
the rental yield, (pre-tax relief yields on the market vary from 6.94 per
cent to 8.25 per cent),
the position of the property, which helps determine prospects for capital
appreciation,
if the property has been pre-let (an advantage), the credit-worthiness of
the tenants.
There are seven sponsors in the market, offering property in 11 different
enterprise zones. Advice from accountants is essential, even if the polls
make you particularly keen to shelter from tax now.
Comparisons of the trusts are available from Investment and Tax Publishing
Services (0234-218740) and the Allenbridge Group (071-409-1111).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1936</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJACHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: The Week Ahead
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
FULL-YEAR figures from P&amp;O, the shipping, construction and property group,
on Tuesday are expected to show a drop in pre-tax profits to around Pounds
200m - Pounds 210m from Pounds 261.3m in 1990. This will be the second year
of sharply falling profits, though the forecast assumes a more stable second
half after interim figures showed a plunge to Pounds 73.1m (Pounds 132.1m).
P&amp;O's balance sheet was bolstered by a Pounds 604m rights issue announced
with the interims, when a maintained final dividend was promised.
On Wednesday Reckitt &amp; Colman, the consumer products group, should report a
rise in annual pre-tax profits to around Pounds 255m-Pounds 260m, up from
Pounds 235.2m in 1990. The main feature will be the performance of Boyle
Midway, the US business bought in 1990, in its first full year when some
significant savings have been made. Also the benefits of the restructuring
of the European business over the last couple of years should be visible.
Interim profits were up 13 per cent to Pounds 127.6m.
Cookson, the chemicals group, reports its full-year profits on Wednesday.
Analysts' expect pre-tax profits to well below last year's figure of Pounds
97.5m. Estimates at the top end are about about Pounds 45m, and the market
is likely to be disappointed with anything below Pounds 40m.
The main concern will be the dividend which was cut last year to 6p for the
year. There is nervousness it could be cut again which analysts would take
as a signal the new management team has lost confidence in its policies.
They will also be looking for any sign of an upturn, particularly in the US.
Wellcome, the healthcare company, which reports its preliminary results on
Thursday, gave a profits forecast of not less than Pounds 235m (Pounds
181.2m) when the Wellcome Trust, the largest shareholder, said it would be
selling a substantial part of its 73.6 per cent stake.
Underlying sales growth should be about 20 per cent, with Zovirax, the
herpes treatment, and Retrovir, the Aids drug, performing well. Analysts
will also be looking at the performance of new products such as Exosurf, a
respiratory drug, and Wellbutrin, an anti-depressant.
Lasmo, the independent oil exploration and production company will report
its results on Wednesday when analysts believe it will show a drop in net
income of some Pounds 10m to Pounds 71m as a result of low oil prices. But
the company is also planning to change its accounting practices.
Burmah Castrol, the refining and lubricants company, reports on Thursday and
although more insulated from the low oil price than exploration companies,
is expected to show a fall in net income to Pounds 72m from Pounds 97m the
previous year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1937</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJACGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Labour home price fears - Entering the
housing market? David Barchard has some advice
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BARCHARD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITAIN'S home owners, already battered by the worst housing market in half
a century, had better brace themselves for further nasty shocks if Labour
wins the general election.
People used to say that if there was to be a Labour government the first
thing one should do was to buy a house by taking out the largest obtainable
mortgage and wait for inflation to whittle the debt away.
That was in the 1960s and 1970s, when inflation usually ran well ahead of
interest rates.
That experience is unlikely to be repeated in the 1990s. A Labour government
is going to have to live inside the disciplines of the European monetary
system and interest rates and the cost of borrowing will march in line with
inflation.
Add to this picture, a housing market full of homes that cannot find buyers
and there are obvious grounds for apprehension about the effects of a
drastic change in economic policy.
'We think that some of the measures the Labour Party are planning could be
devastating for the housing market,' says mortgage broker John Charcol.
People who earn more than Pounds 40,000 will be hit by the new 50 per rate
on income tax, and Charcol fears that a good proportion of people with
incomes above Pounds 50,000, who borrowed at the height of the housing boom,
may find themselves unable to keep up mortgage payments as a result.
Some people, who would have been moving up the housing ladder, may find
themselves having to move down, leading to a larger number of higher value
properties coming onto the market.
Perhaps they should have listened to those economists who have been arguing
against investing in property. 'It's a bit late in the day now but most FT
readers should have sold their houses two years ago and put the money on
deposit and rented. But who wants to live like that?' says Professor Tim
Congdon.
That said, first time buyers could have cause for moderate encouragement. A
Labour government will be good news for people earning less than Pounds
20,000. The tax and National Insurance Plans of the Labour government will
leave them slightly better off in a buyer's market.
The average first-time buyer has an income of Pounds 18,000, so it is
reasonable to assume that a Labour victory could be a mild stimulus to the
first-time buyer's end of the housing market.
It may also be boosted by tax incentives introduced by a Labour government
specifically intended to help first-time buyers. Conversely, first-time
buyers may be shy of entering the market because of other likely changes
under Labour.
One of these is a rise in interest rates. These tend to be at their lowest
around election time and to rise afterwards. Economists in the City are
forecasting a rise in interest rates of between half a percentage point and
two full percentage points in the months after April 9.
By the summer, on a pessimistic projection, the market could find itself
struggling to contend with base rates of perhaps 12 or 12.5 per cent and
mortgage interest rates around 13 per cent. A one per cent base rate rise is
perhaps more likely, implying a mortgage interest rate of 12.5 per cent.
In such circumstances, would-be home buyers are likely to think twice about
entering the market. So, instead of a revival, we are quite likely to see
things getting worse.
It is more probable that the fall in house prices will accelerate, at least
until base rates come down.
John Wriglesworth, housing finance analyst at UBS Phillips &amp; Drew, reckons
that prices could plunge by as much as a further five per cent if base rates
rise sharply.
Even if base rates do not shoot upwards, building societies and banks are
going to find it difficult to hold down their mortgage interest rates. There
are two reasons for this.
One is that rates are already too low. The lenders cut rates in January,
expecting a further half a percentage point cut in base rates in the budget.
It did not happen and the margin between their lending and savings rates is
now too narrow to be sustained.
A second reason is that building societies are under pressure on their
savings business and if they have to compete with a government which is also
trying to attract savings to finance its budget deficit, they will have even
less scope for holding down rates to borrowers.
Building society savings accounts look distinctly unattractive compared to
other investments such as gilts.
But perhaps savings accounts generally will be a better place for your money
than housing. 'I don't think you would expect much house price inflation
under a Labour Government and if there is a good interest rate available on
deposit you should sell and invest the money, but that depends on people's
circumstances,' says Professor Congdon.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1938</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJACFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Your money or your vote - The Election
and You
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NEVER BEFORE have British taxpayers been bombarded by two Budgets in
successive weeks, writes John Authers.
At least one of them will never be fully implemented. But for the time
being, both demand close scrutiny.
This week's Budget, from Labour's shadow chancellor John Smith, is
necessarily less detailed than Norman Lamont's. But it was explicit enough
on the central issues of income tax and national insurance to allow families
a fair comparison between the two.
The main provisions were well-trailed:
There will be an additional top-rate band of tax, payable at 50 per cent,
which will affect those on annual incomes of Pounds 40,000 or more.
The 'ceiling' for national insurance contributions, payable at 9 per cent of
income, will be abolished.
The new 20 per cent band of tax announced in Mr Lamont's budget will be
discontinued.
Thresholds will be increased by more than the rate of inflation, to remove
many people from the tax system altogether.
There was one pleasant surprise, which was the decision not to levy national
insurance contributions on 'unearned' income of more than Pounds 3,000 for
people below retirement age.
This was viewed as a serious disincentive to saving, but Labour have now
withdrawn, mainly because it would adversely affect the many people living
on income from invested redundancy pay-offs.
Last week, the Weekend FT visited five sample households and, with the aid
of Michael Bishopp and Clive Mackintosh of the executive &amp; benefit services
division of Price Waterhouse, analysed what effect Lamont would have on
their household budget.
We can now, with Price Waterhouse's aid, revisit the households and see how
they will do under John Smith.
The results are in the table. Bear in mind that all our basic comparisons
are between two Budgets both of which at present are hypothetical.
Ted Harker, is in his early 70s and lives on a modest pension, plus income
from savings. His total income is Pounds 15,000. He is single, with no
mortgage.
He loses the benefits from the new 20 per cent band of income tax, which
would have saved him, Pounds 100 per year. However, the additional Pounds 5
per week which Labour would put on the standard state retirement pension
comes to his rescue. As a result, he ends up better off by Pounds 2.88 per
week under Labour than he would be under the Tories' new budget, or Pounds
5.35 better off than he is now.
Beverley Williams, is a young, single woman on a salary of Pounds 15,000 a
year, and living in a rented flat. She has no commitments, but her financial
situation is otherwise almost exactly in line with the national average.
It may therefore not be a coincidence that Labour would leave her totally
unaffected. As the table shows, she would pay more tax, thanks to the axing
of the 20 per cent band, but less in NICs, thanks to increases in threshold.
The result: she will be a princely Pounds 2.48 per week better off under
Labour than she is now, exactly the same figure as for the Lamont budget.
David Wallace and Caroline Campbell live in a house they bought together in
1989. They have a Pounds 50,000 mortgage, of which interest on the first
Pounds 30,000 is subject to relief under MIRAS. They both work for a
building society, earning Pounds 12,500 a year apiece. This makes them
'DINKY's - they have a double income, with no kids yet.
Despite their greater commitments, the maths for David and Caroline work out
almost identically to the changes for Beverley Williams.
Their tax-efficient loan thanks to MIRAS survives untouched. Both benefit
from the increasing thresholds, while both lose out slightly from the axing
of the 20 per cent band.
Neither of them individually is close to the current ceiling for national
insurance contributions, so the net result is exactly the same as for
Beverley - a Labour budget would make no difference at all. Either way, they
are Pounds 5.58 better off per week than they are now.
Fiona and Peter Elsworthy will be less happy about Labour's proposals. They
are married, with two children. Fiona is the main breadwinner. She earns
Pounds 40,000 a year as a solicitor and has a company Golf GTI which
completes the year with a business mileage of under 2,501 miles.
Peter, a librarian, earns Pounds 10,000. They have a Pounds 50,000 mortgage,
on which interest relief on the first Pounds 30,000 is available under
MIRAS.
They will be grateful for Labour's rise in child benefits, which will move
up from Pounds 907, under the Lamont budget, to Pounds 1,035 under John
Smith. But the change to National Insurance contributions hit Fiona's
take-home pay. If the ceiling is lifted under Labour, her NIC bill shoots up
from Pounds 1,699 to Pounds 3,347. Changes to the Married Couple's Allowance
and raised thresholds allow them to avoid any higher Labour taxes, and the
couple's total tax bill declines from Pounds 12,076, under the budget, to
Pounds 11,856. However, there is another Pounds 307 to be paid on the car.
The net result is to leave the couple Pounds 29.83 per week worse off than
they would be under Lamont's budget, and Pounds 26.42 worse off than they
are now.
James and Henrietta Hamilton, who are lucky enough to have a joint annual
income of Pounds 100,000, are unlucky enough to take by far the greatest hit
under Labour. James is a company director on Pounds 90,000 per year, while
Henrietta has an income of Pounds 10,000 per year from investments. Their
children have left home.
The new 50 per cent tax rate increases James' tax bill from Pounds 30,279 to
Pounds 35,135, while his NICs go from Pounds 1,699 to Pounds 7,847. Changes
to car benefit put the bill for operating a company car up from Pounds 5,956
to Pounds 7,445.
The net result is to leave them Pounds 241 worse off each week under Labour
than they would be under the Conservative budget. James and Henrietta were
not going to vote Labour anyway.
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
Old age pensioner
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
                                  Con.             Lab.
                     1991-92     1992-93         1992-93
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
Income                10,000      10,000          10,260
Outgoings
Tax                    1,495       1,350           1,460
Alc &amp; cigs               600         617             617
Tot costs              2,095       1,967           2,077
Free inc               7,905       8,033           8,183
Total gain                        2.46pw          5.35pw
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
Single earner
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
Income                15,000      15,000          15,000
Outgoings
Tax                    2,926       2,788           2,844
NIC                    1,161       1,153           1,097
Alc &amp; cigs               600         617             617
Tot costs              4,687       4,558           4,558
Free inc              10,313      10,442          10,442
Total gain                        2.47pw          2.48pw
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
Couple living together
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
Income                25,000      25,000          25,000
Outgoings
Tax                    4,602       4,327           4,438
NIC                    1,871       1,856           1,745
Mortgage               5,400       5,400           5,400
Tot costs             11,873      11,583          11,583
Free inc              13,127      13,417          13,417
Total gain                        5.58pw          5.58pw
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
Married with children
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
Income
Husband               10,000      10,000          10,000
Wife                  40,000      40,000          40,000
Chd ben                  871         907           1,035
Total                 50,871      50,907          51,035
Outgoings
Husb tax               1,246       1,109           1,549
Wife tax              11,127      10,967          10,307
Mortgage               5,400       5,400           5,400
Car                    1,830       1,914           2,221
Alc &amp; cigs               600         617             617
Husb NIC                 711         703             647
Wife NIC               1,636       1,699           3,347
Tot costs             22,550      22,409          24,088
Free inc              28,321      28,498          26,947
Tot gain                          3.40pw        -26.42pw
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
High earners
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
Income
Husb sal             100,000     100,000         100,000
Wife inc              10,000      10,000          10,000
Total                100,000     100,000         100,000
Outgoings
Husb tax              30,439      30,279          35,135
Wife tax               1,676       1,539           1,594
Car                    5,700       5,956           7,445
NIC                    1,636       1,699           7,847
Alc &amp; cig              1,200       1,234           1,234
Tot cost              40,651      40,707          53,255
Free inc              59,349      59,293          46,745
Total loss                        1.08pw        242.38pw
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Price Waterhouse
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1939</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJACEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: What will Labour do with Serps? - The
Election and You / The Labour Party's plans for pensions
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DEBBIE HARRISON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE LABOUR Party's commitment to increase the old age pension by Pounds 5
for single people and Pounds 8 for couples is well known, but little has
been said about the party's plans to revitalise the State earnings related
pension scheme (Serps) and to stall the drive towards personal pensions.
Since 1988, 4.6m employees have opted out of Serps using personal pension
plans, switching a big chunk of pensions provision from the state to the
private sector.
Personal pensions have widened choice. Before 1988, it was only possible to
opt out of Serps through an approved occupational scheme. If the employer
did not offer such a scheme, the employee was automatically in Serps.
However, a Labour Government would seek to re-establish Serps and good final
salary schemes as the twin pillars of UK pension provision. Serps and most
UK occupational schemes are based on the final salary concept. Under
occupational schemes, each year of service builds up to a pension based on
the employee's salary at retirement.
In a money purchase scheme - such as personal pensions - contributions are
invested to build up a fund which buys an annuity on retirement. This means
that the level of pension depends on the fund's investment performance.
There is no guaranteed pension or link with final salary.
Under Labour, Serps would be revamped to provide the benefits it originally
offered, before the present Government reduced its value. It will also offer
several new features.
First, the Serps pension will be based on an individual's best 20 years of
earnings rather than on an entire lifetime. This is particularly important
for women who tend to work part time for several years while they raise a
family. Clearly if the pension is based on earnings over an entire career
these periods of low earnings would drag down its value.
Second Labour would increase the value of the pension to 25 per cent of
average 'band' earnings. Band earnings are the earnings on which National
Insurance contributions (NICs) are paid. From April, employees would pay
NICs on earnings between Pounds 54 and Pounds 405 per week.
Of course Labour plans to abolish the upper earnings limit (UEL) for
employees' contributions so that NICs will be levied on the entire income
over Pounds 54 per week. However, the Party will retain a notional UEL to
limit the earnings which can be taken into account for the Serps pension.
Third, the new Serps would be open to the self employed for the first time,
thus partly eliminating the need for private plans in this sector.
Fourth, the scheme will allow members to pay additional voluntary
contributions, rather like the AVC plans available for members of
occupational schemes. Serps AVCs would allow members to make good any
shortfall in provision, to build up a higher pension and/or to take part of
the benefit as a cash lump sum.
The ability to boost the Serps pension in this way could further restrict
the role of personal pensions and free standing AVCs (FSAVCs).
Labour also has pledged to increase both the basic and the Serps pensions in
line with average earnings, rather than the present system which links
pension increases to retail prices. Earnings inflation tends to outstrip
prices by about 2 per cent. The party said it did not plan to abolish higher
rate tax relief on contributions.
There will be a new regime for personal pensions. Currently employees with a
personal pension can apply for a rebate of band earnings worth up to Pounds
1,500 for the 1991/92 tax year. This includes an 'incentive' - in Labour's
view a bribe - to encourage employees to opt out. The Government recently
announced it would reduce the incentive to l per cent and apply it just to
the over-30s after April 1993.
Michael Meacher, Labour's shadow spokesman for Social Security, plans to
introduce a series of conditions for personal pension providers and those
selling the plans so that employees can make a meaningful comparison with
the new Serps benefits. To this end Labour will:
Withdraw the 2 per cent incentive immediately and the 1 per cent incentive
planned to take effect from April 1993.
Ensure that in future occupational and personal pension providers can only
contract out of Serps if they can guarantee a minimum pension.
Require people with personal pensions to be informed when it is in their
best interests to opt back into Serps.
Require disclosure of agents' commissions and management charges showing
their impact on the investment.
Ensure national standards for user-friendly information to compare personal
pensions with occupational schemes and Serps, distinguishing between
speculative and guaranteed projections.
On occupational schemes, Labour has said it will require preserved pensions
 -the benefits an employee leaves behind when he or she changes job - to be
fully index-linked. At present, preserved pensions must be increased by a
maximum of 5 per cent per annum or retail prices, whichever is the lower.
Labour's proposal also would have a significant impact on the transfer
values offered to job changers, since the calculation is based on the
preserved pension.
A further concern for the occupational pensions industry is Labour's
approach to the equalisation of pension benefits under company schemes. The
historic Barber judgment stated that pensions are pay and, as such, must be
equal for men and women.
If equalisation applied to all benefits built up before the judgment, the
cost to schemes would be up to Pounds 50bn. But at the Maastricht summit
last December, EC ministers agreed that there should be no retrospective
application. However Labour has said it could oppose the Maastricht
protocol, which has yet to be ratified and implemented in the 12 member
states.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1940</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJACDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Investment tips you should consider -
The Election and You
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE are 13 investing days to go until the election.
This is what the investment professionals might call a time of extreme
political risk and volatility.
Some less scrupulous advisers and salesmen might call it a great selling
opportunity.
If your earnings are substantially above the national average, then Labour's
tax regime is likely to leave you worse off (see right). Several measures
might alleviate the problem, but do not invest in haste, only to repent at
leisure over the next five years.
As the tables show, higher top-rate taxes could substantially eat into
income, so leaving large amounts of capital tied up for the long term could
make life even worse.
The following measures could all make sense, but only if they fit with the
underlying logic of your financial planning. Seek advice before acting.
Family Companies If you are a director of a family company, pay yourself
bonuses this tax year rather than next. Accountants Blick Rothenberg suggest
that this should be done through the PAYE scheme for this tax year, as this
cannot be done retroactively.
Similar arguments apply to the payment of dividends - you might increase
them and pay them between April 1 and 5.
Business Expansion Scheme. Labour will abolish the least risky property
assured tenancy side of the scheme. So if you were thinking of a BES
investment anyway, the logic in favour of doing so becomes greater. But it
is essential, in this market, to tread with caution.
Inheritance tax. Make Potentially Exempt lifetime transfers now, as they
could be threatened by Labour's long-term plans for IHT.
Capital Gains Tax. 'Bed and Breakfasting' (selling shares and rebuying them
the following day) to crystallise gains makes more sense than usual, as CGT
thresholds are likely to go down under Labour.
Offshore Funds are not as strong a tax-planning tool as they were, but they
do allow you to defer any tax until you bring the funds back onshore. If you
are confident Labour would be booted out after five years, they could
therefore make sense.
Personal Equity Plans make sense if you do not trust Labour to keep them,
but it may not be wise to buy into equities just as the market hits a period
of extreme uncertainty.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1941</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJACCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Markets: Should we contemplate a triple whammy? - The
Election and You / Labour and privatised stocks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS FOSTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
'WHAT we're saying to people with water shares is that they will be bought,
when the time comes, at their proper value.' Roy Hattersley. BBC Radio 4,
March 18.
'No we won't. The public control that we want is to ensure (the utilities')
high standard of security of supply and safety of supply.'
Neil Kinnock. ITN News, March 18.
PERHAPS not surprisingly, these are worrying times for shareholders in the
privatised water and electricity companies. Even without Labour's apparent
policy confusion, evidenced above by quotes on the same day, the shares have
tumbled as the stock market comes to grips with the possibility of a Kinnock
victory.
But what are the risks for shareholders in the utilities and should these
shares now be sold?
The answer, according to the experts, is probably not. Although there will
be violent short-term gyrations in sympathy with the polls, long-term
investors who have not yet got out should sit tight.
Nigel Burton, who researches utilities for stockbroker SG Warburg, said: 'It
would be silly to sell them now. They've gone down too far and, even if
Labour wins, they still offer good value and they've still got good dividend
growth'.
Peter Hyde, water specialist at Kleinwort Benson, added: 'If you're
petrified about a Labour victory and you're a short termist, you should
sell. But over the longer term, I don't see much problem holding on to
them.'
Labour has steadily toned down its policies towards the utilities, even in
the last six months. Talk of re-nationalising BT or British Gas has long
gone, and the two sectors Labour remains committed to restructure are the
electricity industry, sold off in 1990, and the water companies.
Nevertheless, the stock market is worried for three reasons, a possible
'triple whammy'.
A Labour government might re-nationalise the water and electricity
companies, possibly paying too little for the shares.
Labour will insist on tougher regulation and tighter price controls. This
would mean lower profits for all the utilities, not just water and
electricity.
'The dash for gas'. Labour says it is determined to protect Britain's coal
industry and is opposed to coal imports and gas-fired power stations which
are now being built. Although Labour would be good for miners, its policies
could push up costs for the electricity companies, depressing profits.
Labour's manifesto, published this week, pledged to restore 'public control'
of the National Grid, which is owned by the regional electricity companies.
The provision of water, the party said, is 'so fundamental it is a priority
for return to public control.'
But public control is not public ownership. Even if Hattersley wants to,
Labour may not be able to afford to buy back the water companies. Buying
back effective control, 51 per cent, of the 10 water companies would cost
about Pounds 4bn at today's prices.
But the new government would then have to pay its share of the water
companies' Pounds 28bn capital investment programme. Given Labour's other
spending plans, and high borrowings it would inherit from the Tories, the
markets believe Labour's occasional threats to re-nationalise are merely
symbolic gestures.
Labour's public control will probably be achieved through tougher
regulation. Frank Dobson, Labour's energy secretary, has been attacking
electricity companies and its regulator all year. He says prices and profits
are rising too quickly. Labour has also criticised directors' salaries.
Labour has not yet decided how to tackle these issues. If the party wins, it
will likely start a review of utilities' pricing and regulation. It is
committed to forcing electricity companies to become more energy efficient,
which usually means more spending and lower profits in the short term.
Any review would be bad for utilities' share prices, especially because it
would create uncertainty. Some analysts expect a 10 per cent fall in water
stocks if Labour wins.
But others say the fears are overdone. According to this view, the Tories
have already toughened up on the utilities. For example, John Wakeham,
energy minister, has been trying to keep politically sensitive electricity
prices down ahead of the poll.
Either way, the longer term impact of any regulatory changes may not be as
damaging as the market's pessimists expect. The water companies, for
example, are expected to lift dividends by 4-6 per cent this year, in real
terms. Modest regulatory tinkering by Labour could still leave dividends
rising faster than inflation.
The irony, of course, is that electricity and water flotations were partly
designed to create stable, if unspectacular, shareholdings. With three weeks
to go to the election, and opinion polls rather than prudence driving the
market, these shares have been turned into high risk, high reward stocks.
But only very rich speculators should buy now in hope of a Conservative
victory.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1942</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJACBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Markets: A case of intrusion into private grief - The
Election and You / London
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARTIN, Financial Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE NOTICE went up on the Palace railings just before lunch. 'The stock
market and the Conservative Party are discussing a separation with their
respective psephologists. These discussions are not yet complete and nothing
more will be said until they are.'
The torrent of media speculation and the consequent slide in share prices
are seen as 'especially undesirable' during a general election campaign. One
insider said that 'the knives are out' on both sides, with harsh words being
muttered in private.
For most of their years together, the couple seemed ideally suited. They
shared similar interests, such as lower income taxes and easier money. Both
formed part of a boisterous 1980s crowd, fond of talking loudly into mobile
phones in restaurants.
In retrospect, the summer of 1987 marked the emotional peak in the
relationship, as the chart shows. Yet, though the relationship has cooled,
friends of the couple say that there is no other party exercising an
unhealthy attraction. Some 2,000 or so photographs of the stock market
lunching with a sober-suited Scotsman called John Smith were found by a
cleaner last year, but it is understood that the relationship has never
progressed beyond polite acquaintance.
Some of the stock market's friends fear that a rift may be inevitable.
'Frankly, unless something pretty miraculous happens, it'll all be over by
April 9,' said one. Others, however, hope for the best. 'I think it is early
days,' said another friend: 'If you have a boil and it bursts it often gets
all right afterwards.'
For most of the week, the stock market has been coming to terms with the
possibility of a non-Conservative government. The FT-SE index dropped 19.4
points during the week, closing at 2,456.6. Within that overall decline,
shares which might benefit from a Labour government have done markedly
better than those which might benefit if John Major stays in Downing Street.
Privatised utilities, singled out for tighter regulation in the Labour party
manifesto, have done particularly badly.
The week's trends included a continuing tendency - rewarded by the stock
market - to pay uncovered dividends. BAT Industries, for example, promised
an 8 per cent rise in the final dividend, leaving dividend cover at 0.83,
less than half the 2 the company says is its target. BAT shares rose 43p, to
close the week at 686p.
Another company following the same trend was George Wimpey, the contractor,
which maintained its dividend despite losing money. Joe Dwyer, Wimpey's
chief executive, said he was encouraged by flickers of life in the British
and American housing markets. Wimpey's UK house sales in the first 2 1/2
months of this year were running about 10 per cent higher than the company
had budgeted for, he said. The shares rose 21p on the week, to close at
150p.
Few other bosses were as positive about trading prospects. But the results
season is producing noticeably better results than analysts had expected, at
least for industrial companies. Warburg Securities' running total of how
profits so far compare with what its analysts had expected at the end of
January show earnings declines for industrials of 10 per cent, nearly two
percentage points better than had been expected. Industrials dividends have
grown at 8 per cent, a percentage point better than forecast.
Still, the election campaign and a steady rise in long-term interest rates
have left the market jumpy. Evidence of that mood can be seen in the
performance of one of the week's big losers, Cable &amp; Wireless. A number of
unremarkable pieces of news - the departure of a senior executive and the
reorganisation of some of the company's activities - were a trigger for a
small-scale sell-off. C&amp;W shares closed the week at 538p, down 62p. The
market's reaction seemed to owe as much to a lingering uncertainty about
whether Lord Young was taking the company in the right direction as to any
specific concerns about the week's news. Stock market analysts were divided
on the stock.
A certain ambivalence was also noticeable in the analysts' reaction to the
news that Midland Bank was about to be taken over by Hongkong and Shanghai
Banking Corporation. Midland shares were unambiguous gainers - they closed
on Friday at 343p, up 91p on the week. Shares in the Hongkong Bank dropped:
they fell 11 per cent on the week, to the equivalent of 300p. So far, so
predictable. The ambivalence came in the analysts' assessment of the impact
of the takeover on other UK banks. Their shares rose, reflecting the short
term vote of confidence in the sector implied by Hongkong Bank's
reappearance as a suitor for Midland. But in the longer term, the deal would
strengthen Midland as a competitor in a sector where there is already - from
the shareholder's view at any rate - too much capital.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1943</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJACAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Markets: Goodbye to bearers of bad tidings - The Election
and You / Wall Street
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN FRIEDMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT WAS perhaps fitting that this was the week that saw the withdrawal from
presidential politics of Paul Tsongas - the man who refused to sugar-coat
his views on the US economy.
A few scattered statistics - a jump in housing starts here, improving retail
sales there - were meanwhile being seized on by many as evidence that the US
economy is in a recovery phase. Bearers of bad news such as Tsongas, the one
politician who made it clear that he would not be Santa Claus, are clearly
not welcome.
In the Bush camp, Nicholas Brady, the President's tennis partner and the
Secretary of the Treasury, took heart from the Federal Reserve's latest
survey of economic conditions and interpreted the improving picture as
evidence that recovery is officially underway.
Predictably enough, less politically high-profile analysts of the US economy
have been less categorical in their projections. 'Yes, a recovery seems to
be approaching, but it is by no means clear that it will be strong, or
quick, or decisive.'
Wall Street, of course, had expressed its own sugary vision of the
macro-economy at the start of the year, rallying on the bet that lower
interest rates and the law of averages would help US industry and finance to
emerge from its prolonged period of stagnation.
The problem for US equity investors is that, having discounted a strong
recovery three months ago, the trickle of data which indicates improving
conditions is having little impact on day-to-day trading. This week's
ho-hummish equity market was thus more narrowly focussed.
For example, the Treasury bond market's rally on Thursday, based partly on
reduced fears of inflationary pressure, pushed the yield on the benchmark
long bond below 8 per cent for the first time in several days. This in turn
made bonds a less interesting alternative to equities and brought Thursday's
trading volume up to a respectable 197m shares, compared to the anaemic
151m-share volume of last Monday.
The Dow Jones Industrial Average has not, however, seen any dramatic
movements lately. It is an article of faith that the Dow is hovering
comfortably above the 3,200 level, but the atmosphere is listless.
The equity market more the province of professional traders than retail
investors because of yesterday's 'triple witching' expiration of certain
options on individual stocks and of the March Standard &amp; Poor's 500 futures
options.
In such a patchy market, it was far more interesting for investors to sit on
the sidelines and watch Japan-bashers from the car industry score more
rhetorical points.
Equally entertaining was the little soap opera that was played out last
weekend in the boardroom at Chrysler, where the mercurial Lee Iacocca was
finally persuaded to make good on his promise to retire as chairman at
year-end.
Iacocca spent last Saturday in meetings that lasted until midnight with
members of his board and Robert Eaton, the head of General Motors Europe who
on Monday was named as Iacocca's successor.
The big loser was Robert Lutz, the former Ford executive who was supposed to
be heir apparent, but who confounded skeptics on Monday by loyally promising
to stay at Chrysler even though he has been effectively demoted by the
appointment of Eaton.
Chrysler's share price has improved by 29 per cent over the last two months.
It stood at Dollars 18 at lunch-time yesterday. The confirmation that
Iacocca is finally prepared to hand over the top job seemed to appeal to
investors, since Chrysler's share price has risen by nearly Dollars 2 in the
wake of Monday's announcement.
Another corporate story that could affect share prices was the news that Dow
Corning, the world's leading maker of silicone gel breast implants, is
pulling out of the business.
Dow Corning has been hounded by Congressional investigations, allegations
about the safety of its implants and hundreds of lawsuits that could result
in expensive product liability claims. The company, a 50-50 venture between
Dow Chemical and Corning, is not quoted, but Corning's share price has taken
a beating in recent weeks. Dow Chemical, which is much less reliant on
revenue from breast implants, has not been affected.
But, depending on how the terms of claims and settlements turn out, there
could be more of an impact on the share price of both companies.
 --------------------------------
Monday      3236.36  +   0.45
Tuesday     3256.04  +  19.68
Wednesday   3254.25  -   1.79
Thursday    3261.40  +   7.15
Friday      3276.39  +  14.99
 --------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1944</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAB9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Sun Alliance launches bond
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Sun Alliance has launched a single premium investment bond with a capital
back guarantee in the first four years. No income can be taken during those
initial years; after that, the normal 5 per cent rules apply. There are
withdrawal penalties during the first four years; after four years, the
guarantee does not apply. The guarantee is provided by putting 10 per cent
of the sum invested into 'protector units'; the effect will be to reduce the
growth of the bond in the first four years if the stock market surges ahead.
The minimum investment is Pounds 5,000, and the offer is open only between
March 18 and May 13.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1945</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAB8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Election hurts small stocks
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The pre-election nervousness that has hit the stock markets has taken its
toll of small company shares over the past two weeks. The Hoare Govett Small
Companies index (capital gains version) fell from 1207.27 on March 5 to
1199.54 on March 12 and 1179.53 on March 12, a total fall of 2.3 per cent.
The County Small Companies Index dropped from 956.7 to 953.5 and 937.3 over
the same periods, a total decline of 2 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1946</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAB7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Endowment policy auction
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Foster &amp; Cranfield will hold another auction of endowment policies at the
Connaught Rooms in London on Thursday, March 26. Over 130 second hand
policies will be offered for sale. Further details can be obtained from
Foster &amp; Cranfield on 071-608-1941.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1947</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAB6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: A trust for Europe
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
European markets have had a liberated feel to them since the Berlin Wall
came down - prices have fluctuated widely, as the graph shows. This could
mean big investment opportunities for those who pick their stocks carefully.
Which is why Mercury is launching a New Europe unit trust. It will be a
special situations-style trust, aiming to stay small in size, and looking
for profits via stock picking, rather than asset allocation. It will have
the freedom to invest in any European market, including the UK. Minimum
investment is Pounds 1,000, or Pounds 50 per month via a savings scheme.
Front end charge is 5.25 per cent (with a 1 per cent discount during the
offer period until April 3), and the annual management charge is 1.5 per
cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1948</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAB5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Finance &amp; The Family: Scandals depress Nikkei
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The Nikkei 225 share index in Tokyo fell below 20,000 this week, for the
first time since February 1987. Political scandals and the weakness of many
of the group's leading financial houses have dashed the hopes of many
foreign investors that the Japanese market was due to a rebound. Ironically,
on Thursday, news that the Japanese economy suffered a fall in output in the
last quarter of 1991 caused the market to rebound back above the 20,000
level. The rise was caused by investor expectations that economic weakness
would prompt the authorities to cut interest rates.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1949</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAB4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Markets: Invest in haste repent at leisure - The Election
and You / Serious Money
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN, Personal Finance Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE WAS some really good news this week for those who live off their
savings. Labour has abandoned its plans to introduce a 9 per cent investment
income surcharge.
Admittedly, the surcharge would have applied only to incomes over Pounds
3,000 and those over pensionable age would have been exempt. But it would
have been an unfair tax.
As readers know only too well, in most cases such income is not 'unearned'
at all, but the fruits of many years of hard work. A decision to save is
merely a decision to postpone consumption to a later date. Interest income
is, in large part, compensation for the effect of inflation on the
purchasing power of the money saved.
Take a saver earning, say, 10 per cent in the building society. Income tax
already takes 25 or 40 per cent of that return. If inflation stays at around
4 per cent this year, the 'real' return for savers will be just 3.5 per cent
for basic rate taxpayers and 2 per cent for those on the higher rate.
Labour's surcharge would have reduced that real return by a quarter and a
half respectively.
The people who would have been most hurt by this tax were those who had
retired early and were living off a combination of occupational pension and
savings income.
In the absence of the surcharge, savers can afford to view a Labour
government with equanimity. Indeed, those who are above state retirement age
will enjoy a modest benefit, in the form of Pounds 5 and Pounds 8 per week
increases for single and married pensioners.
Only those whose savings income is over Pounds 40,000 (more for married
couples and those over 65) will be hit by the new 50 per cent tax band. That
will be a minority of savers. For those FT readers who fall into the
category, there are a number of tax shelters (Tessas, national savings, etc)
which may ease the burden.
Of course, many would argue that a Labour government will mean higher
inflation, the enemy of savers. But given Labour's commitment to sterling's
membership of the Exchange Rate Mechanism, inflation might not be the same
problem as it used to be.
Some economists are predicting higher interest rates under a Labour
government, because the foreign exchange markets will test John Smith's
determination to defend the pound. That would be good news for savers.
Those who are trying to build up their savings will be rather less cheerful
this week, at least if their salary is above Pounds 405 per week. A Labour
government would impose an extra 9 per cent bill for national insurance on
such people, and those with taxable incomes over Pounds 36,375 will also be
hit by the new 50 per cent band.
These changes will mean quite dramatic falls in post-tax salaries for some
high earners. A married man on Pounds 100,000 would see his post-tax income
fall by over 20 per cent compared with 1991-92 (or around Pounds 13,000 a
year); a single man on Pounds 50,000 would see a fall in his net income of
almost 8 per cent.
Is this tax burden excessive? It is worth remembering that during the years
1979-88 - the time of the Thatcher 'economic miracle' - the top rate of tax
was 60 per cent. (By-the-by, since the tax burden was lifted by Nigel
Lawson, and 'incentives for entrepreneurs' created, economic performance
seems to have gone downhill. That may, of course, be coincidence.)
We asked Price Waterhouse to compare the tax burden under a Labour
government in 1992-93, with that in the year 1987-88. before the Lawson
tax-cutting Budget.
The differences are less than you might suppose. Tax and national insurance
will take 49 per cent of the income of a married man on Pounds 100,000 under
Labour; in 1987-88, someone on Pounds 68,200 (the inflation-adjusted
equivalent) would have paid 46 per cent. For someone on Pounds 40,000, the
equivalent figures are 34 per cent and 31.5 per cent.
People on Pounds 25,000 will actually face a lower tax burden under Labour
(27.5 per cent of their income), then those on an inflation-adjusted income
of Pounds 17,000 did in 1987-88 (29 per cent).
So a Labour government would essentially move us back to a slightly more
redistributive version of the pre-1988 tax system. That may not sound so bad
in theory.
In practice, however, the difficulties will arise from the fact that the
changes are being imposed all at once. This could have really horrific
effects on individuals, particularly those with large mortgages, as David
Barchard reports on page IV.
Even those who have been prudent will have a lot less money to put aside for
saving and they may be forced to run down previous investments to maintain
their standard of living. There may be knock-on effects as people retreat
from long-term savings commitments, and suffer the penalties.
So those who will be hit by Labour's taxes need to plan very carefully. How
much of your take-home pay do you save at the moment? Will you be able to
continue to save if your take-home pay falls by 10 per cent under Labour? If
not, then beware of taking on further savings commitments in a pre-election
rush. The greatest losers in the savings industry are those who stop
long-term policies early on.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1950</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAB3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Men who won the Falklands peace: Ten years after Margaret
Thatcher toppled Galtieri, Jimmy Burns asks: who gained what?
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JIMMY BURNS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GENERAL MARTIN Balza, Malvinas veteran and Argentina's army chief, sits in
his panelled military headquarters in Buenos Aires, fingering four British
Pounds 1 notes as we talk about the Falklands War ten years ago.
The money represents half his pay as a prisoner of war after he surrendered
his artillery position outside Port Stanley to the British forces. The
general smiles at the memory of those days when, as a lieutenant colonel, he
was short- changed by an English soldier for a tube of toothpaste and a
Coca-Cola. But he is not bitter. Argentina, he concedes, was destined to
lose because of the incompetence of her former rulers.
Back in March 1982, when I was in Buenos Aires covering the war for the FT,
Argentina's then army chief and President, General Leopoldo Galtieri was not
a person I wanted to meet unprotected. His regime's way of dealing with
opponents was similar to that of Nazi Germany. More than 8,000 people, some
foreigners, had 'disappeared' since the coup which brought him to power in
1976.
I will never forget, just a few days before the Falklands war, watching an
old woman, with shopping bag and walking stick, being surrounded and beaten
senseless by heavily armed police. By chance, she had strayed into the first
big demonstration against the regime. Galtieri had ordered it to be
repressed with sabres, gas canisters, long truncheons and live bullets. Yet
when Argentina invaded the Falklands, Galtieri became a national hero.
Now ten years later, after the expenditure of 1,000 lives and enough cash to
make each islander very rich, history has pushed aside both Galtieri and the
woman who defeated him. Margaret Thatcher, whose defiance rang across the
world, and helped to deliver a resounding victory to the Conservative party
in 1983, walks sadly from the main political arena next month, almost at the
anniversary of her military triumph.
She also was rejected from the leadership of her country, as heroic memories
of the struggle began to fade. Yet the questions remain, was it necessary
and was it worth the cost? From Balza's office, at least, it seems the
greatest benefit was reaped by Argentina, which escaped a vicious tyranny
and brought its generals under political control. Did Britain also deliver a
lesson which Argentina (if not the world) will never forget?
Even now, a monument outside the army headquarters in Buenos Aires states
that the Malvinas were, are, and always will be Argentine. But Balza
declares: 'I don't see that there is any possibility of another armed
conflict with Britain. We are living in a different world.'
It seemed, when I stood in the Falklands a few days later under the union
flag by 15 military graves at San Carlos, that the British Government
believes him. All was as quiet as if there had never been a landing of
troops, or a frenzied air attack on transports and frigates in that famous
sound at the north west of the main island. Now only low-flying upland geese
and seagulls disturb the stillness. The nearby military camp lies abandoned
 -a few empty cabins and a couple of jerry cans. Linda Anderson, owner of
the recently opened Blue Beach Lodge nearby, complains that the Ministry of
Defence can no longer afford to transport many soldiers to rest in her bed
and breakfast.
British officials say the forces still stationed on the islands are enough
to defend them. Even so, the UK now spends only Pounds 69m a year on the
defence of the islands, less than 7 per cent of the rate of spending in the
three years after the war. (Even the present sum, however, could provide
each islander with a Pounds 30,000 per year pension). Although the Falklands
now boasts a large and fully-equipped military airport and three highly
sensitive radar stations, the combined military presence has been reduced to
half a squadron of Phantom aircraft (the Harriers have long since departed),
some half a dozen aerial transport units, a company of less than 200
infantry, a frigate and a naval patrol vessel.
One former British marine on the islands said that if it wanted to,
Argentina could recapture the Falklands in 24 hours, for example by landing
special forces from a submarine at night and taking out the radars and the
phantoms on the ground. But nobody in Buenos Aires seems even to be thinking
of such a plan. One reason is that British intelligence has greatly
improved. Ten years ago this week, the UK was apparently unaware of a series
of key meetings between General Galtieri and an officer attached to the
Chiefs of Staff, General Mario Benjamin Menendez.
At one such meeting, while an Argentine foreign minister was still going
through the motions of diplomacy, Menendez was informed that a secret
decision had been taken by the military junta to invade the islands.
According to Menendez, Galtieri dismissed any suggestion that this would
provoke a big international reaction. 'Menendez', Galtieri said, 'that is
none of your business . . . it's the junta's problem and no one else's. I
just want you to think about being a military governor.'
Two weeks later the Argentines overran the token force of marines on the
islands. In Buenos Aires, civilians, including some whose relatives had been
tortured and killed, poured through the streets waving flags and bringing
Galtieri to the balcony of the presidential palace to rapturous applause.
Thatcher responded by sending a taskforce of 30,000 men and scores of ships,
the biggest UK naval operation since the Second World War. Within two
months, on the May 21, the first British troops were wading ashore on the
rocky gravel beach that lies just below Linda Anderson's Blue Beach lodge.
On June 14, Argentine troops surrendered at Port Stanley.
The battle for the Falklands has been described by some military experts as
a small colonial war. But the images that linger are those of high human
drama which for a while gripped the attention of the world: they include the
sinking of the battleship cruiser Belgrano with the loss of more than 400
lives in freezing South Atlantic seas, aerial dogfights of extraordinary
skill and daring, the burning hulks of British battleships, and the dejected
faces of the wounded and the defeated.
Of the 1000 men killed in the campaign more than 800 were Argentines. But in
Argentina, as the tenth anniversary approaches, the fallen are remembered
with muted emotions. Jorge Lanata, the 31-year-old editor of Pagina 12, one
of the country's most popular newspapers, says: 'Three years ago we ran a
series on the war. It was treated with total indifference by our readers.
Many of them supported the invasion, but they are now silenced by a sense of
guilt. They look at the veterans as if they were ghosts.' Yet some Malvinas
veterans who, like Balza, survived the postwar purge are now in positions of
command in a radically altered armed force. Comodoro Gustavo Justo, for
example, a former Mirage 5 fighter pilot in the attack on San Carlos Bay, is
today Chief of Operational Planning under a civilian ministry of defence.
On May 21, 1982 Justo led the first big attack on the British beachhead,
flying low over the waters of the South Atlantic to avoid radar detection
and leaving himself with the minimum fuel necessary to return to base. Justo
narrowly escaped with his life, ejecting from his aircraft at 950 kms per
hour, after being shot down by a British Harrier jet, equipped with the most
modern air-to-air missiles provided by the US. He was only 1 1/2 miles short
of his target. A fellow pilot and best friend was killed.
Badly injured and suffering from concussion, Justo lay in a shepherd's hut
for several days. He was eventually found by an Argentine helicopter team
and shared a field hospital tent with a wounded RAF pilot. 'The Englishman
said 'what a shit of a war. My parents are old and I was going to get
married.' But I thought to myself: not only am I married but I know what I'm
fighting for.'
Ten years on, Justo is much less sure.
'I have known how horrific war can be . . .There are peaceful options. That
is what I am telling my children. It is a lesson that was not passed on to
me by my superiors when we fought.'
Justo, Balza and the new men at the top have presided over a sharp
contraction of the Argentine armed force, squeezed by budgetary cuts and
public indifference. They also perceive that after the Gulf War, a coup in
Buenos Aires - let alone an attack on the Falklands - could no longer be
sure to escape an international response. Indeed, the Argentine military
that defied UN resolutions, today takes part in the UN's global peacekeeping
exercises. More remarkably, it also exchanges information with British
forces on movements in the South Atlantic.
These big changes in Argentina seem, however, to have escaped the notice of
most of the 2,100 islanders. As military spending declines, their improved
prosperity depends, partly at least, on Argentina's new policies of fishery
conservation and non-belligerence. But for many islanders the traumas of the
war have not healed, perhaps understandably in view of the large areas near
Port Stanley still made deadly by Argentine mines.
Stuart Wallace, for example, who studied in Argentina and lives with his
Argentine wife in Port Stanley, says that while Buenos Aires claims the
islands: 'The price of dealing with Argentina is potentially enormous.
Renewed links would politically destabilise us. It would be different if we
were still a disintegrating society with no revenue of our own.'
The islanders may have some reason to remain anxious. Although Argentina's
President Menem today speaks eloquently about his commitment to the new
international order, the same Menem was elected President after labelling
the British the 'pirates of the world'. He said then: 'No matter how much
time passes, or how much blood we have to shed, that territory will be ours
again.'
If he changed his mind once, might he not change it again? Rumours that a
lunatic fringe of military officers might have helped this week's bomb
attack on the Israeli embassy in Buenos Aires, are of just the kind to
rekindle the islanders' general unease. Yet hostility is softening. Some
island officials agree at least to attend talks between Britain and
Argentina on issues such as fishing and oil exploration.
Meanwhile, Argentine school children are still being taught that the
Malvinas belong to them; but they are learning about democracy too. So the
question returns: was it worth the fight? Living in Buenos Aires through the
war I never doubted that it was, if only because Britain's response promised
the destruction of a vicious military regime. On my return to Buenos Aires
ten years later, I found a country deepening its determination to put
history behind it.
This change, and the restoration of commercial and diplomatic links, make a
far more fitting tribute to those, from both sides, who died in 1982, than
the islanders' present intransigence.
Jimmy Burns was the FT's Buenos Aires correspondent during the Falklands
War. His book The Land that Lost its heroes: Argentina, the Falklands and
Alfonsin is being republished by Bloomsbury (London) to coincide with the
tenth anniversary.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1951</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAB2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / The Long View: After victory, the battle
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARRY RILEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT CAN be tough going when you are rearranging the deck chairs on the
Titanic in the icy gale and the freezing rain. You barely have a chance to
notice that there are icebergs looming ahead.
Please forgive the overworked metaphor, but manifesto week in an election
campaign is a time for cliche of expression rather than clarity of thought.
The parties are promising to redouble efforts, end scandals, regenerate
inner cities and grasp new opportunities. There is much talk of recovery and
growth. But the anxious voter may wonder what the winning party will do if
the unthinkable - but, alas, scarcely improbable - happens and the economy
is holed below the waterline.
It has happened before so often following closely-contested elections. After
all, it is only when the economy is faltering that a change of government is
likely to take place. The defending administration is forced to minimise its
problems, and defer unpopular actions.
In 1964 Labour under Harold Wilson arrived with a spectacular National Plan
for 4 per cent economic growth and a promise to exploit the white heat of
the technological revolution, but quickly ran into a series of balance of
payments crises. In 1970 Edward Heath led the Conservatives back into power
but was lured into an ultimately disastrous U-turn on public spending and
corporatism by the recession of 1971, of which the Rolls-Royce bankruptcy
was the highlight.
Back in Downing Street in 1974, Wilson found the country in a state of acute
financial and industrial crisis, afflicted by soaring prices, a sugar famine
and the threat of the 'doomsday machine' as the corporate sector wilted
under an unindexed tax system; he resigned after two years, leaving James
Callaghan to call in the rescue troops of the IMF. As for Margaret Thatcher
in 1979, promises to rejuvenate the overregulated economy were soon mostly
buried, at least for the time being, amid a burst of 20 per cent-plus
inflation and the worst recession since the war. It required Sir Geoffrey
Howe's notorious Budget of 1981 to bring the borrowing and spending balance
back under control.
This week a nervous stock market has been adjusting to the idea that the
Conservatives may well lose, even if Labour does not win outright. In the
past investors have tended to fare badly when governments have changed. I am
indebted to Nick Glydon of Kleinwort Benson for his book of election charts
which shows that after three of the four general elections I have mentioned
gilt-edged were lower in price six months later - by an average of 5 per
cent. Equities also fell three times out of four, by 13 per cent on average.
The exception in each case was 1970 when the stock market had already
tumbled by 20 per cent in the four months before the poll.
All the signs are that the incoming administration next month will walk
straight into another mess. Norman Lamont's Budget last week was supposed to
be the launching pad for the campaign but only succeeded in boring the
public and scaring the financial markets. Labour's John Smith accepted the
Treasury's assumptions in framing his shadow Budget this week, but will
surely have some rethinking to do should he ever get into No. 11 and have a
chance to inspect the 'books".
All the main parties say they accept the discipline of the European exchange
rate mechanism - there is not much choice for the voter here. True, the Tory
Manifesto sneers that the ERM 'would merely expose the folly of Labour
policies' but given the Conservative spending plans the same jibe might be
turned against the Tories themselves. Nobody can promise lower interest
rates until the Germans lead the way. And the problem is - as the Bundesbank
warned this week - that German profligacy following reunification is
threatening that country's financial stability.
The big picture is that excessive German government spending is keeping
interest rates high throughout the European currency bloc and undermining
industrial competitiveness. In Britain the private sector has been
especially vulnerable to these sky-high real interest rates, and the economy
appears to be heading into the feared double dip, with news this week of an
unexpectedly large dive in industrial production in January and a further
rise of 40,000 in unemployment in February. A jump in public spending is the
only available policy response, which would be all very well if these were
temporary programmes, but if permanent spending levels are ratcheted up this
must create the basis for an overstretching of the public finances at such
time as the private sector begins to recover.
There is no attractive route out of this difficulty. If the UK devalues
within the ERM there will be some benefit to competitiveness but a blip in
inflation will be generated and interest rates, if anything, would have to
increase because sterling would have lost credibility in the eyes of the
foreign exchange market. In order to bring interest rates substantially down
sterling would have to be taken out of the ERM and the devaluation would be
very large - probably 20 per cent against the DM. Some politicians are
dabbling with the idea of setting up the Bank of England as an independent
guardian of the currency so as to make the idea of floating the pound more
acceptable; but the Bank might be guarding an open stable door.
Is there any other way? Well, you could warn the public that a year or two
of depressed economic conditions may easily lie ahead, and that although
some short-term public spending projects might be considered, great
restraint would be required in terms of pay levels. The public, in the
meantime, should be very careful when buying assets such as houses, because
values might well fall. But politicians do not get any thanks, let alone
votes, for presenting this kind of negative message. They are there to work
miracles, or at least to proclaim with all due modesty that miracles have
happened.
This time Labour does not have a National Plan but instead its manifesto
boasts of a National Recovery Programme. I wonder if it will be able to
handle icebergs.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1952</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAB1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / The Lex Column: Gold
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Gold bugs, it seems, are running out of places to crawl. Already frustrated
by the metal's soggy showing in the Gulf War - and the narrow trading range
which has prevailed ever since - they suffered the further indignity this
week of seeing the price dip below last year's important trading point of
Dollars 342 per troy ounce. Sizeable distress sales, rumoured to be the work
of an eastern European central bank, did most of the damage. Transatlantic
speculators seizing on the trend merely added to investors' woe.
The days of expecting the gold price to react sharply to macro-economic
shifts now seem but a distant memory. Disillusionment set in long ago with
falling inflation and high real interest rates, whereas investors now have a
much wider range of hedging instruments if by some chance an oil crisis of
mid or late 1970s proportions were to be repeated. Gold has thus become a
rather dull commodity, oscillating between small changes in the
supply/demand equation but always vulnerable to the unexpected behaviour of
big stockholders. The fundamentals point to a marginally tighter market in
1992 and 1993, but it would not do to get carried away.
The lasting appeal of gold, though, is its great anonymity, a characteristic
generally not shared by other financial assets. If the market somehow lost
this element of secrecy, it really might be finished.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1953</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAB0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / The Lex Column: Nestle
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
On the face of it, Nestle's 8.7 per cent increase in 1991 pre-tax profits
was unremarkable. But it seems likely that the group took an as yet unstated
restructuring charge of nearly SFr500m above the line, double the charge a
year earlier. Adjusting for that, profits were 14 per cent higher after
sales growth of 9 per cent and a volume improvement of 4 per cent.
Such a performance suggests Nestle can afford a relaxed attitude should its
bid for Perrier fail. In the more likely event of success, it will generate
additional earnings from the combination of its Vitel mineral water brand
with a Perrier business which has plenty of room for improvement. The
extensive restructuring in the US and UK is almost complete, so this year's
profits should be relatively clean. Although Nestle's shares are near their
all-time high, they are on a prospective multiple of just 12. For investors
comfortable with Swiss standards of disclosure, that looks a distinctly
inadequate reflection of their promise.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1954</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJABZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / The Lex Column: British Steel
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
It is no surprise that Midland Bank is the best performing FT-SE stock since
the election was announced. More curious is that British Steel should rank
as high as eighth when it is under dividend warning. In fact the
outperformance dates from before the campaign, but there is no sign of
recovery in British Steel's markets and first quarter price rises are barely
holding. A Labour government would be too constrained financially to be of
much help, but the company would find it harder to retrench further in
response to the chronic overcapacity in Europe.
Perhaps the market is less frightened of the dividend announcement since its
worst fears for other companies were overdone. But it would make sense for
British Steel to conserve cash by cutting deeply. If the dividend were
halved, the yield would fall below 8 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1955</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJABYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / The Lex Column: Japanese banks
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Japan's banks have so far reacted with surprising calm to the long slide in
domestic equity prices. After all, it was widely predicted last year that
their capital bases would be so weakened by a Nikkei index at 20,000 that
they would be unable to meet the Bank for International Settlements' (BIS)
capital adequacy requirements. The ensuing clawback of overseas assets
appeared to threaten a worldwide financial crisis.
While the banks' capital position is now just outside the long-run BIS
target, it appears they have barely responded. That is partly because the
weak trend of the yen has made the repatriation of assets an unattractive
method of boosting capital. But there is also a growing sense among the
banks that BIS standards only matter where banks have unfulfilled overseas
lending ambitions. In other words, at present they scarcely matter at all -
capital ratios can always be rebuilt once the domestic crisis has been
resolved.
The lack of concern on international markets does not mean the original
thesis was wrong, however. The world credit scene has been hit by the
Japanese lenders' spontaneous withdrawal over the last two years, but they
still have considerable lending outstanding. If the stock market goes down
much further, the world could yet receive a nasty fright.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1956</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJABXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / The Lex Column: Deflating the growth stocks
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
FT-SE Index: 2,456.6 (-11.0)
This week's gentle reminder from Guinness that its profits cannot be
expected to grow as fast as before in a non-inflationary environment raises
questions for growth stocks generally. If inflation makes it easier for
companies to post higher profits, then the multiples on which growth stocks
trade might be expected to come down as price rises abate.
The question is how the effect will bite. Consumer prices have risen by 36
per cent since 1987. Over the same period profits at Bodyshop grew by 234
per cent, at Rentokil by 151 per cent, at Guinness by 115 per cent, at Glaxo
by 72 per cent and at Tomkins by 273 per cent. Inflation played only a minor
part in growth for these companies, at least.
Presumably operating margins can still be widened even when prices are
static. The scope for growth by acquisition may diminish, though, as the
real cost of debt becomes more expensive. Even companies with surplus cash
might find it more attractive to invest in high-yielding gilt-edged stock.
Low inflation thus presents a challenge which will weed out remorselessly
companies trading bogus promises of growth.
That suggests the market will look at quality of earnings in reassessing
ratings. Historically it does not like paying a premium for rising nominal
earnings which are mostly inflation-induced, but durable real earnings
growth of 3 per cent is worth more when inflation is also 3 per cent than
when it is in double figures.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1957</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJABWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / World Stock Markets (Asia Pacific): Buying interest moves to
Australia
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
WITH Tokyo closed for the spring equinox holiday, equity market interest
seemed to move to the Antipodes yesterday although Bombay, too, rose
sharply.
AUSTRALIA was boosted by encouraging economic news and the All Ordinaries
Index closed up 12.6 at 1,584.1, a fall of 0.2 per cent on the week.
The market was encouraged by a rise in consumer sentiment to its highest
level for more than three years.
BHP put on 18 cents to ADollars 13.44 and was followed by fellow mining
groups, CRA rising 4 cents to ADollars 13.80 and Western Mining gaining 13
cents to ADollars 4.86.
TNT was off 2 cents at ADollars 1.86: it announced on Thursday that it had
agreed to operate a joint international express mail service with European
and US post offices.
NEW ZEALAND recovered after hitting a four-month low in early trading: the
NZSE-40 index closed just 0.38 down at 1,438.81 after falling to 1,424.95, a
0.9 per cent decline over the week. Turnover was NZDollars 19.9m after
NZDollars 10.3m.
Analysts said that sentiment was encouraged by the stronger Australian
market, but noted that a series of cash issues and public flotations over
the coming weeks will take more than NZDollars 1bn from the market.
Fletcher Challenge gained 4 cents to NZDollars 3.42 having earlier hit
NZDollars 3.36. Telecom remained weak, closing down 3 cents at NZDollars
2.28.
HONG KONG closed higher after speculation in second line stocks, the Hang
Seng index ending 25.22 higher at 5,015.81, 1.1 per cent lower on the week,
after a low on the day of 4,967.37.
HSBC Holdings, parent of the Hongkong Bank, traded heavily, adding HKDollars
1 to HKDollars 41.25. Brokers said that positive economic signals coming
from the National People's Congress in Beijing, including a formal end to
the Chinese austerity programme introduced in 1988, had little effect as the
news was already built into the market.
BOMBAY rose sharply after reports that a daily limit on share purchases may
be relaxed. The BSE index closed up 115.52 or 3.7 per cent to 3,243.53, but
down 0.4 per cent on the week.
SINGAPORE finished easier, the Straits Times Industrial index falling 0.58
to 1,435.81, 2.1 per cent down on the week. Volume rose from 24.7 to 26.3m
shares.
Landmark rose seven cents to SDollars 1.10 in 2.05m shares on speculation
that shareholders will be given an option to buy new shares in a subsidiary
due to be listed this year.
KUALA LUMPUR closed firmer, the composite index finishing the day up 5.23 at
603.19 in turnover of some MDollars 120m and registering a 1.3 per cent rise
on the week.
BANGKOK's advance continued with the SET index closing 2.61 higher at
814.39, a 1.1 per cent gain on the week, in turnover of Bt7.29bn.
Bangkok Land fell Bt3 to Bt199, Bangkok Bank gained Bt8 to Bt704 and Thai
Farmers Bank lost Bt2 to Bt514.
MANILA rose in light trading on bargain hunting. The composite index closed
up 15.10 to 1,120.17, but down 0.2 per cent over the week. Turnover was 52m
pesos after 61m pesos.
The rise in the US of shares in Philippine Long Distance Telephone prompted
activity by local investors and it closed 10 pesos ahead at 875 pesos.
TAIWAN finished higher on political concerns, but in slow trade, the
weighted index closing 7.95 higher at 4,818.18, 4.2 per cent lower on the
week, in thin turnover of TDollars 17.1bn, down from TDollars 19.7bn
previously.
Investors were sidelined by political concerns as a National Assembly
session opened to amend the constitution.
SEOUL saw strong gains in Hyundai subsidiaries on rumours that the Hyundai
founder, Chung Ju-yung's newly-formed Unification National Party would do
better than expected in the March 24 election. The composite index rose 2.72
to 615.39, fractionally higher on the week in turnover of Won372.3bn.
JAKARTA closed barely changed, with the official index 0.68 higher at 277.49
as profit-taking kept some shares under pressure.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1958</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJABVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / World Stock Markets: South AFrica
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
JOHANNESBURG closed firmer as the market anticipated a cut in interest
rates. The all-share index rose 4 to 3,546 and the industrial index was 2
better at 4,411. The gold index fell 6 to 1,126. Vaal Reefs put on R3 to
R199.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1959</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJABUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / World Stock Markets: Swiss franc depreciation trims growth
in Zurich - Equities have had a good start
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN RODGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The Swiss are early risers.
That admirable trait may help explain why the Swiss stock market has been
extraordinarily lively early in the year for the second year in a row, in
spite of an economic backdrop which is as dreary as a foggy winter morning
in Zurich.
The SMI index of leading shares leapt out of the starting gate on January 1
at 1,670.1 and dashed to 1,840.6 by the end of February, a handsome rise of
about 10 per cent.
'The targets we set for the end of June have already been met,' Mr Sylvan
Trachsler, head of research at Union Bank of Switzerland, says.
The question that torments him and other analysts is whether that is it.
Will the rest of 1992 turn out to be as dull as was the rest of 1991? Mr
Trachsler, for one, has opted for caution, seeing the market 'more or less
going sideways' for the next few months. This is a view shared by Michel
Petitpierre, head of Swiss research at Pictet &amp; Co, although he is calling
for 'a slight correction' because of the recent setback in the government's
monetary policy.
Mr Bernard Tschanz, head of Swiss equity research at Credit Suisse, is
slightly more optimistic, seeing the SMI at 1,900 by mid-year and 1,950 by
year end.
Most analysts are agreed that the main prop for the market in January and
February was the expectation that interest rates were going to drop sharply
following indications that inflation in Switzerland was declining.
'People got a bit too excited about it,' an analyst at James Capel says.
Among them was the Swiss National Bank which declined to follow Germany's
official interest rate rises in December. Perhaps it thought that
Switzerland could still play on its reputation as a stable haven for
capital, but that era seems to have passed.
In January and February, the Swiss franc declined sharply against the
Deutschmark and this month the SNB intervened to stop the fall, nudging up
interest rates. The likelihood is that the lingering gap between Swiss and
German bond yields has become a risk factor for the equity market, rather
than a bull point.
Financial shares have been the main victims of the interest rate rises. CS
Holding, parent of Credit Suisse, jumped from SFr1,755 at the beginning of
the year to SFr2,070 at the end of February, but have since fallen back to
SFr1,970. Zurich Insurance bearers went from SFr4,320 to SFr4,620 and back
to SFr4,230 over the same period.
The negative effects have probably been limited by indications of very
strong profit gains in 1991. The big three banks all reported record 1991
profits and analysts are confident that the big three chemical and
pharmaceutical companies, which will be reporting results next week, will
also do well.
The rush of announcements of stock splits and other moves to make companies
more investor friendly has also contributed to the market's strength. Mr
Tschanz says it has been the most important factor in the first two months,
and it will continue to have a big influence in the short term.
Unfortunately, it is difficult to predict when and how these announcements
are going to affect individual shares or the market as a whole, perhaps
because, as another analyst observes, the Swiss market suffers from a
relatively uneven diffusion of information.
The tendency of Swiss companies to do more to please international investors
has been apparent for several years, and it was widely known that this would
get a big boost this year following modifications to the companies law,
facilitating share splits and forcing simplification of capital structures.
Some companies, such as Nestle, made clear several months ago their
intention to split their shares as soon as they could. Yet Nestle shares
reacted sharply to a newspaper article in January rehearsing this point.
Holzstoff shares rose on the announcement of a capital restructuring. Its
bearers were at SFr5,050 before the announcement and now stand at SFr5,300.
But Alusuisse shares did not.
In the Holzstoff case, the action was especially radical, with restrictions
on foreign ownership coming off, a single class of shares being established
and a 10-for-one share split proposed. Also, group 1991 earnings were up 22
per cent and the dividend was raised. One analyst said the shares were now
very attractive, combining little downside risk with a possibility of
becoming a takeover target.
In some cases, significant gaps still exist between the prices of shares and
participation certificates of companies which are expected to announce
capital restructuring. This, according to Mr Trachsler, offers speculative
opportunities, notably in the PCs of Helvetia and the cable maker,
Cortaillod.
Whatever impact these moves have had so far, there could be further effects
after July 1 when the splits will actually be carried out and it becomes
easier for small investors to buy many Swiss shares.
However, by then, the current squeeze on interest rates may also have eased,
bringing other stimuli to the market. Mr Tschanz is looking for another year
of strong profit growth - 15 per cent compared with 21 per cent last year.
That would indicate that the market is on a prospective price-earnings ratio
of 12.7. 'It is not cheap, but it is not expensive,' he says.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1960</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJABTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / World Stock Markets (Europe): Technical and political
influences move bourses
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Markets Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE CORPORATE results season had to contend with technical and political
influences on bourses yesterday, writes Our Markets Staff.
FRANKFURT withstood its first-ever 'quadruple witching hour' covering the
multiple expiry of futures and options contracts, with effects which were
obvious to the aficionados, but not marked in blue chip share price terms.
Opening prices were clearly higher in Frankfurt, said Mr Jens Wiecking of
Merck Finck in Dusseldorf. At the close the DAX was 11.67 higher on the day,
and 0.2 per cent up on the week at 1,736.30 after gains of 3.65 and 0.1 per
cent respectively for the FAZ at 704.44.
The firmer start seemed to indicate that futures players had long positions
in the expiring March DAX future. Then, as DAX option contracts were settled
in the last few minutes, the index fell by around four points from an
earlier high of just over 1,740.
Underlying that, said Mr Wiecking, was a rise in companies which could look
forward to better earnings in the US, or export margins on the strength of
the higher dollar. In chemicals, Hoechst especially comes into this
category, and led the big three higher with a rise of DM4.30 to DM259.60.
Carmakers, favoured for similar reasons, saw BMW DM6.30 higher at DM560.80.
Among special situations, Continental, the tyremaker, had one of its
occasional days in the sun with a rise of DM8.30 to DM247.70 reflecting
improving fundamentals, the dollar and the possibility that stock is still
being accumulated with the abortive takeover approach from Pirelli still a
very recent memory.
In retailing, Asko took its gain on the week to DM100, or 13.7 per cent on
the latest, bullish projections from its management. The stock is 37 per
cent above its low for the year, and analysts are suggesting that
profit-taking is in order.
STOCKHOLM was mixed on a variety of corporate results as the Affarsvarlden
General index rose 2.0 to 1,009.7, 2.4 per cent higher on the week.
Asea B rose another SKr6 to SKr356 on Wednesday's good results from its
jointly owned operating company, ABB, and Volvo B closed SKr5 higher at
SKr411 after its Thursday report of a fourth-quarterly operating profit,
after five consecutive quarterly losses.
However, in transport, Bilspedition B dropped SKr10 to SKr43 on an 85 per
cent drop in 1991 profits.
PARIS brokers said that Sunday's French regional elections kept investors
out of the bourse. The CAC-40 index fell 2.87 to 1,919.12, down 1.4 per cent
on the week, in light turnover of about FFr1.75bn.
Liquid commodities of one sort or another seemed to be active. In oils, Esso
climbed another FFr27, or 3.7 per cent to FFr757 in 108,000 shares after
Thursday's 3.1 per cent gain on a doubled dividend. But Total fell FFr2.90
to FFr230.10 in 291,650 as it confirmed that its Hutchison unit is looking
into buying assets owned by the Italian tyremaker, Pirelli.
Perrier dipped by FFr33, or 2.1 per cent to FFr1,546 afterThursday's FFr34
gain, traders citing a report that Agnelli is not interested in a takeover
battle with Nestle for the French mineral water group. Another heavy faller
was Pernod-Ricard, down FFr26 or 1.7 per cent to FFr1,482 before next week's
results.
MILAN opened an hour later because of a visit by Prime Minister Giulio
Andreotti and moved little during the day with volume remaining light. The
Comit index shed 2.55 to 511.79, but up 0.2 per cent on the week. Turnover
was estimated at L80bn.
Pirelli gained L34 or 2.7 per cent to L1,263 on the Total report.
ZURICH closed slightly firmer, activity slowing from early hectic trade when
expiring Soffex options and futures took prices up to the day's high. The
SMI leading share index hit 1,852.9 at one point, but closed only 3.8 higher
at 1,837.1, 1,7 per cent higher on the week.
Higher profits took Nestle bearers up SFr40 to SFr9,550, and Swissair
bearers rose another SFr18 to SFr735 on news that the airline was cutting
down the executive board responsible for day-to-day business.
AMSTERDAM's CBS Tendency Index closed little changed, up 0.2 to 125.8, a
rise of 0.5 per cent over the week.
Elsevier, which reported a 10.8 per cent increase in profits after the
close, dipped Fl 1.40 to Fl 114.60, having earlier shown moderate gains.
Heineken, which has been performing strongly all week, came off Fl 1.4 to Fl
189.10 as some investors moved in to take profits.
Nedlloyd declined a further 2.35 per cent following its midweek announcement
that two institutions were converting loans into shares. It finished down Fl
1.4 to Fl 58.00.
BRUSSELS fell with the Bel-20 index ending 3.65 lower at 1,200.89, nearly 1
per cent down on the week. Turnover was BFr740m.
Clabecq, the steelmaker, fell BFr190 or 10 per cent to BFr1,660 after its
announcement on Thursday of larger than expected half-year losses.
ISTANBUL rose for the third consecutive day, although many investors
remained cautious, fearing violence ahead of today's Kurdish new year. The
75-share index advanced 67.52 to 3,990.61, an increase of 3.4 per cent on
the week.
MADRID rose slightly with the general index slipping back 0.17 to 258.38,
for a fall of 0.7 per cent over the week.
VIENNA drifted lower in thin volume, the ATX index closing down 3.81 to
1,046.46; but it was 2 per cent up on the week.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE EUROTRACK 100 - MAR 20
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                      Hourly changes
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Open     10 am    11 am    12 pm    1 pm     2 pm     3 pm     close
1153.00  1154.21  1154.43  1154.38  1155.19  1154.42  1153.95  1153.93
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
          Day's High  1155.59    Day's Low  1153.00
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
     Mar 19    Mar 18    Mar 17    Mar 16    Mar 13
     1153.18   1153.82   1151.88   1145.61   1154.40
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Base value 1000 (26/10/90).
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1961</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJABSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Appointments: Swings and roundabouts in Aronstead's garden
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Aronstead, Britain's leading garden and patio furniture-maker, has recruited
three key, and relatively young, executives after the company, which is
suffering significant losses, parted with its managing director and sales
director in the past few months.
David Smallridge, 36, joins as managing director from Coats Viyella, where
he was managing director of lace net curtain maker Stiebel, on the departure
of Geoff Gurling. Aronstead's parent, Headway, formerly Beaverco, just
announced losses for the six months to December 1991 of Pounds 795,000; it
attributes the bulk of the short fall to Aronstead, which was hit by a poor
summer, but also, in Headway's view, would have benefited from stronger
management.
Headway's chief executive Andrew Staniland - himself from Tootal, now owned
by Coats Viyella - knew Smallridge, who had also been at Tootal earlier in
his career, and was attracted among other things by his knowledge of the
mail-order business.
Malcolm Ritchie, 41, is the new finance director, previously finance
director of Chloride's US subsidiary Altus. 'They gave him a heap of
problems and he did an excellent job,' says Peter Hogdson, Headway finance
director. 'We hope he will eat it alive,' he adds, of the task at Aronstead,
a much smaller company, but one with ambitious plans.
Part of the new strategy is to break the seasonality of garden furniture,
with products ranging from toy prams - the Christmas market  - to slides and
climbing frames for the Early Learning Centre. The new sales and marketing
director, who says more than 20 new products are planned for launch next
year, is Linda Oliver, 38. She replaces the previous marketing director who
left last autumn after just six months. Hers is also a main board
appointment.
With her timing 'less than perfect', Oliver left Tootal Apparel shortly
after a management buyout, where she says she was not a major shareholder,
and effectively not on the board. She admits it cost her dearly financially,
but says she is more excited by the Aronstead opportunity. She too knows
Smallridge when they worked together many years ago at Bradgate, then
Tootal's furry carseat cover-maker.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1962</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJABRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / London Stock Exchange: Heavy trading in Gas
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER JOHN and CHRISTOPHER PRICE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TURNOVER in British Gas was the heaviest of any stock in the London stock
market yesterday and the shares fell 5 to 242p.
The volume of nearly 20m shares was largely accounted for by a sizeable
placing carried out by SG Warburg Securities, which was said to have sold
around 6m shares on behalf of a large institution. Dealers said the
investment bank took the shares on to their book at 239p and sold them at
241p. Warburg would only say that it had been active in the shares.
The deal could be part of a much bigger placing. Societe Generale Strauss
Turnbull said it had also been selling on behalf of a large institution this
week.
However, the sale does not appear to reflect the prevailing view that
shareholders of privatised companies might be in for a tough time if a
Labour government is elected. Strauss Turnbull's oils team argues: 'There
are no political risks attached to the shares - if anything a Labour
government might introduce regulation by committee which is much prefereable
to the perceived arbitrary rule currently in force.'
Reuters return
Volatility in Reuters Holdings continued as the shares bounced back by 24 to
1144p on optimism over one of the company's new trading systems.
Traders said the market was encouraged about Globex, a futures and options
after-hours trading system, following developments at a US conference.
The Chicago Board of Trade and the Chicago Mercantile Exchange said four New
York commodities exchanges agreed to become affiliated to the Globex system.
It was also announced that a new test for Globex had been set for late
March.
Investors also feel that the stock is unlikely to be affected by the outcome
of the general election as 80 per cent of the group's business is conducted
overseas.
Rosehaugh steady
Troubled property group Rosehaugh finally won approval yesterday for its
long-awaited Pounds 315m re-financing package from a syndicate of 28 banks,
led by Barclays and NatWest. The market responded positively, the shares
gaining 2 1/4 to 9p in busy volume of 3.1m, not least because there had been
serious concerns whether the developer would survive.
The shares have declined from a high point of Pounds 7.42 in October 1987 as
the company has mirrored the dramatic fall in property and office rental
prices. Last year, Rosehaugh, which is joint-developer of London's
prestigious Broadgate and Ludgate sites, lost Pounds 227m, and last month
also lost its vice-chairman Mr Godfrey Bradman.
Analyst Mr Graham Stanley at County NatWest commented: 'The banks will have
demanded an awful price for this arrangement which will inevitably come at
the expense of shareholders.' Mr Michael Padley at Strauss Turnbull is more
optimistic, but believes the deal, combined with cuts in interest rates to
single figures in the next two years, will bring Rosehaugh into play - with
MEPC and Hammerson tipped as possible predators.
Once again, utilities suffered in sympathy with the declining fortunes of
the government. Almost all the water companies were weak with Anglian (off 3
at 326p) and Severn Trent (off 5 1/2 at 319 1/2 p) being among the bigger
losers. The Electricity Package fell Pounds 45 to Pounds 2,493.
Profit-taking in Midland Bank saw the shares off 17 at 343p.
Buyers in the US lent support to Glaxo which picked up 8 to 764p. The shares
have been sold heavily on the worries of a French investigation into the
pharmaceuticals company's marketing policy. They have also suffered from
sinking below a perceived support level of 770p.
Consumer products and healthcare group Reckitt &amp; Colman slipped 10 to 674p.
The group which reports its 1991 profits on Tuesday is expected to come up
with very little growth at the earnings per share level and profits of
between Pounds 250m to Pounds 265m, up from Pounds 235m last year.
Amusement machine and nursing home group Kunick issued a statement over its
the performance of its shares - which have declined by almost a half in over
a week - denying any knowledge of the reason why. Talk in the market was
concern over trading conditions in the gaming machine business. The shares
rallied before steadying to 6 1/2 p in turnover of 2.3m.
Nervous selling ahead of the results due this week took 9 off Kingfisher
which closed at 466p. Elsewhere among retail stores, GUS was weak, finally
23 off at 1,460p although the shares are a thin market. Marks &amp; Spencer
slipped 8 to 302p on continued nervousness over the outlook for consumer
spending.
Booker, the food and agricultural products group, turned easier with the
market as traders took a cautious line ahead of the trading results due at
mid-week. The shares lost 16 to 427p.
However, many other leading stocks in the food manufacturing sector held up
well as some brokerage houses argued that they are strong enough to resist
recessionary pressures and good buys for the economic recovery phase - when
it sets in.
United Biscuit a penny better at 407p were sustained by bid speculation,
while Cadbury Schweppes, 3 up at 437p improved as investors absorbed the
details of the Pounds 188m Mexican purchase, for which a Pounds 145m share
placing is intended. Rank Hovis McDougall held steady at 217p but Tate &amp;
Lyle at 418p lost 5 in late trading.
But the food supermarket groups, regarded as closer to the front line in the
consumer spending contest, lacked confidence. Kwik Save, finally 12 of at
544p saw some selling pressure and Tesco, 2 off at 245p shaded lower.
Among the regional brewers, Morland had another active session but, in the
absence of developments after the bid speculation of the previous session,
the shares ended 12 down at 458p. Devenish, suggested by some as a potential
suitor, showed no change at 233p.
Guinness up 2 at 558p edged higher at the close, reflecting a move to
quality, according to some analysts. However, both Allied-Lyons down 8 at
608p and Whitbread 12 lower at 403p shared in the general downturn in
equities.
Speculation that Luxembourg-based group Minorco may launch a takeover bid
boosted Tarmac for the second day running. The shares rose 8 to 146p, with a
strong turnover of 9.8m shares giving some credence to the talk.
Bid talk also spilled over into Pilkington which gained 6 to 126p.
TI Group added 10 to 653p, rounding off a positive week, as investors again
saw it as a safe stock in an uncertain trading period.
Industrial conglomerate Lonrho, talked up all week on bid speculation, lost
6 to 102p on profit-taking.
Speciality chemicals group Laporte continued its slide, losing 14 to 550p
ahead of the placing of its stake by Solvay of Belgium. However volume was
low and the fall was prompted more by marketmakers reducing their prices
than by genuine selling.
Courtaulds remained firm on the back of a series of presentations.
Yesterday, it was the turn of institutions in Scotland. The shares rose 5 to
539p.
NEW HIGHS AND LOWS FOR 1991/92
NEW HIGHS (26).
BRITISH FUNDS (1) Tr. 3pc 1992, AMERICANS (10) Chase Manhattan, Chrysler,
Dana Corp., Dun &amp; Bradstreet, Eaton, Echlin Inc., Ford Motor, Honeywell,
Ingersoll-Rand, Sear Roebuck, BREWERS &amp; DISTILLERS (1) Guinness 5 3/4 pc
Prf., BUILDING MATERIALS (1) Kalon, BUSINESS SERVICES (1) ISS-Intl. Service
Sys. B, ELECTRICALS (2) Chemring Cv. Prf., China Light, ELECTRONICS (1)
Hewlett-Packard, ENGINEERING GENERAL (2) TI, Weir, FOOD RETAILING (2)
Iceland Frozen, Park, INSURANCE COMPOSITE (1) Amer. General, INVESTMENT
TRUSTS (2) Govett Atlantic, World Fund Wrrnts., MOTORS (1) Bletchley, MINES
(1) MIM.
NEW LOWS (75).
BRITISH FUNDS (8) Tr. 13 1/2 pc 1992, Tr. 13 3/4 pc 1993, Tr. 14 1/2 pc
1994, Tr. 9 3/4 pc 2002 C, Tr. 8 1/2 pc 2007 A, Tr. 9pc 2012, Tr. 2 1/2 pc
IL 2020, Tr. 2 1/2 pc IL 2024, BANKS (1) Anglo Irish, BREWERS &amp; DISTILLERS
(1) Macallan-Glenlivet, BUILDING MATERIALS (1) Johnston, BUSINESS SERVICES
(1) Gardiner, CHEMICALS (2) Anglo Utd., Sutcliffe Speakman, CONTRACTING &amp;
CONSTRUCTION (5) Bellwinch, Campbell &amp; Armstrong, Higgs &amp; Hill, McLaughlin &amp;
Harvey, Wescol, ELECTRICITY (1) Scottish Hydro, ENGINEERING AEROSPACE (1)
ML, ENGINEERING GENERAL (4) Clayton Son, Fenner, MS Intl., West Inds., FOOD
MANUFACTURING (1) Carr's Milling, HOTELS &amp; LEISURE (1) Kunick, INSURANCE
BROKERS (1) Heath (CE), INSURANCE COMPOSITE (1) Baltica, INVESTMENT TRUSTS
(7) City of Oxford Inc., Drayton Blue Chip, M &amp; G Inc. Package Units, M &amp; G
Second Cap., Scott. Natl. Wrrnts., St David's Inc., Turkey Tst., MEDIA (6)
Allied Radio, Do. 8pc 2001, Clarke Hooper, Colorgraphic, Holmes Marchant,
Thames TV, MERCHANT BANKS (1) Kleinwort Benson, MISCELLANEOUS (4) Business
Tech., Eurocopy, Gestetner, WSP, OIL &amp; GAS (8) Brabant Res., British Borneo,
Cairn Energy, Caspen Oil, Kelt Energy, Premier Cons., Ramco Oil, Sceptre
Res., OTHER INDUSTRIAL MATERIALS (1) OMI Intl., PACKAGING, PAPER &amp; PRINTING
(1) Tinsley Robor, PROPERTY (11) British Land, Dencora, Derwent Valley,
Ests. &amp; General, Helical Bar, Land Secs., MEPC, Mowat, Regalian, Slough
Ests. 8 1/4 pc Prf., Smith (J), STORES (1) Austin Reed, TELEPHONE NETWORKS
(2) British Telecom P/P, GN Great Nordic, TEXTILES (2) Jacques Vert,
Youghal, TRANSPORT (1) Turnbull Scott, MINES (2) Beatrix, Waverley Mining
Finance.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1963</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJABQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / London Stock Exchange: Gloomy close to the equity account
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERRY BYLAND, UK Stock Market Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE LATEST statistics on domestic inflation did nothing yesterday to revive
confidence in the UK stock market on the final day of the Budget trading
account which has seen the FT-SE Index fall by about 3 per cent. A market
increasingly upset by a closely-run election campaign will wait nervously
for announcement on Sunday of a list of important public opinion polls.
The UK annualised inflation rate of 4.1 per cent in February was a shade
below the most optimistic forecasts in the City of London, and undercut
lingering hopes for a reduction in UK base rates.
A nervous trading session ended with hefty selling of the March future
contract on the FT-SE, reportedly by Goldman Sachs, which left the future
again at a discount to the underlying cash market. This checked a late rally
in the stock market itself and the FT-SE Index closed 11 points down at
2,456.6.
The stock market was unimpressed by the fall in UK inflation to below German
levels because, as one market economist commented, 'the City knows that the
two headline rates are not comparable.' There was concern at the news that
German public sector wage negotiations had broken down, but the stock market
remained focused on domestic political considerations.
The market opened firmly, helped technically by completion of a large
trading programme involving about 300 of the smaller, non-Footsie stocks;
Goldman Sachs was also said to have been the house involved in the deals,
which were both buy and sell operations.
However, with the future still moving nervously, the stock market soon
stalled with a gain of eight points, and slipped back to overnight levels.
When the future was sold heavily in the afternoon, the Footsie Index briefly
fell below the 2,550 mark, touching 2,446.9. There was little substance
behind the final rally which reduced the day's fall from 13 Footsie points
to 11.
Seaq volume improved to 587.8m shares from Thursday's 485.5m as traders
sought to close share positions which have cost them dearly over the past
two weeks. On Thursday, retail, or customer, business in equities was worth
Pounds 1bn, indicating that the big institutions have been reshuffling
portfolios in the wake of the Budget.
At Strauss Turnbull, Mr Ian Harnett pointed out that since the Budget, the
UK market has lost the equivalent of over Pounds 2bn, raising the
possibility that election uncertainty could once again bring the economic
recovery to a standstill.
'A high price to pay to vote,' he comments.
Retail, or customer, volume in equities fell sharply after Budget Day and as
the election campaigns opened but has now rallied.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1964</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJABPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Appointments: Non-executive directors
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
As a result of a reorganisation of responsibilities at County NatWest, Derek
Wanless has resigned from the board of LOMBARD NORTH CENTRAL and Bernard
Horn has taken his place.
*****
Chris Masters and Lawrence Urquhart at SCOTTISH WIDOWS.
*****
David Haggett, senior partner of Evershed Wells and Hind, and chairman of
the Heart of England appeal to send athletes to the Barcelona Olympics, as
chairman of EXCALIBUR AIRWAYS.
*****
Dominic Shorthouse at LWT (HOLDINGS).
*****
Philip Ling at JAMES WILKES.
*****
Timothy Salitt, 57, former deputy chairman of the Export Guarantees Advisory
Council and a past president of the British Electro Technical and Allied
Manufacturers' Association, who left the Hawker Siddeley board in 1990, is
to become chairman of ML HOLDINGS on the retirement of Sir Peter Horsley.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1965</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJABOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / London Stock Exchange: Equity Futures and Options Trading
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PRICE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   DISAPPOINTING economic statistics and a lack of buyers
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
as a result of political uncertainty - pushed the futures market back to a
discount to the cash market in fairly thin trading, writes Christopher
Price.
The March FT-SE contract opened up at 2,476, but soon slipped several
points. Then, independent traders, some caught in short positions, helped
squeeze March to what turned out to be the high point of the day at 2,479.
Lack of demand saw it drift away and by mid-morning March was trading around
the 2,459-level. Goldman Sachs then sold some 600 lots in the 2,451-4 range
which pulled the contract down. Slightly disappointing UK inflation figures
and German pay settlement news hit the short sterling and gilt markets,
which in turn further knocked the March contract. A brief rally was not
sustained in a featureless afternoon's trading. March closed at 2,544, down
27 on the previous session, and at a discount of some 7 points to its
4-point fair value premium to cash. Volume was 6,552.
In the traded options market, Asda was the top stock, with nearly 14,000
lots traded out of a total of 38,887. This was followed by British Steel and
Cable and Wireless.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1966</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJABNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Commodities (Week in the Markets): Gold price sinks to
six-year low
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD MOONEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GOLD'S TARNISHED image suffered further this week as its priced sagged to
the lowest level for six years.
A major blow came on Monday when the London bullion market price fell below
Dollars 342 a troy ounce, which many traders had seen as the last line of
defence. 'It is very worrying,' said Mr Michael Spriggs, analysts at the SG
Warburg Securities financial services group. 'Chartists say there is no real
support for the price below Dollars 342. The price could go all the way down
to Dollars 325 and I can't see what would push it back over Dollars 350 in
the near term.'
Persistent selling, some of it suspected to be on behalf of an eastern
European central bank, pushed the price below Dollars 336 an ounce later in
the week, before it was lifted yesterday to Dollars 339.05 an ounce, down
Dollars 7.95 on the week, in what one New York dealer described as 'an
anaemic rally'.
One excuse for the market's weakness was the absence of most Middle Eastern
operators during Ramadan, the Islamic fasting month. 'The were no buyers
when people began bailing out,' said Mr Wiktor Bielski, analyst at Carr
Kitcat &amp; Aitken, part of the Banque Indosuez group. 'The price could just
keep going down.'
The possibility of a 'No' vote in the South African reform referendum acted
as a steadying influence on the market in the early part of the week. But
the announcement on Wednesday of a big majority in favour of reform was
followed by a modest rally in the gold price.
For platinum, however, the referendum result was unequivocally bearish.
South African mines last year accounted for three-quarters of world platinum
supply outside the former eastern bloc countries, and there had been fears
that disruption would follow if the vote had gone against further reform.
At the London bullion market the platinum price, which had already lost
ground, responded with an immediate fall of nearly Dollars 7 to Dollars 349
an ounce and later in the week slipped to Dollars 346.25 an ounce. A
substantial rally was staged yesterday, however, and the price was fixed in
the afternoon at Dollars 352.35 an ounce, down Dollars 6.65 on balance.
Dealers said signs of recovery in the US motor industry were steadying
platinum, the main use for which is in exhaust-cleaning catalytic
converters.
Base metals markets had a quiet week at the London Metal Exchange, the main
bright spots being gains for aluminium and lead.
Traders attributed cash aluminium's Dollars 15 rise on the week to Dollars
1,297.50 a tonne to US speculative buying. It came despite a continued
build-up in LME warehouse stocks of the metal and news from Moscow that the
Russian authorities had given way to producers' demands for the scrapping of
export duties on aluminium and requirements that part of hard currency
export receipts be sold to the Russian central bank. That was 'an indication
that the flood gates are about to open again', said Mr Angus MacMillan,
research manager at Billiton-Enthoven Metals, part of the Royal Dutch/Shell
group. Exports from the former Soviet Union, which were largely responsible
for the unprecedented rise in LME aluminium stocks last year, had slowed
considerably following the imposition of the duties and the foreign exchange
requirements.
Lead prices were buoyed by news of a planned 25-day maintenance shut-down at
Nuova Samim's smelter at Port Vesme, Sardinia, and continuing production
problems at the Treca smelter in Yugoslavia. The cash price ended the week
Pounds 9.25 higher at Pounds 307 a tonne.
In the nickel market the bullish implications of a strike at Western Mining
Corporation's Kambalda mine in Australia were outweighed by concern at talk
of fresh Russian deliveries further swelling LME warehouse stocks. The cash
price closed yesterday at Dollars 7,375 a tonne, down Dollars 70 on the
week.
The London Futures and Options Exchange's robusta coffee market made further
ground this week in response to improving hopes that Brazil would take a
positive role in attempts to revive the International Coffee Organisation's
export quota system. It emerged on Wednesday night that the Brazilian coffee
industry's private sector - including growers, processors and exporters -
had passed to the government proposals for a new international coffee pact
with economic clauses.
This helped to encourage a rise that left the May futures price Dollars 33
up on the week at Dollars 878 a tonne.
 ---------------------------------
LME WAREHOUSE STOCKS
(As at Thursday's close)
 ---------------------------------
tonnes
Aluminium  +10,025 to 1,153,975
Copper        +200 to   303,300
Lead          -850 to   133,475
Nickel        +540 to    25,068
Zinc        +1,025 to   215,300
Tin           -120 to    12,015
 ---------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1967</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJABMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Appointments: The intensity of saving an acre of rain-forest
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Geraldine Sharpe-Newton, who has hitherto communicated on behalf of the
visual media on both sides of the Atlantic, has effected a sharp career
switch to become director of communications for the UK arm of the World Wide
Fund For Nature (WWF).
An American, she worked as director of information services at CBS News in
New York for three years 'handling the transition after anchor-man Walter
Cronkite left', before she moved to London, where she was with ITN for eight
years, first as head of public affairs, then head of corporate relations.
'I decided it was time to give something back to the environment. Of all
possible sorts of organisation (as employers) I had never thought about
charities, But I answered an ad, and it was a total fluke.'
Well, perhaps not exactly a fluke. Last year her long-time companion was one
of the CBS team imprisoned in Iraq - and later released - for 40 days almost
from the beginning of the Gulf War. 'It was a catalyst for change,' she says
mildly of the experience.
Hence, at 47 and with her two children grown-up, she decided that 'saving an
acre of rain forest means much more than assembling a set of press
clippings'.
New to the world of charities, she professes to have been 'stunned at the
overall level of expertise, and the discipline of the organisation'.
As part of a big restructuring at WWF, she has taken up a newly created
post, and is one of the seven-strong directorate determining strategy for
the UK. 'Our message has changed; we started as a species organisation, but
that has grown as we realised we had to look at the whole habitat, the whole
environment.'
Just returned from a conference in Kyoto on trade and endangered species,
she says in satisfied tones: 'It is probably the most intense work I have
ever done.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1968</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJABLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Foreign Exchanges: Dollar breaches new barrier
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NEIL BUCKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE DOLLAR broke out of its recent narrow band, breaching DM1.68 in brisk
late trading after chipping away at the barrier all day, writes Neil
Buckley.
Dealers said the market had been daunted by rumours of a large sell order at
DM1.6780. These orders were either filled or taken out, and the dollar
suddenly surged through this level in late afternoon.
It closed at around DM1.6825/35, after an Asian close of DM1.6725/32, and at
Y134.40/50, from Y133.71.
The rise surprised many dealers who had predicted that the dollar would
spend the next week or two in a consolidative phase, restricted to the
DM1.6350-DM1.6720 range.
However, determined buying by a handful of speculators, notably a south-east
Asian central bank and a Middle East investor, sparked off a rally. This was
backed by a strong Philadelphia Fed survey of business confidence, which
leapt from -0.9 to +18.9.
The dollar was also strengthened by comments from Mr John Laware, the Fed
governor, who said he was satisfied by the current level of the dollar
against the yen. This contrasted with comments in January that a stronger
yen level of around Y120 was needed to restrain the huge Japanese trade
surplus.
Now, however, the Fed does not seem worried enough about the yen level for
it to help the Bank of Japan with intervention.
'Given the recent data, we could see a further spurt by the dollar next
week, especially if the figures are good,' said Mr Gerard Lyons, chief
economist at DKB International.
'Everything does point to a US recovery in the second half-year, although
this might not be as strong as the market expects.'
In Asia, the dollar had been very steady in thin and uneventful trading. The
Tokyo markets were closed for a national holiday.
The D-mark was generally mixed. It rose against the Swiss franc to
SFr0.9100, from a previous SFr0.9070. Dealers said more intervention by the
Swiss National Bank - for the third time this month - was possible on Monday
if the SFr0.9100 barrier was breached.
It fell, however, against the French franc, despite worries about this
weekend's regional elections in France, in which the ruling socialists are
expected to do badly.
It also fell against sterling, although dealers said this had more to do
with the stronger dollar than any improvement in sterling sentiment.
Sterling closed at around DM2.8619 from a previous DM2.8573, and improved
within the ERM to 47 per cent of permitted swing below its central rate,
from 50 per cent.
Against the dollar, sterling fell to Dollars 1.7007, from Dollars 1.7120.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1969</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJABKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Money Markets: Rates rise further
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE UK money market was distinctly nervous yesterday before this weekend's
batch of six opinion polls, and rates rose still further.
Yesterday's poll of marginal seats in London which pointed to a hung
parliament - the worst possible outcome as far as the market is concerned -
did not augur well for the rest of the weekend. The retail price figures
were also a disappointment to some, simply holding the previous inflation
rate, rather than showing a decrease.
The market continued to maintain a stance that was increasingly discounting
the possibility of higher interest rates after the election.
Interbank rates firmed sharply towards the close, with the key three-month
rate up  1/8 at 10 15/16 -10 13/16 per cent. The six-month to one-year rates
were also up  1/8 to 11 1/16 -10 15/16 , and even the one-month rate was 10
3/4 -10 5/8 , expensive for a 10 1/2 per cent base rate.
The June sterling contract opened up six basis points at 89.11, but soon
slid down to 88.95.
The Bank of England did its best to avoid unnecessary strains on money costs
by allowing the market all possible means to relieve a large shortage,
forecast initially at around Pounds 1.15bn.
In early operations, it purchased bills totalling Pounds 517m, made up of
Pounds 11m of band 1 bank bills at 10 3/8 per cent, Pounds 2m of band 3
local authority bills at 10 3/16 per cent, and Pounds 364m band 3 and 4 bank
bills at 10 3/16 and 10 5/32 per cent respectively, plus Pounds 140m for
resale to the market on April 3 and 6 at 10 7/16 per cent.
At midday, the forecast was revised upwards to Pounds 1.2bn, and the bank
purchased a further Pounds 319m of band 1 and 3 bank bills and band 4
treasury bills. The shortage was revised down to around Pounds 1.05bn in the
afternoon, with the Bank providing late assistance of Pounds 230m, to take
the day's total to Pounds 1,066m.
Overnight rates, however, were still relatively firm at 10 3/4 -10 1/2 per
cent for much of the session, rising to 11-10 7/8 per cent in the afternoon.
German call money rates firmed owing to the heavy draining of liquidity from
March tax payments, but were expected to ease back on Monday.
Traders quoted call money at around 9.65/70 per cent, up from 9.60 per cent
on Thursday and just below the 9.75 Lombard rate.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1970</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJABJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / International Company News: Moulinex climbs 11% to FFr149m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MOULINEX, one of Europe's leading makers of small household equipment,
yesterday reported an 11.2 per cent rise in net profits for 1991, writes
William Dawkins in Paris.
Reported profits rose to FFr149m (Dollars 26m) from FFr134m on sales up to
FFr8.35bn from FFr5.96bn, including the first contribution from Krups, the
German producer of coffee machines and blenders which Moulinex bought in
January last year.
As expected, the financing costs of the Krups takeover meant the German
acquisition diluted Moulinex's earnings in its first year, though the French
group said Krups was profitable before interest charges.
Stripping out Krups, net earnings rose by 14.9 per cent to FFr154m while
sales increased 12 per cent to FFr6.68bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1971</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJABIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / International Company News: BA joins German banks in deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS, Aerospace Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH Airways has, with three German partner banks, acquired Delta Air, a
German commuter airline, to consolidate its position in the domestic German
air travel market.
Delta Air, which has no connection with Delta Air Lines, the US carrier,
will form the operating base of Deutsche BA, the joint airline company set
up by BA last year with Commerzbank, Berliner Bank and Bayerische
Vereinsbank.
The three banks own 51 per cent of Deutsche BA, with the UK carrier
controlling the remaining 49 per cent. The company was set up as a vehicle
to enable BA to maintain its presence in the domestic German market.
BA has traditionally had a strong presence in the German market since the
second world war with its Internal German Services (IGS), based in Berlin.
But following German unification two years ago, it has been forced by the
German authorities to run down its IGS activities.
IGS operates 92 scheduled flights a week on five routes from Berlin but will
have to cease all its operations by the summer of 1993.
To continue operating in the German market, the UK carrier had to establish
a new airline majority owned by German interests. 'Delta Air will help us
build up the operating base for the new German company,' BA said yesterday.
The UK carrier did not disclose how much Deutsche BA was paying for the
commuter carrier, which operates 10 turbo-propeller aircraft including 9
Saab 340s and one Dornier 228.
But Deutsche BA plans to acquire an unspecified number of Boeing 737-300
twin-engined airliners to develop its German network.
Delta Air carried 225,000 passengers last year on domestic German routes as
well as serving international destinations including Brussels, Zurich, Paris
and Basle.
The commuter carrier based at Friedrichshafen by Lake Constance was set up
in Germany by Crossair, the Swiss regional carrier.
The Deutsche BA acquisition coincides with moves by Lufthansa, the German
flag carrier, to consolidate its own position in its domestic market.
Lufthansa has taken an option to acquire up to half of the voting capital of
Aero Lloyd, the German charter airline.
Aero Lloyd is understood to have also had discussions with BA and Delta Air
Lines.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1972</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJABHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / International Company News: Nestle says Perrier fight may
end in a few weeks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN RODGER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ZURICH
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
NESTLE, the Swiss foods group, said its bitter takeover battle with Italy's
Agnelli family for Source Perrier, the French mineral water and cheese
group, could be resolved within the next few weeks.
'Now that the legal situation has been cleared and that some signals have
come from the other side, I would not exclude that the resolution of this
matter could well happen in the next few weeks,' a Nestle spokesman said
yesterday.
He was responding to a newspaper report quoting an Agnelli official as
saying: 'We have seen where the political will lies in France, and there is
not much point in fighting that.' The Nestle spokesman said this was one of
many indications that the Agnelli camp was thinking that the time had come
to change their approach.
In late January, Nestle, the world's largest food group, bid FFr1,475 per
share for Perrier, valuing the company at FFr13.42bn (Dollars 2.36bn).
The bid countered an attempt by Agnelli companies to gain control of Perrier
indirectly by buying companies that held large blocks of Perrier shares.
Since then, Nestle has won court battles in France aimed at obstructing the
Agnelli approach.
Also, the French stock market authorities have ruled that the Agnelli group
must make an offer to all Perrier shareholders, not just to a few.
Meanwhile, Nestle reported yesterday that its consolidated net profit rose
8.7 per cent last year to SFr2.47bn on sales up 8.9 per cent to SFr50.5bn.
The directors have recommended a dividend increase to SFr215 from SFr200 per
share, and to SFr43 from SFr40 per bearer participation certificate.
The group said that in spite of worsening economic conditions in many
countries, sales volume grew by 4 per cent. The trading margin showed a
slight improvement to 10.1 per cent.
The results were close to analysts' expectations in most respects, but there
was apparently disappointment that the group did not announce plans to split
its shares.
That, according to one Zurich analyst, was the reason the bearer shares
jumped SFr100 on the statement to SFr9,620, but then settled back almost
immediately to SFr9,550.
Nestle said it intended to split its bearer and registered shares, 10 for
one, as soon as possible. A Swiss law permitting such a change comes into
effect on July 1, but the group was still clarifying the process it had to
follow to comply with the law.
No decision had been reached on converting the participation certificates
into shares or on consolidating the capital into a single class of shares.
The group said neither issue was urgent now that there was no difference in
the rights attaching to its two classes of shares.
Mr Ramon Masip, executive vice-president and head of the regional management
for Europe, was promoted to president of the general management group in the
food sector. However, Mr Helmut Maucher, remains chairman and chief
executive officer. Mr Maucher, who is 64, has made clear that he has no
plans to retire.
Lex, Page 24
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1973</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJABGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / World Commodities Prices: Spices
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Most spice prices remained steady except for cloves, which came down rapidly
after export duties were abolished in Madagascar, reports Man-producten.
Early this week Madagascar cloves were offered at between Dollars 1,325 and
Dollars 1,350 a tonne cif, but by the end of the week sellers were looking
for bids at Dollars 1,125 to Dollars 1,150. Cassia: some demand from
factories which are starting to cover their autum needs. Pimento: steady,
Dollars 2,450 ex-warehouse Rotterdam. Another official price increase
expected. Small lots Mexico pimento are offered at Dollars 2,350 cif for
immediate delivery. Market for chillies remains hot.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1974</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJABFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / International Company News: Remy lines up a world class list
 -The drinks group's expansion strategy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP RAWSTORNE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The restructuring of Remy Cointreau, the family-controlled French cognac,
champagne and liqueurs company, to be completed shortly with a public
offering of 20.8 per cent of shares, will consolidate Remy's position among
the leading international drinks groups.
Remy will emerge as a diversified drinks business with turnover of FFr6.5bn
(Dollars 1.15bn) and profits of FFr214m. Some 20 years ago, the original
Remy Martin cognac company had turnover of FFr72m and profits of FFr4.5m.
Rivalry between the related Heriard Dubreuil and Cointreau families, which
has hampered the development of the group, was resolved two years ago when
Mr Max Cointreau's family sold its stakes in both Remy Martin and Cointreau
to Grand Metropolitan, the UK drinks, food and retailing group.
The Pounds 100m deal enabled the Dubreuil family to merge the Remy and
Cointreau businesses - and the group will now buy back the GrandMet holding
for Pounds 120m (Dollars 207.6m) over the next three years.
The deal also greatly simplifies the maze of interlocking interests which
has characterised the group's structure.
After the public share offer, the Dubreuil family's holding company, Orpar,
will have 51 per cent of Remy Cointreau's equity. The rest of the shares
will be publicly held via stock market listings in Paris and Frankfurt.
Marc and Francois Heriard Dubreuil, the brothers who run the group, will
oversee three operating divisions - covering cognac, champagne, and wines
and spirits - and one of the most extensive, wholly-owned international
distribution networks.
'The company that controls its distribution, controls its independence,'
says Francois Heriard Dubreuil. The strength of the network built up by Remy
has been a crucial factor in its development.
Despite the restricting family squabbles, it has enabled the brothers in
recent years to extend their drinks portfolio from its cognac base by adding
Piper Heidsieck and Charles Heidsieck champagnes to their existing
prestigious champagne house, Krug.
They have acquired Mount Gay rum from Barbados, St James rum from
Martinique, and Galliano liqueurs from Italy.
Distribution of third-party brands includes Absolut vodka, Campari bitters,
Jim Beam bourbon, Domecq sherries, Drambuie liqueurs, and French, Italian,
Californian, and Australian wines.
Towards the end of 1990, the brothers tied up a marketing and distribution
deal with Highland Distilleries, maker of The Famous Grouse, the UK's second
best-selling Scotch whisky, and acquired a 26 per cent stake in
Macallan-Glenlivet, another Scotch distiller. Export volume sales of Famous
Grouse rose last year by 16 per cent against an overall industry decline of
3 per cent.
Following the example of Guinness and LVMH, the relationship is cemented
with cross-shareholdings. Highland holds convertible bonds equivalent to a
30 per cent share in Orpar, and Orpar may raise its present 2 per cent stake
in Highland to 10 per cent.
Wines and spirits now account for 48 per cent of Remy Cointreau's turnover,
cognac for 40 per cent, and champagne for 8 per cent.
The network, into which the distribution of Cointreau will be fully
integrated over the next two months, gives an even geographical spread to
the business. Last year, France accounted for 25 per cent of turnover, the
rest of Europe 35 per cent, Asia/Pacific for 24 per cent and North America
for 17 per cent.
Few potential customers are neglected - distribution even reaches into the
Pacific islands of Guam and Saipan to target Japanese holidaymakers.
The group is now looking towards eastern Europe. 'St Petersburg was our
biggest market at the turn of the century,' Marc Heriard Dubreuil muses.
More than half the group's 3,000 employees are engaged in sales and
marketing, and the business is tightly focused on premium quality and price.
The Dubreuil brothers have no immediate plans to acquire more brands. The
FFr1.2bn expected from the public share offer will be used to reduce
borrowings presently standing at FFr7bn.
Development of the existing drinks portfolio and more effective use of
distribution is expected to increase earnings per share by more than 20 per
cent this year and by about the same amount next year. Profits are forecast
to rise this year to FFr261m from FFr214m, and to FFr313m in 1993.
The brothers, who have long been concentrating their cognac business into
the VSOP and higher categories, believe firmly in the reliability of the
long-term trend for consumers everywhere to 'drink less, but drink better'.
Marc says: 'We are selling products which are perceived as luxuries but
which a growing number of people can afford. A bottle of Remy Martin VSOP is
less expensive than a tankful of petrol.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1975</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJABEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / International Company News: St Paul Cos may float part of
Nuveen unit
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE St Paul Companies, the US property/casualty insurer, yesterday said it
might make an initial public offering of a minority stake in Nuveen, writes
Karen Zagor in New York.
Chicago-based Nuveen is the oldest and largest investment banking and asset
management firm specialising in the underwriting, trading and marketing of
municipal bonds and tax-free investment products. Its assets under
management increased four-fold in the last five years while annual sales
doubled.
The St Paul Companies said yesterday if a decision is made to go ahead with
an offering, it will be announced in the next few weeks.
Minnesota-based St Paul Companies also owns Minet Holdings of the UK.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1976</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJABDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Economic Diary
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
TODAY: Independence referendum in Tatarstan. Mr Helmut Kohl, German
chancellor, pays two-day visit to the United States for talks with Mr George
Bush, US president.
TOMORROW: French regional elections. General elections in Thailand.
Postponed general election takes place in Albania.
MONDAY: Food facts (fourth quarter). Balance of payments, current account
and overseas trade figures (February). European Community environment
ministers meet in Brussels. Financial Times holds two-day conference
'International Packaging and the Environment' in London.
TUESDAY: Capital expenditure and stockbuilding (fourth quarter - revised).
Company liquidity (fourth quarter). South Korean general elections.
Conference on Security and Co-operation in Europe follow-up meeting begins
in Helsinki (until March 26). Mr Chris Patten, the Conservative Party
chairman, speaks at American Chamber of Commerce lunch. Connecticut
presidential primary.
WEDNESDAY: Building societies monthly figures (February). New construction
orders (January - provisional). US durable goods orders (February). Close of
nominations for general election candidates.
THURSDAY: Insurance and pensions (fourth quarter). New vehicle registrations
(February). Energy trends (January). US jobless claims; real gross domestic
product (final release - fourth quarter) 1991; import/export prices
(February). International Court of Justice in The Hague holds hearings in
Libya's case against Britain and the US concerning the dispute over their
demand for extradition of Libyans charged with blowing up a Pan Am jet over
Lockerbie in 1988. European Community tranport ministers meet in Brussels.
Scottish Liberal Democrats annual conference in Inverness.
FRIDAY: Confederation of British Industry publishes trends enquiry (March).
US personal income (February). Heads of Commonwealth of Independent States
meet in Alma-Ata. 1992 consumer congress at Leicester University (until
Sunday).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1977</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJABCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Perry tumbles 47% to Pounds 2.23m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PERRY GROUP, one of the UK's largest motor dealers, has maintained its
dividend in spite of a 47 per cent fall in pre-tax profits to Pounds 2.23m
for the year to December 31.
Mr Richard Allan, chairman, said the 9p dividend - which has been maintained
since 1988 - was just covered. 'We are confident that when the economy
improves profits will improve significantly,' he said. Mr Allan added,
however, that so far there had been no signs of a pick up.
Losses in contract hire and new car sales clipped both profits and sales,
which fell by 8 per cent to Pounds 301.1m. The new car division had reversed
from a profit of Pounds 597,000 in 1990 to a loss of Pounds 233,000 last
year. Contract hire reported a Pounds 750,000 loss beacause a large number
of customers went into liquidation and returned fleet cars.
On the brighter side, Perry's remaining four divisions reported record
results. Used car profits - which account for about 23 per cent of the total
 -rose by 20 per cent, the parts division increased its contribution by 18
per cent, the body and parts operations by 14 per cent and the service
business by 4 per cent.
Mr Allan said Perry's had experienced mixed results from its seven Ford
dealerships, although the parts depot had performed well. Perry, which has a
total of 30 dealerships, claims about 3 per cent of Ford's UK sales.
During the year, the group spent Pounds 2.9m on new dealerships, including a
Nissan outlet. Mr Allan said that figure would be reduced to Pounds 1m in
1992. 'We are cutting back until we are happy the recession is behind us,'
he said.
Gearing rose from 24 per cent to 32 per cent, although the chairman said
1990's figure had been helped by a last minute property deal.
Earnings per share tumbled from 17.2p to 9.2p. The proposed final dividend
is maintained at 6.25p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1978</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJABBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Wilkes 66% lower at Pounds 2m after asset
write-down
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
JAMES WILKES, the engineering company fighting a hostile bid from Petrocon,
yesterday reported pre-tax profits down 66 per cent in 1991 after a large
exceptional write-down of assets to be sold.
Pre-tax profits fell from Pounds 5.61m to Pounds 1.89m but at the operating
level profits were only 5 per cent lower before the Pounds 2.76m exceptional
item.
The company is recommending a 5.25p final dividend, giving an unchanged 10p
for the year, even though earnings per share fell from 22.4p to 4.6p.
Mr Arthur Watt, Wilkes chairman, said the results were excellent given the
recession. The exceptionals related to the closure of the aviation business
and head office mansion.
Wilkes said its bankers, NM Rothschild, had written to Petrocon saying it
would withdraw a Pounds 7.25m credit line if the bid was successful.
Rothschild's corporate finance department is advising Wilkes but the bank
says its lending decision was made independently based on its lack of
knowledge of Petrocon.
A Petrocon adviser said the bidding company was prudent and that the
borrowings revealed by Wilkes in its defence document were exactly as
anticipated.
Petrocon said that its final offer, worth 151p a share and valuing Wilkes at
Pounds 27.5m, was generous, representing an historic earnings multiple of
33.
Wilkes also stepped up its attack on Petrocon's management and in particular
the record of Mr Colin Robinson, its chairman.
Wilkes said there was little evidence to suggest Mr Robinson could develop
businesses and that he had rarely held a company stewardship position for a
sustained period.
Mr Robinson said Wilkes had been selective in not highlighting his
management successes at GEC and Heron Corporation.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1979</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJABAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Nesco Investments edges up to Pounds 28,000
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Nesco Investments, the computer systems supplier, lifted pre-tax profits
from Pounds 22,000 to Pounds 28,000 for the half year to December 31 1991.
However, after tax of Pounds 16,000 and minorities of Pounds 12,000 the
company just broke even. Last time there were losses per share of 0.7p.
Turnover rose marginally to Pounds 2.87m (Pounds 2.79m).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1980</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAA9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Wm Bedford cuts loss to Pounds 210,000
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
William Bedford, the USM-quoted antique dealer, cut its pre-tax loss from
Pounds 259,000 to Pounds 210,000 for the 1991 year after an exceptional gain
on the sale of an asset.
However the Winchester-based company said that the underlying trend showed
no sign of recovery and a further loss was expected in the present six
months. The first two months had shown an improvement but that was compared
with the market depressed by the Gulf war.
Turnover for the year fell to Pounds 1.63m (Pounds 2.03m). The loss was
higher than it would have been because of the need to make further
provisions against the realisable value of slow moving stock. Losses per
share came out at 2.6p (4p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1981</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAA8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Martin Currie Euro net assets improve
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Net asset value per share of the Martin Currie European Investment Trust
rose from 282.8p to 297.2p over the 12 months ended February 28.
The improvement was due largely to a reduction from 52 per cent to 29 per
cent in exposure to the 'poor performing' Japanese stock market and an
increase from 13 per cent to 27 per cent in the trust's weighting in Hong
Kong.
Earnings declined to 1.1p (1.43p) and the dividend for the year is 0.4p
(0.75p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1982</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAA7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Fired Earth Tiles drops to Pounds 302,000
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
In what it described as the worst two years in living memory, Fired Earth
Tiles, the specialist tile retailer, saw pre-tax profits fall further from
Pounds 753,000 in 1990 to Pounds 302,000 last year.
Earnings per share fell from 8.56p to 3.58p, but the dividend is unchanged
at 4.025p with a second interim of 2.4p. While overall turnover was little
changed at Pounds 5.26m (Pounds 5.04m), sales from the Merchant Tiler shops,
selling less expensive tiles, doubled to Pounds 1.8m (Pounds 900,000), with
the average number of outlets rising from 6 to 10.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1983</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAA6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Kunick tries to stop shares slide
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Kunick, the amusement machine and nursing home group, yesterday tried to
stop the slide in its share price by announcing there has been no change of
circumstances since the company released its most recent profits warning two
weeks ago.
The shares, which have been under pressure since last October, fell from 8p
to 6.25p earlier this week. Yesterday they closed unchanged at 6.5p.
The company appears to be suffering from a general loss of institutional
support following its warning that interim profits to end-March will be
'substantially below' the Pounds 7.3m last time.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1984</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAA5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / UK Company News: James Halstead improves to Pounds 3.44m
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
In 'very tough trading conditions' James Halstead, the floor coverings,
weatherproof wear and trailers group, reported pre-tax profits of Pounds
3.44m for the half year to December 31. Profits last time were Pounds 3.34m.
man, said the core floor coverings business had maintained its share of UK
and export markets and had increased its profits.
As already indicated, Belstaff International continued to incur a loss and
Mr Clare said its closure should be completed by the year-end. An
extraordinary Pounds 3m will be included in the full-year accounts to cover
the estimated closure costs.
Earnings per share worked through at 15.56p (14.9p) and the interim dividend
is lifted from 4.25p to 4.5p.
Turnover edged ahead to Pounds 28.9m (Pounds 28.2m).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1985</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAA4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Sheafbank incurs Pounds 993,000 loss
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Sheafbank Property Trust, the property investment and financial services
group, ran up a loss of Pounds 992,778 pre-tax for the year to March 1991
after taking account of an exceptional provision of Pounds 950,000.
The delayed results compared with profits of Pounds 500,891 for the 1989-90
year. The exceptional item represented a provision against the carrying
value of the company's investments in financial services.
The delayed results were due to changes on the board which took effect
following the year-end and the inclusion of audited information on major
corporate investments. As a consequence, the directors are recommending that
the current accounting period should cover the 15 months to end-June 1992.
Losses per share emerged at 6.19p (earnings 2.48p). A final dividend of 0.1p
makes a 0.2p (0.75p) total.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1986</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAA3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Rosehaugh banks extend loans
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Rosehaugh, the property company with borrowings of Pounds 310m, yesterday
announced that its 26 banks had extended their loans until January 1994.
The debt restructuring followed the breach of its banking covenants at the
end of last year. The standstill agreement reached by the banks had to be
extended at the end of January.
The refinancing package has consolidated the existing facilities into one
master facility, to which Barclays Bank will be agent.
The company said it believed that the agreement represented a satisfactory
conclusion to the talks which began in late 1991.
Rosehaugh's shares rose from 6 3/4 p to 9 1/2 p after the announcement. The
share price of Stanhope, which has a joint venture with Rosehaugh rose from
24p to 27p. Rosehaugh Stanhope Developments, the joint venture, was not part
of the refinancing agreement.
Last December, Rosehaugh announced pre-tax losses of Pounds 227m for the
year to June 30.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1987</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAA2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Blue Circle Pounds 70m sale in S Africa
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
BLUE CIRCLE Industries, the cement and home products group, has sold its
42.3 per cent stake in a South African associate for Pounds 70m.
The purchaser is Murray &amp; Roberts, which has been BCI's joint venture
partner in the South African business since it acquired Darling &amp; Hodgson.
The two parties had been talking since November. BCI made the original
investment in 1913.
It said yesterday that it preferred to be a lead shareholderin its
investments and that the South African company would benefit from having one
shareholder in the driving seat.
The investment contributed Pounds 11m to BCI's operating profit and Pounds
7m to after-tax earnings in 1991, as well as a dividend stream of Pounds 3m.
Its carrying value at the December year-end was Pounds 33.8m.
The cash will initially help to reduce BCI's net debt, which stood at
roughly Pounds 300m before the transaction. Shareholders' funds at the
previous year-end were Pounds 949.6m, counting Pounds 90m of convertible
capital bonds as equity.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1988</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAA1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Hornby hit by consumer spending fall
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROLAND RUDD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HORNBY, the toy and sports boat manufacturer, yesterday reported a 45 per
cent fall in pre-tax profits before exceptionals, from Pounds 3.82m to
Pounds 2.09m, for the year to December 31 1991.
Last year's figures were restated following the reclassification of an
extraordinary item - Pounds 616,000 profit on disposal of land and buildings
 -as an exceptional item in accordance with the recent Accounting Standards
Board guidelines.
Although the fall in consumer spending affected both sides of the business,
Fletcher sports boats was worse hit, turning a Pounds 350,000 profit into a
Pounds 450,000 loss.
The company has appointed 100 more dealers in France and Spain to boost its
share of the European market.
Profits from toy sales, which account for the bulk of the company's turnover
of Pounds 32m (Pounds 39.5m), were only marginally down on the previous
year. The company is focusing on a new product range.
Mr Alan Cox, chief executive, said: 'This is a year for caution, not a year
for risks. We are going to concentrate on developing our existing businesses
instead of looking at further acquisitions.'
Net cash fell from Pounds 4.9m to Pounds 3.3m because a greater proportion
of sales occurred in November and December.
Earnings per share fell from 30.1p to 15.4p but the single final dividend is
unchanged at 9p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1989</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAA0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Berisford cancels rights as coffee rises
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAGGIE URRY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BERISFORD International, commodities and property group, has cancelled a
rights issue announced a month ago. Its shares rose 2p to 20 1/2 p.
The issue, which was to raise Pounds 14m net through the sale of loan stock,
would have allowed Berisford to provide further finance to Rayner Coffee
International, its 45 per cent owned coffee trading associate.
Mr Barry O'Connor, company secretary, said that the coffee price had risen
in recent weeks and RCI had closed its position on the terminal market,
meaning it was no longer exposed to margin calls. As a result the pressure
for the rights issue had been removed.
That allowed Berisford to cancel the issue when it found it impossible for
it, its banks and the underwriters to balance their interests.
Mr O'Connor said the cost of closing the terminal market position was
bearable by RCI. RCI was also negotiating the sale of some subsidiaries,
which may be agreed in the next few weeks, and had implemented staff cuts.
Berisford guarantees some of RCI's borrowings and has cut the maximum
exposure from Dollars 115m to Dollars 105m (Pounds 61m). At present RCI is
using Dollars 88m of this facility. The aim is to cut this further through
asset sales. Berisford said that once the RCI guarantee was removed
Berisford would 'be in a better position to implement a strategy for
acquisition and growth'.
Berisford has also renegotiated its own borrowing facilities. It now has a
facility from four banks which is 'sufficient for Berisford's ongoing
business requirements'. The facility runs until March 31 1993 and Berisford
has arranged more favourable terms.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1990</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAAZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Liberated Molins edges ahead
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MOLINS, the tobacco machinery and packaging manufacturer, yesterday unveiled
its first set of results since the exit of hostile shareholder Leucadia, to
show a 2 per cent rise in pre-tax profits to Pounds 15.5m for 1991.
The group, which has escaped five attempts in four years by hostile
shareholders to win control, managed the increase through shaving interest
costs by Pounds 300,000 to Pounds 3.3m. Operating profits were steady at
Pounds 15.6m on turnover up 13 per cent to Pounds 155m.
Mr Michael Orr, chairman, made only the most discreet of references to the
two-year attempt from the US financial conglomerate to win control.
'Leucadia is behind us now and we are enjoying the chance to concentrate on
the business,' he said. Leucadia shed its 48.4 per cent stake in Molins in
November after its proposal for seats on the board was defeated at an
extraordinary general meeting.
Molins rewarded shareholders with an increased final dividend of 9.75p (9p),
making a 12.75p (12p) total. Earnings rose from 36.9p to 37.3p.
The packaging machinery division increased trading profits from Pounds 2.9m
to Pounds 3.1m. The Langston business, one of the leading names in the US,
had increased its market share, the chairman said.
The tobacco machinery division, which represents two-thirds of group sales,
had come under pressure from its dependence on the lower margin Third World
business.
However, the weak result from the refurbishment of old machines had masked a
strong performance in the original equipment and spares business.
Molins also announced that it hoped to put proposals forward to pension fund
trustees aimed at unlocking the Pounds 38m surplus allowable by law. The
actual pension fund surplus as calculated by Molins actuaries is Pounds 90m,
and has been cited as the main reason for the past hostile bids. Last year
Molins received a Pounds 3.2m (same) net pension credit.
COMMENT
Molins is not the most exciting of stocks, leaving many to wonder why so
many bids. The pension surplus is perhaps the biggest reason, with further
unrealised potential in the company's Flexible Manufacturing Systems patent.
This has been the subject of litigation for several years, and now Molins is
merely awaiting judgment following the court hearing in January 1991. The
timing of that judgment is as uncertain as a London bus. Meanwhile, Molins
maintains its position as one of the top three tobacco machinery
manufacturers, and the packaging industry offers great scope for expansion
after the pension surplus is used to wipe out the already low gearing of 13
per cent. Profits are expected to creep up to Pounds 16m this year, for a
prospective p/e of 10. This looks undervalued, especially when the net asset
value per share of 408p is taken into consideration.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1991</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAAYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Canadian disposal for Hillsdown
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAGGIE URRY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Maple Leaf Foods, Hillsdown Holdings' Canadian subsidiary, has signed a sale
agreement for its edible oils division, which was originally negotiated last
spring. The sale will raise CDollars 105m (Pounds 51.2m). Hillsdown shares
rose 2p to 177p.
The buyer is CanAmera Foods, a joint venture between Central Soya of Canada,
a company within the Ferruzzi empire, and CSP Foods, a large oilseed crusher
and refiner based in western Canada. The deal has been passed by the
regulatory authorities.
Maple Leaf, 56 per cent owned by Hillsdown, the food processing company, put
the business on the market in November 1990. Hillsdown decided the business,
though profitable, was not a core activity.
Maple Leaf had net cash at the 1991 year end of CDollars 151m. It also
announced a joint venture with ConAgra of the US in flour milling and bakery
mixes which would give it greater access to the US market.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1992</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAAXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / UK Company News: US side takes toll on Attwoods
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DEPRESSED world metal prices that hit its US recycling plant left first half
profits at Attwoods, the international waste management company, virtually
static at Pounds 16.51m pre-tax.
The figure for the six months to January 31 compared with Pounds 16.47m
previously and was scored on the back of a 30 per cent rise in sales to
Pounds 168.3m.
Earnings per share fell from 5.07p to 4.27p. A same-again interim dividend
of 1.75p is being paid.
Mindis, the US recycling and reprocessing plant, was hit by falling metal
prices, particularly aluminium. A Dollars 6m pre-tax profit turned into a
Dollars 900,000 (Pounds 520,000) loss in the first half. That reduced
margins in the US, which accounts for over 70 per cent of sales, from 14 per
cent to 9.8 per cent.
The company had anticipated too much growth but had now cut overheads and
was showing signs of recovery, said Mr Ken Foreman, Attwoods's chairman.
Sales and operating profits in continental Europe doubled over the period
with Germany a particularly good performer. Demand for portable
accommodation units on long term rental outstripped expectations.
Mr Foreman said there was a large potential market in former East Germany
for temporary accommodation.
Margins in Germany remained at 19 per cent even though sales doubled.
In the UK, sales and profits rose and margins were maintained at about 7 per
cent. The eight council waste disposal contracts were not making good
profits although there was potential to improve margins, Mr Foreman said.
Gearing fell to 28 per cent after the deeply discounted rights issue in
December. However, the interest charge more than doubled to Pounds 1.96m as
a result of considerably higher debt that triggered the need for the rights
issue.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1993</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAAWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Time, gentlemen, to unravel the knot -
Morland bid talks pose a heady problem
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP RAWSTORNE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NEWS THAT Morland, the Thames Valley brewer, is talking to potential bidders
has focused attention on one of the most complex knots yet to be unravelled
in the government's efforts to loosen the national brewers' hold on pub
retailing.
Whitbread, the national brewer and retailer, and the associated Whitbread
Investment Company hold substantial stakes in five regional brewers and pub
operators - Morland, Marston's, Brakspear, Devenish and Boddington.
Maintaining these ties threatens Whitbread's competitive position; breaking
them endangers the independence of the regionals.
Whitbread still has 1,500 pubs from its own estate to lease or sell during
the next seven months to comply with government orders.
But it could be forced to release another 1,000 pubs from exclusive beer
supplies because of the stakes it holds directly, and indirectly, through
its 49.9 per cent interest in WIC, in the five regionals.
Under the terms of the government orders, large brewery groups as well as
individual brewers owning more than 2,000 pubs must free half of the pubs
above that limit from tied beer supplies by November 1.
The orders define a large brewery group as the combination of any one
company with every other company in which it has a shareholding of 15 per
cent or more.
Whitbread's holdings in the regional brewers clearly put it at the head of
such a grouping. It has a direct stake of 27 per cent in Brakspear, the
Oxfordshire brewer, and an indirect stake of 21.8 per cent in Morland
through WIC. A combination of direct and indirect holdings gives it
effective interests of 21.6 per cent in Marston's and 16.8 per cent in
Boddington.
Unless these holdings are reduced to less than 15 per cent, Whitbread will
have to count the pubs owned by the four companies, more than 1,800 in
total, as part of its estate.
It would then have to free a further 900 of its own pubs from the tie to
satisfy the government orders.
Further complications stem from the Office of Fair Trading's view that a
second large brewery group exists with the Whitbread Investment Company at
its head, since WIC holds 28.9 per cent of Whitbread's shares.
WIC's 15.3 per cent stake in Devenish would then mean that Whitbread would
have to free another 190 pubs - equivalent to half the Devenish estate.
It seems unlikely that Whitbread will resolve the situation by freeing all
these additional pubs. The market for pubs remains in the doldrums; at one
London auction recently, only one of 19 lots was sold.
Disposal of an extra 1,000 pubs would also leave Whitbread with a tied
estate of a little over 3,000 pubs - less than three-quarters the size of
the estates of Allied-Lyons, Bass and IEL, the GrandMet/Courage joint
venture.
Changes in the shareholdings are thus inevitable - with WIC, as well as
Whitbread, forced to reduce its holdings to a maximum of 15 per cent. At
present, the WIC stakes amount to 43.6 per cent of Morland, 33.1 per cent of
Marston's and 23.6 per cent of Boddington.
Simply selling excess shares in the market would pose problems for Morland,
Marston's, and Brakspear. It would mean that 28.7 per cent of Morland's
equity would be up for grabs. More than 18 per cent of Marston's shares and
12 per cent of Brakspear's would also be on offer.
It seems safe to assume that all three are vigorously opposed to such a
solution.
Whitbread, too, would be loth to see blocks of shares placed with possible
predators given its own substantial sales of Heineken and Stella Artois
lagers to the three companies.
Another way out of the dilemma would be for Whitbread, itself, to bid for
one or more of the brewers. It already sells Marston's and Morland ales as
part of its guest beer portfolio.
'The drawback to such a move,' says Mr John Spicer, analyst at Warburg
Securities, 'is that it would incur significant costs - perhaps Pounds 34m
for Brakspear, Pounds 250m for Marston's and Pounds 80m for Morland  - and
could invite referral to the Monopolies and Mergers Commission.'
There is a bewildering range of other options. A transfer of shares between
Whitbread and WIC would slightly reduce the number to be sold.
That number would be reduced further if WIC cut its shareholding in
Whitbread to 14.9 per cent. But Whitbread would be reluctant to have 14 per
cent of its equity placed in the market.
In theory, says Mr Spicer, the regional brewers could seek shareholders'
approval to buy in some or all of the shares for disposal  - but the cost
would be high and leave less money available for acquiring pubs.
Rights issues by both Marston's and Morland could reduce the Whitbread and
WIC holdings below the critical level, provided both refrained from taking
up their rights.
But again the scale of the issues would be a problem - and Morland made a
Pounds 10.8m cash call only last June in which WIC took up its full
entitlement.
Whether intentional or not, the government orders have posed a problem which
only a stroke of genius is going to resolve without leaving some, at least,
of those involved poorer or weaker.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1994</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAAVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Anglia Television profits fade to Pounds
8.7m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GARY MEAD, Marketing Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ANGLIA TELEVISION yesterday reported pre-tax profits of Pounds 8.73m for the
14-month period ended December 31 1991, substantially down on the Pounds
14.9m in the twelve months to October 31 1990. The result was in line with
analysts' forecasts.
The final dividend is maintained at 6.4p, making an unchanged total of
9.26p. Earnings per share declined to 13.31p (21.89p). Operating profit fell
almost Pounds 3m to Pounds 14.9m.
Anglia's share of the ITV network's total revenue rose slightly from 6.72
per cent to 6.75 per cent. Advertising revenue was Pounds 127.3m (Pounds
108.9m) with an extra Pounds 22.35m (Pounds 12.9m) from programme sales.
Turnover showed an increase from Pounds 124.5m to Pounds 153.4m.
The Pounds 2.96m cost of renewing its franchise was taken as an
extraordinary charge as was a provision of Pounds 13.3m for restructuring
and writing down its original Pounds 12m stake in BSkyB, the satellite
television broadcaster, to a nominal Pounds 100,000.
Sir Peter Gibbings, chairman, said that Anglia took the view that BSkyB  -
in which Pearson, publisher of the Financial Times, has a stake - is
unlikely to be profitable before the end of the century. Writing down the
investment was thus 'prudent accounting'.
Sir Peter added that staff levels had been reduced by some 23 per cent, from
820 to 633, since 1989 but no further redundancies were envisaged. Last
October the company retained its franchise to broadcast in the east of
England region with a Pounds 17.8m bid
Net current assets at the end of 1991 were Pounds 43.6m (Pounds 29.6m).
Sir Peter said: 'At a time like this, keeping light on your feet and having
a pile of cash in the bank does not seem a bad approach.'
Analysts are forecasting 1992 pre-tax profits of between Pounds 14m and
Pounds 18m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1995</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAAUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Letter: Integrated EC forces under joint command not
'fantastical' concept
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr WILLIAM WALLACE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Your leader on the Liberal Democrats' manifesto (March 17) dismisses
the commitment to the 'gradual integration of community members' armed
forces under a joint command' as 'fantastical'.
For a far-sighted newspaper like the Financial Times, I find this a
disappointingly short-term assessment. No doubt it is fantastical to imagine
that within the next two to three years there will be substantial change in
the organisation of British forces. But over the next five to 15 years it is
evident that there will be fundamental shifts in national and European
defence, following from the end of the Cold War, the withdrawal of most (or
all) American forces, pressures to reduce national defence budgets and the
shift to different security concerns.
The British government and its EC partners have just signed a treaty
committing themselves to 'a common foreign and security policy. . .which may
in time lead to a common defence', which for the first time brings the
Western European Union into the ambit of the Brussels institutions. The
French and German governments have tabled proposals for integrated ground
forces, building on the Franco-German brigade. The British government has
committed troops to a multinational corps, with shared divisions, in the
Rapid Reaction Force. We already share training structures for the Tornado
with the Germans and Italians, and naval facilities with the Belgians and
Dutch; Dutch marines have for many years been effectively integrated into
British commando forces.
I recall some 15 years ago suggesting that it would be rational and logical
to share diplomatic facilities in third countries with our European
partners. The idea was swept aside as unthinkable. Yet we are in Alma Ata
and elsewhere searching for buildings we can share with the Germans, Dutch
and even representatives of the Commission itself: driven by budgetary
constraints far more than any 'European' idealism. The British, of course,
don't like to look ahead. But the same pressures will push us towards our
continental partners in the far more sensitive area of defence.
And by the way, we will also have a European Federal Bureau of Investigation
within 15 years. The first hints are there in the Maastricht Treaty; some
senior British police officers already privately accept the objective.
Fantastical - or unavoidable?
William Wallace,
European Studies Centre,
St Antony's College,
Oxford OX2 6JF
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1996</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAATFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Letter: Same problem
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr GEORGE HESKETT-SMYTHE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, In response to Mr Alan Sugar's letter (March 19), I, too, have not
prospered in the present recession.
George Heskett-Smythe,
The Manor House,
Bunbury-on-the-Hill,
Salop
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1997</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAASFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Letter: Bulldozers and bureaucrats
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr RODNEY PARKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Your picture of a lone protester defying a bulldozer destroying a site
of special scientific interest (SSSI) at Twyford Down brings into question
who really rules.
It is significant that as soon as the politicians become preoccupied with
the general election, the bulldozers - held back since March 1 - go in. The
conclusion is that it is the people who do not have to worry about votes -
the bureaucrats - who are the driving force.
Rodney Parkins,
8 Duval Drive,
Rochester, Kent ME1 2SY
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1998</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAARFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Letter: Labour tax proposals seen as an employment levy and
likely to hit property prices and feed inflation (2)
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr GERARD TYLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, The effect of the proposal by Labour to raise income tax at the top
marginal rate to 50 per cent and to impose national insurance on above
average earners will be dramatic. Domestic property values will fall, as
home buyers would not be able to service such high mortgages. The take-up of
services such as private education, medical insurance and pensions would be
reduced. Sales of cars, consumer goods and holidays would fall, affecting
other sectors of the economy.
In order to ameliorate the effect of such dramatic reductions in post-tax
incomes, employers would have to concede inflationary pay rises. By way of
example, if a married man's salary of Pounds 59,736 rose to Pounds 76,234,
his post-tax income would increase by only Pounds 1,257.
Mr Kinnock would therefore need almost all the salary rise which would come
with his elevation to prime minister, to compensate him for the increase in
taxes which his chancellor would impose. The salaries quoted are those for
the leader of the opposition and for the prime minister.
Gerard Tyler,
25 Midhurst Avenue,
Muswell Hill, London N10
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-1999</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAAQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Letter: Labour tax proposals seen as an employment levy and
likely to hit property prices and feed inflation (1)
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr PETER M BROWN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Could I warn John Smith, the shadow chancellor, that the extra 9 per
cent insurance charge, masquerading as a benefit, on those earning over
Pounds 21,060 will operate as a payroll and employment tax.
Employers will be forced to grant extra pay increases to critical qualified
staff in the Pounds 20.000-Pounds 30,000 band which will deflect money from
recruitment and make domestically produced goods and services more
expensive.
It will rekindle the 'grey economy' of tax avoidance, which the post-1988
tax regime had largely killed off, and is targeted to affect precisely those
groups whose support any government needs.
To impose a flat rate employment tax - that will in practice cost public and
private employers 5 per cent to 9 per cent on Pounds 20,000-plus payroll
costs - when we have a record number of qualified staff on the dole and a
very hesitant recovery shows a lack of understanding about the 'real jobs'
Mr Smith and his party want to encourage.
Peter M Brown,
chairman,
Top Pay Research Group,
Upper Ground Floor,
9 Savoy Street, London WC2
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2000</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAAPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Letter: Lamenting demise of Business Expansion Scheme
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Dr P J HARROP
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, I write to express sadness that the end of the Business Expansion
Scheme is in sight. The fact that it has largely degenerated into a rich
man's tax dodge on property obscures the fact that it is still available for
its original purpose - supporting small wealth-creating businesses.
I am currently involved in raising money on the BES for a small electronics
company, Ragom Holdings, that already exports to Japan. For us, it is a
welcome alternative to venture capital, which is largely a seller's market
these days. Most venture capital companies are accountancy driven; they tend
to consider medium and large management buy-outs to be low risk because they
have a balance sheet. It seems not to matter that some of these companies
have little or no intellectual property or management talent. By contrast,
venture capitalists tend to frown on business start-ups even where
world-beating key patents are involved and the board contains proven
achievers. Small growth businesses often have difficulty in raising finance.
They are usually asked to pay back much of the money in the first few years
 -when they need to invest. Government grants and tax breaks are not
available to the same degree as in some other European countries.
Doubtless, it will suit some in the venture capital industry to see a
potential competitor - the BES - eliminated just as it is emerging from its
mad-cap phase and seeing some rational proposals for trading enterprises of
potential benefit to our country. But does it suit the rest of us?
P J Harrop,
chairman,
Racom Holdings,
37 Kingfisher Court,
Hambridge Road,
Newbury, Berks RG14 5SJ
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2001</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAAOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Letter: Water should stay privatised
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr ROY WATTS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, the Labour manifesto says 'the provision of water is so fundamental
that it is a priority for return to public control'.
Such a reversal would be a tragedy for many customers, shareholders and
employees. It is a proposal which ignores the massive improvement in the
water industry since flotation two years ago when government put ownership
and management into the more efficient private sector while retaining its
true role as regulator, with powers to punish failure.
Water is a business. Like coal, oil and any mineral, water is a natural
resource. But laboratories, treatment works, thousands of miles of pipes,
reservoirs and trained skills are not. Water is a continuous process
industry that plans for water, collects it, stores it, treats, it
distributes it, re-cycles it and disposes of it - all to very high legal
standards.
Since flotation, investment, previously neglected, has proceeded apace and
with certainty. New standards have been achieved, new technology
implemented, the pace of change increased, skilled staff attracted and
rewarded, international business secured.
Alongside this, water bills have remained low - in the case of Thames an
average of 40p per day per family. There are no arguments for changing an
efficient, highly-motivated business.
I hope all those involved, including those in the private sector companies
whose employees benefit from taking part in the Pounds 30bn industry capital
programme, will reflect on Labour's proposals.
Roy Watts,
chairman,
Thames Water,
14 Cavendish Place,
London W1M 9DJ
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2002</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAANFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Europe joins the Mickey Mouse club: Euro Disney must
overcome the climate and competition from US counterparts to achieve
commercial success
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL SKAPINKER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
In his office on a corridor labelled White Rabbit Run, off Dormouse Drive,
Mr Robert Fitzpatrick, president of Euro Disney, is adamant that he will not
be blackmailed.
Sixteen French building contractors say that Euro Disney owes them money.
Some have issued veiled threats that they will disrupt Euro Disney's grand
opening on April 12. Mr Fitzpatrick is examining their claims. But, he says:
'I think it is important to tell these companies they can't get away with
sloppy work.'
The outburst is angry, but uncharacteristic. Generally, Mr Fitzpatrick is as
unflappable as the floor-to-ceiling Mickey Mouse tapestry on the wall of his
office at the nearly completed resort at Marne-la-Vallee, 32km east of
Paris. The 16 companies aside, he is delighted with the progress of Euro
Disney. He has reason to be.
He will not need to reset his brightly coloured 'countdown to the magic'
wristwatch which tells him how many days there are until the opening. Large
construction projects, such as the Channel Tunnel, almost always open late,
having overshot their initial budget. But Euro Disney, Europe's largest
leisure complex, featuring such attractions as the Big Thunder Mountain
Railroad and Dumbo the Flying Elephant, is set to open on time and to its
budget of FFr22bn (Pounds 2.26bn).
In the five years since Disney, the US film, entertainment and merchandising
giant, signed an agreement with the French government to construct Euro
Disney, it has assembled 700 contractors and an additional 1,000 suppliers
to build 30 theme park attractions, a man-made lake, two rivers, six hotels
with a total of 5,200 rooms, a campsite, a golf course and an entertainment
centre. Most of the contractors had not worked for Disney before; 95 per
cent were European. At peak building periods, there were up to 89 cranes on
the 1,500-acre site and 11,500 construction workers.
To welcome a projected 11m visitors in the first year, Euro Disney has
recruited a staff of 14,000 'cast members', representing 75 nationalities
and speaking 40 languages.
And this is only the start. Disney has plans for its French site which will
take it up to 2017. They include the opening in 1995 of Disney MGM
Studios-Europe, with film and television production facilities and a movie
theme park; a convention centre; a water park; a second golf course; and
13,000 more hotel rooms.
Euro Disney has not been the only impressive performer. From the covered,
moving walkway which will carry visitors from the 12,000-space car park to
the site, the roof of a brand new RER suburban-line railway station is
visible. Due to open at the beginning of April, it will enable visitors to
reach the park from central Paris in 40 minutes. A station for the
high-speed TGV train, located inside the resort, is expected to open in
1994.
The co-operation of the French government in providing the infrastructure to
serve the park has been crucial to Euro Disney's initial success, Mr
Fitzpatrick says. The planning and work has continued under four prime
ministers: Mr Laurent Fabius, Mr Jacques Chirac, Mr Michel Rocard and Mrs
Edith Cresson. Each of them appointed an 'interministerial delegate' to
ensure co-operation between Euro Disney and all the public authorities
involved.
According to Mr Fitzpatrick, who helped organise the 1984 Los Angeles
Olympics, a dispute with a handful of contractors is relatively
insignificant in a project the size of Euro Disney.
There have been other pin-pricks. A French labour inspector has asked a
judge to examine the legality of the Euro Disney Look, the company's dress
code. This stipulates that cast members must wear 'proper undergarments';
that hair must not be bleached, tinted, frosted or streaked; that moustaches
and beards are not permitted; that 'due to close contact with guests and
fellow cast members, the use of a deodorant or antiperspirant is required';
and that 'sunglasses are a block to interpersonal communication with the
guests and should be avoided when possible'. Staff are told that 'as a
condition of your continued employment with Euro Disney, you are responsible
for maintaining an appropriate weight and size'.
Mr Fitzpatrick says he is confident the Euro Disney Look conforms with
French law. Turning the 14,000 new employees into Disney cast members does,
however, present the company with a new challenge: it has never had to
manage a multinational workforce before. Its two theme parks in the US, in
Orlando, Florida and near Los Angeles, employ mostly Americans. Its third
park, Tokyo Disneyland, which opened in 1983, employs Japanese.
Of the European employees, 66 per cent are French, 11 per cent are British,
4 per cent are Dutch and 3 per cent are Irish. French and English are the
two languages of Euro Disney. Although bilingualism is not an absolute
requirement of employment, 80 per cent of the staff speak English and 80 per
cent speak French.
The question of whether European employees will take to Disney's celebrated
service-with-a-smile culture provokes a second flash of irritation from Mr
Fitzpatrick. The quality of service at Euro Disney is already 'fantastic',
he says. The idea that such standards are not achievable in Europe is 'a
Euro-myth, a self-defeating, self-critical myth that astonishes me. It's not
a question of nationality. It's a question of the company and what it
values. You communicate in a thousand different ways what are the values of
the company.'
Mr Fitzpatrick says he leads by example. If there is litter on the ground he
picks it up. He gives every appearance of living up to Disney's
squeaky-clean image. It would be churlish to point out that he smokes.
Like all other members of staff, he wears an oval plastic badge, with a
picture of Mickey Mouse at the top and his name, Bob, in large letters in
the middle. As the Euro Disney Look says: 'We are a first-name
organisation.' When he walks around the site, he says, French staff give him
a cheery 'Salut, Bob.'
However, the cast members being conducted past the pink timber exterior of
the Disneyland Hotel a few weeks before opening, look anything but cheery.
Squinting into a howling wind, they clutch the hoods of their coats around
their faces as protection against the driving rain. And this is March. What
will January be like?
The north European climate looks like being the biggest potential obstacle
to Euro Disney's success. Unlike many other European theme parks, Euro
Disney will be open all year round. Euro Disney says it has worked hard at
overcoming the difficulties posed by the gloomy Parisian winters and
unreliable summers.
Building on the experience of Tokyo Disneyland which, the company says, has
to cope with even worse weather, many of Euro Disney's attractions will be
indoors. Ticket booths at the entrance to the park will be under shelter on
the ground floor of the Disneyland Hotel. The park's Main Street USA will
contain indoor arcades running parallel to the street.
Mr John Forsgren, chief financial officer, says that good winter attendances
will be crucial to Euro Disney's success. For much of the summer, Euro
Disney expects to be bumping up against its daily capacity of 60,000
visitors. Improving annual profits will therefore depend on increasing
winter visitors.
In the company's first financial year, to September 1992, Mr Forsgren
expects the company to be profitable after interest payments, although he
will not put any figure to his forecast. Mr Paul Slattery, an industry
analyst at Kleinwort Benson in London, says that in the first year, which
does not include a winter season, he expects Euro Disney to have net profits
of FFr246m. He does not expect much improvement in the second year, which
includes both a winter and a summer season.
Mr Forsgren agrees that Euro Disney will do well to break even in the period
between October 1992 and March 1993 and might make a small loss. If
attendances are low in the winter, Disney will offer special events and
prices to attract visitors.
The problems of the winter do not seem to worry shareholders. Since Euro
Disney's hugely over-subscribed offering of 51 per cent of its equity in
October 1989, the shares have shot up from FFr72 to close in Paris yesterday
at FFr161.2. At this level they are a very expensive 130 times greater than
expected first-year earnings per share.
The performance of the shares worries Mr Forsgren. 'It's a bit much. We've
actually been cautious with investors. We've asked people to be realistic
about what we can achieve in the first years,' he says.
Mr Forsgren, formerly treasurer of the parent Disney company, says, however,
that communicating with European investors is more difficult than many US
executives realise. 'The markets in Europe are much less efficient than in
the US. The process of conveying information is much slower. You don't have
the security analyst coverage you have in the US. You can't assume that,
having made a statement in a speech, all the major investors are going to
get that message. You make a speech in London and, two months later, it's
news in Germany.'
He says that Euro Disney could break even with as few as 8m or 9m visitors a
year. The key would be a reduction in labour costs. The high turnover in
theme park staff makes it relatively easy to reduce employee numbers when
necessary, he says. 'Some people join with the intention of staying only for
a season. Others simply decide they don't like the work. For whatever
reason, it happens in a fairly new company.'
Despite the economic downturn which is affecting much of Europe, Euro Disney
says it is confident it will meet its first-year target of 11m visitors.
Half are expected to come from France, with guests from the UK, Germany and
the Benelux countries making up the rest.
Travel companies seem equally confident. P&amp;O Ferries says it has already
sold between 70 and 80 per cent of the Euro Disney holidays it has available
for the first three months after opening. British Airways Holidays says it
has sold about 40 per cent of its summer Euro Disney holidays and about 25
per cent of the packages available for the first year.
P&amp;O's packages range from Pounds 50 per person a night to more than Pounds
90, depending on the class of hotel and time of year. British Airways'
packages, which include air fares from the UK to Paris, range from Pounds 83
a person per night to more than Pounds 100.
Euro Disney says it expects visitors to stay for a shorter time than
European guests at its US theme parks. A winter trip to Walt Disney World in
Florida, already popular with UK and German visitors, is, however, not much
more expensive. Packages range from Pounds 65 a night to Pounds 160.
Mr Forsgren believes that Euro Disney's main competition will come from the
alternative attraction of European living rooms with television sets in
them. During a grim European winter, however, the Florida sunshine might be
more enticing than either Euro Disney or television. Euro Disney's stiffest
competition might turn out to be its sister parks.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2003</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAAMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Man in the News: Dour Scot with an empire from east to west
 -William Purves
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON DAVIES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The career of Mr William Purves is a tale of 'go east young man' redolent of
Britain's imperial past. Thirty-six years ago he left his job of bank clerk
in Scotland to seek his fortune in the colonies. Now the chairman of
Hongkong and Shanghai Banking Corporation is to take control of the UK's
Midland Bank, which Mr Purves's bank is about to acquire.
However, the 60-year-old Scot seems unmoved by the prospect of taking over
one of the big four English clearing banks. He has already got used to big
titles. Hong Kong folklore has it that the three men who rule the colony are
the chairman of the Royal Hong Kong Jockey Club, the chairman of Hongkong
Bank and the Governor, in that order. Since December 1991, Mr Purves has
held the the first two of these posts.
Although the Midland takeover would propel the Hongkong Bank into the
limelight of the international banking stage, Hong Kong looks on the UK
partner as a smaller, weaker bank. Indeed, many Hong Kong bankers describe
the UK as a 'sunset economy' and point to the opportunities from branching
out on to the Chinese mainland. Mr Purves is often to be found on the
mainland and has cultivated a close relationship with the Chinese
government, which takes over the colony in 1997.
Colleagues and friends attach adjectives like 'dour', 'hard-working' and
'tough' to him, rather than 'ambitious' or 'self-important'. Colleagues
describe him as 'not the kind of man who seeks personal publicity'. He
himself says he is a dedicated banker, rather than a principal pillar of
colonial society.
In this respect, he differs from his more flamboyant predecessor, Sir
Michael Sandberg. Sir Michael's nine-year reign as chairman left the colony
with numerous monuments to the bank's glory, such as the Dollars US1bn
Hongkong Bank building, with its unused helicopter landing pad, and a
palatial residence of questionable taste on the Peak, the island's most
exclusive area.
By contrast, employees claim that Mr Purves has been known to fly economy
class. He sees the Hongkong Bank as an institution where Scottish banking
principles offer a good model, and hard work and loyalty are the keys to
success.
The principles Mr Purves reveres include common sense, frugality and
conservatism, although occasionally his puritanism can rub people up the
wrong way. When the Bank of Credit and Commerce International collapsed, he
angered local BCCI depositors by accusing them of greed for having been
attracted by that bank's slightly higher interest rates.
His innate caution might appear odd, given that he has been associated with
an ambitious programme of overseas expansion, which has taken Hongkong Bank
into the US, Canada, Australia and, almost, Scotland - through a failed bid
for Royal Bank of Scotland in 1981 - in the last 12 years. But Hongkong Bank
has given itself ample time to consider the wisdom of a move on Midland,
having acquired its initial 14.9 per cent stake in the bank more than four
years ago.
The gestation of the deal had been longer still. On the day that Mr Purves's
appointment as chairman was announced in December 1985, he said: 'If the
opportunity arose we would like to do more in Europe, but it's not something
that's likely to present itself in the immediate future.'
He became chairman exactly 30 years after leaving the National Bank of
Scotland's Kelso branch for the Hongkong and Shanghai Banking Corporation.
He had then worked his way through the hierarchy; being a rugby-playing
Scotsman provided a slight edge in a bank with a strong Scots contingent. He
stresses, however, that he has got where he has by dint of hard work and
being fair. Few of his colleagues argue with this.
Mr Purves claims the paternalistic image of the bank is overplayed, but it
clearly expects hard work and loyalty, and it rewards them. 'The bank is a
bit like a boarding school, with Mr Purves playing the role of a senior
prefect,' says one insider.
Mr Purves still calls in new trainees and makes a valiant effort to remember
all their names - a significant task, as the bank has 10,000 more staff
today than eight years ago. His powers of recollection are renowned and it
is this, he claims, that gives people the impression he is a details man.
Some, however, have criticised him for being too involved in the nuts and
bolts of bank business, and not sufficiently focused on broader strategies.
The Hongkong Bank chairman wields immense power: there are no big
shareholders breathing down his neck, as a result of a ruling on a maximum
shareholding of 1 per cent - which will go as a condition of Midland
takeover. Moreover, the board comprises mainly non-executive local
businessmen, unlikely to question the bank's executive committee. But the
burden on Mr Purves has been relieved to an extent, through the appointment
of the deputy chairman, Mr John Gray, as chief executive of Hongkong Bank.
Mr Purves, therefore, has had more time to concentrate on the difficulties
caused by the bank's operations outside Hong Kong. Hongkong Bank has allowed
its overseas operations to run with a large degree of autonomy, which has
sometimes backfired in the tough economic climate of the last two years.
'When you put someone in charge, you should let them get on with it. But
there have been problems and we have sadly had to make changes. I have been
accused of being too slow to make those changes, but you have to give people
the chance,' says Mr Purves. For example, Mr John Bond, a director of the
bank, has been sent to the US to turn round a subsidiary, Marine Midland.
But Mr Purves says this does not reflect a change in management style.
Midland Bank would, in the main, be left to run itself under the existing
regime. There is speculation that Mr Purves may relocate to London to
control the growing bank empire from the City; but he is non-committal,
stating that he will do what his board wants him to.
But he also says he is getting old and is looking towards retirement.
Friends suggest he would have difficulty parting company with his business
interests completely, and for that reason might want to remain close to
London.
However, although he has assumed the badges of his post as Hong Kong's most
eminent corporate man, such as a company Rolls-Royce, Peak dwelling and even
a share in a race horse, the social trappings do not seem important to him.
'I have other outside interests that I would like to pursue. A long time ago
I was interested in gardening and bee-keeping. And I would like to have time
to read,' he says. But, in the meantime, he has a HKDollars 30bn acquisition
to complete.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2004</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAALFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Inspiration from meditation plan
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GARY MEAD, Marketing Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A NEW party entered the election race yesterday, spending about Pounds 1m on
full-page national newspaper advertisements and promising to field
candidates in all 651 constituencies.
The Natural Law Party, launched less than a week ago, bases itself on the
teachings of the Maharishi Mahesh Yogi, the founder of the Transcendental
Meditation programme and two universities.
Party official Peter Warburton yesterday declined to give details about
financial backers.
He said the party, whose lengthy manifesto was published in national
newspapers yesterday with photographs of 119 election contenders, would have
candidates for all 651 seats by next Wednesday, which is the final date for
registration.
The candidates would be paying their own deposits.
Mr Warburton said the party's aim was to introduce an ideal system of
administration to the country.
Although that might seem idealistic, the party would implement very
practical measures to achieve that aim.
Mr Warburton hoped that the party would be granted a party political
broadcast. It had met one of the conditions to qualify by fielding more than
50 candidates.
Mr Warburton refused to comment on plans for further advertising, though he
said that the party had formed a nationwide fund-raising organisation called
The Heaven on Earth club.
He said the party depended on unnamed well-wishers for donations, including
about 160,000 people in the UK who have studied transcendental meditation
under the Maharishi's guidance.
The party has a slogan - 'Only a new seed will yield a new crop' - and its
symbol is a rainbow.
Its leader is Mr Geoffrey Clements, who is a professor of physics at one of
the Maharishi's universities.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2005</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAAKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Middle managers could still work under Mr
Smith - If Labour wins, would its tax increases demotivate managers and
damage the economy?
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CEDRIC SANDFORD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BY RAISING the top marginal tax rate for employees from 40 per cent to 59
per cent, Labour's tax increases are almost a mirror image of those in Mr
Nigel Lawson's 1988 Budget, when he cut the higher rate of income tax from
60 per cent to 40 per cent.
A research study on the effects of the 1988 cuts provides some clues to the
likely effect of Labour's proposed increases. The study by the late
Professor Chuck Brown and the author was based on interviews with 316
accountants in private practices spread across London, the south-west and
mid-Scotland. The response rate was 69 per cent.
Accountants were chosen because they were mostly higher-rate taxpayers,
knowledgeable about tax and in a position to vary their workload.
They were asked whether there been any change in their working hours,
holidays, the amount of work taken on outside the practice and the amount
turned down in the practice. Those over 45 years old were asked about any
changes in retirement plans.
The interviews took place in 1989-90 and the questions concerned the year
before and the year after the 1988 Budget. In the initial stage, tax was not
mentioned by the interviewer.
On balance, there had been more hours worked, more holidays taken and more
work turned down. Of those who had changed their retirement plans, five
times as many were proposing to bring forward their retirement as to
postpone it.
However, only seven out of 316 gave tax as a reason for a change in
behaviour, and these were almost equally divided between those for whom tax
cuts had provided an incentive and those for whom the opposite was true.
At the end of the interviews, respondents were asked direct questions on the
effects of the tax cuts on their behaviour and on that of their clients.
Nearly a quarter of accountants whose tax rates had fallen by at least 5 per
cent said they had spent more and a similar proportion said they saved more.
On clients' behaviour, the most significant response was that 30 per cent
said clients were now less concerned with tax avoidance and more concerned
with the economic merits of investment decisions.
How far can these findings be reversed in respect of the Labour party
proposals? Clearly, the world is not the same as it was in 1988; nor are
Labour's proposals a precise reversal for top income-tax payers of the 1988
cuts. Nonetheless, the 1988 findings are very relevant.
There is no reason to doubt the central message of the 1988 findings - that
there will be some disincentive effects and some incentive effects  - but
the net effect on work effort is unlikely to be significant. This conclusion
is supported by earlier research findings.
Many of the 'middle managers', about whom top businessmen have spoken with
such passionate concern, may well wish to work more, not less, in order to
pay their high mortgages and their school fees - if, that is, they are in a
position to increase their pay by working more.
Of course, many managers cannot respond in this way. This is less true for
the self-employed, but so far Labour has made no proposals to raise their
national insurance contributions. The top marginal tax rate for the
self-employed under Labour would be 50 per cent, not 59 per cent.
It is also necessary to maintain a sense of proportion. Even at 59 per cent,
the combined rate of National Insurance contributions and top income tax
would be lower than the rate which has applied at any time since the second
world war, except for the period 1988-92.
On the other hand, many other countries have cut direct tax rates in recent
years; 59 per cent represents a relatively higher rate in 1992 than it did
in the early 1980s.
Our analysis suggests that the most potentially damaging effect would be to
increase tax avoidance, which might distort investment patterns, as well as
reducing expected tax revenue. The tax avoidance effect, however, should be
mitigated by the fact that returns on savings and investments will not be
affected by extra national insurance contributions: the proposed top rate on
investment income is 50 per cent.
In recent years, many tax-avoidance loopholes have been closed, and since
Labour plans to tax almost all fringe benefits to employers' national
insurance contributions, one obvious potential opportunity has also been
discouraged.
But Labour has not said what it proposes on capital gains tax (CGT). If it
continued to be charged at the taxpayer's top marginal rate of income tax
(50 per cent), it would be exceptionally high by international standards,
and would be likely to encourage investors to lock in to their investments,
to the detriment of capital mobility.
On the other hand, if the link with income tax were broken and capital gains
tax left at a maximum 40 per cent, new possibilities of tax avoidance -
through conversion of income to capital gains - would emerge. But too much
should not be made of this. Because of the separate CGT threshold, the
present link is not watertight; and, throughout most of the life of CGT we
have lived with much bigger differences between the rates of income tax and
CGT.
All in all, the evidence from our study suggests that the increases proposed
by the shadow chancellor would be highly unlikely to cause significant
disincentive or other serious detrimental effects.
Professor Sandford is the former director of Bath University's Centre for
Fiscal Studies.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2006</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAAJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Warning on Scots EC membership
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BETHAN HUTTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MEMBERSHIP of the European Community would not be automatic or easy for an
independent Scotland, Douglas Hurd, the foreign secretary, warned yesterday
while campaigning in Edinburgh.
'Scotland could not slide out of the United Kingdom on Monday and sidle into
the Community as the thirteenth member state on Tuesday,' he said. 'The
lawyers would have a series of field days. There could be many months or
years of dispute and uncertainty.'
Many European countries could put obstacles in Scotland's path as they would
be reluctant to set a precedent for their own potential break-away regions,
he said.
Destroying the union would be 'an act of unparalleled vandalism', said Mr
Hurd. He also attacked Labour's plans for devolution while retaining the
level of Scottish representation at Westminster as 'overwhelmingly
self-serving'.
Mr Hurd lunched at Scottish Life assurance, one of the Scots life business
that has expressed fears over independence for Scotland.
At the Eric Liddell Centre, Mr Hurd's polite interest in babies did not sway
a group of mothers. 'I'm voting SNP,' said one after he left.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2007</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAAIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Tories promise to end Treasury's pre-Budget 'purdah'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP STEPHENS, Political Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AN END to the Treasury's secretive grip on all Budget decisions in favour of
more open debate within the cabinet about taxation and spending is being
promised by senior ministers if the Conservatives win the election.
Some members of the cabinet this week blamed the Treasury's insistence on
pre-Budget 'purdah' for the faltering start to the Conservatives' general
election campaign. Colleagues said the significance of the planned reforms
of the Budget system had not been widely appreciated. Mr Norman Lamont, the
chancellor, has announced that from next year all decisions on government
spending and taxation - which are now split between the Autumn Statement and
the March Budget - would be presented in a single December Budget.
The reasoning behind the proposal is that the uniquely British tradition of
separating decisions on government spending and revenue has obscured the
choices to be made between spending increases and tax cuts. Mr Lamont said
the process had intensified pressure for special reliefs and had contributed
to an 'excessively complicated' tax system.
Senior ministers outside the Treasury said that the chancellor and the prime
minister appreciated that under the new system the cabinet and the House of
Commons would gradually assume more prominent roles in tax decisions.
At present, the chancellor informs his cabinet colleagues of his decisions
only on the morning of the Budget. Until then they are in the dark about
revenue and borrowing projections and cannot make informed judgements on the
chancellor's options.
The ministers said that because the planned change would sharpen the
'trade-off' between tax and spending decisions, the Treasury would be far
less able to conceal what it was doing. The lag between the announcement in
December of the expanded Budget and its implementation in April after the
passage of the finance bill means that MPs will have more opportunity to
force changes.
Some cabinet members believe secrecy was a significant factor in a
less-than-enthusiastic reception for the Budget on March 10. Mr Lamont's
colleagues continued until the day of the announcement to fuel expectations
of much larger tax increases because they were unaware of the sharp rise in
borrowing.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2008</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAAHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Barclays to implement 3% offer
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL SMITH, Labour Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BARCLAYS BANK is to implement a pay deal for 70,000 employees averaging
slightly more than 3 per cent - the lowest among the big four in recent
years - in spite of union opposition.
The implementation of the increase on Monday signals a tougher line by the
banks on pay and conditions.
The Barclays pay package will be implemented in spite of a ballot concluded
yesterday by Bifu, the financial services union, which showed a majority of
members in favour of industrial action.
Members of the Barclays Group Staff Union (BGSU) have voted against the pay
offer and are being consulted by their leaders on whether they want to vote
on industrial action.
In spite of the union votes, it is extremely unlikely that there will be
industrial action at the bank.
Bifu is investigating the possibility of joint action with BGSU. Although it
has not given the results of its ballot, it admits that the majority in
favour was narrow and that the turnout was low.
Barclays' offer would raise salaries of its 70,000 non-managerial staff by
between Pounds 230 and Pounds 535 a year, representing rises of between 4
per cent and 2.5 per cent.
Salaries would vary between Pounds 5,958 and Pounds 18,674 after the
implementation of the settlement, which is payable from the beginning of
February, the settlement date.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2009</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAAGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / 'Race war' boast
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JOHANNESBURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Right-wing extremist Eugene Terre Blanche said yesterday his private army
was preparing for race war following the 'Yes' victory in South Africa's
reform referendum, Reuter reports from Johannesburg.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2010</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAAFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Chinese premier backs economic reform: Li Peng tells party
congress lid must be kept on political change and unrest
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By YVONNE PRESTON and REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BEIJING
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CHINA'S prime minister, Li Peng, yesterday gave cautious backing to the
economic reform strategy of Deng Xiaoping, the country's paramount leader,
but warned that neither political change nor unrest would be tolerated.
At the opening session of China's rubber-stamp parliament, the National
People's Congress, Li said: 'We must do two types of work at the same time,
attaching equal importance to both. We should promote reform and opening to
the outside world and, at the same time, crack down on criminal activity of
all kinds.'
The annual assembly session comes after reformists, led by Deng, have taken
the initiative in a fierce power struggle against hardline ideologues within
the country's communist government. Li is known to favour a cautious style
of central planning, while the reform lobby wants a more radical approach to
economic development.
Deng's picture has been plastered across southern newspapers in the past
week in a media barrage unprecedented since the days of Chairman Mao
Zedong's personality cult in the mid-1960s. This could be a strategy to
out-flank party hardliners in the north unhappy with the pro-reform push.
In his 'government work report' to the 3,000 delegates, Li substantially
reflected the new economic strategy pushed publicly by Deng in visits to
southern China in January and February.
Repeating remarks made by Deng, Li said in carrying out reform 'we should
emancipate our minds, seek truth from facts and boldly explore new ways'.
The test of reform was whether it raised living standards and boosted
productivity.
The report was half the usual length and relatively free from orthodox
communist slogans.
However, the Chinese premier failed to repeat Deng's claim that the greatest
danger came from the left not the right.
Reflecting fears of party hardliners about a breakdown of law and order and
an end to their grip on power, he said: 'We should not hesitate to take
forceful action against criminal activities and to eliminate social evils.'
Li said: 'We must be on the watch for any ideological trend towards
bourgeois liberalism, checking it the moment it appears and never allowing
it to run rampant.'
The work report declared a formal end to the austerity programme initiated
after the rampant inflation and economic overheating of 1988.
Because 'rectification' had only just ended, Li said the economic growth
target has been set at only 6 per cent over last year's figure, with
inflation to be kept under 6 per cent. He said China suffered from a growing
budget deficit, over-expanded credit, inflationary tendencies and
loss-making state enterprises.
The premier pledged to make state enterprises more responsive to the market,
but he stopped short of recommending large scale privatisation or
bankruptcies.
The controversial Three Gorges hydro-electric dam project should be included
in the 10-year plan that runs until the end of this century, Li said. The
57bn yuan (Pounds 6bn) project was technologically feasible and economically
rational and should be built.
For the first time, the report referred to human rights. China acknowledges
human rights as a proper subject for international discussion but opposes
the use of human rights as a pretext for interfering in other countries'
internal affairs, Li said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2011</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAAEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Israeli poll puts Labour in front
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HUGH CARNEGY and REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JERUSALEM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ONE OF the first national opinion polls conducted since an Israeli general
election was called for June 23 has put the opposition Labour party ahead of
the governing Likud party of Prime Minister Yitzhak Shamir. But the Likud
and the parties it was in coalition with until recently would still together
command a parliamentary majority.
The telephone survey, conducted by the Dahaf institute in Tel Aviv for a
daily newspaper, gave Labour, under its new leader, Mr Yitzhak Rabin, 41
seats in the 120-seat Knesset, with Likud slipping to 37.
Labour's 'natural allies' among small leftist and Arab parties, to which it
would turn for support in a coalition, shared 17 seats, while right-wing and
religious parties which tend to support Likud shared 25. In theory, this
would allow Mr Shamir to reconstruct his old coalition with a parliamentary
majority of two.
Although the poll confirmed anecdotal evidence that Labour is profiting from
harsh economic conditions and the government's disputes with the US,
analysts warn that much can change between now and June.
Israeli soldiers shot dead a Palestinian and imposed curfews yesterday in
the worst unrest to sweep the occupied West Bank and Gaza Strip this year,
Reuter reports.
Youths stoned troops and paramilitary police and set up roadblocks of
burning tyres.
The army put the West Bank towns of Ramallah and Hebron under curfew and
sealed off the entire Gaza Strip, home to 750,000 Palestinians.
Soldiers killed a 19-year-old youth from Silwad village in clashes in
Ramallah. Military sources said he had thrown a firebomb at an army jeep. A
20-year-old Palestinian also died yesterday after being shot by security
forces in the town of Jenin three days ago.
The clashes marked an upsurge in the four-year-old Palestinian revolt, which
had been virtually dormant since the Middle East peace talks got under way
in Madrid last October.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2012</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAADFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Mexico puts controversial dam on hold
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAMIAN FRASER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MEXICO CITY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Mexican government has dropped plans to build a hydroelectric dam on the
Rio Usumacinta, near the Guatemalan border.
The dam, which is opposed by environmentalists, would not be built during
the administration of President Carlos Salinas, the federal commission for
electricity said. However, the commission left open the possibility of the
dam being constructed under the next administration, which begins on
December 1 in 1994.
Environmentalists said the dam's construction might flood some of the nearby
Mayan cities, and upset the delicate ecological balance in the Lacandona
tropical rainforest.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2013</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAACFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Yugoslav foes become brothers in arms sales
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LAURA SILBER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BELGRADE
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Serb-controlled Yugoslav army and the republic of Croatia, until
recently at each other's throats, have joined forces to produce weapons for
export.
Serbian and Croatian media this week confirmed that Djuro Djakovic, a
weapons factory in Croatia, will honour a Dollars 300m two-year contract for
the delivery of 200 M-84 tanks to Kuwait. The Yugoslav federal office which
oversees arms sales said the outbreak of war had prevented Yugoslavia from
fulfilling the contract, Borba, a Belgrade daily, reported yesterday.
Vjesnik, the Zagreb daily, said Croatia would receive Dollars 300,000 of the
Dollars 1.5m price of each tank. The tanks are assembled in Djuro Djakovic,
in Slavonski Brod town midway between the Croatian capital Zagreb and the
Serbian capital Belgrade.
The newspaper said 1,000 factories from all the republics of the former
Yugoslav federation contribute parts for the M-84s. Vjesnik cited 'numerous
problems' in deliveries from Bosnia-Hercegovina, where road blocks have
become routine. It said Serbia 'irregularly' delivers parts due to a
government embargo and suspicions that the tanks may used by the Croat army
rather than exported to Kuwait.
General Antun Tus, the chief of staff of the Croat forces, admitted it may
'sound paradoxical that warring countries are in this joint business of
production and export of weapons to a third country'. But he insisted there
was no danger because the tanks were entirely under Croatian control.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2014</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAABFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / Bush may be warming to Rio's Earth Summit: The US could
change its mind and back plans for a global environmental charter
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NANCY DUNNE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE are signs that President George Bush may be ready to give way to
international pressure to put his weight behind the Earth Summit in Rio de
Janeiro in June.
Mr Bush has so far resisted appeals at home and abroad for the
administration to sign up to an international charter at the summit to
protect the global environment.
Alone among industrialised countries, the US has baulked at signing an
agreement, a centrepiece of the Earth Summit, that would commit it to limit
carbon dioxide emissions to 1990 levels by the year 2000.
The administration has been arguing there are so many unanswered questions
about global warming that the US must proceed with caution.
But it may have little choice about changing its position. Legislation is
being drawn up by the House of Representatives sub-committee on health and
the environment that would mandate a curb in emissions to 1990 levels. The
bill is likely to attract sufficient support for passage, particularly with
an election looming.
After testifying this week before the sub-committee, Dr Daniel Lashof, a
senior scientist at the Natural Resources Defence Council, said the
administration now was 'considering whether to change its position based on
internal government analyses.'
These analyses, including one by Mr Lashof and his colleagues, conclude that
the US could meet the goals being pressed by the European Community and
other allies by implementing some of the measures endorsed by the
administration last month at the last round of climate treaty negotiations
in New York in preparation for the June summit.
At the sub-committee hearing, Congressman Henry Waxman, its chairman, said
on the basis of latest evidence from the Environmental Protection Agency,
the National Academy of Science and others, the US could stabilise carbon
dioxide emissions at 1990 levels 'at little or no cost.'
'The central questions that scientists are debating now concern how much
warming and how quickly,' said Mr Waxman. 'But there is little question that
warming will occur.'
Scientists predict that the long-term effects of global warming include a
dramatic decline in the world's agriculture productivity, increased spread
of infectious disease, flooding of coastal areas and wetlands, inundation of
drinking water supplies and devastation of many of the planet's natural
ecosystems.
US and EC representatives are scheduled to take the issue up again in Paris
on April 13. The last round of international negotiations are set to begin
in New York on April 30.
While there is a vocal green lobby in the US, particularly among young
voters, as an election issue it has been obscured by worries about the US
economy. Recessionary pressures have lent greater weight to the argument of
US business and industry that 'ill-considered policy responses' could damage
US competitiveness.
In testimony to Congress last Thursday, Mr Richard Briggs, vice-chairman of
the Global Climate Coalition, warned that overall measures to sharply reduce
greenhouse gas emissions could impose 'massive costs' on the US economy - as
much as Dollars 95bn a year, according to one study.
Mr Briggs contended that few of the 'so-called commitments' by other
countries to curb carbon dioxide are 'meaningful' because they are not
supported by binding obligations under the laws and regulations of those
countries.
'Several industrialised countries have suggested that policies address only
carbon dioxide, and thus ignore methane and other greenhouse gases,' he
said. 'To focus solely on carbon dioxide emissions is to ignore up to half
of the potential impact of greenhouse gas emissions.'
The administration is under great pressure to abandon its opposition to the
climate change treaty. All five current and former Democratic presidential
candidates agreed to urge the president to attend the Rio summit and to
demonstrate US leadership on global warming. The international community is
worried that the summit will fall flat if Mr Bush is not there.
Mr Bush is hardly likely to go unless he intends to sign up for concrete
action. But he will lose any hope of passing himself off as 'the
environmental president' unless he makes it to Rio in June.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2015</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCUAJAAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920321
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  21 MAR 92 / World News in Brief: Ceasefire marred
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
An Iranian-brokered ceasefire took effect in Nagorno-Karabakh but was marred
by shelling of the enclave's capital as United Nations envoy Cyrus Vance
began a fact-finding mission.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2016</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAG5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / London Stock Exchange: Equities steadier but remain nervous
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERRY BYLAND, UK Stock Market Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ATTEMPTS by the London stock market to recover yesterday from its
post-Budget gloom were restrained by disappointing statistics on
unemployment, wages and unit wage costs, and by mixed signals from the
public opinion polls.
The brightest feature was the improvement in stock index futures, where the
March contract on the FT-SE Index closed at a premium to cash for the first
time for several sessions.
At the opening, the stock market decided to respond to the latest Gallup
poll, indicating a two-point lead for the governing Conservative party,
rather than to an NOP poll showing a four-point lead for Labour. Shares
opened higher but the gain was increased to some 13 points on the Footsie
only after the stock index futures made a firm start.
The rise was as swiftly reversed when the March futures contract temporarily
shed its premium against the underlying cash market, where the Footsie fell
to a net loss of 9.8, bringing it to within five points of the 2,450 mark.
Both markets were undermined by news of a further rise in UK unemployment
last month, a factor seen as further damaging the government's re-election
chances and thus increasing the danger of a 'hung' parliament.
However, the market later rallied, and was helped by a firm start on Wall
Street, where the Dow gained 9.61 in early trading.
The final reading put the FT-SE Index at 2,467.6 for an improvement on the
day of 2.9 points. Trading volume remained disappointing and the City of
London was still very nervous regarding the progress of the government's
re-election campaign.
Today brings the close of the Budget trading account in equities, and leaves
the market facing a loss of around 130 Footsie points over the period.
UK securities markets have shown disappointment with the size of the Public
Sector Borrowing Requirement disclosed in the chancellor's Budget speech and
have also been hurt by the dwindling hopes for a cut in base rates.
Seaq volume edged higher to 484.3m shares from the previous day's 454.3m;
but Wednesday's retail, or customer, value was low at Pounds 867.2m,
indicating once again that the big insti-tutions are staying on the
sidelines until the political outlook clears.
The FT-SE Index finally provided little guide to the market's mood, because
it was distorted by movements in a handful of leading shares. Cable and
Wireless fell heavily, taking an effective two points off the Footsie, after
confirming a re-organisation plan.
On the other side of the scale, Midland Bank continued to advance, although
some selling was seen at the day's high point; the market hopes for further
developments in the merger situation but traders were also taking profits.
Shares in the other UK clearing banks also continued to attract interest as
the market wondered what else is in store. Indications that at least one
other UK bank had shown interest in acquiring Midland appear to open the
door to further reshaping of the industry.
The Midland move also refuelled bid speculation across the range of the
market, with some building shares moving higher as investors tried to
identify likely targets in a sector badly shaken by the effect of high
domestic interest rates on the construction industry.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 40
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2017</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAG4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / London Stock Exchange: C and W sharply depressed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By COLIN MILLHAM, PETER JOHN, STEVE THOMPSON and CHRISTOPHER PRICE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A REORGANISATION by Cable and Wireless, the telecoms group, sharply
depressed the shares. The company is merging its Personal Communications
Network (PCN) interests with those of Unitel, another PCN consortium,
restructuring its premium services, and expects to make a Pounds 50m
provision in its current year's results.
The stock finished 28 weaker at 555p, after touching 548p, with turnover of
10m shares easily the heaviest in a single trading session since June 1989.
The shares had already fallen sharply on Wednesday when Mr Peter Van
Cuylenburg, formerly one of the leading lights at Mercury, C and W's
telecoms division, announced his departure.
Some telecoms specialists viewed the latest moves with dismay. There were
also stories circulating in the market that C and W's stockbroker, Cazenove,
had been a keen seller of the stock and that a series of profits downgrades
were imminent.
Other analysts said they liked the deal but not the way it emerged. Dealers
said there had been a series of switching trades, out of C and W shares and
into Vodafone, which settled 5 higher at 342p.
Lasmo strong
Another strong performance by Lasmo, which recently won control of Ultramar
and is now among the UK's most important oil exploration stocks, left the
shares 6 higher at 197p on good turnover.
The market picked up hints that Lasmo has sold its interest in the
Wilmington oil refinery, located on the West Coast of the US.
The oil group inherited Wilmington when it acquired Ultramar last December.
During the bid battle, Lasmo pledged to sell a number of Ultramar's
business's, including Wilmington. Ultramar paid more than Pounds 250m for
its stake in the refinery in 1988.
Lasmo is scheduled to report preliminary figures next Wednesday, and is
therefore in the statutory 'closed period' during which it is prevented from
disclosing price sensitive information.
Along with other oil exploration stocks, Lasmo shares have come under heavy
selling pressure recently, reacting to the weakness of crude oil prices.
Demand for Tarmac
Tarmac, the building materials and construction group, attracted a welter of
speculative buying as the market reacted to another wave of stories that
Minorco, the international conglomerate associated with the South African
mining magnate Mr Harry Oppenheimer, was about to launch a bid for the UK
company.
At the close, Tarmac shares were 14 higher at 138p, having reached 142p
earlier. The market had been alerted to the bid rumours by the level of
turnover; 10m shares was by far the heaviest activity during a single
session since January 1991.
Although sceptical about the bid stories, building sector specialists said
Minorco had already shown its hand in seeking building materials assets in
the past by launching its ultimately unsuccessful bid for Consolidated Gold
Fields (ConsGold) around two years ago. Among ConsGold's most sought after
assets was Amey Roadstone, the hugely successful aggregates business that
ConsGold acquired during the 1970s.
BAT pleases
Delight over the dividend helped BAT Industries to climb 27 to 687p in
active trading of 3.5m shares as analysts became increasingly positive on
the stock.
Securities house Hoare Govett issued a buy recommendation and a positive
note on the company which is expected to reach clients today. Traders said
other brokers were contemplating such a move following the release of BAT's
strong 1991 results on Wednesday.
Hoare analyst Mr Richard Workman said: 'We have raised our rating on the
back of the results, which were every bit as good as one could hope.' The
brokerage concern shifted BAT to a buy from undervalued, and lifted its 1992
profits estimate by Pounds 25m to Pounds 1.45bn.
Smith New Court, the stockbroker, was said to have placed the majority of a
line of 4.5m CE Heath shares at 395p, having purchased them for 388p.
Guardian Royal Exchange shot up 13 1/2 to 128p on exceptionally heavy
turnover of 14m shares after the group revealed increased losses slightly
less than the market had expected, and a reduced dividend when many
specialists had been looking for the dividend to be omitted. In recent
months the market has responded to intermittent rumours that an overseas
stakebuilder has been at work in GRE, although no hard evidence of
stakebuilding has emerged to date.
Midland Bank rose 10 more to 350p, with speculators still betting on a bid
from Hongkong and Shanghai Banking in excess of 375p a share and possibly as
much as 400p. It was pointed out by traders, however, that a number of
institutions had been aggressive sellers at the 350p mark.
Selling in the futures market was said to be behind a continuing slide in
Glaxo Holdings, which lost 10 to 756p. Analysts added that wholesalers and
chemists were concerned about Glaxo's UK distribution methods and this was
hurting sentiment.
An announcement by SmithKline Beecham that its Relafen arthritis drug is to
be made available in the US helped the shares firm 5 to 885p.
A large agency cross by Lehman Brothers provided backing for Fisons, which
rose 4 to 368p on turnover of 7.3m shares. The investment bank crossed 3m
shares with institutions at 365p. It was the final part of a large sell
order which Lehman has been handling over the past few days.
Specialty chemicals company Laporte fell 13 to 564p ahead of full-year
results due next Tuesday. These are not expected to be bad but are likely to
herald the placing of Solvay's 8 per cent stake in the company.
Pharmaceutical retailer UniChem gained 4 to 212p after the company came out
with raised profits, a bullish statement and the announcement that it had
decided not to bid for retailer and pharmaceutical manufacturer Macarthy.
A possible bid lifted Morland by 97 to 470p, amid suggestions that this
could be the first sign of Whitbread complying with the wishes of the
Monopolies and Mergers Commission in offloading its holdings in regional
brewers.
Whitbread owns 43.6 per cent of Morland and would obviously play a key role
in the disposal of the company. Wolverhampton &amp; Dudley, down 7 at 604p, was
mentioned as a possible bidder on the news that Morland is holding
discussions which may lead to a takeover. However, analysts tended to be
sceptical, with one arguing that JA Devenish, 3 higher at 233p, made more
sense on a regional basis as a bidder.
Whitbread 'A' shares were little moved by the news, moving in line with the
market for a loss of 3 at 415p. Fears of broker downgrades weighed on the
shares, with Robert Fleming reducing its estimate of 1992-93 profits to
Pounds 240m from Pounds 285m. Fleming also said that compliance with MMC
orders appears to be more difficult for Whitbread than for any other
national brewer.
Guinness slipped 14 to 556p in spite of producing profit figures in line
with market forecasts. A rise in 1991 profits to Pounds 956m from Pounds
847m was up to expectations, but a cautiously worded statement led to fears
that the future may not be as favourable as analysts had hoped.
Arjo Wiggins Appleton gained 12 to 240p after reassuring comments in the
statement accompanying the 1991 results. Profits fell by to Pounds 231.5m,
below analysts' expectations of about Pounds 240m.
Engine-maker Rolls-Royce put on a good performance on a number of
considerations, not least an upbeat presentation on Wednesday evening to
institutions at Hoare Govett, its broker. There was also talk of strong US
buying of the shares, which closed 8 up at 157p, after a recent New York
presentation.
Smith New Court turned buyer of Johnson Matthey, the shares adding 3 at
365p. Mr Peter Deighton, a Smith analyst, said the move was prompted by
increased demand for catalytic converters in Europe, and also the US.
MARKET REPORTERS:
Colin Millham, Peter John,
Steve Thompson,
Christopher Price.
Other market statistics, including the FT-Actuaries Share Indices, Page 29.
NEW HIGHS AND LOWS FOR 1991/92
NEW HIGHS (23).
AMERICANS (1) Chrysler, BANKS (1) Midland, BREWERS &amp; DISTILLERS (1) Morland,
BUILDING MATERIALS (1) Kalon, ELECTRONICS (1) Hewlett-Packard, ENGINEERING
GENERAL (4) Atlas Copco B, Siebe, TI, Wier, FOOD MANUFACTURING (2) Nestle
(Br), Do. (Reg), FOOD RETAILING (2) Iceland Frozen, Park, HEALTH &amp; HOUSEHOLD
(1) UniChem, HOTELS &amp; LEISURE (1) Tanjong, INSURANCE COMPOSITE (1) AEGON,
INSURANCE LIFE (1) Torchmark, INVESTMENT TRUSTS (3) Flmg. Emrg. Mkts.,
Govett Atlantic, Murray Split Cap. Zero Prf., MISCELLANEOUS (1) Stag
Furniture, MOTORS (1) Volvo B, PROPERTY (1) Green Prop.
NEW LOWS (76).
BRITISH FUNDS (5) Tr. 13 3/4 pc 1993, Tr. 9 3/4 pc 2002 C, Tr. 9pc 2012, Tr.
2 1/2 pc IL 2020, Tr. 2 1/2 pc IL 2024, AMERICANS (1) Bell Atlantic, BANKS
(1) Mitsubishi, BUSINESS SERVICES (3) Automated Sec., Boustead, Gardiner,
CHEMICALS (1) Sutcliffe Speakman, CONTRACTING &amp; CONSTRUCTION (3) Higgs &amp;
Hill, Laing (J), Do. A, ELECTRICITY (1) Scottish Hydro, ELECTRONICS (1)
Harland Simon, ENGINEERING GENERAL (1) Ransomes, FOOD RETAILING (2) Ashley,
Do. 8.25p Prf., HEALTH &amp; HOUSEHOLD (2) Kunick, Do. 8 1/4 p Prf., INSURANCE
BROKERS (1) Heath (CE), INVESTMENT TRUSTS (18) Abtrust Prfd. Inc., City of
Oxford Inc., Contra-Cyclical Cap., Drayton Blue Chip, EFM Inc., Gartmore
Scot. Units, Kleinwort High Inc., M &amp; G Inc. Geared Units, Do. Cap., Murray
Split Cap., Overseas Inv. Wrrnts., River &amp; Merc. Cap., River Plate, Scot.
Natl. Inc., St David's Cap., Do. Inc., Throgmorton Wrrnts., Tor Cap., MEDIA
(1) Holmes &amp; Marchant, MERCHANT BANKS (2) Brown Shipley, Kleinwort Benson,
METAL &amp; METAL FORMING (2) Barrett (H), Clayhithe, MISCELLANEOUS (3)
Eurocopy, RPS, WSP, OIL &amp; GAS (5) Brabant Res., Conroy Petrlm., Monument
Oil, Pict Petrlm., Sceptre Res., OTHER FINANCIAL (1) King &amp; Shaxson,
PROPERTY (14) Bolton, Britannia, Brit. Land, Bucknall, Cap. &amp; Counties 5 3/4
pc Prf., Debenham Tewson &amp; C, Derwent Valley, Fletcher King, Gt. Portland
Ests. 9 1/2 pc 2002, Helical Bar, London Secs., MEPC, Ossory Ests.,
Regalian, STORES (2) Mallett, Oliver, TELEPHONE NETWORKS (1) GN Gt. Nordic,
TEXTILES (2) Jacques Vert, Jerome, TRANSPORT (2) Eurotunnel Wrrnts.,
Manchester Ship Canal, MINES (1) Bougainville.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 40
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2018</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAG3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / World Stock Markets (America): Dow improves despite sharp
fall for IBM
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Wall Street
EQUITIES showed a mildly firmer tendency yesterday in moderate activity, in
spite of a drop in leading computer issue International Business Machines
(IBM) on a sharply reduced earnings forecast from Soundview Financial,
writes Karen Zagor in New York.
The Dow Jones Industrial Average edged ahead 7.15 to 3,261.40, while
advances held a narrow lead over declines by 912 to 773 after a total of
194m shares had changed hands. The Standard &amp; Poor's 500 was just 0.65 up at
409.80, while the Nasdaq composite of over-the-counter stocks was 1.02
higher at 625.96.
There was little stock market reaction to the release of trade data for
January, which showed a slightly narrower US merchandise trade deficit of
Dollars 5.77bn, compared with a revised Dollars 6bn for December.
IBM fell Dollars 1 5/8 to Dollars 85 7/8 in heavy volume after Soundview
Financial cut its first-quarter earnings estimate to 25 cents a share from
the previous 90 cents. Soundview also reduced its 1992 earnings forecast to
Dollars 4.50 from Dollars 6.50 a share.
Burlington Industries led NYSE trading yesterday. The stock was quoted at
Dollars 14 after the textile company returned to the public domain with an
initial public offering of 44.9m shares priced at Dollars 14 each.
The big three auto makers, which have dominated the big board all week, were
actively traded again yesterday. Ford Motor climbed Dollars 1 1/8 to Dollars
40 1/8 , near its 52-week high of Dollars 40 5/8 . The company expects to
turn in a first-quarter profit after five consecutive quarterly losses.
Chrysler added Dollars  5/8 at Dollars 18 3/8 and General Motors rose
Dollars  1/4 to Dollars 38 3/8 .
Harley-Davidson, the last of the big US motorcycle makers, moved ahead
Dollars 3 3/8 to Dollars 59 3/4 after Morgan Stanley initiated coverage of
the company with a 'buy' rating.
In the pharmaceutical sector, Pfizer initially moved higher following an
analysts meeting where a professor at Yale University said the company's new
Zithromax oral antibiotic had potential for use in the treatment of
gonorrhea, lyme disease, toxoplasmosis in Aids patients and a range of
gastrointestinal infections.
These indications, however, have not been reviewed by the Food and Drug
Administration, which has so far approved the drug to treat respiratory
tract infections, uncomplicated skin infections and chlamydia. The drug is
the first in a new class of antibiotics which have higher tissue
concentrations than conventional treatments such as penicillin. Pfizer
closed unchanged on the day at Dollars 71 1/8 .
Canada
THE Toronto composite index staged a further moderate recovery from recent
weakness in a fairly busy trading session, gaining 14.9 to 3,466.7, but
falls led rises by 287 to 271. Volume came to 28.1m shares.
The communications and media sub-group advanced 1.89 per cent as Thomson
Corp rose CDollars 1 to CDollars 16 5/8 . Financial services put on 1.12 per
cent and forest products gained 1.02 per cent.
Cineplex Odeon, which reported decreased losses for 1991, slipped 5 cents to
CDollars 3.95.
Deprenyl Research dropped CDollars 2 5/8 to CDollars 15 1/4 . The company
said the fall was due to a sell recommendation from a Los Angeles-based
analyst.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2019</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAG2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Foreign Exchanges: Short-term buyers boost dollar
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NEIL BUCKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE DOLLAR touched DM1.67 in late trading yesterday, mainly due to
speculative buying by two major players, writes Neil Buckley.
Traders said a south-east Asian central bank and a large Middle East
operator were buying dollars, sending the currency up rapidly in otherwise
thin market conditions.
The US unit was generally slightly stronger, however, with some investors
turning to the currency as a safe haven following a newspaper report that
the US might be preparing to attack Iraq once more. The report said US
military planners had given President George Bush a set of options for
bombing Iraq, with the possibility of starting before the end of next week,
if it does not comply with UN resolutions to destroy its weapons of mass
destruction.
Mr Steven Barrow, an economist at Chemical Bank, said: 'The market has been
very thin, so a little rumour goes a long way.' He added that better US
jobless claims figures (433,000 against 460,000 last week), Wednesday's Tan
book from the Federal Reserve which saw a cautious economic recovery in the
US, and a slightly lower January trade deficit of Dollars 5.77bn, were
further good indicators for the dollar, but had had little effect on the
market.
The news that the Democrat Mr Paul Tsongas was to drop out of the US
presidential race, leaving Mr Bill Clinton, of Arkansas, the most likely
challenger to President Bush, also had little effect.
'It has been a jobbing day,' said one analyst. 'The market is very choppy.
Speculators took the dollar down as far as it would go yesterday, and took
it up to the top today.'
The dollar closed at DM1.6697/05 after a DM1.6595/05 start and a DM1.6560/65
Asian close. Against the yen, it was at Y133.33/38, from Y132.70/80 and
Y132.55/60. In New York it edged higher to end at DM1.6707 and Y133.57.
In Tokyo, the dollar had remained slightly firmer against the yen and
D-Mark, with traders saying this was mainly due to D-Mark/yen interest, with
some dollar position adjustments before the three-day weekend in Tokyo. The
market is closed today for a national holiday.
The D-Mark lost ground against the French franc and lira after the
Bundesbank failed to raise interest rates, in spite of some rumours that it
might do so. The Italian currency has been under pressure ahead of next
month's election, but yesterday it improved to L752.38/48 from an opening
L752.90 to the D-Mark.
Sterling was unaffected by mixed opinion polls and a big increase in the UK
jobless figures, closing at DM2.8572/76 from a DM2.8550/57 start, and never
moving outside this tight range. It stayed close to its effective floor
against the peseta, at a 50 per cent swing below its central rate.
Against the dollar, however, it fell more than 1 1/2 cents to Dollars 1.7120
from Dollars 1.7290, and in New York eased to Dollars 1.7111.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2020</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAG1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Money Markets: Trade still subdued
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE UK money market was very subdued again after a large rise in UK jobless
figures, and with mixed opinion polls failing to give any clear lead.
The resilience of sterling in the face of a deteriorating political outlook
was said to be providing some comfort to the market. But the disappointing
figures for unemployment, underlying earnings and unit wage costs, and very
slow consumer borrowing, were seen as giving more ammunition to the Labour
party in the general election battle, and little comfort to the
Conservatives.
Interbank rates were little changed, but remained on the firm side for a 10
1/2 per cent base rate, and with only the slightest positive tilt to the
yield curve. The key three months rate was unchanged at 10 13/16 -10 per
cent, although the one year rate was down  1/16 at 10 15/16 -10 7/8 .
The June sterling contract opened at 89.07 and slid to a low of 88.99 on
brisk early selling, before recovering to 89.05.
Day-to-day funding proved more difficult than expected, in spite of the
modest shortage forecast of Pounds 550m, as the Bank of England was prepared
to offer assistance only in shorter bands. The market was not very
interested in taking this up, preferring to sell off longer paper carrying a
greater risk.
The Bank did not operate until midday, when the shortage was revised upwards
to Pounds 600m, and it purchased Pounds 77m band 1 bank bills at 10 3/8 per
cent. In the afternoon, the forecast fell to Pounds 550m, and the Bank
purchased Pounds 76m bank bills in bands 1 and 2. Late assistance of Pounds
250m still left nearly Pounds 150m uncovered.
Overnight rates were up to around 11-10 7/8 per cent by midday, and firmed
in the afternoon to 11 1/2 per cent to reflect the difficult conditions,
before dropping back to 10 1/2 -10 per cent at the close.
German call money was stuck at the 9.60 per cent level as heavy March tax
payments continued to drain liquidity. The tax payments were putting some
banks under pressure yesterday, leading to heavier demand for overnight
money, but dealers said supply and demand were balanced.
The Bundesbank confounded faint rumours that it might tighten its monetary
policy, saying only that its council had discussed economic and monetary
topics and European monetary integration at its meeting with Mr Helmut Kohl,
the German chancellor.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2021</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAG0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Brazil proposals spark rally in
coffee prices
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BILL HINCHBERGER and DAVID BLACKWELL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SAO PAULO, LONDON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
WORLD COFFEE prices moved sharply upwards yesterday on overnight news that
Brazil's private sector had given the government proposals for a new
international coffee pact with economic clauses.
While it remains far from clear exactly what the proposals would entail,
Brazilian government officials say that by next week the details will be
ironed out on their negotiating position. They will present it to the
International Coffee Organisation meeting in London early next month.
London's May robusta contract closed last night at Dollars 874 a tonne, up
Dollars 15 on the day, but still Dollars 1 below the high struck during
trading last Thursday when Brazilian exporters announced that they were
ending their opposition to an export quota system.
In New York, the May arabica contract was 1.20 cents up by midday at 74.9
cents a lb.
Leading associations in all sectors of Brazil's coffee industry - of
growers, processors, exporters and instant coffee producers - have reached a
consensus in favour of some sort of international quota system. This has
convinced the government to run counter to its free market philosophy and
support controls on the coffee trade.
As the world's leading producer of coffee, Brazil is being cautious about
the effects of a bold announcement of its goals in the negotiations. 'This
is an enormously sensitive issue,' admitted Mr Clodoaldo Hugueney Filho, the
foreign ministry's representative at the Wednesday meeting. 'It can affect
the market, so we are going to be very careful.'
Despite the apparent common front in the Brazilian private sector, there are
still many dissenting voices opposed to the establishment of quotas. This
may help determine the attitudes of Brazilian negotiators at the April 3
meeting of producer countries that will precede the general talks.
Last year, Brazil exported 21m sacks, 33 per cent of the global supply. Mr
Pedro de Camargo Neto, president of the Brazilian Rural Society, a producer
group opposed to quotas, believes that most Brazilian private sector
representatives are not inclined to accept a significant reduction in their
output.
'If we go to quotas, it will have to be 30 per cent,' he said. 'Even my
colleagues who are in favour of quotas believe that it has to be an
agreement that is good for Brazil.'
Mr Lawrence Eagles, analyst with GNI, the London futures brokers, said last
night that the Brazilians would have little option but to go for export
quotas. The abandonment of export quotas in July 1989 is thought to have
cost Latin American producers Dollars 6bn in lost revenues.
Observers believe the April ICO meeting will not end with any concrete
proposals for a new coffee agreement, but that negotiations will be well in
hand. 'I think it's very positive,' said one analyst yesterday.
'It's the first time for two or three years that the Brazilians have tried
to be helpful,' said a trader.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2022</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAGZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Government Bonds: Treasuries gain as trade data attracts
attention
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR and SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK, LONDON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
US Treasury prices posted gains along the length of the yield curve in thin
trading yesterday as the market ignored an unexpected sharp drop in jobless
claims and turned its attention, instead, to favourable trade data.
The yield on the benchmark 30-year bond fell through the
psychologically-important 8 per cent mark in the morning. The long bond was
unable to hold on to its highs for the day, and was quoted  7/16 higher at
100 9/32 to yield 7.97 per cent in late trading. Movement was less
pronounced among shorter-dated maturities, with the three-year note firming
 3/32 to yield 6.25 per cent.
The Federal Reserve entered the open market to arrange Dollars 2bn customer
repurchase agreements when Fed funds were trading at 4 1/16 per cent. The
operation, which adds reserves to the banking system, had no implications
for official policy.
The market took a 27,000 decline in jobless claims for the week ended March
7 in its stride, although the drop was larger than expected.
Instead, there was some buying on the back of merchandise trade figures for
January, which showed a decline in exports for a third consecutive month.
UK GOVERNMENT bonds slipped back again on political uncertainty, with the
fall in the other European government bond markets contributing to the weak
sentiment.
With the latest round of opinion polls showing that neither the Labour party
nor the Conservative party has a clear lead in the general election
campaign, the market is likely to focus on fresh polls this weekend, traders
said.
In addition, yesterday's unemployment figures were seen as 'politically
negative' and unlikely to provide much comfort for the gilt market,
according to dealers. The figures showed a seasonally adjusted rise of
40,200 in the number of unemployed in February, taking the total number of
jobless to 2.64m, the highest level since October 1987.
The benchmark 11 3/4 per cent gilt fell from Wednesday's close of 112 to 112
7/32 by late afternoon, yielding 9.875 per cent. Shorter-dated stocks held
up better as traders point out that disappointment over the diminished
prospects of a base rate cut has already been discounted by the market. The
10 per cent gilt due 1996 slipped from 100 1/8 to 100 1/32 , yielding 9.97
per cent.
FRENCH government bonds fell nearly a quarter of a percentage point,
reflecting concern over the outcome of the regional elections this Sunday.
The June futures contract on the Paris Matif fell from Wednesday's close of
107.98, opening at 107.88 yesterday and dropping to 107.68 by late
afternoon.
Elsewhere in Europe, German government bonds weakened during the afternoon
as worries about wage talks continued to unsettle the market.
The Liffe bund futures contract opened at 87.96 and traded in a range of
87.76 to 88.00 before ending the day at around 87.86. Volume was average
with about 48,000 contracts traded.
SPECULATION that the Bank of Japan will cut the official discount rate by
between 50 and 75 basis points during the next few days pushed up Japanese
government bond prices.
The market opened on a firm note, and the futures contract climbed from
102.76 to close at 102.88. The yield on the benchmark No 129 issue started
at 5.35 per cent and ended at 5.345 per cent, trading in a range of 5.335 to
5.385 per cent.
Some Japanese newspapers carried reports yesterday predicting a cut in
interest rates next week, from 4.5 per cent to either 3.75 per cent or 4.0
per cent.
The Bank of Japan took the money market by surprise when it injected Y800bn
in funds shortly before the close of trading, pushing the overnight
unsecured call rate down to 4.5 per cent from 5 5/8 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2023</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAGYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: Daily News seeks time to find
buyer
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN FRIEDMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE New York Daily News, the loss-making tabloid that was acquired last year
by the late Mr Robert Maxwell, has asked a federal bankruptcy judge for more
time to find a buyer and to formulate a reorganisation plan.
The newspaper, which last December filed for protection from its creditors
under Chapter 11 of US bankruptcy law, filed court documents that named four
parties as prospective buyers. These include Mr Conrad Black, the Canadian
publishing tycoon, and Mr Mortimer Zuckerman, the New York property
developer and owner of US News and World Report magazine.
In its filing, the newspaper asked Judge Tina Brozman to extend from April 3
until June 30 the period during which it has the sole right to propose a
reorganisation plan. After that time, creditors could file competing plans.
A hearing has been set for March 27.
Mr Howard Seife, lawyer for the newspaper's creditors, said a number of
prospective buyers had examined the finances and operations of The Daily
News and were meeting with a group that is screening candidates. The
screening panel includes Salomon Brothers, the investment bank adviser to
the newspaper, as well as trade union and creditor representatives.
Mr Kevin Maxwell, who took over as chairman of the newspaper following the
death of his father last November, subsequently resigned his position, along
with other Maxwell-linked directors of the New York newspaper.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2024</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAGXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: Trading in Continental Air
shares suspended
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE American Stock Ex-change yesterday agreed to suspend trading in the
ordinary shares of Continental Airlines, the fifth largest US carrier which
has been operating under Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection since late 1990.
Along with the ordinary shares, the public market in two debt issues will
also be suspended, all with effect from this morning. Five other debt issues
will continue to trade.
The announcement comes after wrangling between the exchange and Continental,
which has said it is anxious to protect investors. The move also highlights
the difficulties in deciding whether to maintain a public market for a
company's securities once it has gone into bankruptcy.
Continental, for example, has filed a reorganisation plan which, if accepted
by creditors and the bankruptcy courts, would render the ordinary shares
worthless. Yet its common stock has continued to change hands, and still
enjoys speculative flurries.
Nor is Continental a one-off. A small British investor lost thousands of
pounds by buying shares in Pam Am when the international carrier filed for
bankruptcy in January 1991. Nine months later, Pam Am - like Continental -
filed a reorganisation plan which would have eliminated the ordinary equity
(although, in this case, the airline eventually folded).
The American Stock Exchange, which is smaller than the New York Stock
Exchange, said that 11 of the 850 companies listed with it were in Chapter
11.
It admits there is no standard policy towards trading in bankrupt companies'
securities - but justifies this on the grounds that every corporate
situation is unique, and judgments need to be made on a case by case basis.
One problem is the length of time that a bankruptcy can last - allowing for
significant jockeying between creditors and changes in underlying trading
fortunes.
The Continental board, however, has now formally authorised the filing of an
application with the Securities and Exchange Commission to 'delist' its
common stock. This is due to be lodged with the SEC shortly.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2025</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAGWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: Dow expects 1993 charge
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DOW Chemical of the US expects to take a one-time after-tax charge of
between Dollars 650m and Dollars 950m in the first quarter of 1993 as a
result of changes in accounting standards, Reuter reports.
The US Financial Accounting Standards Board mandated a change in the accrual
method of accounting for retiree healthcare and life insurance benefits
effective after December 15 1992.
Dow also said that it expected challenging economic conditions to continue
in 1992, but the company should see a resumption in growth from 1991 levels,
when Dow Chemical's net earnings fell 32 per cent to Dollars 3.46 a share.
Monsanto, another US chemical group, also expects to adopt in 1993 an
accounting change covering healthcare and life insurance benefits for
retirees, and estimates its liability will be about Dollars 1bn to Dollars
1.2bn before tax. It has not yet decided whether to take the expense as a
one-time charge against earnings or spread it over a 20-year period.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2026</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAGVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: Canadian Air and American near
deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TORONTO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE long-awaited restruct-uring of Canada's airline industry has come a step
closer with news that American Airlines, one of the top three US carriers,
is at an advanced stage of negotiating a 'comprehensive strategic alliance'
with Canadian Airlines International.
American and Canadian's parent, PWA Corp of Calgary, said yesterday that
detailed talks were being held on an equity investment, joint marketing
programmes and other unidentified reciprocal services. Earlier speculation
suggested that American was planning to acquire a 49 per cent stake in PWA.
Mr Robert Crandall, American's chief executive, said that 'preliminary
discussions have established the basis for an agreement which would
strengthen the competitive position of both carriers'.
In addition to its extensive domestic routes, Canadian operates a highly
profitable service from Canada to various Asian cities. It also flies to
Europe and Latin America. Canadian lost CDollars 161.7m (USDollars 135.8m)
last year on revenues of CDollars 2.9bn.
Any deal struck between the two carriers would face a number of hurdles.
Canadian law at present limits foreign ownership in the airline industry to
25 per cent, and Canadian's main rival, Air Canada, has lobbied vigorously
against any significant foreign involvement in the domestic industry.
Supporters of such a deal have noted that the likely alternative, a merger
between Canadian and Air Canada, would lead to massive lay-offs, without
solving the problem of competition from the emerging global airline
groupings.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2027</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAGUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: Noranda issues hopeful forecast
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GIBBENS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NORANDA, Canada's biggest resource group, said commodity prices appeared to
have bottomed out and it should break even this year and return to
profitability in 1993, writes Robert Gibbens.
The company admitted it had not foreseen the severity of the downturn in
1991 when it suffered a loss of CDollars 133m, or CDollars 1.04 a share, on
revenues of CDollars 8.5bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2028</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAGTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: Teleglobe monopoly extended
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GIBBENS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MONTREAL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CANADA'S federal govern-ment has extended Teleglobe Canada's monopoly on
overseas telecommunications for another five years.
Any other course of action would allow international competitors to fragment
Canada's small telecommunications market and hamper its global development,
said Mr Perrin Beatty, federal communications minister. 'Canadian
telecommunications players must be able to compete internationally,' he
added.
He said the five-year extension would allow Teleglobe to plan ahead, and
after 1997 the 'exclusive mandate' would be reviewed again.
Control of Teleglobe management has shifted recently to Bell Canada, the
eastern Canada telecommunications utility, and its parent BCE has taken over
leadership of the whole trans-Canada public telecommunications system.
Both the government and BCE believe a single public system, including
Teleglobe and its international gateways, is needed to enable Canadian rates
to compete effectively with AT&amp;T of the US. They fear more and more Canadian
voice and data traffic from overseas could be routed through the US.
BCE and the trans-Canada system, now called Stentor, have taken the first
steps in cementing global links.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2029</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAGSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: Commission censures Brierley bid
vehicle
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ROSSINGTON Investments, the vehicle for a bid for Australian Consolidated
Investments (ACIL) by two companies associated with Sir Ron Brierley, was
reprimanded yesterday for an apparent breach of corporate regulations.
Rossington, which is jointly owned by Brierley Investments of New Zealand
and GPG, Sir Ron's UK company, announced on Wednesday that it had reduced
its ADollars 127m (USDollars 95.4m) bid for ACIL from 23 cents a share to
21.5 cents.
The reduction reflected Rossington's revised valuation of ACIL following the
group's agreement to make a ADollars 14m out-of-court settlement to the
liquidator of Spedley Securities, with which ACIL has been engaged in a
legal battle.
Sir Ron accused ACIL of 'gratuitous capitulation' which was 'so inexplicable
that, in the absence of a credible explanation, it will be necessary to
pursue the issue of directors' liabilities for breach of duties and
responsibilities to shareholders'.
However, Mr Michael Braham, the New South Wales regional commission of the
Australian Securities Commission, the corporate regulator, said Rossington's
announcement of its lower bid 'may have caused the market to be
misinformed'.
Mr Braham said the ASC refused Rossington's application to reduce the bid
price on Tuesday and informed the company of its decision on the same day.
The ASC said it would decide next week whether to take any action against
Rossington.
ACIL has rejected Rossington's bid, which the directors said was 'highly
conditional,' and poor value for shareholders.
ACIL shares closed 1 cent lower on the day at 22 cents.
Rossington's bid for ACIL is the first joint takeover attempt by the two
companies with which Sir Ron is associated since he acquired GPG in 1989. He
resigned as Brierley Investments' chairman in 1990 but remains a director.
The bid is conditional on the cancellation of ACIL's plan to sell to Lion
Nathan of New Zealand its 50 per cent share in National Brewing Holdings,
formerly the brewing arm of Mr Alan Bond's Bond Corporation Holdings.
ACIL would also be required to cancel a ADollars 220m float of Bass Strait
oil royalty holdings planned by Weeks Petroleum. ACIL holds a shareholding
of 96 per cent in Weeks, but does not control the board.
Lion Nathan says it has 'an absolute and binding contract' for the purchase
of National Brewing, which would give it 100 per cent control of the
Tooheys, Castlemaine XXXX and Swan brands.
ACIL, formerly known as Bell Resources, was once a vehicle for takeover
activity by the late Mr Robert Holmes a Court, who died last year. It was
later part of the Bond group, which crashed last year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2030</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAGRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: Finmeccanica to go public after
major restructuring
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
FINMECCANICA, the Italian engineering group, is to go public, using one of
its subsidiaries as a vehicle to obtain a listing on the Milan Stock
Exchange, Agencies report from Rome.
IRI, the state holding company which owns Finmeccanica, has approved a
complex operation to restructure and float the engineering group on the
bourse.
The plan involves a L1,200bn capital operation which includes issuing L750bn
in convertible bonds with warrants for shares in the newly quoted company,
IRI said.
Under the plan, Finmeccanica will merge with its Sifa unit, whose shares are
already quoted. Trading in Sifa stock was suspended pending the
announcement.
Finmeccanica would hand IRI the 62.3 per cent of Sifa it controls, then
Finmeccanica will merge with Sifa, IRI said.
The process of merging with a quoted unit is a faster way for Finmeccanica
to quote its shares on the market than applying for a listing itself,
analysts say.
IRI already owns 5.8 per cent of Sifa with the remainder is traded on the
open market. Once Sifa has merged with Finmeccanica, it will change its
name.
Part of the funds generated by the fundraising operation will allow
Finmeccanica to comply with an European Community order to repay to the
government L615bn plus interest accrued since 1989. The EC ruled that the
money, used by Alfa Romeo, the car maker which was at the time owned by
Finmeccanica, was an illegal subsidy.
Last year Finmeccanica posted a consolidated net profit of about L150bn
compared to L119.6bn in 1990.
Finmeccanica employs more than 45,000 workers and is expected to report a
consolidated net profit of L150bn lire for 1991.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2031</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAGQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Thames TV lower at Pounds 8.2m but beats
market expectations
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GARY MEAD, Marketing Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THAMES TV, whose London weekday broadcasting franchise expires at the end of
this year, yesterday reported pre-tax profits of Pounds 8.2m for the year
ended December 31 1991, slightly down from 1990's Pounds 8.9m but rather
better than analysts' forecasts of about Pounds 5m.
However, extraordinary provisions of Pounds 25.5m - made against the group's
need to rapidly scale down its operations this year - meant that it recorded
an overall loss of Pounds 23.5m for the year. Operating profit declined to
Pounds 35.8m (Pounds 40.1m).
The board recommended a final dividend of 5p, making a total of 7.5p (16p)
for the year. Earnings per share fell to 4.1p (10.9p).
Thames reduced its net debt over the year by Pounds 11.5m, leaving it at
Pounds 38.2m at the year-end.
Included in the extraordinary items were costs of more than Pounds 2.75m
incurred in preparing the failed application to renew its broadcasting
licence.
Besides forthcoming redundancy costs, an Pounds 18.8m provision was made for
property which will soon be surplus to requirements. Against that Thames has
benefited by some Pounds 11.5m levy relief and Pounds 9.7m corporation tax
relief.
Thames has progressively shrunk its workforce from more than 1,800 in 1990.
By mid-1993, when restructuring will be completed, it will have less than
250 employees worldwide.
Mr Derek Hunt, finance director, said yesterday that Pounds 22m of the
provisions will cover redundancies.
Revenue over the year grew slightly to Pounds 388m (Pounds 378m). Its share
of the independent television network's advertising revenue increased to
15.32 per cent (15.21 per cent), while overall network revenue fell by 1.6
per cent. However, after discounts, advertising revenue shrank slightly to
Pounds 243m (Pounds 246m).
While revenue from programme sales fell across the world - particularly so
in the US - programme sales in the UK showed a marked improvement to Pounds
97.8m (Pounds 79.1m).
The Independent Television Commission is to shed 53 of its 242 staff by the
end of 1992. The job losses will be achieved by a mix of early retirement,
non-renewal of contracts and redundancies.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2032</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAGPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Jobs go in Coats thread merger
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DANIEL GREEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITAIN'S BIGGEST thread maker is to be created by the merger of Coats
Viyella's J&amp;P Coats division with English Sewing, which CV acquired last
May, when it bought Tootal after a bitter takeover battle. This will lead to
the loss of 350 jobs.
The new company Coats Ltd, which comes into being on April 6, will have
annual sales of Pounds 60m and take about 40 per cent of the UK thread
market.
The job cuts are mostly at J&amp;P Coats manufacturing operations at Paisley,
Scotland. Mr Nick Kershaw, managing director of the merged company, said
yesterday that staffing across Coats Ltd would be down to 800 within a year.
J&amp;P Coats is the junior in the partnership, with about 17 per cent of the UK
market. The combined company will account for about 7 per cent of Coats
Viyella's worldwide thread sales.
The merger will take place a few days after Coats Viyella publishes its
results for 1991 on March 27. The figures will be closely watched by
analysts because they will include eight months of trading after the merger
with Tootal.
Coats Viyella is expected to have made pre-tax profits of about Pounds 108m,
a slight improvement on 1990.
It has already shed some jobs since the merger, but cuts would have been
higher in the thread division had Tootal not closed two spinning mills at
Belper and Matlock in Derbyshire in March 1991 with the loss of 220 jobs.
Mr Kershaw said that these job cuts had helped efficiency.
More than 90 per cent of Coats Ltd's products are made, dyed or finished in
the UK at plants in Scotland, Northern Ireland and Enderby, Leicester.
Its main competitors in the UK are Leicester-based Donisthorpe, owned by
DMC, the French textile group, and Oxley Threads, a family-owned business in
Ashton-under-Lyne, Greater Manchester.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2033</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAGOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Morland shares leap on bid talks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP RAWSTORNE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Morland, the Thames Valley brewer, said yesterday that it was in discussions
'which may or may not lead to an offer for the whole of the issued share
capital' of the company, writes Philip Rawstorne.
The statement followed a 26 per cent rise in the brewer's share price from
373p to 470p.
Morland is believed to be trying to resolve the problems created by the 43.6
per cent stake in the company held by the Whitbread Investment Company.
Unless WIC disposes of the shareholding or substantially reduces it by
November 1, Whitbread will have to add Morland's 300 pubs to its 6,150 in
calculating the number it has to free from tied beer supplies to comply with
government orders.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2034</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAGNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / China neutral on Midland HK deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON DAVIES and ALEXANDER NICOLL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   HONG KONG, LONDON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CHINA indicated yesterday that it would not raise serious objections to
Hongkong and Shanghai Bank's proposed takeover of Midland Bank.
A statement issued in Hong Kong by an unofficial mouthpiece for the Beijing
government allayed fears that the Chinese authorities would see Hongkong
Bank's move as desertion of the territory ahead of China assuming
sovereignty in 1997.
The Hong Kong branch of the China News Service, an unofficial Chinese news
agency which has close ties to Beijing and usually reflects the official
line, said the merger was a means of switching the assets of the colony's
quasi-central bank out of Hong Kong.
But it also said the move by Hongkong Bank to merge with Midland Bank
represented a sound commercial strategy for the long term, because of the
limited potential business growth in Hong Kong.
The China News Service statement added that the proposals reflected 'the
group's strategy of vigorously expanding their overseas business'.
The double-edged response was interpreted as neutral and reflecting an
apparent decision by the Chinese government to adopt a wait-and-see attitude
towards the proposed merger, which will substantially dilute the impact of
earnings in Hong Kong on the enlarged group.
Mr William Purves, Hongkong Bank chairman, kept the Beijing authorities
informed of the bank's plans, and has emphasised its long-term commitment to
the territory. This appears to have lessened the likelihood of any negative
official reaction.
Hongkong Bank's role in the colony is sensitive because it performs some of
the functions of a central bank, including issuing banknotes. Its chairman
sits on the executive council, the governor's most important decision-making
body. However, the Chinese authorities had previously given tacit approval
to its move in 1990 to switch the domicile of its holding company to London.
Concerns about the financial implications for Hongkong Bank of further
overseas expansion continued to weigh on its share price yesterday. It
dropped a further HKDollars 2 to HKDollars 40.25, making an 11 per cent fall
in two days' trading since the plan was announced. Midland Bank's shares
rose 10p to 350p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2035</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAGMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Mack's long haul back to health: Renault's attempts to shake
up the US truck maker
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARTIN DICKSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Mr Michael Helm, general manager at Mack Trucks' Macungie plant on the
outskirts of Allentown, north-east Pennsylvania, points proudly to a huge
void between the assembly lines. 'You could put a tennis court or two
there,' he says.
The void represents some of the 124,00 sq ft of space saved by complete
overhaul of the plant's manufacturing methods since October 1990 when
Renault of France acquired full control of Mack, a troublesome minority
investment it had held since the early 1980s.
Renault yesterday unveiled more than doubled net profits for last year,
though operating earnings fell.
The overhaul at Mack, following a study of Renault's methods at RVI, its
truck and bus division, and after consulting Macungie's own workforce, has
sharply boosted productivity.
For example, parts which used to clutter the production line have been
cleared, cutting inventory expense and making more efficient use of
manpower: one team has been reduced from 10 men to seven because its members
do not have to walk so far to pick up parts.
The reforms Renault is introducing at Mack are mostly standard practice
among leading vehicle manufacturers. But the fact that a state-owned French
company, with a patchy profits record, is teaching such lessons to a grand
old name of the American motor business highlights the blinkered
concentration on the short-term which has led many US industrial companies
to lose their competitive edge.
'There's an American thinking today that 'we know better',' says Mr Helm,
'when in point of fact that's not true.'
'Up to 1990 Mack was a totally egocentric company, with a parochial
culture,' says Mr Elios Pascual, the 51-year-old Frenchman sent by Renault
to turn the company around. 'It became the most fantastic machine for
inventing excuses that I have ever seen.'
About 18 months after the takeover, Mack is still losing money - Dollars
158m (Pounds 91.3m) last year - in a depressed US truck market. But
Renault's reforms hold out the prospect of an eventual return to financial
health.
The company was founded early this century and its trucks, with their
distinctive bulldog mascot, earned a reputation for toughness.
However, in the 1980s the company went badly off the road when management
failed to invest sufficiently in plant or manufacturing techniques and the
quality of its vehicles began to deteriorate.
The problems worsened in 1987 when it moved from Allentown to a new plant in
South Carolina, to escape the United Auto Workers (UAW) union and high
wages.
However, after a legal battle the union won the right to represent the South
Carolina workers. Then a lack of proper quality controls meant poorly
finished vehicles quickly tarnished Mack's reputation.
These factors, and a slump in US demand, prompted Renault to step in to
protect its investment. It launched a takeover, assumed management control
and sent Mr Pascual, a senior executive at RVI, to sort out the mess.
He made a clean sweep of the company's top management, bringing a few senior
French executives and hiring American ones from outside Mack's ingrown
culture.
Arguably his most important reform has been to implement a system for
measuring and controlling quality.
This is standard at most large industrial companies but at the old Mack,
says Mr Pascual, 'the management didn't feel the need for quality tools
because quality was given from God.
'When you have this frame of mind, you don't see things deteriorating.'
The company has also negotiated with the UAW substantial changes in work
rules - untouched since 1972 - to permit more flexible use of labour. And
the number of employees has dropped by 16 per cent to 5,400 since the end of
1990.
The result has been a dramatic improvement in productivity. Hours required
to produce a truck have fallen about 35 per cent where the new techniques
have been introduced. And the quality of vehicles has improved to the point
where Mr Pascual can claim they are among the best in the industry.
But none of this has translated into success in the market. Mack has seen
its share of the North American heavy truck market drop from nearly 20 per
cent at the start of the 1980s to around 11 per cent now. However, the
company argues that this decline has been exaggerated by its reluctance to
compete in the transport fleet market, where manufacturers have been winning
orders through loss-leading discounts, and by the fact that the recession
has hit hardest at markets important for Mack: construction and rubbish
trucks in the north-eastern US.
Mack aims at an 11.6 per cent market share this year, helped by
well-received new models and engines and attempts to woo back customers.
None of this means a rapid return to profits. For one thing, North America's
heavy truck manufacturers - led by Navistar, Paccar and Daimler Benz's
Freightliner, each with roughly 22 per cent of the market - are battling for
market share at a time of weak demand.
With at least twice as much manufacturing capacity as trucks sold, that
spells slim profits for the strongest companies and heavy losses for the
weakest.
The reforms at Mack still have a long way to go. Productivity gains
identified by the new management have to be pushed across the group followed
by squeezing smaller improvements out of the system.
Mack has too much manufacturing capacity - its plants operate at 40 per cent
of their potential output. And it wants further concessions from the UAW
which means some delicate manoeuvring next autumn, when the company begins
negotiations over a new labour contract.
Renault, Volvo, BMW results, Page 25
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2036</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAGLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / US waste group seeks Pounds 405m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY and NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LONDON, NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
WASTE Management, the US group, is to sell 20 per cent of its international
operations in a share placing and offering estimated to raise Pounds 405m.
The Chicago-based group, the largest US waste management company, is
preparing a war chest for opportunities it expects to arise from tightening
environmental regulations in Europe and growth in Asia.
The international operating company, Waste Management International,
anticipates an offer price between 530p and 645p. At 587.5p, the mid-range
price, the offering values the company at 30 times 1991 earnings, well above
UK companies in the sector.
About 26m of the 75m new Waste Management International shares will be
placed in the UK, 30m are being simultaneously offered in the US and nearly
19m will be offered for sale outside the UK, the US and Canada.
Cazenove is broker to the UK placing while Merrill Lynch is acting as global
co-ordinator to the offer.
After the offerings and flotation Waste Management International will have
almost no debt, shareholders' funds of about Pounds 500m and a Dollars 750m
(Pounds 433m) credit line from its parent. Waste Management has also
effectively guaranteed up to Pounds 170m for any potential future
environmental liabilities at its 80 facilities.
The prospectus says Waste Management will be seeking further acquisitions
and also permits and licences for new greenfield sites.
The group has collected citations for pollution violations from the US
Environmental Protection Agency.
In recent years, Waste Management has made efforts to improve its image. In
the fourth quarter of 1991, the parent company took a Dollars 260m pre-tax
charge for the estimated clean-up costs at old dump sites. Waste
Management's after-tax profits last year fell from Dollars 684.8m to Dollars
606.3m as a result.
In the Security and Exchange Commission filing, Waste Management
International says Pounds 227m of the funds raised by the offering will
repay debt owed to the parent company.
Lex, Page 18; Caird, Page 22
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2037</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAGKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / US breast implant maker to withdraw from market
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN FRIEDMAN and CLIVE COOKSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK, LONDON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE WORLD'S largest maker of silicone breast implants plans to withdraw from
the business.
Dow Corning, a 50-50 joint venture between Dow Chemical and Corning based in
Michigan, also said yesterday that it would set up a Dollars 10m (Pounds
5.7m) fund for research and would offer up to Dollars 1,200 to women wishing
to have the implants surgically removed.
The business has been plagued by political controversy, lawsuits and US
congressional investigations.
In abandoning the market, Dow Corning follows two other companies that have
done the same. Bristol-Myers Squibb stopped making a different type of
implant last April and Bioplasty, a small company, withdrew last week. Two
other small US companies remain in the market: Mentor and McGhan Medical.
The US Food and Drug Administration (FDA) placed a moratorium on silicone
implant sales in January after questions were raised about the product's
safety. Internal Dow Corning memos were released that are alleged to show
negligence by the company, a charge it denies.
An FDA ruling next month may place tight restrictions on the future sale of
the implants, some 80 per cent of which are used by women desiring cosmetic
surgery.
Dow Corning's decision nonetheless seems likely to spell the effective
phasing out of the US implant industry and could yet lead to some of the
largest product liability claims in recent history.
The company estimated that about 750,000 women around the world have Dow
Corning implants, which were introduced in 1962. The number of women in the
US is around 450,000. The actual number of implants made by Dow Corning is
1.3m.
Depending on how many women wish to take advantage of Dow Corning's offer of
Dollars 1,200 for surgical removal, the company could face costs of Dollars
900m or more. Dow Corning stressed that it would only reimburse women who
could not otherwise afford the surgery and whose doctors stated the
procedure was medically needed. The company has not decided how it will help
women outside the US pay for the removal of unwanted implants.
Dow Corning took a Dollars 25m charge in the fourth quarter of last year to
cover legal and other costs related to the implant controversy which
included the Dollars 10m research fund announced yesterday.
The company disclosed last week that it has Dollars 250m of insurance to
cover potential legal costs stemming from claims that the implants damaged
the health of patients.
But analysts say that the hundreds of lawsuits outstanding could create a
potential liability of more than Dollars 1bn - quite apart from the costs
related to surgical removal.
Corning is more reliant on implant revenues than Dow Chemical, and Corning's
share price has halved - to yesterday's Dollars 34 - since December.
In the UK, the government's chief medical officer Dr Kenneth Calman has
consistently reassured women about the safety of breast implants. He
maintains that they are not dangerous and do not carry an increased risk of
cancer.
However, most implants used in the UK are imported from the US. Therefore,
Dow Corning's withdrawal from the market will affect availability.
Dow Chemical charge, Page 27
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2038</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAGJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Appeal Court frees Cyprus bank's assets: Overturning of
Mareva injunction likely to be welcomed by bankers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND HUGHES, Law Courts Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A COURT ORDER freezing a bank's assets should be made only in unusual
circumstances, Sir John Donaldson, Master of the Rolls - the senior judge of
the Court of Appeal - said yesterday in a ruling likely to be welcomed by
bankers.
The so-called Mareva injunctions, named after the first case in which one
was imposed, have been widely used in recent years to avoid dissipation of
assets pending a final ruling in a court action. They are frequently imposed
on banks holding defendants' assets.
Banking business, Sir John said, was fundamentally dependent on the
maintenance of customer confidence that a bank could and would meet its
obligations.
Any order that could cause a 'run on the bank' would be inimical to the
purposes for which the jurisdiction to grant asset freezing orders existed.
Sir John made his comments when the Appeal Court lifted a Mareva injunction
freezing Pounds 38.9m of the worldwide assets of the Central Bank of
Northern Cyprus.
Such injunctions were granted in November to the administrators of Polly
Peck International, who are trying to recover about Pounds 1bn of the failed
international trading company's assets that they believe have been
misapplied by Mr Asil Nadir, the former chairman, and others.
The court was told that the administrators' current estimate was that there
would be a Pounds 190m surplus in Polly Peck after the costs of the
administration had been deducted.
In their pending action, the administrators claim from the Central Bank
Pounds 44.9m transferred to it by Industrial Bank of Kibris, a Northern
Cyprus bank controlled by Mr Nadir. They assert that the Central Bank knew,
or should have suspected, that the funds were being improperly diverted away
from Polly Peck.
Allowing an appeal by the Central Bank, Lord Justice Scott said the Mareva
injunction had already seriously interfered with its normal business and, if
maintained, would be likely to cause it irreparable harm.
Polly Peck's claim against the bank was 'no more than speculative', the
judge said, and it was not only wrong in principle, but positively unfair,
to impose an asset-freezing order interfering with a defendant's normal
course of business before any liability had been established.
The judge said the Mareva injunction was merely intended to prevent a
defendant defeating a plaintiff's chances of recovery by dissipating or
secreting away assets.
That principle made it very difficult to grant a Mareva against a bank,
which had to repay depositors in accordance with the terms on which deposits
were held.
The Central Bank's only customers were the authorised banks of Northern
Cyprus, which were required to keep 20 per cent of their foreign currency
holdings in the Central Bank to ensure their foreign currency liquidity.
There was evidence that the Central Bank's foreign currency liquidity had
been very seriously affected by the freezing order, Lord Justice Scott said.
Sir John Donaldson, who observed that it was the first case in which a
Mareva order had been sought against a bank as a defendant, said a central
or reserve bank could not continue to fulfil its proper functions under
local law if subject to an injunction on the way it transacted its business.
The appeal judges ordered that the Pounds 10.7m balance of the Pounds 44.9m
still held by the central bank in Midland Bank in London should be earmarked
in a separate account and not used other than in the normal course of
business, unless there were no other funds available in England. The central
bank must also inform Polly Peck's solicitors of any proposed use of the
Pounds 10.7m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2039</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAGIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / The Lex Column: Waste Management
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The pathfinder prospectus for the flotation of Waste Management
International confirms that its US parent has posed a teaser for UK
investors. Assuming WMI increases its earnings per share by one third this
year, its shares will be on a prospective multiple of 23 if priced in the
middle of the range suggested by the group's advisers, or 26 at the top of
the range. That compares with historic multiples of 19 for Caird after
yesterday's results, and 18 for Shanks &amp; McEwan. It is just possible that
both valuations are right. The flotation could prove a lively affair all the
same.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2040</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAGHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / The Lex Column: Guinness
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Yesterday's fall of more than 2 per cent in Guinness shares suggests that
the equity market has still not fully adapted to low inflation. On its own
admission, Guinness will find it harder to raise prices in a
non-inflationary environment. In nominal terms its profits, which have more
than doubled since 1987, will grow more slowly even if they still show a
real increase. That might necessitate some adjustment to the rating,
especially relative to depressed manufacturing companies with recovery
potential. But in its haste to take the point on board, the market appears
to have overdone the gloom.
Admittedly, acquisitions in beer and other spirits will gradually reduce the
share of high-margin Scotch in the overall business. Margins on spirits rose
an underlying 2 percentage points to 33 per cent last year. They cannot
continue to widen indefinitely, but there is still room for improvement as
consumers move up-market after the recession. Nor does lower inflation mean
volume growth has stopped dead in its tracks. There seems no reason why
earnings should not advance by, say, 10 per cent in 1992 from last year's
33.6p. The forward multiple of around 15 is not demanding.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2041</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAGGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / The Lex Column: Cable &amp; Wireless
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Judging by yesterday's 5 per cent fall in Cable &amp; Wireless shares, the
market thinks the telecoms group has lost the sureness of touch demanded of
highly rated companies. The irony is that the restructurings announced
yesterday for its business service and personal communications network (PCN)
divisions appear to make sound commercial sense, even though the
accompanying Pounds 50m exceptional provision suggests this year's earnings
per share will be slightly lower than the 31p reached last year.
Under its chairman, Lord Young, the group has been steadily moving away from
the idea that it is a global provider of premium services, partly because
competition has forced it to reduce the scope of its ambitions. Arguably,
C&amp;W needs a stronger and narrower base from which to compete in the crowded
business sector, while yesterday's joint venture with US West in the nascent
PCN market both removes a competitor and creates a more powerful threat to
cellular operators like Vodafone.
Perhaps understandably, the market was more inclined to the view that this
latter arrangement has scotched the chance of a deal between Mercury and
AT&amp;T. It may be that C&amp;W is paying the price for refining its strategy in
public, a notion raised first by the on-off talks with AT&amp;T and more
recently by the abrupt departure of a senior manager. On balance, investors
are probably right to show scepticism until C&amp;W proves it has recovered its
poise.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2042</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAGFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / The Lex Column: GRE
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Although the market clings to the idea of a takeover bid for Guardian Royal
Exchange, investors would be silly to get carried away. The lack of much
domestic mortgage guarantee exposure, to be sure, makes the company a more
attractive target than Royal. But it is still hard to imagine an aggressive
suitor stepping out from the ranks of wounded UK composite and preoccupied
continental insurers.
That leaves the question of whether yesterday's 12 per cent jump in GRE's
shares was justified by evidence from last year's results alone. The answer
is quite probably yes. The apparent determination to make rate rises stick
and polish underwriting skills smacks of a company prepared to sacrifice
market share. Pre-tax losses may have increased by one third in 1991 to a
mind-shuddering Pounds 210m; but, thanks to a Pounds 30m tax credit and the
41 per cent dividend cut, the year end solvency ratio of 43 per cent is
enough to keep GRE out of the casualty wards.
Given the nature of general insurance risks, the effort to demonstrate an
underlying improvement in second-half UK underwriting results is less
convincing. At best, things look to be going from worse to bad. Doubts will
persist about the quality of GRE, but a 15 per cent discount to net assets
and 7.3 per cent historic yield provide fair value in the short term.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2043</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAGEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / The Lex Column: Working assumptions for the polls
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
FT-SE Index: 2,467.6 (+2.9)
The only consolation for the government in yesterday's unemployment figures
is that they could have been worse. A monthly rise of 42,000 is broadly in
line with the average for the previous three months, so at least the trend
is not accelerating. That said, the Tories will not have been helped in
marginal constituencies by the regional breakdown. The south-east and the
Midlands accounted for nearly 90 per cent of the total monthly increase.
A more general worry is the way in which average earnings continue to grow
by more than 7 per cent despite the decline in inflation and continuing
announcements of large-scale lay-offs. This may reflect the continuing
impact of high pay awards last spring, in which case one could expect the
figure to drop fairly quickly. It may also be that redundancies have been
concentrated among lower-paid workers, pushing up the average pay of those
that remain. That might in turn explain why so little of what ought to be a
sharp increase in real wages is finding its way into extra spending in the
high street.
Even if the statistics overstate the underlying trend in wage growth, the
high reported rate could be especially awkward for Labour if it wins the
election. It leaves less grounds for resisting catch-up demands from
public-sector employees. That would put a further strain on Mr John Smith's
budget, whose Pounds 28bn borrowing requirement for 1992-93 already looks
less than convincing.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2044</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAGDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Tsongas quits presidential race
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JUREK MARTIN, US Editor
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR PAUL TSONGAS yesterday ended his attempt to become the US Democratic
party's presidential nominee.
The withdrawal of the former senator from Massachusetts means that both the
Democratic and Republican fields have been reduced to a clear front runner
and a dissident outsider, with no other contender apparently in sight.
Mr Tsongas, the first in either party formally to declare a candidacy nearly
a year ago, gave up because he was beaten in recent primary contests, mostly
by Governor Bill Clinton of Arkansas, and because political money is not
attracted to losers.
Defeats in Michigan and Illinois on Tuesday were the writing on the wall and
Mr Tsongas's dog-tired interviews after those primaries showed he knew it.
He declined to endorse either of the remaining Democratic contenders, Mr
Clinton or Mr Jerry Brown, the former governor of California, but said Mr
Clinton was 'certainly in the driver's seat'. Mr Tsongas said he did not
want to stay in the Democratic race just as a 'spoiler'.
Logically, Mr Clinton should be the principal beneficiary of Mr Tsongas's
withdrawal, because the policy gap between them is much narrower than that
between Mr Tsongas and Mr Brown. This should show up in next week's
Connecticut primary, where Mr Tsongas, from a neighbouring state, might have
done well.
But Mr Tsongas has repeatedly said he would not be Mr Clinton's running mate
because they disagree profoundly on key aspects of economic policy,
particularly Mr Clinton's advocacy of a middle-class tax cut. Recent
exchanges between the two have also been bitter. There may not, therefore,
be an instant rush of support to Mr Clinton.
Mr Tsongas leaves the contest with honour, having made some cogent points,
especially on economic policy. He also claims that he showed the way to
other Democrats. Ignoring the obvious handicap of being another Greek from
Massachusetts, like 1988 presidential contender Mr Michael Dukakis, he took
on the president when Mr Bush, in the afterglow of the Gulf war, appeared
unassailable. Now Mr Bush's rating is more like 40 per cent and his
re-election far from assured.
Mr Tsongas stood on the right of the party. Although a liberal on social
issues, he did not promise tax cuts for the individual, but advocated tax
breaks for investment in manufacturing, eschewed protectionism, and
generally called for sacrifices in the cause of economic revitalisation.
His appeal, demonstrated not only in his native New England but in such
states as Maryland and Delaware, was mostly to more affluent Democrats, just
the sort of constituency that deserted the party in the last three
elections.
This proved more effective than conventional campaigns by Senators Tom
Harkin of Iowa and Bob Kerrey of Nebraska - who sought organised labour's
backing - but was no match for Mr Clinton's broad-based approach and
infinitely superior organisation.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2045</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAGCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Letter: UK and US suffer same problems but politicians are
not addressing them
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Prof JEREMY J SIEGEL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, In your editorial, 'An election that matters' (March 10), you state
that neither the Tories nor Labour is talking about Britain's most trenchant
problems, specifically '. . . a disastrous secondary education system; local
government, which has lost its independent fiscal base and its sense of
purpose; and a labour market, battered by legal change and economic boom and
bust, still failing to train enough skilled workers.'
For a moment I was sure I was reading about the US] It is striking that the
nub of our two countries' challenges could be so similar, yet our
presidential candidates avoid discussing these very same issues. Certainly
one could assert that Britain is now suffering the same plight as the US
because Margaret Thatcher, an ideological soul mate to Ronald Reagan,
allowed these problems to fester during her 12-year reign.
But I believe the source of our common problems runs much deeper. The easy
transference of technology and production to the populated 'third world'
countries means that the return to manual ('blue collar') labour is
declining and will inevitably fall further. The 30 years which followed the
Second World War brought unprecedentedly high wages to US labour, but that
was because the US was the only working economy after the war. Now that the
rest of the world, teeming with unskilled labour, is eager to join in this
prosperity, unskilled wages will decline
In the US, low-skilled government workers, who constitute the only growing
union movement, are trying to maintain their own wages despite the decline
in those of their fellow workers in the private sector. The cities are
caught in a squeeze trying to cope simultaneously with the demands of unions
and the lower classes who are increasingly alienated and unprepared for the
changing demands of the workplace. Public education shoulders much blame
because it lacks the structure to teach new skills and offer a fresh vision
of the future. In the US too many students are expected to go to college and
acquire a working permit called a 'diploma', often emerging untrained for
the jobs available in areas of expanding employment, such as computers,
health care and skilled trades.
The changing demands on the workforce will eventually affect all other
industrialised nations. Continental Europe's economy appears ready to follow
Britain's and the US's into a recession. Many of their cities show some of
the same deterioration as those in America, as swarms of immigrants,
attempting to take advantage of western Europe's higher living standards,
are not being integrated into society. Even Japan, which deals with a
totally homogeneous population, is battered by scandal in government, a real
estate collapse that dwarfs our own, and the loss of manufacturing jobs to
the new Asian markets.
The responses to these challenges are not easy, but no politician is talking
about them. The world would be infinitely richer if we allowed free trade
among nations and heavily supported and/or retrained those who lost their
jobs as a result. Furthermore, the educational system must be revamped so
that job preparation, as well as general education, becomes a primary goal.
The future can be bright for America and the rest of the world if the common
nature of many of our problems is confronted directly, rather than lost in
meaningless rhetoric of 'middle class tax cuts', 'capital gains', or 'Buy
American'. Yes, this election matters - but not about matters currently
debated by the world's politicians.
Jeremy J Siegel,
professor of finance,
Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania,
Philadelphia PA 19104-630, US
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2046</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAGBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Major's best bet
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOE ROGALY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The Conservatives have not had a good week. There is one sure-fire argument
in favour of re-electing them, and so far they have failed to get it across.
Sure-fire? Sure. What would win the election for Mr John Major would be a
general belief that Labour cannot be trusted - not on taxation, not with
management of the market economy, and not on the ground of general
competence.
We have no need to spend long hours discussing whether this proposition is
sound. To do so would be to engage in what Mr Christopher Patten, the
Conservative party chairman, refers to when pursued with awkward questions
as 'Socratic discourse'. Soundness is not the issue. What matters is what
people perceive. Do floating voters in marginal constituencies think that
Labour can be trusted, or do they not?
The story of the first week of this election is that Labour has - so far
successfully - positioned itself to be given the benefit of the doubt. It
may have done so unfairly, or on specious grounds, but that is beside the
point. Judgments of the nature of its methods will vary according to
political taste. The unpalatable fact with which the Tories have to wrestle
is that many uncommitted voters remain to be persuaded that Mr Neil Kinnock
is a red-blooded wild and woolly socialist under that smart dark-blue suit.
It may turn out to be difficult to win great numbers of non-Conservatives
over to such a view. Even ministers fighting with the desperation born of
fear of the loss of office will find it an uphill struggle. For the Tories
have only three weeks in which to sell their inherently negative message.
The opposition has spent three years burying its unmentionable past - or
nine if you date the beginning of the turnaround from 1983, as some do. The
precise year is not important. Mr Kinnock never had a chance of winning
while memories of the abysmal performance of the Labour governments of
1974-79 were fresh. These unpalatable recollections are now stale; younger
voters regard them as history.
Labour has not merely waited for time and the leftist ascendancy over its
affairs to pass. It has used its years with some skill. It has concentrated
on making itself look unfrightening to voters. This has been its principal
objective, to the exclusion of almost everything else. Policies the
electorate found repellent have been abandoned. The language of one
revisionist programme after another has been refined. The latest political
broadcast conveys patriotism and conservative virtue. A formerly angry party
whose historic roots are buried deep in the old unionised working class has
dressed itself in the raiment of the middle classes. Mr Michael Foot's
duffle coat has been hung up; in its place is the dress-code of senior
management.
Mr Patten and his colleagues have striven to tear
Labour has positioned itself to be given the benefit of the doubt
all this away, to reveal what they honestly believe to be the clumsy,
grasping, egalitarian, tax-grabbing monster beneath. They made the attempt
again yesterday morning, with an attack on the cunning budget presented by
Mr John Smith on Monday. This, it was argued by the prime minister, the
chancellor and the employment secretary, would increase taxation for the
middle classes, and add to unemployment. That was not all. It was also
incompetent. 'This is not just a mock budget,' said Mr Major, speaking
election-ese, 'it's a mockery of a budget.'
I asked Mr Patten whether this line of attack would continue. The reply was
a robust affirmative. The manifesto issued by Labour on Wednesday would be
fully costed. The message would be driven home. Yesterday was not, however
the day for it. The unemployment figures and the news of the marital
difficulties of the Duchess of York stole the headlines. Thus did fate
conspire both to help the government by reducing the visibility of the
unemployment statistics and simultaneously to hinder it by frustrating its
assault on Labour.
Yet concentrating fire on Mr Smith's tax plans, and by extension Labour's
perceived untrustworthiness, is not an entirely hopeless endeavour. Monday's
alternative budget redistributes large sums of money from high earners to
everyone else; those high earners include the very London-based scribes and
broadcasters whose task it is to disseminate what the participants in the
election have to say. Thus there should be no difficulty about delivering
the Conservative message, which is that more people than Labour thinks are
turned away by the thought of a sudden 9 per cent impost on all earnings
above Pounds 22,000 a year, let alone a further 10 per cent not all that
much higher up the scale.
There is therefore sense in the Patten strategy of working on potential Tory
voters' natural mistrust of Labour - a mistrust that, in spite of Mr
Kinnock's efforts, has been suppressed, not obliterated. If the Tories'
knocking copy gathers strength from repetition, Mr Smith's achievement in
selling his budget on Monday may turn out to be short-lived. In those
circumstances the trend in the opinion polls, which has favoured Labour this
week, would be reversed. Mr Major's mistake in getting himself into a
position in which he was obliged to call an election in mid-recession would
quickly be forgotten.
Another, less happy, possibility exists. Labour's calculations of the number
of gainers from its proto-budget may be accepted by most voters. Then every
Tory mention of Labour's plans will be an advertisement for Labour. That
happened with the National Health Service. The government's NHS policy is
right, but it will never be believed and therefore it is aways tactically
wrong to mention it. Taxation is a Tory issue, but on the polling evidence
so far, exploiting it has not worked to the government's advantage. It had
better start doing so soon, if Mr Major is to be saved.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2047</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAGAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Leading Article: Politics and unemployment
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE IDEA that unemployment does not affect the outcome of UK general
elections is now being put to severe test. Mrs Thatcher had the good sense,
or good fortune, to seek re-election when the economy was growing and
unemployment was rising slowly or falling. Not so Mr Major. Against a
background of falling output and accelerating unemployment, he must persuade
nervous southern householders that things would be worse under Labour. The
polls suggest voters are not convinced.
Yesterday's figures will do little to ease their fears. Unemployment has
accelerated upwards in recent months and is rising fastest in the south and
west Midlands, where many finely balanced Tory marginals are concentrated.
And the figures will probably be rising for another year or more. The case
against the government is that its errors caused the recession. The case for
change is that unemployment will peak earlier and fall faster if Labour is
elected. It is a case that Labour has yet to make convincingly.
The exchange rate mechanism will constrain the ambitions of whichever party
is elected, assuming their resistance to devaluation is sustained. The
recovery, when it finally comes, will remain sluggish until German interest
rates start to fall and maybe longer.
Fiscal stance
Nor does fiscal policy materially differentiate the two parties. Both
budgets implied the same overall fiscal stance, although Labour would
channel more money into temporary investment incentives and infrastructure
spending than into tax cuts. Labour's package would probably be slightly
more expansionary. Independent calculations from the National Institute of
Economic and Social Research suggest growth under Labour would be 3 per cent
in 1993 compared to 2.7 per cent under the Conservatives. Yet the difference
between them is dwarfed by the normal margin of error in forecasts.
It is the two parties supply-side policies that will most affect the
long-term difference in the rates of economic growth they can deliver. In
the field of support for the unemployed and wage-bargaining, the government
offers more of the same while Labour offers modest change.
Yet not all of Labour's reforms are desirable. The NIESR expects
unemployment to be 300,000 lower under Labour in 1993, largely because of
the more extensive package of support for the unemployed promised in its
manifesto. Commendably, Labour promises to restore last year's cuts in
spending on training for the unemployed in order to guarantee job experience
or training, as well as just counselling, for everyone unemployed for over
six months. But it also plans a statutory minimum wage which would cost
upwards of 100,000 jobs - ostensibly to end 'poverty pay', but in reality to
appease the public sector unions.
Archaic system
Labour has also shuffled towards bringing some order to the archaic UK
system of wage bargaining. Yesterday brought the dismal news that UK average
earnings have fallen by less than one percentage point since last June,
since when unemployment has risen by 350,000. At this rate, many more jobs
will have to go before the UK finally gets its rate of wage inflation down
to a sustainable level within the ERM.
Labour's national economic assessment might, at least, focus the minds of
British businesses and trade unions on the need to cut wage inflation to
below 5 per cent. The risk is that it, as with many of Labour's proposals,
could become a tool for government intervention to protect interest groups
when the going gets tough.
Labour now talks the language of the market and stresses the need to boost
Britain's miserable labour productivity. It also recognises that government
has a role in providing better incentives for training, guidance on wage
expectations and direct measures to cut long-term unemployment. The risk is
that Labour would more than undo all of these good things by impeding
competition and pricing the unskilled out of work.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2048</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAF9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Technology: Tamarins return to the jungle - A Brazilian
experiment to save an endangered species from extinction
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTINA LAMB
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
In a lush patch of Brazilian rainforest a group of golden lion tamarins
discover the joys of swinging between trees. Brought up in the Los Angeles
zoo and recently introduced to the wild, they form part of one of the
world's most successful experiments in saving a species from extinction.
The project brings together first and third world nations, private and
public sectors, environmentalists and farmers, as well as several scientific
disciplines. Its techniques are now being copied worldwide.
Only 450 of the monkeys survive in the wild. Throughout this century many
have been captured to keep as domestic pets by people attracted by their
exotic beauty and flaming golden fur. Moreover, their natural habitat has
almost disappeared.
The animal has been rescued through the combined forces of Aldemar Coimbra,
Brazil's first primate specialist, and Devra Kleiman, a director of the
National Zoo in Washington.
Coimbra realised the danger in the 1960s when there were around 600 left. He
was unable to raise much interest until 1972 when Kleiman held a conference
in Washington on Saving the Golden Lion Tamarin. Experts from Europe and the
US discussed how tamarins could be reproduced in captivity and then
reintroduced to their native habitat.
Breeding tamarins in zoos proved so successful that there are now more in
captivity than in the wild. 'When I started there were just 72 animals in 16
zoos. Now we have more than 550 in 130 zoos and a third of them are on
contraceptives because they are growing so quickly that we cannot find zoos
for them,' says Kleiman.
In 1983 the team of Brazilian and American scientists began the more
difficult process of reintroducing those born in captivity into the Atlantic
rainforest in the Poco das Antas biological reserve south of Rio. So far 69
have been reintroduced with a 70 per cent survival rate and a further 60 are
to be reintroduced this year.
Denise Rambaldi, who heads the field programme, says that the animals
generally adapt quickly. 'Initially they do not know how to defend
themselves against predators and they fall over a lot because they're used
to stronger branches in their cages. But after the third tumble they usually
learn.'
According to Rambaldi, the main indicator of the project's success is the
ability of the reintroduced animals to breed among themselves and with their
wild cousins. Of 33 surviving offspring at least 10 are the result of
crossing wild and reintroduced tamarins, adding variety to the gene pool.
Family histories are kept on all former captive and wild tamarins to avoid
inbreeding.
'There is no doubt that the ability of once-captive tamarins to bear
offspring sometimes by mating with wild tamarins and their gradual ability
to feed themselves in the wild proves that reintroducing them into their old
habitat has been a success,' says Coimbra.
The project is special for several reasons, says Kleiman. Reintroducing
captive-born animals is a pioneering method of preserving species, and the
preservation of tropical forests is a developing science. It brings together
130 zoos, IBAMA (the Brazilian state environment agency), the World Wildlife
Fund and the Rio Primate Centre.
The success of the project is far from guaranteed. 'We're fighting against
time. In less than 20 years tamarins could be extinct in Brazil and thus
worldwide', warns Coimbra.
The main problem is lack of forested land. The reserve is only 5,500
hectares, of which 60 per cent is covered by forest. Each group of five or
six monkeys requires 40 hectares of forest and Kleiman estimates that 20,000
hectares are needed to keep the 2,000 tamarins necessary for the breed's
sustainable survival. 'The larger aim of the project is to regenerate the
Atlantic forest for tamarins and other endangered species,' she adds.
Consequently, the project's organisers are trying to involve private
business, aiming to raise Dollars 250,000 a year to buy remaining
forestland. So far they have persuaded 11 farmers to dedicate their
remaining forest to protection for the monkeys.
Another problem is a wave of tamarin robberies to sell on Brazil's black
market. At least 10 have been stolen in the last year and a publicity
programme has been launched to raise local consciousness.
'When we have the international community supporting the feeding and
maintenance of these animals outside Brazil, sending them to Brazil and then
hearing they have been stolen it does not look good for Brazil,' warns
Kleiman.
One answer has been to hand every tamarin back in a special ceremony to the
Brazilian government to create more local responsibility. But Mr Jairo
Costa, President of the Brazilian Foundation for Conservation which helps
fund the project, believes a tougher crackdown on the trade is necessary.
'Catching an animal is regarded as a source of wealth. It is hard to
persuade someone with hunger in his stomach that for the sake of ecology he
should remain hungry.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2049</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAF8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Asian vote explodes new myths about party
allegiances - Campaigners' efforts to target ethnic minorities with ethnic
issues may have been misplaced
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD DONKIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ANOTHER grey evening was drawing in as Mr Mohammed Ishaq studiously chewed a
date to break his fast for Ramadan, which ends a few days before polling
day. For Moslems it is a time of religious cleansing, but it may take longer
for some of the Nottingham community to purge their bitterness towards the
Labour party.
'If you say to me, why are you voting Labour? What have they done for you? I
have no answer for you,' says Mr Ishaq.
His word is important in this area of brick-built terraces which supports
about 100 Moslem families. No more than a handful of Moslem men have jobs in
this part of Nottingham South, where the Tories are trying to hang on to a
4.2 per cent majority over Labour.
Next door, in Nottingham East, the Conservative majority is even more
slender and, on the basis of the present polls, the seat should fall to
Labour with ease.
Labour's doubt concerns a section of its traditional Moslem supporters who
feel that the party's national executive engineered a split among Moslem
constituency members when Mr John Heppell, deputy leader of Nottinghamshire
County Council, was selected as the Labour candidate earlier this year.
The squabble has been marked by claims, counter-claims and a national
executive investigation into constituency membership irregularities. But the
allegations are less important than how Moslems react at the polls.
Acrimony over Nottingham East has spilled over into Nottingham South and
many working class Moslems, upon whom Labour could have relied, seem intent
on making the party sweat it out until election day.
Mr Ishaq, a firm Labour supporter, says that he is not so sure. He is angry
and feels let down by Labour's failure to select an Asian candidate in
either seat. As the local halal butcher explains: 'How Ishaq votes, I vote,
and that counts for everyone around here.'
Even so, most of the local Moslems are likely to back Labour. 'The Labour
party may have split the community but they haven't yet split the family,'
says Mr Ishaq.
Moslem anger among Britain's Asian-origin communities is becoming a hallmark
of election campaigns but it has yet to manifest itself in a significant
shift from Labour. The more organised groups, such as Bradford Council of
Mosques, are presenting candidates with lists of issues and using the
campaign to put over minority grievances.
Such lists tend to mask the true voting intentions and concerns of Britain's
estimated 1.8m voters of Asian origin.
Dr Shamit Saggar, a lecturer in politics at Queen Mary and Wedfield College
at the University of London, says: 'Attitudes of Asian voters to politicians
and policies are remarkably similar to those of white electors.'
Drawing on a 1987 Harris poll, he says the two most important issues among
people of Asian origin are unemployment and prices. Since 1979, immigration
issues have dropped well down the list of Asian concerns, he says.
Election candidates, he argues, worry too much about what they perceive as
important ethnic issues. 'They would be better off approaching an Asian
doorstep as they do any other.'
Traditional Asian support for Labour appears to be holding firm in spite of
Conservative contentions that they are natural Tory supporters.
A poll by Harris last year for East, BBC 2's Asian-affairs programme, said
76 per cent of Asians intended to vote Labour, 18 per cent Conservative and
4 per cent Liberal Democrat. This indicates that more people of Asian origin
intend to vote Labour than in 1987, although their support has fallen since
1990.
Dr Saggar believes the statistics 'explode the myth' that they are switching
allegiance to the Conservatives in significant numbers.
A Sikh trader who commutes from Leicester to Nottingham, where he runs an
electrical shop, says: 'I may wear a tie but I carry the boxes into my shop
and I drive the van. I may work for myself but I'm still working and Labour
is still the party for the working man.'
Efforts by Mr Kenneth Baker, the home secretary, and Mr Norman Tebbit before
him to woo the rich Asian vote have secured high-profile supporters but
failed to make significant inroads into the community and are unlikely to
trouble either Mr Keith Vaz, the sitting MP in Leicester East, or Mr
Greville Janner in Leicester West, both Labour marginals where the party
expects to increase its vote.
A far more important marginal for the Conservatives, where local organisers
believe the ethnic vote is crucial in deciding the outcome, is Walsall
South, which has been troubled by Labour in-fighting on the local authority.
Tories are convinced that Labour's 2.2 per cent majority is vulnerable and
are targeting the Asian vote - which they say shifted towards the Tories in
the last local elections.
Mr Najabit Ali, a working-class Asian Moslem and Conservative party member
since 1977, is about to be made redundant when the Walsall company for which
he works closes down. But he does not blame the government, and has no plans
to switch allegiances. 'I used to vote Labour but now I think my interests
are best-served by the Conservatives,' he says.
Apart from Nottingham East, other Conservative marginals where the ethnic
vote could be significant include Birmingham Selly Oak and Slough.
The Asian-born Conservative candidate who appears to have the best chance of
success is Mr Nirj Deva, the Sri Lankan-born company director and Bow Group
chairman defending a 7,953 majority in the Brentford and Isleworth seat
formerly held by Sir Barney Hayhoe, who has retired.
The issue may be less whether people of Asian origin will vote Tory, more
whether Tories will vote Asian. Research suggests that the ethnic background
of a candidate has little bearing on voting intentions.
A survey commissioned by the Runnymede Trust last year found that 86 per
cent of white people would vote for British citizens of Asian origin
standing for a party of their choice.
The 11 per cent who declared themselves less likely to vote for an Asian
candidate could be significant in Langbaurgh in the north-east, a
constituency with few ethnic voters, won from the Tories by Labour's Mr
Ashok Kumar in the November 1991 by-election but with less of a swing than
had been predicted.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2050</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAF7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Hurd's maths - Ballot Box
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Douglas Hurd may be a very professional foreign secretary, but should be
kept away from anything to do with statistics.
He told an election meeting in Southampton on Wednesday that the reason why
the proportion of tax paid by the country's top 5 per cent of salary earners
had risen during the government's lifetime was that there are more of them.
When an FT correspondent gently pointed out to him that 5 per cent is 5 per
cent is 5 per cent, the foreign secretary replied diplomatically that he had
'elided' two separate arguments.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2051</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAF6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Flexible bets - Ballot Box
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Labour has regained the higher ground not only in some opinion polls, but
also among City dealers.
City Index, a small firm which makes markets in sporting events and has
offered a price for the past two elections, quoted Labour as ahead for the
first time on Tuesday. The party fell back on Wednesday, but nudged into the
lead yesterday with a quoted bid/offer price of 302-309 against the
Conservatives' 300-307.
Punters pay an agreed price per point and will recover that price for every
seat above the offer price.
The aim is to offer more flexibility than the ordinary bookmaker without the
downside of betting tax.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2052</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAF5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: In the clouds - Ballot Box
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Plaid Cymru's election manifesto was partly written by Dr Phil Williams, a
terrestrial physicist. Williams was unable to be present at the launch of
the document yesterday because he was in Kiruna, Sweden, north of the Arctic
circle, studying aspects of the earth's atmosphere.
His work on global warming and the ozone hole fuelled his interest in the
party's energy policies. The launch of a satellite by the space shuttle is
keeping him away, but he will be back in Wales in time to vote for
independence.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2053</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAF4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Some hope - Ballot Box
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The official statement on the possible separation of the Duke and Duchess of
York began with the words: 'In view of the media speculation which the Queen
finds especially undesirable during the general election campaign . . . ' It
is unclear why the speculation is any more undesirable at election time than
any other. The main political interest was in how far the story would knock
yesterday's unemployment figures off the front pages of the tabloids. Anyone
who thinks that the story will die because of the Palace statement does not
know the popular press. A more intriguing question is how far the
broadsheets will follow the tabloids' example.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2054</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAF3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Howard's way - Ballot Box
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Michael Howard, the employment secretary, was missing yesterday from the
official release of the monthly labour figures. He was out campaigning,
rather than giving his usual cheery gloss.
He may also have run out of gloss. For the past
18 months the line has been that UK unemployment is lower than the European
average. Truth be told, among the main industrialised countries the rate is
higher than Britain's only in Spain and the Irish Republic. The OECD puts UK
unemployment at 10.6 per cent, higher than the government's own figure of
9.4 per cent. In Italy the rate is 9.9 per cent, in France 9.8 per cent, in
the US 7.3 per cent, and in the old West Germany 4.3 per cent. One could go
on.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2055</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAF2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Fishing votes - Ballot Box
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Labour is pitching for the angling vote. David Clark, the party's
agriculture spokesman, left a press conference in Cardiff and headed
straight for a meeting in Brecon with the local angling society. 'Britain's
3m anglers will have a key role to help improve water quality and monitor
pollution,' he told them.
Clark is pro-fishing but anti-hunting. Killing fish is a sport, he said, but
hunting is 'cruelty'. Was he not for one sort of killing, and against the
other, because more Labour voters are to be found on river banks? 'Only a
cynic would accuse me of vote-catching,' he said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2056</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAF1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Portillo's gamble - Ballot Box
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Michael Portillo, the ambitious minister for local government, has stuck his
neck out. While the polls suggest Labour has a fighting chance of making up
ground in London, Portillo went on record yesterday forecasting that the
Tories will add at least five seats in the capital to the 58 they hold.
His list of likely Tory gains begins uncontroversially with Tooting: it is
widely accepted that the process of gentri-fication in the constituency has
given the party a chance of overturning Tom Cox's Labour majority of 1,441.
It has even been whispered that Ken Livingstone might be vulnerable to
attack in Brent East, where he has a majority of only 1,653. But
Hammersmith, Newham South and Tottenham?
Portillo's prognosis for Tottenham is that an 'unpopular' Bernie Grant,
faces a stiff challenge from a 'candidate from the Greek community there
with very good connections'. If Portillo is right about all of this, he
really will be a man to watch. His majority in Enfield Southgate is over
18,000.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2057</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAF0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Reversing roles on the small screen - Ballot
Box
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Forget about political values, let's talk production values. Labour's party
election broadcast - on show at a television screen near you last night -
was another example of how this topsy-turvy election is reversing roles.
We have gasped at the audacity of the People's Party selling itself as the
home of prudence and the Tories as irresponsible spendthrifts. But that can
hardly be sustained by the two combatants' first brushes with the small
screen.
John Schlesinger's 'John Major. The Journey' offered the grainy print and
hand-held cameras of mid 1960s cine-verite. Urban grit, real people, Brixton
badinage, and yup, good old John Boy, man of the mean streets made, oh yes,
really very good indeed. It looked like it had been made on the proceeds of
a quick whip-round at the Lambeth Conservative Association. That was the
point.
Labour's Britain, on the other hand, has money to burn. We begin airborne,
shooting gracefully across snowy hilltops and swooping down over charming
schools plucked from those Beautiful Britain magazines found only in embassy
lobbies abroad.
As the Wagnerian horns of the 'It's Time for Labour' theme soar along with
us, a husky throat breaks through the Celtic twilight. 'We live in a country
rich in heritage,' it proudly insists, 'rich in natural resources and, of
course most of all, rich in people . . . '. But not rich enough under the
Tories.
Mr Kinnock's imitation of his countryman Richard Burton's more theatrical
advertising voice-overs confirms his powers of mimicry. Indeed, Hugh
Hudson's sumptuous film illustrates just how far perfectly normal people are
prepared to go to imitate a government-in-waiting.
The 'This Is Britain' tour is interrupted by a series of familiar faces,
talking optimistically about how they are going to turn the country into the
sort of place only before seen on Shell adverts. Gordon Brown, in what is
believed to be a historic first, actually smiles on camera - twice.
As we bank and wheel over polluted rivers, even the pollution looks rather
pleasant. Good pollution, made in Britain. It is all wonderful, and slightly
incredible.
When Mr Kinnock returns to take his natural place
on-camera, the viewers can hardly have raised an eyebrow at the flags
bedecking his office. The horns and violins, the patriotic pride, the hope
for a brighter future, must have left them with one thought. It is time,
time for a change, time . . . to put on the kettle.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2058</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAFZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Major and Kinnock outline straight choices
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL CASSELL and ALISON SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A STRAIGHT choice between a party with policies to build a lasting economic
recovery and a Conservative administration offering a repeat of the old
boom-slump cycle was last night set by Mr Neil Kinnock at the heart of
Labour's campaign.
But as the two main party leaders brandished their rival agendas at
set-piece rallies, Mr John Major put Mr Kinnock's leadership alongside
Labour's tax policies as the issues at the heart of the election.
In a strong speech to his first rally of the campaign, in Manchester, he
joined a growing Conservative attack on Mr Kinnock's fitness to govern.
Without mentioning the Labour leader by name he said bluntly: 'We can't
afford to be led by people who don't know what their policy on foreign
affairs and defence is from one day to the next.'
As Labour sought to keep the focus of the campaign on the recession and
unemployment, Mr Kinnock, speaking to a rally in Birmingham, rounded on the
government's record and pledged that Labour would 'ignite' an early economic
recovery.
He said that, although the government, which had brought rising unemployment
and the fear of unemployment, would not even recognise its existence, the
British people did. 'That is why it is essential that the unemployment party
is defeated. The Tory government of recession must be replaced by a Labour
government for recovery.'
Mr Kinnock said Labour's Budget proposals would bring immediate assistance
for the economy. 'With each step we take, more orders will be won, more work
will be created, and more people will be employed.'
Responding to a day of intense Conservative attacks, he said it was not
surprising that the Tories did not want to fight on their record. 'Is it any
wonder they are spending millions on telling lies about us, instead of
telling the truth about themselves?'
Mr Major reserved his fiercest words for Labour's plans to abolish the
present ceiling on National Insurance contributions. He said that Labour's
shadow Budget would 'kick-start not the economy, but the society of class
and the philosophy of envy'.
Echoing remarks made by Mr Kinnock during the 1983 election, when the Labour
leader warned people not to grow old or fall ill if the Conservatives won,
Mr Major told his audience that if there were a Labour government: 'I warn
you not to be ambitious. I warn you not to be qualified. I warn you not to
be self-employed.'
He emphasised the harm he said Labour's policies would do to all on lower
incomes. Everyone would suffer because the housing market would collapse,
with knock-on effects for businesses such as builders, electricians,
do-it-yourself shops and garden centres.
The rally in Manchester was the first outing for the Pounds 500,000 set
devised by Imagination, a theatre set-design company for which Mr Andrew
Lloyd Webber was a creative consultant. Party officials, describing the set
as spectacular, said that it reflected Mr Major's personality.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2059</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAFYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Business leaders support Lib Dems
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IVOR OWEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SIR PETER PARKER, chair-man of Evered Bardon, heads a group of 12 business
leaders who declare their support for the Liberal Democrats in a letter to
the Times today, Ivor Owen writes.
They endorse the party's proposal for an extra 1p on the basic rate of
income tax to finance investment in education, saying it is 'the necessary
pre-condition of a high-skill, high-value-added economy'.
They also emphasise that the Liberal Democrats are prepared to 'make the
necessary investment now in public works to get a very sluggish economy
moving again'.
The letter states: 'After 40 years which have seen Britain's relative
decline as a major industrial power continue under both Conservative and
socialist governments, rational businessmen are bound to ask themselves
whether there is not a better way forward.'
The signatories include Mr Terry Maher, chairman of Pentos, the publisher,
Lord Ezra, former chairman of the National Coal Board and a Liberal Democrat
spokesman in the Lords, and Mr Peter Boizot, chairman and managing director
of Pizza Express.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2060</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAFXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Plaid calls for Welsh self-rule within EC
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY MORETON, Welsh Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PLAID Cymru, the Welsh Nationalist party, yesterday launched its manifesto,
urging self-government for Wales within the European Community.
The party - which has three MPs - said that as the UK became increasingly
integrated into the EC it was essential that Wales should be a fully
self-governing nation.
Mr Dafydd Wigley, Plaid president, said full self-government was no longer a
distant aim but an urgent necessity and essential for democracy.
'Massive increases' in the EC's regional and social funds must at the same
time be introduced to balance the centralising role of the community and
offer poorer countries like Wales the prospect of 'intermediate prosperity'.
The manifesto, titled Towards 2000, says any funding from Europe must be
handled within Wales by a Welsh parliament, and must be in addition to money
from the UK government.
Plaid's economic policy includes more help for small businesses and
high-technology industry. It also calls for a 10-year plan to restore
closed-down rail links and development of harbours.
The party is to contest all 38 seats in Wales, though it will fight three
Gwent seats - Newport East, Torfaen and Monmouth - jointly with the Green
party.
This alliance with the Greens was first tried in the Monmouth by-election
last May. The joint candidate won 277 votes out of the 45,195 cast in a 76
per cent turnout.
The manifesto has a particular emphasis on environmental issues. The party
calls for recognition of the employment potential of energy conservation and
the use of renewable sources. At the same time, agriculture 'must remain a
bedrock industry, with a commitment to the family farm'.
It claims the failure of successive Welsh secretaries to attend crucial EC
meetings has meant the interests of Welsh farmers have never been properly
represented.
The party also calls for a 'massive drive' to improve housing conditions -
with support for first-time buyers and people on low incomes - and a
comprehensive act to promote the Welsh language.
 ----------------------------------
Plaid Cymru
1987
 ----------------------------------
Votes                123,599
% of total votes         0.4
Seats                      3
Candidates for 1992       35
 ----------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2061</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAFWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Greens announce radical tax plan
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JIMMY BURNS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE GREEN party yesterday announced its radical alternative to the three
main parties in an attempt to reverse its declining fortunes.
It proposes a significant shift away from taxes on income to 'green' taxes
aimed at cutting the amount of non-renewable energy and raw materials
consumed in the economy.
As part of its commitment to cut carbon dioxide emissions by between 60 per
cent and 80 per cent by early next century, the party wants a significant
move away from the use of private cars towards public transport and
bicycles.
The manifesto, printed on recycled paper in two sections, was presented in
the cramped offices of the London Ecological Centre by the party's new
shared leadership: chairwoman Ms Sara Parkin and 'joint speakers' Ms Jean
Lambert and Mr Richard Lawson, both of whom are standing for parliament.
'We know that the Greens in power can make a difference,' Ms Parkin said.
'Unlike the other political parties, this manifesto faces up to the real
issues.'
Mr Lawson, a GP who is fighting Weston-super-Mare, said: 'The brains of the
country's political economists are malfunctioning to such an extent that
they are destroying our renewable resources.'
The party has just Pounds 75,000 - and no contributions so far from any
company - to spend on its national campaign. But Ms Parkin was in a upbeat
mood, claiming the Greens were the 'fastest-growing movement the world has
ever seen'. The party will field 250 candidates, many in constituencies
where there are controversial environmental issues.
Green speakers yesterday rejected the suggestion by what it termed the
'grey' parties that they should urge their supporters to vote tactically
rather than 'waste' votes. Ms Lambert said: 'We shall tell our supporters to
vote Green.'
On taxation, the party plans 'green' taxes on carbon fuel and all packaging
materials, increased petrol and diesel duties and a zero value-added-tax
rating for goods and services that promote sustainable development and a
luxury rating on those that do the reverse.
 --------------------------------
Green Party
1987
 --------------------------------
Votes                 89,793
% of total votes         0.3
Seats                      0
Candidates for 1992      250
 --------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2062</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAFVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Quotes of the day
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
I'm a simple soul. If it looks like a dog, barks and wags its tail - it's a
dog. No doubt your statisticians could tell me it is a kangaroo with an
attitude problem
Graham Perry in phone-in to Michael Heseltine
To be Green in Britain in 1992, listening to the spiralling hysteria of the
main parties, is like being a small mammal watching the last two dinosaurs
engaged in a struggle to the death. On the one hand, there is a deep inner
sense of personal fragility. On the other, there is a deep confidence that
the future does not belong to the dinosaurs
Green Party manifesto
The SNP seems to be promising that the sun will shine all day and that it
will only rain at night
Ian Lang, Scottish secretary
The loony left is alive and kicking in London - Lambeth council has
introduced a women's-only section in the Brixton library
Michael Portillo, local government minister
I am not in favour of legalisation of brothels. If it is necessary to
distinguish myself from Lindi St Clair, it is best to have this out in the
open as early as possible
Chris Patten
It's monkey warfare, rather than guerrilla
Nina Temple, of the Democratic Left, after sabotage on a Tory poster
The words socialist and socialism don't stick in my throat. Of course we
believe in democratic socialism
Tony Blair
We are genuinely disappointed that the Labour party has produced what is a
Conservative manifesto in many ways
Paddy Ashdown
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2063</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAFUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Thatcher warns on borrowing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID OWEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MRS Margaret Thatcher last night gave a stern warning of the consequences of
imprudent government borrowing as she urged voters to support Mr John
Major's Conservatives in order to prevent Labour undoing the policies of the
past 13 years.
In a robust address to the Finchley faithful, the former prime minister all
but disregarded the 54,000 words of manifesto pledges unveiled by the
leading parties this week - 29,000 of which were produced by the
Conservatives.
These were 'so detailed' it was difficult to see the broader general issues,
she said. But broader issues were the ones that mattered.
In a lengthy passage dedicated to the importance of 'sound finance', Mrs
Thatcher - who is known to be privately dismayed by the sharp increase in
government borrowing - argued that this was crucial to a country's standing
overseas.
'People won't listen to you unless you demonstrate you can handle the
economic affairs and finances of your country,' she said in remarks
presumably intended to reach the ears of Mr Norman Lamont, the chancellor.
What sound finance meant was 'living within your means'.
Using the plain language for which she was renowned when in office, she said
that one consequence of this was 'having to say no to some public
expenditure if it takes you over your top limit.
'Believe you me, no is a very useful word in government. It keeps your
finances sound so that we were able actually to reduce our debt.'
Mrs Thatcher's wide-ranging speech returned to the theme of Europe, which
loomed so large in her downfall, haranguing 'socialist Delors' social
charter' and warning against the consequences of a single European currency.
She urged voters not to settle for a hung parliament. 'Coalitions are not
decisive; majorities are, have been and will continue to be.'
On a personal note, she said it was 'very strange' not to be addressing her
largely elderly audience as a parliamentary candidate and that it was 'quite
a wrench' to stand down.
The meeting was convened to adopt Mr Hartley Booth, a former special adviser
at Number 10, as her successor in the constituency.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2064</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAFTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Supersonic statesman stays on the ground
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL CASSELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FLY KINNOCK] The soaraway statesman yesterday took to the skies over England
on a daylight mission to drop propaganda across the kingdom.
Stick with Captain Kinnock and his crew for economic lift-off and blue skies
all the way.
On the tarmac at Heathrow Airport Sir Colin Marshall, British Airways' chief
executive, twiddled his fingers while the Concorde flight-deck crew fiddled
with the aircraft's droop snoot. Both were obliged to await the arrival of
the Labour leader, given the inexplicable absence of Lord King, the
airline's chairman, whose fanaticism for all things Labour is only
restrained by his notoriously shy and retiring demeanour.
The VIP guest, on autopilot a week into the campaign, leapt up the steps to
give the supersonic beast the once-over. Aides explained he was not actually
going anywhere (precisely what the Major camp claims) but was merely taking
a look at the sort of state-of-the-art avionics technology which put the
Great into Britain - not to mention Mr Tony Benn, who was Labour's
technology minister in the 1970s before his wings fell off.
Sir Colin plugged the successes of his profitable, privatised national
carrier while Captain Kinnock stuck his head out of the cockpit window - a
practice not to be recommended at Mach 2.
Concorde, it is said, will remain fully operational until 2010, given a
regular overhaul, which more or less reflects Mr Kinnock's approach to the
business of keeping his party in the air.
After a chat to engineering apprentices, who aspire to earning the sort of
salaries that Labour wants to clobber, it was off for a first sight of Mr
Kinnock's own airborne campaign craft.
Red Rose 1, alas, is no pencil-thin supersonic masterpiece, more a
pot-bellied BAe 146, particularly favoured by members of a gradually
depleting royal household.
Hailed as the world's quietest, cleanest airliner, it does not have the
rusty charm of its 1987 predecessor, a clapped-out Viscount with flat
batteries.
A bumpy drop into Birmingham, the setting for one of those immaculately
orchestrated, impromptu rallies.
Our man reached new heights of rhetoric before heading back to his
whispering machine. Apparently the BAe 146 is available in several models to
suit all needs. Reports that Captain Kinnock has one on order remain
speculation.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2065</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAFSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: New candidate for Hexham
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
HEXHAM Conservatives have adopted Mr Peter Atkinson as their candidate after
the resignation of their MP, Mr Alan Amos, following an alleged incident on
London's Hampstead Heath.
Mr Atkinson, a former journalist in Tyneside and London, is a public affairs
and political consultant, specialising in countryside matters.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2066</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAFRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Scottish Tories' rates pledge
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Scottish Conservative Party pledged yesterday to bring business rates in
Scotland in line with those in England and Wales in the lifetime of the next
parliament.
The promise is contained in the Scottish version of the Tory manifesto which
was launched by Mr Ian Lang, Scottish secretary, in Edinburgh.
Mr Allan Stewart, local government minister, said that by the new financial
year the Tory government would have reduced the overall burden of business
rates on Scotland by Pounds 370m from what they would otherwise have been.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2067</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAFQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Ashdown admits pact 'difficulties'
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Paddy Ashdown, leader of the Liberal Democrats, admitted last night that
he could face difficulties in persuading his party to back a minority
Conservative government to keep Labour out of office.
Interviewed by Sir Robin Day on Thames Television's This Week, he said: 'It
may require a very considerable degree of leadership. What will matter to me
is what is right for the country and not what is right for the party.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2068</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAFPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Waldegrave hits at NHS claim
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
HEALTH secretary Mr William Waldegrave has written to the editors of
national newspapers to protest at the Labour party's use of tragic
individual cases to bolster its attack on the government's NHS reforms.
In his letter, Mr Waldegrave claims that 'very many of the individual cases
alleged have, on investigation, turned out to be completely false or heavily
distorted'. He says that by the time the hospitals concerned have
established the truth 'the lies have been spread'.
Conservative party managers were incensed by a Labour party advertisement
asserting that an 18-month-old baby born with a heart defect 'died because
the NHS is short of money. Meanwhile, the Tories are cutting taxes to keep
their election hopes alive.'
Labour insisted the advertisement was factually correct.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2069</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAFOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Heseltine launches London manifesto
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID OWEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Conservatives yesterday summoned the genie of the defunct Greater London
Council (GLC) in an attempt to link Labour's proposed strategic London
authority with 'loony left' extremism, David Owen writes.
Labour's tax and national insurance plans meant that 'people on top taxes
would be paying those taxes at lower levels than even under (former Labour
chancellor) Denis Healey,' said Mr Michael Heseltine, environment secretary.
Mr Heseltine attacked Labour's proposed authority as 'a GLC, which we will
remember very clearly is . . . a body to undermine the elected government of
the day'.
The aggressive tenor of his remarks appeared to confirm the view of many
observers that Labour's proposed London government might prove attractive to
the voters in the capital.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2070</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAFNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Three cultures converge in concern for the
citizen - The Issues, Consumer protection
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN WILLMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE KEY phrase of the campaign might be 'we are all consumers now', as the
parties compete to promise better-quality public services that are more
responsive to their users.
The Conservatives say their Citizen's Charter offers 'the most far-reaching
programme ever devised to improve quality in public services'.
Labour promises 'high-quality, value-for-money services' with three 'quality
commissions' to keep schools, councils and the National Health Service on
their toes.
The Liberal Democrats would 'invest in a network of community services to
improve quality, choice and opportunity'.
This emphasis on quality in the public services is a new theme in general
election campaigns. When the main elements of the welfare state - such as
the NHS, secondary-education and slum-clearance programmes - were
established by the 1945 Labour government, the drive was for quantity, not
quality.
'People were grateful for mass-produced services devised to meet urgent and
basic needs which everybody shared,' says Ms Anna Coote, research fellow at
the Labour-leaning Institute for Public Policy Research. 'But as people
became better-educated, better-housed and better-off, they expected more
diverse and flexible services to meet their individual needs.'
Mrs Thatcher was a catalyst for bringing these expectations to the fore,
says Mr John Beishon, chief executive of the Consumers' Association,
publishers of Which? magazine.
'By her emphasis on competition and choice, she made people more aware of
the power consumers could wield through their spending capacity,' he says.
The Conservatives' problem is that opinion polls consistently show that
voters think Labour is best able to provide high-quality public services. By
launching his Citizen's Charter last July, Mr John Major hoped to
demonstrate a Conservative concern for the public services - and a
distinctively market-oriented approach to improving them.
A fourth-term Tory government would introduce further privatisation to
public services. There would be greater competition between providers, and
more contracting-out to the private sector. Managers' pay would have a large
performance-related element as an incentive to satisfy customers.
Where market forces cannot be brought to bear, services would be required to
publish charters setting out clearly defined standards of services. If
services fall below standard, there would be simple means of redress,
including well-signposted complaints procedures and, in some cases,
compensation.
In some respects, this programme is little different from those of the other
parties. Mr Paddy Ashdown, leader of the Liberal Democrats, devoted
considerable space in his 1988 political testament, Citizen's Britain, to
the need for consumers of public services to have rights and entitlements.
Labour reached a similar position in its policy review after the 1987
election, and can draw on the experience of Labour local authorities such as
York City Council which have pioneered guaranteed standards. Labour's
manifesto promises 'customer contracts' for services, with 'clear avenues
for complaint'.
This apparent convergence does not mean there is no difference between the
parties, according to Ms Coote. 'While the parties are using the same
language, they have very different agendas,' she says.
Mr Major told a conference in January: 'Let us hear no more of the phoney
argument that you can only make things better by spending more money.
'Politeness, keeping promises, giving the right information, answering
letters promptly - these things don't cost money. They are the everyday
currency of decent services and they must become universal.'
Labour emphasises 'underfunding' as a cause of poor-quality public services,
and rejects the Tories' belief in the role of competitive pressures in
improving performance. Labour would halt privatisation and compulsory
competitive tendering in local government and the NHS.
For Mr Beishon of the Consumers' Association, neither approach is
sufficient. He agrees there is scope for squeezing out inefficiency in some
public services. He accepts that free competition is the best mechanism for
consumers to exercise power but he believes some problems will require fresh
money.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2071</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAFMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Candidates take out insurance cover
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AT LEAST 500 parliamentary candidates are taking out insurance to cover the
cost of any legal battles arising from the election campaign, Richard Lapper
writes.
Legal Protection Group, a subsidiary of Sun Alliance, and Careassist, which
is owned by Royal Insurance, provide legal expense policies for candidates.
These cover costs arising from libel or defamation claims as well as actions
under the Representation of the People Act.
So far, LPG - which is selling a policy valid for the period of the campaign
 -has received requests from 242 candidates. Careassist, which sells a
policy covering all local and parliamentary elections over a 12-month
period, says that it has sold a block scheme covering all Liberal Democrat
candidates. It also has 300 Conservative and a handful of Labour candidates
on its books.
LPG is set to pay a Pounds 50,000 claim to finance legal action by Labour
candidates who sued Liberal Democrat opponents over a bogus Labour council
by-election document in Tower Hamlets, London. The Appeal Court found in
favour of the Liberal Democrats last week.
Mr Reg Brown, whose syndicate at Lloyd's underwrote the LPG policy for the
last two elections, says there have been 45 claims on the policy.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2072</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAFLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Independence within six months
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The constitution and the economy dominate the manifesto. Main points are:
Independence
WITH the majority of Scottish seats, the SNP would negotiate independence
for Scotland within six months. Scotland would become a separate member of
the European Community and the United Nations. The constitution would be put
to a referendum for approval. A month later there would be elections, using
proportional representation, for the single-chamber Scottish parliament.
The vote would be extended to everyone aged over 16. The Queen would remain
as constitutional monarch. A bill of rights would guarantee human rights,
equality, freedom of information and other social and economic rights.
Scottish citizenship would be granted to anyone born in or resident in
Scotland and others as decided by parliament.
Economic recovery
Industrial equity and investment fund of an initial Pounds 160m a year to
stimulate new investment. British Steel's Scottish assets would be taken
into public ownership and a Scottish Steel Corporation would be set up with
a substantial investment programme. Ravenscraig would be brought back into
full production.
Scottish exports unit to improve overseas sales. Increased marketing budget
for Scottish Tourist Board. Increased structural support for the fishing
industry. Agricultural finance bank to be set up.
Tax incentives to promote research and development. New training and
employment grants and a national apprenticeship scheme. Investment in
infrastructure and electrification of the railways.
Taxation
New 20 per cent rate on the first Pounds 3,000 of taxable income. Ceiling on
National Insurance contributions to be lifted.
North Sea oil
Scotland would expect to retain 90 per cent of oil revenue under an oil
treaty with the rest of the UK. Taxation would remain basically unchanged. A
consultation paper will shortly be released to the industry.
Education
Nursery education for all three-year-olds and four-year-olds by the end of
the first parliament. Priority for maintenance and repair of schools. Opting
out and national testing to be abolished. Highers to remain.
Non-means-tested, index-linked student grants.
Health
Expenditure to be increased by 15 per cent in real terms over four years, to
bring it up to the European average as a proportion of gross domestic
product. One-third of increase to be financed by extra tobacco duties.
Charges for prescriptions, eye care and essential dental work to be
abolished. Opted-out hospitals will be returned to the NHS.
Housing
Local authority capital debt to be written off over four years. Investment
in new housing, including sheltered accommodation, and a modernisation and
repair programme. Council tenants' right to buy and mortgage tax relief to
be retained.
Defence
Immediate withdrawal from the Trident programme. All other nuclear weapons
to be removed. Disengagement from Nato as long as strategy remains based on
nuclear weapons. Full complement of the Scottish division to be retained,
and strong conventional forces of about 25,000 which will co-operate with
the UN and European countries.
Social security
Benefits to be raised 10 per cent in real terms over the first four years.
Child benefit of Pounds 10 a week. Pensions will be raised to Pounds 60.50 a
week for a single person and Pounds 96.80 for a married couple.
Environment
Nuclear reprocessing at Dounreay, Caithness, and the importation of nuclear
and other toxic waste to be stopped. Environmental Protection Agency is to
be established. Recycling to be encouraged. Renewable energy sources to be
developed.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2073</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAFKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Parties clash on nationalisation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IVO DAWNAY, Political Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LABOUR ACTED last night to quash Tory attacks over its plans for the water
and electricity companies by ruling out claims that majority shareholdings
in the utilities would be bought in the short term.
However, party officials refused to deny categorically that the British
National Grid and the water companies could be nationalised in the longer
term if they failed to take consumer and environmental interests adequately
into account.
Instead of buying majority stakes in the companies, a Labour government
would introduce legislation to regulate both sectors. These would give it
powers to control prices and environmental practices.
The dispute over Labour nationalisation plans came after Mr Chris Patten,
Tory chairman, seized on remarks by Mr Roy Hattersley on BBC radio to
describe Labour's policy as 'a shambles'. The Labour deputy leader had said
his party would, 'when the time comes', buy back water shares at
'appropriate value.'
His words were quickly denied by Mr Neil Kinnock, who stated definitively
that Labour would not use public money to buy water shares.
Yesterday Mr Jack Cunningham, Labour's campaign co-ordinator, again
confirmed the leader's position.
But in a letter to Mr Kinnock distributed to the press, Mr Patten accused
the Labour leadership of being at odds with its manifesto, which talks of
public control of water being 'a priority'.
His attack came as Mr Norman Lamont, the chancellor, challenged the ability
of Labour's shadow Budget to fund spending commitments into the 1993-94
fiscal year.
He said that Mr John Smith's calculations depended on privatisation proceeds
that would only be available to a government ready to continue with
privatisation programmes.
Labour officials countered, however, that the government's planning for a
second tax year were based on incomplete figures.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2074</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAFJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: SNP prepares to lead a nation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BETHAN HUTTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Scottish National party yesterday launched what was in effect not one
manifesto but two: one for this election and one for the first
post-independence election.
The first four pages of the manifesto Independence in Europe - Make It
Happen Now] are devoted to the SNP's plans for independence and a Scottish
constitution if it wins a majority of Scottish seats on April 9.
The remaining 13 pages and the whole of a companion brochure called Recovery
in Scotland - Make It Happen Now] put forward detailed plans and costings
for the SNP's agenda should it win a general election to be called
immediately after independence becomes a reality.
Mr Alex Salmond, leader of the SNP, said his party was offering Scots
political and economic freedom and a chance to go forward into the
mainstream of Europe, rather than remain stuck in a regional backwater of
Britain.
Mr Jim Sillars, SNP deputy leader, called it 'a people manifesto', and said
it was time for Scots to face their responsibilities.
Responding to claims by Mr Ian Lang, the Scottish secretary, that business
would be driven out of Scotland by constitutional change, Mr Salmond said:
'We are offering a competitive environment for Scottish business.'
He pledged to bring business rates in Scotland down to the levels south of
the border within the four years of the first Scottish parliament. In the
same period, 200,000 jobs would be created by the party's medium-term
recovery strategy, Mr Salmond said.
The SNP manifesto was intended to prove the party's economic credibility,
but Mr Salmond did not deny that theirs was nonetheless the most leftwing of
the manifestos on offer. He said that the SNP was in line with the
mainstream social democratic tradition in Europe.
Mr Salmond accepted that voters might reject the latter half of the SNP's
manifesto in a post-independence election, but as Mr Sillars pointed out,
unlike the other political parties, the SNP has to win only once to achieve
its main aim.
 --------------------------------------
SNP
1987
 --------------------------------------
Votes                    416,473
% of total votes             1.3
Seats                          3
Candidates for 1992           72
 --------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2075</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAFIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Sharp increase reported in fraud losses
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT RICE, Legal Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LOSSES resulting from fraud more than doubled between 1987 and last year,
KPMG Forensic Accounting, an offshoot of KPMG Peat Marwick, the accountancy
firm, reported yesterday.
Analysis of cases in which fraud-related criminal charges were brought shows
total losses through fraud of Pounds 163m in 1987 and Pounds 376m last year.
The number of fraud cases per year increased from 45 in 1987 to 75 last
year. The figures for last year do not take into account possible fraud
emerging from the collapse of the Maxwell empire.
KPMG has set up a 'fraud barometer' to measure the incidence of fraud and
monitor trends. Results will be published three times a year.
Its decision to examine only reported frauds involving losses of more than
Pounds 100,000 means that it will present a limited picture of the extent of
fraud in the UK, much of which remains unreported. KPMG says its analysis of
the 279 reported frauds since 1987 - involving an estimated Pounds 1.2bn -
provides useful information for companies about the pattern of fraud.
Many companies concentrate on systems to give protection against employee
fraud, which is believed to be a prime area of risk. The KPMG figures show,
however, that employee fraud accounted for only a quarter of the cases and
only 13 per cent of the money lost.
The figures indicate that companies are far more at risk from management
fraud, which accounted for 33 per cent of the cases surveyed by KPMG and 39
per cent of the money lost.
But the greatest risk comes from external fraud, which accounted for 38 per
cent of the cases and 46 per cent of the money lost. External fraudsters
include gangs which target and defraud particular companies.
Banks and other financial institutions are still the most common victims of
fraud, accounting for 31 per cent of the cases and 37 per cent of the money
at risk. The public is the next biggest group of victims.
KPMG says the increase in fraud is linked partly with the 1980s growth in
share ownership, which attracted unsophisticated investors into the markets.
The firm says they became easy targets for unscrupulous investment advisers
such as Barlow Clowes. There has also been a big increase in mortgage frauds
in recent years - these were perpetrated in the housing boom of the 1980s
and are coming to light as prices fall.
KPMG says fraud increases during a recession because frauds committed during
the boom are difficult to conceal in an economic downturn. A downturn can
also trigger fraud as managements try to stave off creditors by painting a
false financial picture of their businesses.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2076</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAFHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Opera house asks consultant to investigate costs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTONY THORNCROFT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Royal Opera House, Covent Garden, has called in a management consultant
to examine administration, production costs, and backstage operations. It
hopes the findings will strengthen its case for a big increase in Arts
Council subsidy.
'We deserve an uplift in funding,' Mr Jeremy Isaacs, director-general of
Covent Garden, said yesterday. 'We hope that this investigation will provide
the material which justifies an uplift.'
The consultant, Mr Ian Beesley from Price Waterhouse, conducted a similar
exercise at Covent Garden's rival, English National Opera. Mr Beesley will
report by September.
Covent Garden will receive Pounds 18.95m from the council in 1992-93, a 6.5
per cent increase on last year. This will make it by far the largest
beneficiary of the council.
Covent Garden operations are also being examined by a panel appointed by the
Arts Council and headed by Lady Warnock. This review is part of the regular
assessment of council clients.
The council says it is happy for Covent Garden to undertake its own audit
and will take the findings into account when making its judgment.
The Royal Opera House feels under threat. To reduce its deficit it has been
forced to increase seat prices by more than the rate of inflation to more
than Pounds 100 for important opera productions.
However, many recent new productions have attracted tepid reviews, and
audiences are at about 80 per cent of capacity compared with 90 per cent
last season.
In contrast English National Opera is on a high. The government this week
awarded it Pounds 10.8m towards the Pounds 12.8m costs of acquiring the
freehold of the Coliseum. The remaining Pounds 2m will come from the
Foundation for Sport and the Arts, run by the pools companies. English
National Opera is also expected to announce soon a surplus for the financial
year.
Covent Garden said it was confident that an outsider's assessment of its
performance would endorse its management and confirm its case for increased
subsidy.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2077</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAFGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / TUC seeks mark of service quality
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN WILLMAN, Public Policy Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Trades Union Congress will today launch a campaign calling for the
introduction of a new Quality Work Assured servicemark to highlight the
importance of good employment practices in public services.
To be awarded the servicemark, an organisation would have to show that it
was committed to 'a quality staff, providing a quality service in a quality
work environment'. This would mean good practice in staff training and
development, equal opportunities, 'decent pay and conditions', partnership
and workforce consul-tation. The scheme also aims to improve investment in
training and employee involvement in the public sector. It is an attempt to
challenge government initiatives to improve service standards, such as
compulsory competitive tendering and the Citizen's Charter. The TUC says
these result in poor working conditions, low pay and unsatisfactory service.
The servicemark would be based on the approach of quality assurance schemes
such as those of the British Standards Institution.
The plans will be discussed with experts in quality management from the
public and private sectors at a seminar in London today. Contracting out has
seriously damaged the quality of public services, according to a report
published yesterday by the Public Services Privatisation Research Unit. The
unit is funded by six unions representing employees in the public sector.
The report says that 10 per cent of contracts in the NHS and local
government are terminated early - often because of the contractors'
financial problems.
Quality Work Assured. TUC, Congress House, Great Russell Street, London WC1B
3LS. Free. Privatisation. PSPRU, 20 Grand Depot Road, London SE18 6SF.
Pounds 50 for private-sector bodies; Pounds 10 for public bodies.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2078</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAFFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Auction houses' results hint at upturn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTONY THORNCROFT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE are signs that the international art market is over the worst of the
global recession. Sotheby's announced yesterday that it made a profit last
year in spite a drop in auction sales to Dollars 1.1bn against Dollars 2.4bn
in 1990.
On Monday its rival Christie's also announced a small profit. Profit for
both auction houses was much lower than in 1990, but there had been fears
that both auction houses would report a loss.
A succession of cost-cutting exercises - linked to a reluctance to accept
for sale works of art of doubtful quality - kept the salerooms in the black.
 Staff levels have been cut, marketing and catalogue expenses reduced and
salaries frozen. Both auction houses have concentrated on the decorative
arts - furniture, silver, ceramics - which appeal to a connoisseur market,
rather than paintings, especially Impressionist and 20th century paintings,
which attracted speculative buying and precipitated a price collapse in the
autumn of 1990.
Mr Michael Ainslie, president of Sotheby's, said yesterday: 'Decorative art
made up approximately 56 per cent of our overall sales total in 1991
compared to 38 per cent and 30 per cent in 1990 and 1989 respectively.'
Auctions in 1992 have so far proved reassuring, he said. 'We are 12 per cent
up on 1991.'
The one sector where little substantial improvement is expected is
Impressionist and Modern art which in 1990 accounted for about half of
Sotheby's turnover.
To boost turnover, the auction houses are courting owners of good Old Master
paintings, the only antiques which can approach the Impressionists in value.
Christie's hopes to sell masterpieces by Holbein, Rembrandt and Canaletto on
April 15 (although it is possible that the Holbein will be saved for the
nation before the auction), while Sotheby's has announced that it was will
offer a Rembrandt owned by Lord Rosebery on July 8.
A timely indication of better days came yesterday in London where Sotheby's
sold an ivory netsuke (the toggle used to hold together kimonos) for Pounds
77,000. In 1968 the same netsuke made Pounds 300. On Wednesday Christie's
auctioned a gold lacquer screen for Pounds 220,000.
Sotheby's results, Page 22
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2079</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAFEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Rise in GPs' support for fundholding
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN PIKE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SUPPORT for GP fund-holding has increased among family doctors since the
government introduced the controversial scheme last April, a British Medical
Association survey showed yesterday, Alan Pike writes.
The survey, the most extensive ever among family doctors, shows that most
general practitioners still oppose fund-holding. Fund-holding GPs have
budgets from which they buy hospital and other treatment on behalf of their
patients.
GPs were asked in the survey to state both their initial and present views
of fundholding. The proportion of doctors in favour has grown from 10 per
cent to nearly 20 per cent. Those opposing the scheme have declined from 76
per cent when fundholding was introduced to 62 per cent now.
The survey suggests, however, that there are mixed attitudes about
fundholding even among doctors using it. Thirty per cent of GPs who are
fundholders, or are considering joining the scheme, remain opposed to the
idea.
The survey also shows that 73 per cent of GPs would like to opt out of their
24-hour responsibility for patients. They would like this to be replaced
with alternative arrangements such as the provision of out-of-hours care by
local primary-care emergency centres.
The survey will form the basis of future negotiations between the BMA and
the Department of Health.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2080</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAFDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Mr Michael Stoney
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MR MICHAEL STONEY was questioned by the Commons committee investigating the
losses from the Mirror Group Newspapers' pension funds in his capacity as a
former director of Pergamon AGB Trustees Limited, not as treasurer of the
Mirror Group pension fund as stated in our report of 13 March. There was in
fact no treasurer of the Mirror Group pension fund as such.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2081</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAFCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Court rules in satellite TV wrangle
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GARY MEAD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Court of Appeal yesterday ended a legal wrangle between British Sky
Broadcasting, the satellite television network in which Pearson, publisher
of the Financial Times, has a stake, and Tatung UK, a manufacturer of
satellite receiving equipment, Gary Mead writes.
The court ruled that BSkyB had no agreement with Tatung that its D-Mac
satellite receivers would be the preferred technology.
The case stems from November 1990, when two rival satellite television
companies, British Satellite Broadcasting (BSB) and Sky Television, merged
to form BSkyB. The former BSB was compatible with Tatung's D-Mac receivers,
but after the merger the alternative system used by Sky took over.
Yesterday's case will have a bearing on similar actions pending against
BSkyB by three other electronics manufacturers, Nokia, Philips and Ferguson.
Tatung was refused leave to appeal to the Lords.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2082</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAFBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / 'Male-dominated' industry attacked
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CATHERINE MILTON, Labour Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
INDUSTRIES in the UK are male-dominated and have much to learn about equal
opportunities, according to Ms Hilary Williams, the British Gas executive
who won a sex discrimination battle against her employer on Wednesday.
An industrial tribunal in west London told the company to reinstate her as
marketing services manager of its south-west region.
'Male-dominated industries will have to learn that there is a wealth of
talent which happens to be female, and that even at the best of economic
times you cannot afford to waste it,' Ms Williams said. 'Companies must make
the very best use of all human resources. It's only economic sense.'
Ms Williams took action against British Gas after she was replaced by a male
colleague in her Pounds 45,000-a-year post and was subsequently told by the
regional marketing director that she had taken the news like a man - 'even
though you are the wrong shape'.
After her demotion Ms Williams - who was once tipped to be the first female
regional director with British Gas - continued working for the company in
spite of her claim that she had been a victim of discrimination.
The Equal Opportunities Commission said yesterday that her victory was
timely as it followed a survey of women directors showing that three
quarters of them believe sexual discrimination is common in the workplace.
Ms Williams' case was important, the company added, because she was a
high-flyer and British Gas was at the heart of a significant industry. The
company is also a participant in Opportunity 2000, the business-led
initiative on the employment and promotion of women.
The tribunal awarded her compensation of Pounds 8,000 and told British Gas
to reinstate her in her original job. Ms Williams said she wanted British
Gas to employ her where her skills were most effective, but added that many
other women felt unable to pursue similar claims.
'In these sorts of cases it is up to the person who complains to prove there
has been sexual discrimination, and that is very difficult,' she explained.
'Many women may feel they do not have enough evidence.'
Ms Williams warned women considering similar action: 'It has been an
ordeal.' But she added: 'I do feel my case demonstrates that career women
should expect fairness in a way in which they perhaps don't at the moment.
No company, however large, is above the law.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2083</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAFAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Cost of new curriculum is estimated at Pounds 1.5bn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW ADONIS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FULL introduction of the national curriculum will cost secondary schools
more than Pounds 1.5bn with additional annual costs of almost Pounds 500m,
according to a report yesterday from consultants Coopers &amp; Lybrand Deloitte.
That amounts to a first-year cost of about Pounds 224,000 for a typical
secondary school, and Pounds 175,000 in the second year. Extra demands on
staff account for most of those amounts, though none of the schools surveyed
achieved those levels of expenditure.
The report stresses that expenditure tends to lag significantly behind
implementation - so that many of the costs will bear heavily on schools this
year and next.
The National Union of Teachers, which commissioned the report, said: 'The
government has failed to fund its own reforms. It ensures there is nothing
national about the national curriculum if all schools are resourced at
different levels.'
The national curriculum has been introduced during the past two years. An
earlier report by Coopers said primary schools needed an extra Pounds 4.7bn
over five years to fund implementation of the curriculum adequately.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2084</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAE9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Lending by banks and building societies falls
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMMA TUCKER, Economics Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LENDING by banks and building societies to the private and corporate sectors
fell sharply last month. The fall was a further sign that the recession is
continuing.
Lending by banks and building societies, known as M4 lending, rose by only
Pounds 400m, confounding City expectations of a monthly rise of Pounds
2.5bn. The slight increase brought annual credit growth to 5 per cent - the
lowest annual growth rate since 1967. In February last year annual credit
growth stood at 13.9 per cent.
The figures from the Bank of England contrasted strongly, however, with
separate data from the British Bankers Association. These showed that
lending by the nine big high- street banking groups to the private sector
(about 70 per cent of total bank lending) grew by Pounds 1.5bn in February
compared with a rise of only Pounds 400m in January.
Lord Inchyra, secretary-general of the association, warned against reading
too much into its figure. 'Looking at longer-term trends, one should
probably say no more than that the sharp decline in bank lending does appear
to have bottomed out,' he said.
Mr Chris Dillow, UK economist at Nomura Research, said the difference in
figures could be explained by a collapse in building society lending, which
is not included in the association's figures. But it was more likely to be
the result of a fall in lending by overseas banks.
Other measures of money supply from the Bank also pointed towards a stagnant
economy. Narrow money (M0), which mostly comprises notes and coins and
indicates underlying demand pressures, grew by a seasonally adjusted 2.2 per
cent in the 12 months to February. Between January and February M0 grew by
0.2 per cent.
Broad money (M4) - notes and coins plus sterling deposits at banks and
building societies - grew by 6 per cent in the 12 months to February.
This followed growth of 6.2 per cent in the year to January. In February M4
grew by 0.5 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2085</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAE8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Scandinavian hub is planned for Gatwick
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS, Aerospace Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE THREE partner airlines in the Scandinavian NRT Nordisk travel group plan
to expand their operations to turn Gatwick into an international hub for
Scandinavian air traffic in competition with Copenhagen, Paul Betts writes.
The three carriers, Transwede Airways, Norway Airlines and Sterling, are
developing new scheduled air services between Scandinavia and Gatwick to
take advantage of the deregulation of domestic air travel in Sweden.
This will enable them to compete in their domestic market against
Scandinavian Airlines System (SAS), the region's flag carrier, to develop
feeder services to London and other European cities to connect with
international networks of larger airlines.
'Domestic deregulation in Sweden this summer will enable the three carriers
to develop a domestic traffic they will be able to transport to Gatwick,' Mr
Anders Lidman, an aviation consultant to the three carriers, said in London
yesterday.
It could create a Scandinavian international hub-and-spoke system in
competition with Copenhagen, he added.
Transwede and Norway Airlines have reached several joint ticketing
agreements with international carriers at Gatwick including British Airways,
American Airlines, United Airlines and Cathay Pacific. The airlines, which
recently started scheduled services from Scandinavia to Gatwick, also
announced yesterday plans to boost frequencies to London.
Transwede, Norway Airlines and Sterling joined forces last September under
the umbrella of the NRT Nordisk travel group to compete against SAS to take
advantage of airline deregulation in Sweden and air-transport liberalisation
in Europe.
Mr Harald Rosen, Transwede's vice-president for traffic and sales, said the
three smaller airlines would compete strongly against SAS because their
costs were about 30 per cent lower than those of the Scandinavian flag
carrier.
Transwede, which started scheduled services from Stockholm to Gatwick a year
ago, had now gained nearly 30 per cent of that market, said Mr Rosen.
The expansion of NRT Nordisk's airline activities and their challenge to SAS
is expected to lead to a change in the share-ownership of the travel group.
NRT Nordisk is jointly owned by the Reso hotel and travel company and the
Wallenberg group. However, Wallenberg is also a shareholder in SAS and is
expected to withdraw from NRT Nordisk.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2086</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAE7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Service industries show record drop in output
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARSH, Economics Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE SEVERITY of the recession was underlined yesterday by figures showing
record reductions last year in output by service industries and in the
underlying level of company investment.
The Central Statistical Office also said that non-oil company profits
excluding the recently-privatised electricity groups, fell last year by the
largest amount for 17 years.
Output by the service sector, which accounts for 60 per cent of the economy
and includes retailing, transport and government services such as education,
fell 1.6 per cent last year. This is only the second year since the CSO
started records in 1950 in which services production has shown a fall.
The CSO said investment by industrial and commercial companies, excluding
electricity, fell 16 per cent in value terms last year - the highest since
records began in 1963.
Gross trading profits by industrial and commercial companies, leaving aside
oil and electricity, came to Pounds 63.6bn last year after Pounds 67.7bn in
1990. The fall of 6 per cent in value terms was the biggest since a fall of
12 per cent in 1974.
Last year the total economy shrank by a revised 2.4 per cent. Excluding
North Sea oil and gas production, the contraction was 2.7 per cent.
Within this, output by distributive services - including shops, hotels and
catering - fell 3.2 per cent. Transport and communication fell 3.5 per cent
while 'other services', including financial services and government
activities, were flat.
The only previous recorded service industries fall was in 1980, when output
fell 0.4 per cent in the last recession. That recession had its biggest
effect on manufacturing.
Real personal disposable income - total consumers' income less tax - fell
0.4 per cent last year. This was the first decline since 1982.
Other data indicated the reluctance of consumers in the final quarter of
last year to increase spending, which has inhibited the economic recovery.
In the final quarter consumer spending, accounting for two thirds of the
economy, was flat compared with the previous three months. For the year it
fell 1.7 per cent.
In the fourth quarter the savings ratio - consumer savings as a proportion
of disposable incomes - fell to 10 per cent after a revised 10.4 per cent in
the third quarter and 11.3 per cent in the second quarter. For last year the
savings ratio was 10.2 per cent against 9 per cent in 1990.
Companies' total financial deficit fell to Pounds 10.9bn last year from
Pounds 24.1bn the year before. The deficit in the fourth quarter was Pounds
1.7bn - only slightly down from the figure in the third quarter.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2087</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAE6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Number-cruncher prepares to break the mould: Peter Marsh
talks to the new chief of the Central Statistical Office
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARSH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR BILL McLENNAN, the Australian statistician who is the new head of the
government's Central Statistical Office, has an outgoing style unusual for a
senior UK civil servant.
Asked about his past, Britain's statistics supremo hands out not a list of
pre-vious jobs but an 11-page assessment of his personality, provided by a
management consultancy.
While the squash-playing number-cruncher is not shy about baring his soul to
the world, he has also promised an open debate about the work of the CSO.
The office's main task is to monitor the economy on behalf of the Treasury,
which takes overall responsibility for the agency.
The CSO is expected to come up with accurate and timely figures on a vast
number of variables, from the balance of payments to sales of do-it-yourself
goods.
Mr McLennan, who is 50, wants the CSO to put a new emphasis on marketing its
statistics both to other parts of the government and to people in the
business world. 'If the statistics aren't what people want, they might as
well not exist,' he says.
The new CSO boss was headhunted from the post of deputy director of the
Australian Bureau of Statistics, where he worked for 32 years. He has come
to Britain with his wife - also a statistician - who has secured a job in
the Treasury.
As well as being in charge of the 1,200-strong CSO, Mr McLennan takes on
responsibility for the output of 500 government statisticians in other parts
of Whitehall. The 500 are part of the Government Statistical Service.
To prepare for his job Mr McLennan read through every news report he could
find which has mentioned the CSO since 1988. He says the reports indicate
that the CSO has been 'under pressure', largely because of complaints by MPs
and the City that too many of its statistics are inaccurate and prone to
revision.
The less-than-positive tone of the news coverage and the office's somewhat
dozy image are partly due to the reclusive nature of Sir Jack Hibbert, Mr
McLennan's immediate predecessor as CSO chief, who retired at the end of
February. Sir Jack disliked publicity and was viewed as a thoroughly
pleasant, though less than dynamic, civil servant.
Mr McLennan is a more vigorous character. The personal assessment which he
hands visitors emphasises his 'enthusiasm for ideas', although it says his
planning might be improved if he did more 'deep personal thinking'. The
document also says Mr McLennan is 'impetuous', 'impatient' and may 'ruffle
people's feelings'.
Reflecting this outgoing style, Mr McLennan has no problems about speaking
to newspapers 'on the record' rather than insisting, in the manner of most
Whitehall mandarins, that he must not be quoted.
It seems his approach might jar with the traditionally secretive style of
Whitehall, which is especially marked at the Treasury. But the panel which
selected Mr McLennan contained two of Whitehall's most senior figures - Sir
Terry Burns, Treasury permanent secretary, and Sir Robin Butler, cabinet
secretary - and his appointment may imply that the Civil Service
establishment is keen to encourage a little more openness.
In his new job Mr McLennan will be helped by expansion already in train at
the CSO which is aimed at improving its statistics. The office's annual
budget is due almost to double, from Pounds 19.6m in 1989-90 to Pounds 37.3m
in 1992-93. Over the same period staff will increase by nearly 400.
'Now we've got to perform,' says Mr McLennan, indicating a tougher approach
to management than is normally associated with Whitehall. He also hints that
the agency might increase the charges for its data - much of which is given
away free or at low prices - partly to raise money for the government but
also to keep staff on their toes by bringing them closer to customers.
As to the challenge of his job, Mr McLennan is not backward in expressing
enthusiasm. He describes one statistical series he devised in Canberra - an
analysis of Australian population trends put on a laser disc to be read by
computer - as a 'beautiful product'.
He adds: 'I'm a bit of a crusader. The public perception of statisticians as
dull backroom boys is all wrong. Having good statistics about a country is a
fundamental part of how it organises itself.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2088</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAE5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Jobless total highest since September 1987
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER NORMAN, Economics Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE NEWS of a 40,200 jump in seasonally adjusted unemployment last month
confirmed that there will be no early reduction in Britain's lengthening
dole queues.
Although the increase was lower than January's 55,900 rise, the latest
figures have brought the UK jobless total to its highest since September
1987 and dashed last autumn's hopes that the monthly increases in
unemployment were on a downward path.
Instead, economists warned that recent redundancies in the manufacturing and
service sectors would add further to unemployment. Mr Peter Spencer, UK
economist of Shearson Lehman Brothers, the US-owned securities house, said:
'Company managers have obviously decided that the economy is not recovering
at an early stage and have moved to cost-cutting.'
According to the Department of Employment, the seasonally adjusted jobless
total has risen 1.05m in 22 months to 2,647,300, or 9.4 per cent of the
workforce. After rising by more than 500,000 in 12 months, the number of
male unemployed topped 2m in February for the first time since May 1987.
Official figures show that 12.8 per cent of the UK male workforce was
unemployed last month, compared with an unemployment rate of 5.3 per cent
among women.
The February increase in unemployment was slightly higher than expected by
the City, where the consensus forecast was for an increase of 35,000.
Average earnings and productivity figures released yesterday were
disappointing while job-vacancy statistics showed a small improvement.
Average weekly earnings in the year to January increased by 7.25 per cent -
unchanged from the annual rate in December, but slightly higher than market
expectations of a 7 per cent rise.
Unit wage and salary costs in manufacturing also rose more steeply than
expected - by 5.7 per cent in the year to January compared with 4.5 per cent
in the year to December. In the three months ending in January, wages and
salaries per unit of output in manufacturing were 4.7 per cent higher than
12 months earlier.
Manufacturing output per head was 1.8 per cent higher in January than at the
same time last year, having increased by 2.6 per cent in the year to
December. Manufacturing productivity showed a year-on-year gain of 2.7 per
cent in the three months to January.
Unfilled job vacancies at Jobcentres rose by a seasonally adjusted 2,300 to
124,300 in the month to February, lifting vacancies by about 20,000 compared
with last summer.
One effect of the long recession has been to smooth out earlier regional
variations in unemployment. From its low in early 1990, unemployment south
of a line between the Wash and the Bristol Channel has more than doubled. In
no region north of that line has unemployment risen by more than 80 per
cent.
Greater London, with 10 per cent of the workforce out of work, now has a
higher jobless rate than the national average. According to Mr Ian Lang, the
Scottish secretary, unemployment in Scotland is now lower than in the UK as
a whole for the first time since records began. Since its 1990 low the
jobless total has increased most sharply - by 184 per cent - in the
south-east outside greater London.
In the south-east as a whole and greater London itself, unemployment has
increased by 137 per cent and 107 per cent respectively. Unemployment in the
west Midlands has risen 76 per cent from its recent low point, while jobless
totals in the north, Scotland and Northern Ireland have increased only by 28
per cent, 17 per cent and 8 per cent respectively. The sharp rise in
unemployment since May 1990 means Britain now has the third-worst
unemployment rate of the industrialised world. Internationally standardised
data from the Paris-based Organisation for Economic Co-operation and
Development put the UK rate at 10.6 per cent compared with a European
Community average of 9.3 per cent. Only the Irish Republic and Spain have
higher rates, with 16.8 per cent and 16.3 per cent respectively.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2089</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAE4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Docklands trust is withdrawn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VANESSA HOULDER, Property Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
OLYMPIA &amp; YORK, the property company developing Canary Wharf in London's
Docklands, has withdrawn its Pounds 215m Cabot Square Trust, the largest
enterprise-zone trust yet launched.
The decision results from the impact of the general election on the Finance
Act. The shortened act omitted some provisions that extended enterprise-zone
tax relief to include occupied buildings which were crucial for the trust's
success.
Olympia &amp; York said it was 'very disappointed' that the trust could not go
ahead.
It said there was insufficient time to restructure the trust before the end
of the tax year. The transaction might be relaunched when the legislation
was enacted.
The trust, which was due to buy the Cabot Square building from Olympia &amp;
York, would have allowed investors to benefit from the tax allowances in
enterprise zones. The Pounds 30m already raised by the trust is being
returned to investors.
Independent Property Securities, the trust's promoters, had been confident
that it would have raised a substantial part of the Pounds 215m target in
the last two weeks of the tax year.
The trust's progress was hampered, however, by concern about the finances of
Olympia &amp; York, which has been forced to withdraw its commercial paper
programmes after a loss of confidence among investors.
Further controversy stemmed from the lack of detail given about the
building's valuation, which sparked an inquiry by the Royal Institution of
Chartered Surveyors' asset valuation committee.
It was concerned that the valuer had not considered the strength of the
developer's covenant in making the valuation.
The Cabot Square Trust was an ambitious attempt to expand the
enterprise-zone trust market, which raised a combined total of just Pounds
150m last year. It was an innovative scheme offering investors an option to
sell the building back to the developer after 10 years at a guaranteed sum
of Pounds 215m.
Property Market, Page 13
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2090</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAE3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Apex Trust chief made redundant
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MR BILL MATHER, chief executive of Apex Trust, the charity for ex-offenders,
has been made redundant by Cork Gully, the joint court-appointed
administrator of the troubled charity.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2091</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAE2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Support for union representation
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
NEARLY 90 per cent of voters believe employees should have a legal right to
be represented by a union, according to a Mori poll commissioned by the
TUC-backed Press for Union Rights.
There is no right under British law for employees to be represented by
unions.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2092</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAE1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Further charges against executive
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MR TONY COLE, former chairman of Bestwood, the industrial and property
holding company, has been sent for trial at the Old Bailey on 20 charges
including the alleged theft of Pounds 1.2m.
Fresh charges were made against Mr Cole when he made his second appearance
at City of London magistrates' court yesterday. He was arrested a month ago
and charged with 13 offences of false accounting, perjury and theft.
He now faces six charges alleging theft from Atlanta Fund Managers, the
pension fund of British Drilling and Freezing, and Bestwood Securities, six
alleging offences under the 1985 Companies Act, three of false accounting,
two of perjury, and one each of conspiracy, theft of share certificates and
procuring the execution of a valuable security.
Yesterday the magistrates transferred the case to the Old Bailey where four
other people, charged last year as a result of a Serious Fraud Office
investigation into Bestwood, are awaiting trial.
They are Mr Charles Wilkinson, a senior partner in London solicitors
Lawrence Graham, and Mr Jeremy Colson, a financial director, both charged
with Companies Act offences, Mr Peter Southgate, an accountant, charged with
theft, aiding and abetting an unauthorised loan and false accounting, and Mr
William Collins, a stockbroker, charged with theft and false accounting.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2093</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAE0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / MMC to probe card charges
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BARCHARD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE OFFICE OF Fair Trading confirmed yesterday that it had started to
investigate a recent price increase in the credit-card services which banks
provide to retailers, David Barchard writes.
Barclays, National Westminster and Midland banks said recently they were
seeking increases in the commissions.
The banks say the amount of the increase would be very small as the
commissions average 1.6 per cent of each transaction. They are seeking an
increase that will push the average towards 2 per cent.
This would very nearly restore commissions to their level four years ago,
before the banks began to compete against each other in this area and
started cutting their prices.
'We have launched an informal investigation following complaints from the
retailers' consortium and other retailers,' the OFT said yesterday.
If the OFT found strong evidence of anti-competitive activities by the banks
it could refer the matter to the Monopolies and Mergers Commission.
Retailers say the increase demanded by the banks could force them to raise
prices. But the banks suggest that the difference to most retailers could be
very small - perhaps as little as 14p in each Pounds 100 of credit card
sales.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2094</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAEZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / US exports fall for third month in a row
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NANCY DUNNE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
US EXPORTS fell in January for the third month in a row, while last year
foreign direct investment in the US fell to the lowest level since 1985,
according to US Commerce Department figures.
Exports, as one of the brighter spots in the US economy, have been billed by
Bush Administration officials as 'an engine of growth' out of recession. But
recession and slowdown overseas have begun to take their toll.
In January exports fell to an estimated Dollars 35.5bn, down from Dollars
35.9bn in December and Dollars 36.9bn in November. The slowdown hit exports
of manufactured goods, off by Dollars 0.3bn from December, while exports of
advanced technology fell from Dollars 9bn to Dollars 8bn.
On the plus side, the US trade deficit narrowed by 3.9 per cent to Dollars
5.8bn, the result of cheaper oil and weakened demand for imports. Imports
shrank by 1.4 per cent from December levels to Dollars 41.3bn.
Last year's fall in foreign direct investment into the US to Dollars 22.2bn
contrasted sharply with the rates in 1988, when US assets were seen as a
prime buy. Investment rose in 1988 and 1989 by Dollars 59.4bn and Dollars
70.6bn, respectively.
But investors have had little to show for their US bargains. Last year total
earnings amounted to only Dollars 361m, according to the Organisation for
International Investment in Washington.
The Commerce Department estimates that from 1983 to 1990, the rate of return
on foreign direct investment in the US, based on market value, came to only
2.6 per cent.
Most dramatic in the downturn was the fall-off in Japanese investment to
Dollars 4.3bn last year, a decline from the Dollars 17.3bn annual average of
1988-90.
The UK, the largest foreign investor in the US, added another Dollars 8.6bn
last year. This represents a slowdown from previous years, however. Between
1987 and 1989 UK investments averaged Dollars 21.7bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2095</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAEYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / US carries on waving military stick at Iraq
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL LITTLEJOHNS and GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   UN, NEW YORK, WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE US continues to emphasise the threat of military action against Iraq in
an effort to force it to comply with the UN demand for elimination of its
weapons of mass destruction, reports George Graham from Washington.
The Defence Department is reported to have prepared a list of options for
President George Bush, including a 'graduated bombing campaign.' Officials
are seeking to reinforce the impression that the US is ready to use military
force in the very near future if Iraq does not back down in a confrontation
with the UN inspection teams seeking to destroy missiles and nuclear
production facilities.
A UN team is in Iraq this week after the Security Council delivered a stern
warning to Mr Tariq Aziz, the Iraqi deputy prime minister, at an angry
meeting in New York last week.
However, the US has blown hot and cold over its readiness to use force. Mr
Bush said he would not rule out any options, but Mr Dick Cheney, defence
secretary, and Mr Edward Djerejian, the assistant secretary of state for
near eastern affairs, this week sought to play down the likelihood of
military action.
Michael Littlejohns adds from the UN in New York: Negotiations between the
UN and Iraq over the proposed sale of Dollars 1.6bn (Pounds 920m) worth of
Iraqi oil, in part to pay for food and medicines, will re-open in Vienna
next Thursday.
Baghdad's agreement to resume the talks, broken off last month, was one of
the positive results of last week's Security Council meeting. The Council
resolution authorising easing of sanctions for limited oil sales expired on
Wednesday. Its renewal depends on the outcome of next week's talks.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2096</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAEXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Brazil 'close' to Dollars 40bn debt rescheduling
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTINA LAMB and STEPHEN FIDLER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   RIO DE JANEIRO, LONDON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BRAZIL's chief debt negotiator said yesterday he expected to announce an
agreement soon on an outline accord to restructure over Dollars 40bn of
medium-term debt the government owes to international banks.
Mr Pedro Malan told the Financial Times yesterday: 'We've made very
significant progress and there are no major obstacles left .. We hope to be
able to announce something shortly'.
Mr Malan was due to meet with the full advisory committee of creditor banks
in New York last night.
Mr William Rhodes, vice-chairman of Citicorp, which leads the advisory
committee, said yesterday: 'The negotiations are progressing well and we are
getting close to an agreement.'
Bankers said there were important differences to resolve, including the
interest rate to be paid on one type of bond to be issued under the
restructuring.
The restructuring will follow the lines of the Brady plan, under which banks
are given the choice of exchanging existing debt for a variety of new
concessional bonds, some of which carry guarantees of principal payments and
of interest. Banks can also opt to make new loans.
A discount rate of 35 per cent - the same as that achieved by Mexico in its
landmark debt restructuring two years ago - has been accepted by both sides.
Some Dollars 40bn of previously restructured debt will be covered by the
agreement, along with Dollars 3.3bn in new loans made in 1988, which will be
treated more favourably. Brazil carries the largest foreign debt in the
Third World, totalling Dollars 116.2bn at the end of 1990.
According to one banker the most important concessional bonds on offer will
carry a 12-month guarantee of interest payments and a guarantee of principal
repayments.
One sticking point has been the volume and timing of guarantees on the new
bonds. The Brazilians have now offered Dollars 3bn in guarantees, helped by
a spectacular increase in foreign reserves, thought to be over Dollars 13bn.
Bankers say the government has requested a Dollars 700m bridging loan from
the banks to help finance guarantees.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2097</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAEWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Falklands struggle for a new identity: Jimmy Burns surveys
the windswept island colony for which Britain fought a war
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JIMMY BURNS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A British soldier recently discovered he had been in Port Stanley, capital
of the Falkland Islands, only after he had driven through it. Turning to his
passenger, who was also his commanding officer, he commented on the
'village' they had just passed and, as they motored on into the countryside,
wondered when they would see Stanley.
Indeed, at a glance, it is difficult to understand what all the fuss was
about.
The islands - that saw an Argentine invasion and subsequent death of more
than 1,000 soldiers ten years ago - still look not much different from a
scattering of Scottish isles.
Stark and windswept, they loom out of the south Atlantic like a geological
afterthought.
Stanley, where most of the Falklands population of 2,100 is concentrated,
has fewer facilities than many smallish European villages: primitively built
houses, a single bank and the Upland Goose, which represents the capital's
claim to an international hotel but in reality is little more than a
glamorised pub. It keeps its clients entertained with nightly videos and a
one-page summary of world news. Newspapers arrive several days late.
It says much for the abandoned condition of the British colony before the
war that the present-day Falklands boasts of economic progress: a new fully
equipped hospital and school, a new telephone and road system linking some
previously isolated areas, and a new military airport that can be used by
wide-bodied jets.
No British government, having lost lives to retain the islands, could afford
to let them sink into oblivion.
Between 1982 and 1987, the kelpers, as the islanders call themselves, found
it easy to get subsidies for their business projects: Pounds 30m was
channelled from London into the civilian sector and Pounds 3bn was earmarked
in defence spending.
The programme proved controversial because of some ill-judged investments in
projects which in different political circumstances might have been
subjected to more careful scrutiny.
The Falklands programme has since been streamlined and subjected to more
control. As the governor of the islands, Mr William Fullerton, says, the
economy has entered a 'consolidation phase.'
The real change in the Falklands' economic fortunes has come about thanks to
the discovery of squid in the South Atlantic and the granting of fishing
licences by the local government to foreign companies.
The licences now account for 65 per cent of the islands' operating revenue,
even though this is still only a third of what the British Ministry of
Defence pays out to maintain its troops on the islands.
Thanks to squid, the islands are more self-sufficient than they used to be
and less dependent on their traditional wool industry, which over the years
suffered because of weak world demand.
The new sense of confidence is personified by Mr Terry Betts. In 1982 he was
an employee of the Falkland Islands Company, which virtually controlled the
local economy but whose substantial landholdings have been broken up and
distributed with government assistance to Falklands residents. Its Stanley
holdings, including the Upland Goose, are up for sale.
Today, Mr Betts and his wife run their own businesses, including several
smaller retailing outlets, and have taken shareholdings in some of the
foreign companies which have obtained licences.
'We've moved from living within a colonial glove,' he said, 'to having a
sense of our own identity. What matters to me is success and economic
growth.'
The problem for the Falklands is where to go next. Officials believe the
islands' licensing regime has reached its maximum potential, balancing the
need to increase revenue and the need to conserve stocks on which future
revenue depends.
In fact, licensing revenue has fallen to Pounds 25m from its peak of Pounds
28m in the 1988-89 season because of more stringent conservation and
competition from other fishing areas.
One option being considered by the government is broadening the scope of the
islands' economic involvement in the fishing industry through development of
onshore facilities and a more carefully scrutinised programme of joint
ventures.
Few kelpers have any direct stake in what is actually fished in their
waters, while support facilities are based in the Chilean port of Punta
Arenas.
There is also growing local interest in the prospect of developing oil
resources.
London has authorised the local Falkland Islands government to issue seismic
exploration licences.
At the same time it has embarked on talks with Argentina - at which island
officials have been present - with a view eventually to discussing issues
such as harmonisation of legislation, enviromental policies and demarcation
of zones.
No conclusive survey has ever been done in and around the islands, although
the offshore seabed has long been rumoured to hold large oil reserves.
However, any serious oil development in the islands could well provoke
considerable environmental and political problems and thereby revive the
issue of sovereignty.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2098</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAEVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Russia and Japan to discuss islands
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Russian Foreign Minister Andrei Kozyrev arrived in Tokyo yesterday for
discussions with Japanese leaders on a longstanding territorial dispute over
the Kurile Islands and aid for Russia's economic reforms, Reuter reports
from Tokyo.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2099</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAEUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Singapore road pricing planned
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By AP-DJ
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SINGAPORE
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Singapore is expected to introduce an electronic road pricing system, which
would charge motorists for road usage, in 1996, Mr Mah Bow Tan, minister for
communications said yesterday, AP-DJ reports from Singapore.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2100</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAETFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Japanese group paid for minister's aide
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Mr Keiwa Okuda, the Japanese transport minister, said yesterday the Sagawa
Kyubin transport group at the heart of a growing bribery scandal paid the
salary of one of his political secretaries, a transport ministry official
said. Reuter reports from Tokyo.
He is the first cabinet minister to be linked to the group.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2101</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAESFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Americans urged to leave Libya
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE US and France yesterday urged their nationals to leave Libya before air
links are cut by the expected imposition of sanctions by the United Nations
Security Council, Reuter reports from Washington.
A resolution proposed by the US, France and Britain would impose mandatory
sanctions, including an air embargo, a halt to arms sales and a reduction in
diplomatic representation if Libya does not turn over agents suspected of
involvement in two aircraft bombings in which 471 people died.
Libya is alleged to have played a central role in the 1988 bombing of a Pan
Am jet over Lockerbie, Scotland, and the 1989 crash of a French UTA plan
over Niger in central Africa.
Yesterday Libyan leader Muammer Gadaffi sent world leaders a cable from
Tripoli repeating that Libya was happy to co-operate with the Lockerbie
investigation, but condemning as aggressive the draft UN resolution calling
for sanctions.
The resolution 'threatens international peace and is related to the
occurrence of aggression,' he said.
The US State Department made it clear yesterday that American nationals
should depart as soon as possible.
'Once airline links are broken, it will be obviously more difficult to leave
the country,' Ms Margaret Tutwiler, the State Department spokeswoman, said.
An estimated 1,000 Americans are in Libya.
The French Foreign ministry said 470 French people were in Libya at the
beginning of this year but several dozen had already left.
Libyan Prime Minister Abu Zaid Omar Dourda said in Cairo he had called for
an emergency meeting of Arab League foreign ministers, apparently to discuss
the sanctions threat.
At the United Nations Mr Boutros Boutros Ghali, the secretary-general said
he believed diplomacy could still solve the looming crisis over Libya.
He said he had met Tripoli's UN ambassador more than 10 times over the past
few weeks in hopes of averting a showdown. Talks were continuing with
non-aligned members of the council, several of whom want to avert sanctions.
'We are trying for a kind of compromise' within the framework of Security
Council demands, he said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2102</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAERFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / S African budget runs into criticism
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP GAWITH
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   CAPE TOWN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SOUTH AFRICA'S budget fails to address the country's structural economic
problems and is a short-term political expedient, economists and businessmen
said yesterday.
The budget was described at a post-budget seminar in Cape Town as a holding
affair, overshadowed in its implications by the positive outcome of the
referendum on constitutional reform.
It lacked a strategy for long-term growth and its public spending and
borrowing levels were too high. The budget deficit for 1992-93 is estimated
at 4.5 per cent of gross domestic product.
The need to improve the growth rate was underlined by the release of the
Reserve Bank's quarterly bulletin on the economy which revealed that the
downturn in economic activity had deepened in the fourth quarter of 1991.
GDP in the period fell at an annualised rate of 0.5 per cent. The economy
has been in recession for three years.
The bank noted that with real GNP per capita having declined to R3,275
(Pounds 660) per capita in 1991 from R3,905 in 1981, it was 'important to
restructure the economy in order to improve its production potential'.
Professor Brian Kantor of the University of Cape Town said yesterday the
budget contained few such initiatives.
Mr Gerhard Croeser, director general of the Department of Finance said the
government's constrained revenue position had 'this year made it virtually
impossible to do much about growth'. However, the previous two budgets had
contained important supply-side initiatives, he said.
Dr Jaap Meijer, deputy governor of the Reserve Bank said yesterday the
budget did not appear to have done anything that would facilitate a cut in
interest rates. He said Dr Chris Stals, the governor, would soon be making a
statement about interest rates.
Increased social spending and a narrowing of the gap in spending on blacks
and whites was criticised by Mr Tito Mboweni of the African National
Congress, as 'throwing money at the problem and not trying to resolve it.'
The most significant concession to business in Tuesday's budget came in the
form of expanded incentives for industrial investment with tax concessions
for importers of raw materials.
The stock market received a boost in the form of reducing from 10 to 5 years
the period before which the disposal of shares will attract income tax.
Economists and businessmen at yesterday's seminar suggested that while the
referendum result was positive, the business community itself would have to
ensure that sufficient attention was paid during the move to a new
constitution to the needs of business and the economy.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2103</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAEQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Loan row points up Israeli military reliance on US: Hugh
Carnegy reports most weapons are US supplied and financed - loss of advanced
technology would be a hard blow
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HUGH CARNEGY and REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JERUSALEM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE DISPUTE between Israel and Washington over the issues of loan guarantees
and alleged Israeli sales of sensitive US weapons technology has underscored
the extent to which Israel has become dependent on US aid, both in the
economy as a whole, but also particularly for its military strength.
Government ministers have responded defiantly to Washington's refusal to
grant Dollars 10bn (Pounds 5.7bn) in loan guarantees to help settle
thousands of Jewish immigrants from the former Soviet Union unless Israel
halts Jewish settlement in the occupied territories.
Mr Moshe Arens, the defence minister, has said Israel will not 'crawl or beg
for help' and that it will look to world Jewry for the funds instead.
But Israeli leaders know it will be hard to cope with any significant
reduction in the levels of US aid. The failure to secure the loan guarantees
and the implicit threat of reduced access to US military assistance if abuse
of US technology is proved has sent a shudder of alarm through the
government and the defence establishment.
Despite Mr Arens' appeal, diaspora Jews, who already contribute about
Dollars 2bn a year to Israel, cannot realistically be expected to fill the
gap left by the loss of the loan guarantees. And Israel expects that
borrowing large amounts on world markets without the guarantees would be
very hard.
Mr Jacob Frenkel, the governor of the Bank of Israel, said a programme of
tough spending cuts, possibly on social spending, and accelerated reforms to
promote growth and investment would be necessary.
However, the deeper concern raised by the US stance on the guarantees, and a
political climate in Washington less sympathetic to foreign aid than in the
past, is that it may presage a decline in the traditional high level of
economic aid Israel has received annually from the US for the past 20 years
and more.
US government aid to Israel has totalled around Dollars 40bn since the
establishment of the state in 1948. Since the early 1980s, combined annual
economic and military aid of around Dollars 3bn has all been in grant form,
in effect lifting the burden of Israel's foreign debt and allowing Israel to
maintain rates of military spending at times amounting to more than 20 per
cent of gross domestic product.
As Mr James Baker, US secretary of state, remarked tartly in evidence to
Congress, the reason Israel has a good debt repayment record is because the
US provided the dollars with which to pay it back.
In 1991, US aid went up to close to Dollars 4bn because of emergency help
for Gulf war expenditures. This amounted to some 8 per cent of GDP. In
contrast, net foreign investment was negative for both of past two years.
Critics of the Israeli economy argue persuasively that US aid has been a
factor in Israel's poor growth record since the 1970s by fuelling
misallocation of resources and blunting the incentive to introduce market
reforms to the state-dominated economy. But it is clear any big reduction
would be extremely painful in the short term.
Nowhere would this be felt more than by the military. A recent study for Tel
Aviv University's Jaffee Centre for Strategic Studies* says Israel's ability
to finance military acquisitions rests on US security assistance, which
makes up Dollars 1.8bn of the annual aid package. This accounts for an
average of more than 30 per cent of the defence budget and may have reached
half in 1991.
'This reliance on Washington for the flow of arms goes much deeper than the
financial sector,' the study says. 'For not only is the US the principal
funder of weapons acquisition, it is the number one provider as well.'
Military experts have been quick to point out that any reduction in military
assistance - -or blocking of access to technology - would be extremely
damaging. Since France cut off arms supplies in 1967, Israel's main weapons
systems have become US supplied or financed, or both. Access to US
technology has been a vital part in maintaining Israel's crucial
'qualitative edge' over its Arab foes.
US systems used by Israel include its frontline F-15 and F-16 aircraft,
Apache helicopters and radar surveillance aircraft. 'Even Israel's main
battle tank, the Merkava, has been built in large part by US investment
capital,' says the Jaffee Centre study.
The US is funding the development of the Arrow ballistic missile
interceptor, the Israeli-made weapon which Israel intends to be its main
defence against missiles such as the Scud rockets fired at it by Iraq during
the Gulf war.
Under offset terms attached to the US military aid, Dollars 375m can be
spent by Israel in Israel and Dollars 100m by the US in Israel, a vital
source of business for the country's indigenous military industries. These
also benefit from annual Pentagon purchases from Israel of Dollars 250m.
Israeli officials and US diplomats say that the current disputes between
them have not compromised Washington's commitment to support Israel's
security.
But Mr Binyamin Netanyahu, junior minister in the office of Mr Yitzhak
Shamir, the prime minister, said in a radio interview this week that
Israelis should be ready for a decline in aid. 'We are entering a decade in
which we will no longer be able to depend on American aid,' he said.
*Rearming Israel: Defence Procurement through the 1990s, JCSS 1991.
Published by the Jerusalem Post, PO Box 81, Jerusalem 91000.
Israel will bar 750,000 Palestinians from leaving the Gaza Strip from today
until further notice, Reuter reports from Jerusalem. The order came two days
after a Gaza man stabbed to death a Jewish woman and an Israeli-Arab man and
wounded another 19 people. The attacker, who was avenging the death of his
father in an Israeli prison, was shot dead. Palestinians said it was the
first time since the Gulf war a year ago that the army had sealed off Gaza.
About 20,000 Gazans leave daily to work in Israel, mostly as labourers.
Security officials said the closure order came from Defence Minster Moshe
Arens, who is in Washington for talks. The uprising against Israeli rule
began in a Gaza refugee camp in December 1987. Gaza is a stronghold of the
Moslem fundamentalist Hamas movement.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2104</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAEPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Ethiopians flee into Kenya
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ADDIS ABABA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
AT LEAST 10,000 southern Ethiopians have fled over the Kenyan border in the
past two weeks, fleeing tribal warfare and drought, Mr Abadi Zemo, deputy
head of the state Relief and Rehabilitation Commission, said yesterday,
Reuter reports from Addis Ababa.
A UN official said in Nairobi as many as 2,000 Ethiopians were arriving each
day.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2105</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAEOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / World Trade News: Japan cuts voluntary ceiling on cars to US
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEVEN BUTLER, JOHN GRIFFITHS and AP
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO, LONDON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Japanese government yesterday responded to mounting trade friction with
Washington by sharply cutting its self-imposed ceiling on automobile exports
to the US.
But the move was greeted with derision by the US motor industry, with Ford
chairman and chief executive Mr Harold Poling declaring that Japan had
'learned nothing' about the need to balance its trade with the US.
The Ministry of International Trade and Industry (Miti) lowered the ceiling
from 2.3m to 1.65m vehicles for the fiscal year starting next month.
Bilateral trade restraints limiting automobile exports were first agreed
between the US and Japan in 1981. Japan, however, unilaterally maintained an
export ceiling when the agreement lapsed. The current ceiling of 2.3m
vehicles was fixed in 1985.
However, the practical effect of the cut will not be that great, in that
Japanese exports to the US have in any case been falling steadily - against
the background of a severely depressed US new car market.
Exports to the US from Japan last year are estimated at only 1.73m vehicles,
compared with 1.85m in 1990.
The decline, however, has been more than offset by increased local
production. Japan's share of the US market has risen to more than 30 per
cent. Honda said yesterday it could tap spare production capacity at its
Ohio plant if demand warranted, while Nissan is bringing new facilities on
stream this summer in Tennessee.
It is actions such as these which prompted General Motors yesterday to decry
the export cut as 'misleading'.
'It only stimulates the building of more capacity in an industry already
saddled with world-wide over-capacity', said a GM spokesman.
Ford's Mr Poling said it 'will not do a thing to help the trade balance and
it's a voluntary limit anyway. A limit of around 1.3m or less would have
shown that Japan understood the need to change its trading relationships'.
Chrysler, whose chairman Mr Lee Iacocca is one of the fiercest critics of
Japanese trade policies, said the ceiling should have been cut to 1m if the
Japanese were serious about 'a level playing field'.
Vehicles and vehicle parts account for about 75 per cent of Japan's trade
surplus with the US, which rose to Dollars 43bn last year from Dollars 41bn
in 1990.
Mr Atsushi Kawashima, director of Miti's automobile division, said the
ceiling was lowered in order to keep exports on a declining trend. With the
Japanese and European markets both sluggish, Japanese makers may otherwise
take advantage of the expected recovery in the US economy by boosting
exports, he said.
Accepting that it would be difficult for Japan to raise the ceiling again,
some measure of relief should be provided to the US industry when its market
starts to emerge from recession. However, in terms of the financial balance,
even this could be countered by the fact that the cars Japan exports have
been moving steadily 'upmarket', with higher unit values.
The reduction plan announced yesterday will stoke fears that the world's
free trade system is being gradually eroded by a series of managed trade
deals.
The European Community has recently criticised US-Japan agreements in
automobile parts and semiconductors.
With Japan's domestic car market also faltering for the first time in years,
and exports to the US and Europe restricted, Japanese vehicle makers are
under increasing pressure to find additional outlets for their products,
with South America and other developing areas gaining more of their
attention.
Mr Kawashima said the decision was 'based on the recognition that the
automobile industry is one of the industrial pillars of both Japan and the
US, and that healthy development of the automobile industry in both
countries is vital to advance further the good relationship between the two
countries and maintain the overall free trade system'.
Mr Kozo Watanabe, Miti minister, however, admitted that the decision was
open to criticism on many grounds.
'We have four options - whether to maintain the ceiling at the current
level, to scrap it, to cut it to the level of fiscal 1991 exports, or to
reduce it below that. We've known none of them can be satisfying enough for
everybody concerned.'
Mr Watanabe acknowledged that the ceiling may have to be abandoned depending
on the outcome of the Gatt trade negotiations, where efforts are being made
to ban all 'grey area' trade controls.
He argued however that the voluntary trade restraint would in the end
promote free trade by giving breathing space to allow a recovery at General
Motors, Ford, and Chrysler in the US. This he said would help to stem
protectionism.
The Japanese automobile companies yesterday greeted the new ceiling with
resignation, saying it was unavoidable in the current political climate.
Miti has yet to allocate quotas to individual companies.
The Bush administration yesterday sent a direct plea to Japanese businesses
to ease antagonism over the trade imbalance by doing more to provide equal
business opportunities to US companies, AP reports from Tokyo.
The US ambassador, Mr Michael Armacost, warned a gathering of senior
Japanese executives tensions could grow worse if more was not done to
counter Japan's surging trade surplus.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2106</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAENFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / World Trade News: Finding the hand on the purse-strings
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS, DAVID DODWELL, NANCY DUNNE, ROBERT GRAHAM, DAVID
MARSH, QUENTIN PEEL and DAVID WALLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WE NEED to know who has the authority to sign a contract,' says Mr John
Macomber, chairman of the US Export-Import Bank, when asked about deals with
the former Soviet Union. 'Who controls the foreign currency? Who decides if
foreigners can invest in their oil and gas business?'
For all international companies, pinpointing worthwhile deals in the midst
of current upheavals in the former Soviet Union is no easy matter.
Trading and financial institutions have disappeared. Privatisation plans are
creating turmoil in Russia. Inexperienced officials in other republics of
the Commonwealth of Independent States (CIS) are wrestling to fill the void
left as Moscow-led institutions have been cut adrift. Raw material supplies
to factories are being sold to the west for foreign exchange. Banks that can
be trusted as sovereign guarantors for projects are almost totally absent
outside Russia.
Ms Beatrice Kuhne, a Berlin-based trade promotion expert from the Federation
of German Industry, says: 'Everyone thought it would be better there when
(Russian President) Yeltsin freed prices and investment conditions in
November. But the result is chaos. We tell our people that the only thing
that works is barter.'
Two years ago, Britain's Davy McKee won a Pounds 1.5m contract to supply
modifications to an aluminium rolling mill in Mikhailovsk in Siberia. Today,
the goods are ready to ship, but the buyer - a Soviet trading company - no
longer exists and foreign exchange for payment has evaporated.
In Italy, where the mood is a mixture of confusion and wait-and-see, Fiat is
anxious to conclude a deal for a joint venture with Vaz, the former state
automotive producer at Togliattigrad in Russia.
The deal envisages Fiat taking a one-third stake in Vaz, modernisation of
the plant, retooling, and production of a new model, initially at 300,000
units a year.
However, any deal is complicated by the fact that Vaz relies for 20 per cent
of its components on factories outside Russia, while another 30 per cent of
components come from inside Russia but from factories not integrated with
Vaz.
In the food industry, where investment is urgently needed, and western
governmental sympathy has been greatest, movement is also likely to be slow.
For example, Mr Peter Cheshire, director of marketing at the UK sugar group
Booker Tate, says that any joint venture in the sugar industry is at least
two years away.
His company operates an experimental plot in conjunction with a local
partner in the Ukraine. 'They don't even have a clear idea of a currency.
It's total chaos at the moment, though it's still worth working there,' he
says.
While cautionary tales are the norm, some worthwhile deals are being forged:
the attraction is the republics' long-term potential and the feeling that
now may be the time to grasp the opportunity. Mr Lorenz Schomerus, head of
the external trade department of the German Economics Ministry, says that
normalisation in the former Soviet republics would open the way for at least
DM60bn (Pounds 20.9bn) worth of trade.
Salamander, the German shoe manufacturer, has a 49 per cent stake in
Lenwest, a St Petersburg joint venture. Although Salamander's own shoe
exports to the Soviet Union are likely to drop at least tenfold this year,
the company claims its joint venture is coping well.
Even Davy McKee, in contrast to its experience in Mikhailovsk, agreed just a
month ago a Pounds 40m contract to supply an electrolytic tinning plant at
the Karaganda steelworks in Temirtau, Kazakhstan. Karaganda has foreign
exchange earnings of its own which it has been willing to commit to paying
Davy McKee.
Helping to explain the west's lack of enthusiasm for Mr Yeltsin's requests
for new money, governments have another, though more prosaic, nightmare: the
fear that fullscale Soviet default on officially supported export credit
guarantees could cause billions of dollars of losses. One of the greatest
unknowns, German officials say, is the adequacy of the foreign currency
reserves of the new republican foreign trade banks.
'The main problem is arranging financing and export credit insurance,' says
Mr Hans Koch, a board member of Lurgi, the plant-building subsidiary of the
Frankfurt-based Metallgesellschaft group which has been trading with the
Soviet Union for decades. The company's projects are 'more or less stuck at
the moment', he says.
Ms Tatiana Berls, in charge of relations with the Soviet republics at Apco
Associates, a Washington consulting firm, said US manufacturers are delaying
entry into the market because of current instability. But, she says, 'once
the International Monetary Fund and the World Bank are in there, business
will follow'.
Mr Eberhard von Koerber, chairman of the German subsidiary of Asea Brown
Boveri, a multinational engineering company with long-standing Soviet links,
echoes a common sentiment: 'We can't simply sit back and wait until
everything is clear and sorted out. That might take 10 years, and by then
someone braver than us would have come in and got all the business.'
Contributors: William Dawkins, David Dodwell, Nancy Dunne, Robert Graham,
David Marsh, Quentin Peel and David Waller. A companion piece appeared
yesterday.
The Russian Revolution, Page 14
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
               E. EUROPE AND CIS FOREIGN TRADE % 1990-91
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                     EXPORTS           IMPORTS
                                  1990     1991     1990     1991
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Eastern Europe with:
World                             -3.3    -11.0      2.9    11.4
Eastern Europe                   -18.6    -32.5    -18.2   -34.5
Industrial countries              11.6      9.2     24.2    27.5
Developing countries             -14.3    -24.6       -     -3.2
CIS with:
World                             -5.2    -17.7       -    -41.4
Eastern Europe                   -26.9    -31.6    -12.1   -41.2
Industrial countries              12.3     -7.0      5.6   -41.1
Developing countries              -9.5    -31.7      3.8   -51.4
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: UN Economic Commission for Europe, 1991
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2107</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAEMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / French students in election manoeuvre
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN DAVIDSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THOUSANDS of French university and secondary school students marched in
procession in the streets of Paris yesterday to protest against the
government's plans to reform the university education system.
The timing of the demonstration, the third such protest march in the past
month, was deliberately chosen by the students to put maximum pressure on
the government in the immediate run-up to Sunday's regional elections, which
are expected to show a substantial loss of support for the ruling
socialists.
Yesterday's student march came in the wake of a demonstration march on
Wednesday night, staged by left-wing and human rights groups protesting
against the regional election campaign of Mr Jean-Marie Le Pen, leader of
the extreme right-wing National Front. Mr Le Pen's party is expected to make
large gains in Sunday's vote, with perhaps 15 per cent of the total.
A fringe element of the anti-NF march erupted in violence, in which a small
group of left-wing extremists broke shop windows and overturned cars. The
government's educational reform plan is intended to streamline the
university system so as to reduce the very high failure rate for
first-degree students. The first two years of first-degree courses would be
made less specialised, by reducing the number of different degree subjects
from 45 to 12. Courses would be made more modular, with the acquisition of
credits. Students would receive more tutoring in addition to public
lectures; and those who dropped out after a year could receive a certificate
registering the course credits they had achieved.
But this reform plan, like so many previous plans, has met outright
rejection from student activists. Some charge it is a way either of making
the universities more selective, others that it is designed to down-grade
university degrees.
Shock to the system, page 16
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2108</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAELFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / World News in Brief: Pets free to travel
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Britain will have to scrap its anti-rabies quarantine measures under planned
European Commission legislation. Travellers will be free to take pets to
other EC countries provided the animals are vaccinated against rabies.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2109</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAEKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / World News in Brief: Queen confirms York separation
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The Queen issued a statement that the Duke and Duchess of York were to
separate, six years to the day after their engagement, and made it clear it
was the duchess who had initiated the move. An official said the Queen found
media speculation undesirable during the general election campaign.
There are no immediate plans for either the duke or the duchess to move out
of the family home, Sunninghill Park, near Windsor. Ballot box, Page 9
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2110</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAEJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Financial regulation proposal divides the City
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS and PHILIP STEPHENS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE CITY was sharply divided yesterday over a government proposal to move
the policing of large parts of Britain's financial sector from the
Department of Trade and Industry to the Treasury.
The move, which has been driven by ministerial concern to strengthen the
regulatory framework for large financial conglomerates, was broadly welcomed
by many top City figures.
Mr Peter Rawlins, chief executive of the London Stock Exchange, welcomed the
proposal, which would bring regulation in the UK into line with other
leading financial centres.
'The securities industry is getting increasingly intertwined with the wider
banking and financial services industries,' he said. 'It would make a good
deal of sense.'
However, senior figures in the insurance industry, the only part of the
financial sector directly overseen by the DTI, were concerned about being
brought under the Treasury's wing.
The DTI - which has come under widespread criticism in recent years over its
failure to prevent a number of City scandals - is widely seen as a
sympathetic regulator of insurance companies.
Insurers fear the loss of a relationship which they believe has worked in
their favour.
The Association of British Insurers said banking and insurance regulation
'should be kept separate, so that bank depositors should not be
disadvantaged compared with insurance policy holders, and vice versa'.
The planned shake-up also raises the question of whether Lloyd's, the
troubled private insurance market which regulates itself, would be brought
under external control.
Existing self-regulatory bodies in the City also generally seemed concerned
about any upheaval in their relationship with government.
There was concern in some quarters about the overlap that would result
between the regulation of companies, which would remain at the DTI, and
other aspects of financial regulation.
'It would be a terrible muddle,' one City regulator commented. 'Who would
handle a Blue Arrow or Guinness investigation?'
The Conservative manifesto indicated this week that if re-elected, the
Conservative government would transfer to the Treasury oversight of the
financial services industry, including the Securities and Investments Board,
the chief investment watchdog, the stock exchange and insider dealing.
The proposal is also widely believed in Whitehall to cover the insurance
industry.
The City's relations with the DTI have fluctuated sharply in recent years.
Concern has been expressed about the way investment regulation was amended
under the Financial Services Act and mixed feelings surfaced over the way
deregulation in the City was handled in the 1980s.
The relationship between the Treasury and the banking sector has been
smoother as the Bank of England has acted as a buffer between the two.
Senior ministers said the proposal marked a recognition that the creation of
multipurpose financial conglomerates had blurred the previous distinctions
between banks, building societies and other businesses in the financial
services sector.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2111</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAEIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Stock and Currency Markets
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 ---------------------------------
STERLING
 ---------------------------------
New York:
dollars 1.71115 (1.728)
London:
dollars 1.7115 (1.7325)
DM 2.8575 (2.8575)
FFr 9.705 (9.7025)
SFr 2.5925 (2.5875)
Y 228.0 (228.75)
pounds index 89.8 (89.9)
 ---------------------------------
GOLD
 ---------------------------------
New York Comex Apr
dollars 339.1 (353.6)
London:
dollars 336.85 (340.6)
 ---------------------------------
N SEA OIL (Argus)
 ---------------------------------
Brent 15-day  Apr
dollars 17.875 (17.825)
 ---------------------------------
DOLLAR
 ---------------------------------
New York:
DM 1.67075 (1.6532)
FFr 5.67 (5.613)
SFr 1.51485 (1.4952)
Y 133.575 (132.32)
London:
DM 1.6695 (1.649)
FFr 5.67 (5.60)
SFr 1.5145 (1.493)
Y 133.25 (132.1)
dollars index 65.4 (64.9)
Tokyo close: Y132.55
 ---------------------------------
US CLOSING RATES
 ---------------------------------
Fed Funds: 4 1/8% (3)
3-mo Treasury Bills:
4.138% (4.138)
Long Bond:
100 5/16 (99 29/32)
yield: 7.965% (8.001)
 ---------------------------------
STOCK INDICES
 ---------------------------------
FT-SE 100: Yield 5.00
2,467.6 (+2.9)
FT-A All-Share:
1,186.78 (+0.1%)
FT-SE Eurotrack 100:
1,153.18 (-0.64)
FT-A World Index:
138.89 (+0.3%)
New York:
DJ Ind. Av.
3261.4 (+7.15)
S&amp;P Comp
409.8 (+0.65)
Tokyo: Nikkei
20,185.09 (+420.78)
 ---------------------------------
LONDON MONEY
 ---------------------------------
3-month interbank:
10 13/16% (same)
Liffe long gilt future:
Jun 94 13/32 (Jun 94 13/16)
 ---------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2112</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAEHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / De Klerk to speed pace of reform in S Africa
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL HOLMAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JOHANNESBURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PRESIDENT FW de Klerk indicated yesterday that he would quicken the pace of
constitutional reform in South Africa.
Mr de Klerk, buoyed by the white electorate's overwhelming endorsement of
negotiations with black leaders, said a sense of urgency and dynamic
negotiation was needed to end any uncertainty about the country's political
future.
Echoing the need for rapid progress, Mr Nelson Mandela, the African National
Congress president, urged Mr de Klerk to act quickly. Mr Mandela told a
press conference in Cape Town: 'Our demand is that the interim government
must be introduced this year, and we think that is possible.'
Mr de Klerk, speaking in Cape Town after meeting Mr Pierre Trudeau, the
former Canadian prime minister, declined to put a timetable on the reform
process.
'The basis of negotiation is consensus so no one can say how long it will
take,' said Mr de Klerk. But he made clear that Tuesday's referendum, in
which 69 per cent of the white electorate voted for constitutional talks,
had given impetus to the negotiations.
Officials from the government and the ANC believe an interim government
could be in place by the end of the year.
The size of the 'yes' vote and the success of the national side in the World
Cup cricket tournament in Australia, has left most of white South Africa
feeling in better heart than it has for years.
A sizeable exception to the rejoicing is represented by the parliamentary
caucus of the right-wing Conservative party, for whom the referendum was a
disaster.
The caucus met yesterday to consider its strategy in the face of Tuesday's
rebuff.
Many observers expect a split in the party, which persuaded 31 per cent of
whites to oppose reform - well below their expectations.
Some Conservative MPs believe the party should now participate in
constitutional talks, which so far it has boycotted. Mr Andries Treurnicht,
the party leader, gave no clue yesterday of his plans, but warned that Mr de
Klerk 'will be the victim of his own reform.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2113</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAEGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Major switches attack to tax as jobless rises
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP STEPHENS, PETER NORMAN and ALISON SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR JOHN MAJOR signalled the start of a fierce Conservative onslaught on
Labour's tax plans last night as news of another steep rise in the
unemployment total delivered a jolt to the prime minister's election
campaign.
In what his cabinet colleagues said marked the beginning of an unrelenting
effort to 'shred' Mr John Smith's shadow Budget, Mr Major said Labour
planned 'the biggest increase in personal tax since the war'. He also joined
in his party's attacks on Mr Neil Kinnock, arguing that the 'question of
leadership' was central to the election.
His speech, at the first large Conservative rally of the campaign in
Manchester, came as official figures showed that unemployment rose by a
further 40,200 last month to its highest level for 4 1/2 years.
The seasonally adjusted jobless total has risen for 22 consecutive months to
stand 1.05m higher than at its low-point in the spring of 1990.
Mr Kinnock, describing the jobless figures as 'utterly appalling', told a
Labour rally in Birmingham that his party's plans for investment, training
and reviving confidence offered the only opportunity to 'ignite recovery'.
His colleagues said the rise in unemployment would keep the recession at the
centre of the election campaign.
Their confidence was strengthened by evidence that dole queues lengthened
most last month in the main election battlegrounds of the south-east,
Greater London, the south-west and West Midlands.
Unemployment in the traditional Tory heartland of the south-east outside
London has increased by 184 per cent over the past two years. In Greater
London, unemployment stands at 10 per cent, having more than doubled since
January 1990.
As the first week of the election campaign drew to a close there was a
grudging acceptance among senior Conservatives that the Labour party had got
off to the stronger start.
In spite of the volatility of opinion polls, the underlying message appears
to be that Mr Smith's alternative Budget and the gloomy economic news on
output and employment had left Labour with a slight lead.
Only three of the past 12 opinion polls have shown a Conservative lead.
The FT's weighted average of the past six polls points to a two-point Labour
advantage.
The same mood was reflected in the FT Election Share Index of politically
sensitive shares, which again swung towards stocks that might gain from a
Labour victory.
The 'Labour gainers' section of the index rose strongly, to 99.6, less than
half a percentage point below the level at which they started the campaign.
'Conservative gainers' dropped again, to 95.5, some 4 1/2 percentage points
below their announcement-day level.
Mr Chris Patten, the Conservative party chairman, signalled that his party
would play the 'tax card' with a ferocity which would stop Labour in its
tracks in the final three weeks of the election campaign.
That strategy was reflected in the sharpness of Mr Major's language during a
day on the campaign trail.
Jostled during a rowdy demonstration in Bolton, he blamed the 'ugly face' of
Labour.
He told the Manchester rally that Labour was the party of 'envy' and
'spite'.
And he said of Labour's plans to abolish the ceiling on National Insurance
contributions and increase the top rate of tax: 'No one at any stage in the
history of Britain has launched such an onslaught on the security of
hard-working middle income families.'
Yesterday's economic news was not as bad as 'black Thursday' a month ago,
when news of the big jump in January unemployment coincided with a sharp
rise in house repossessions and a significant fall in manufacturing
investment.
But other officials figures released yesterday underlined the severity of
the recession.
The Central Statistical Office reported that output by the service sector,
which accounts for three-fifths of the economy and includes retailing,
transport and government services such as education, fell by a record 1.6
per cent last year.
Investment by industrial and commercial companies, excluding electricity,
fell 16 per cent last year - the highest figure since records began in 1963.
Gross trading profits made by industrial and commercial companies, leaving
aside oil and electricity, fell more sharply during 1991 than at any time in
the previous 17 years.
Election 1992, Pages 8-9
Figures deepen dole-queue gloom, Page 6
Editorial Comment, Page 16
Joe Rogaly: Major's best bet, Page 17
Lex, Page 18
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2114</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAEFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Decline in Japanese output increases rate cut pressure
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEFAN WAGSTYL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
JAPAN'S economy declined in the last three months of 1991, indicating that
the country may soon slip into recession.
However, economists believe that any decline in output would be modest in
comparison with Britain or the US.
Output fell compared with the previous quarter, resulting in the first
quarterly fall in economic activity in more than two years. The decline
reflects weak consumption and will increase the pressure on the Bank of
Japan to cut interest rates, possibly next week.
The stock market, buoyed by the speculation of a cut in the official
discount rate, rebounded sharply. It sent the Nikkei index back above the
20,000 level. Investors also took heart from speculation that the government
was planning to boost the economy by concentrating public works spending in
the first part of the new financial year. The index closed 420 higher on the
day at 20,185.09.
The economy contracted by 0.2 per cent on an annualised basis in the last
quarter of 1991 compared with the previous quarter, according to the
government's Economic Planning Agency. A sharp decline in domestic demand of
2.1 per cent was partly offset by an increase in external demand, composed
of a decline in imports and a rise in exports.
The agency admitted that the government's target of 3.7 per cent economic
growth in the year to the end of March looked unattainable. The outturn is
likely to be closer to 3.3 per cent - well down on the 5.5 per cent recorded
for 1990-91 but still well ahead of most other industrialised countries.
A decline in the Japanese economy in the first quarter of this year, making
two successive quarters, would by most yardsticks mean Japan was in
recession. Japan last suffered a recession in 1974-75.
EPA officials said the economy was much stronger now than in 1974, pointing
out that the 0.2 per cent quarter-on-quarter decline was modest.
However, bankers and industrialists, who have been calling for further
interest rate cuts, will seize on yesterday's figures. Mr Yoh Kurosawa,
president of the Industrial Bank of Japan, said that although businessmen's
gloom was exaggerated, Japan needed a rate cut to boost confidence and
revive the stock market.
According to the EPA, consumption was weak, held back by lower year-end
bonuses and a decline in confidence. It grew just 0.4 per cent. Private
investment (excluding housing) declined but only by 2.5 per cent - less than
expected and a sign of continuing resilience in the economy.
On a year-on-year basis, the economy grew 3.2 per cent. For 1991 as a whole,
the economy grew by a robust 4.5 per cent, due to strong growth early in the
year.
Car exports cut, Page 3
Editorial Comment, Page 16
World stock markets, Page 37
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2115</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAEEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Appointments: Orange pump-priming for BP Oil
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
British Petroleum has appointed John Orange to head its BP Oil UK division
following the retirement of Viv Thomas after 33 years with the company.
Orange, 49, moves into the UK petrol retailing sector at a time of intense
competition for market share as supermarkets challenge the oil companies'
business. BP has recently revamped its forecourt set-up and is leading an
aggressive assault for motorists' business.
No stranger to a tough position, Orange has been responsible, over the past
two years, for pushing through BP's cultural change programme which has
involved cutting through layers of bureaucracy to give more responsibility
to individual managers. The culture change has been controversial inside the
company since it has coincided with a period of substantial job losses for
which it has often received the blame.
Orange previously spent 18 months at BP's operations in Iran just before the
revolution in 1979. He then returned to London as legal adviser for two
years before being made regional co-ordinator for the Middle East. After
that he headed BP Denmark and later BP's New Zealand operations.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 40
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2116</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAEDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / London Stock Exchange: Equity futures and options trading
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PRICE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A LATE buying spree helped the futures market to its first premium to the
cash market in recent sessions as traders reported a busier, but still
volatile session, writes Christopher Price
The March FT-SE contract opened up at 2,471, but was soon sold down to 2,464
before finding buyers. The contract was then squeezed higher to 2,477, its
best point of the day, with independent traders taking long positions.
Mild panic selling set in with the release of UK government statistics at
11.30am. The gilts and short sterling markets were knocked and March
followed suit, tumbling to 2,455 within five minutes.
With the opening of Wall Street in the afternoon session, the market
steadied. But buyers moved in towards the end, squeezing March to 2,471.
This was 11 higher than the previous session's close and some 2 points above
its estimated fair value premium to cash of about 4. Turnover was a busier
7,223 contracts.
The traded options market was also busier than the previous session, with
29,636 contracts traded. The FT-SE 100 option traded a third of these, while
the best-traded stock option was Asda at 3,870 contracts, followed by
British Steel and Cable and Wireless.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 40
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2117</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAECFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Appointments: Bucking the trend at Salomon
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Salomon Brothers, the investment house suffering from waves of defections
after last summer's Treasury bond scandal, is congratulating itself on
having lured a team from Continental Bank to set up an international
structured arbitrage group based in London.
The three, Richard Briffett, 44, Lee Resseguie, 44, and Christopher Warner,
28, previously made up Continental's London international treasury
consulting group.
Their combined expertise is very much in the tax and legal sphere, and they
will be working on complicated cross-border transactions, particularly in
the equity field. Salomon is keen to stress that they will in no way be
acting as clients' tax advisers.
Briffett, who set up the group at Continental in 1987, spent eight years
with the Inland Revenue before joining Continental; Resseguie has worked as
a tax attorney at Sara Lee Corporation and Atlantic Richfield; and Warner is
a law graduate with a year at Coopers &amp; Lybrand Deloitte. They are also a
highly international bunch - British, American and Dutch respectively.
Salomon is understood to have made the approach before the scandal hit, but
negotiations were on hold for some months until the investment house was
clearer about its future.
Continental, however, plays down the Salomon 'coup', pointing out that it
has severely cut down its own London operation. While the team left of its
own accord, the US bank says it will not be replacing them.
Meanwhile, Jeremy Bradburne, who resigned as Salomon Brothers
International's chief financial officer some months ago, has surfaced at JP
Morgan Securities also in the structured finance area. He joins as a
managing director in the European capital markets division with
responsibility for structured finance products.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 40
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2118</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAEBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / FT Law Report: Compensation will be amended
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RACHEL DAVIES, Barrister
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE LAW DEBENTURE TRUST CORPORATION v THE URAL CASPIAN OIL CORPORATION LTD
AND OTHERS
Chancery Division:
Mr Justice Hoffmann:
March 9 1992
A TRUSTEE for ex-shareholders with rights to foreign compensation for
confiscation of company assets, has no contractual cause of action against a
person to whom the company transfers those rights in breach of agreement
with the trustee, nor against a subsequent transferee, if the transferees
acquired the rights with knowledge of the agreement but were not party to
it.
And as the second transfer deprives the trustee of the remedy of retransfer
as against the first transferee to undo the consequences of the tort of
interference with contractual relations, he may have a cause of action in
tort as against the second transferee for interference with the remedies
arising out of a broken contract, which would enable him to seek a court
order for retransfer to the first transferee and then to the company.
Mr Justice Hoffmann so held when striking out parts of the statement of
claim and giving leave to amend it in an action by Law Debenture Trust
Corporation against Ural Caspian Oil Corporation Ltd, North Caucasian Oil
Fields Ltd, New Schibaieff Petroleum Co Ltd, Grozny-Sundja Oil Fields Ltd
('the Russian companies'), Hilldon Ltd and Caspian Resources Ltd.
HIS LORDSHIP said the Russian companies were English-registered companies
which carried on business in Russia before the revolution. The Soviets
confiscated their assets and for many years rejected their claims for
compensation.
In April 1986, Leisure made an offer for the entire issued share capitals of
the Russian companies. The controlling shareholder in each company was Shell
Petroleum. It agreed to accept the offer on condition that Leisure and the
companies entered into covenants to apply any compensation for the benefit
of existing shareholders.
By four agreements dated May 2 1986 each of the Russian companies and
Leisure entered into covenants with Law Debenture Trust as trustee for the
shareholders. Each company covenanted to pursue its compensation claim, and
to pay any compensation it received to the trustee.
In each agreement, Leisure covenanted to procure that the company would
perform its covenants, and not to part with control of the company unless
the transferee entered into similar covenants.
After execution of the agreements, Shell and certain other shareholders
transferred their shares to Leisure.
On December 15 1989, the Russian companies were paid Pounds 7.2m
compensation. Shortly before payment, Leisure agreed to sell its entire
shareholding to Hilldon, an Isle of Man company. In breach of covenant, it
imposed no requirement that Hilldon should covenant with the trustee, and
Hilldon did not do so.
On March 5 1990, the shares were transferred to Hilldon. A further Pounds 6m
compensation was paid on June 4. In October, Hilldon transferred the shares
to Caspian.
The Russian companies refused to pay the compensation to the trustee. It
commenced proceedings against the companies, and against Hilldon and
Caspian.
The statement of claim alleged against Hilldon that by accepting the shares
knowing the terms of the agreements, it procured Leisure to breach of
covenant. Hilldon admitted the allegation disclosed a cause of action in
tort.
However, it was further alleged that Hilldon and Caspian, knowing of the
agreement, each came under a contractual 'implied collateral obligation' to
the trustee to perform similar covenants.
Hilldon and Caspian applied under RSC Order 18 rule 19, to have the claims
in contract struck out.
Neither of them was party to a contract with the trustee. Nor were there any
grounds for implying a collateral contract. Part of the statement of claim
was liable to be struck out as against Hilldon, and the whole as against
Caspian.
Mr Crystal for the trustee applied for leave to amend the statement of
claim.
A proposed new paragraph said that because Hilldon took the shares with
knowledge of the agreements and their breach by Leisure, it also took the
burden of those covenants and came under an obligation to perform them.
Similar allegations were made against Caspian.
Mr Crystal submitted that the obligation to perform the covenants arose
either under the principle of De Mattos v Gibson (1958) 4 De G&amp;J 276, 282,
or under a developing principle relating to benefits and burdens.
The De Mattos principle was that as a general rule, where a person acquired
property with knowledge of a previous contract to use the property in a
specified manner, he should not use it in a manner not allowable to the
giver or seller.
The principle permitted no more than the grant of a negative injunction.
In Lumley v Wagner (1852) 1 De GM&amp;G 618 the defendant was restrained from
singing at Covent Garden and Mr Gye was injuncted from employing her there,
but she was not ordered to sing at Her Majesty's Theatre and he was not
ordered to procure that she did so.
There was not a single case in which the De Mattos principle had been used
to impose a positive duty to perform the covenants of a predecessor.
In the alternative, the trustee relied on the principle that he who took the
benefit of a transaction must also take the burden.
The 'pure principle' of benefit and burden was that the right and burden,
although arising under the same instrument, were independent of each other:
'X grants a right to Y and by the same instrument Y independently covenants
with X to do some act' (Tito v Wadell (No 2)(1977) Ch 106).
In the present case, the right and burden did not arise under the same
instrument. The shares were transferred to Leisure from registered
shareholders, while the covenant was made by Leisure with the trustee for
all shareholders.
A covenantee's right to enforce his covenant against an assignee depended on
the circumstances of a transaction to which he was not a party (see Tito).
One must be able to infer from that transaction that the assignee was
intended to assume the burden. No such inference could be drawn here. On the
contrary, the trustee asserted that the whole object of the transaction was
to ensure that Hilldon and Caspian would not be subject to the burden of the
agreements.
Finally, the trustee claimed extension of relief for the tort of inducing
breach of contract.
In Esso Petroleum (1974) 1 QB 142 an order was made to undo the consequences
of a tort which could have been restrained before it was committed.
Under that authority, the court could have ordered Hilldon to retransfer the
shares to Leisure for it to procure performance by the Russian companies. An
order was no longer possible because Hilldon had transferred the shares to
Caspian.
The trustee therefore asked for orders against Caspian to retransfer the
shares to Hilldon, and against Hilldon to retransfer them to Leisure.
For an injunctive order against Caspian, the trustee must demonstrate a
cause of action. It had no cause of action in contract. The question was
whether it had a cause of action in tort.
Caspian was not alleged to have played any part in inducing Leisure to break
its covenant as to disposal of the shares. The effect of the transfer to
Caspian was not to interfere with contractual relations, but to deprive the
trustee of the Esso remedy of retransfer which it would have had for
inducement of the earlier breach by Hilldon.
That raised the question of whether the Lumley principle could be extended
beyond interference with contractual relations to interference with the
remedies arising out of a broken contract.
There was no authority for such liability, but on an application under RSC
Order 18, rule 19 it could not be said that that an affirmative answer could
not be given.
Such a claim should not be struck out but should be argued at trial when the
relevant facts had been established.
As against Hilldon the claims in contract were struck out. As against
Caspian, the whole statement of claim was struck out but the action was not
dismissed. Leave was given to serve an amended statement of claim against
all parties, though not in the form for which leave had been sought. Counsel
would reconsider the draft in the light of the judgment.
For the trustee: Michael Crystal QC and John Higham (Linklaters &amp; Paines).
For Hilldon: Robert Kirk (Jerrard Saunders Donn).
For Caspian: Robin Potts QC and Richard Snowden (Hill Taylor Dickinson).
In Davy Offshore v Emerald, FT March 16, leading counsel for Emerald was VV
Veeder QC.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 40
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2119</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAEAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Appointments: Rift forces Hayter to quit
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
John Hayter, 54, is to part company with the rapidly growing Lloyd's agency
group Hayter Brockbank, which he helped form, following a rift between him
and the group's senior management.
John Shipton, 57, who joined the group last year following Hayter
Brockbank's acquisition of his own members' agency, JK Shipton, takes over
as chairman.
A former chairman of CT Bowring, more recently Shipton has been associated
with CE Heath Insurance Services - the biggest personal lines broker in the
Lloyd's market.
The group decided on a new, more hands-on, management style after a recent
review of its operations but Hayter, now 54, refused to stand down as
chairman or to continue as a director of the members' agency company, which
he founded in 1974 and merged with Alston Brockbank in 1988.
According to George Stevens, group managing director, it was felt that the
company needed a cohesive and single-minded approach to the boardroom in
order to tackle problems and grasp the opportunities that lay ahead.
*****
Ian MacLellan has been appointed a director of CT BOWRING REINSURANCE.
*****
Alan Baines and David Wickerson are appointed directors of RICHARDS
LONGSTAFF (INSURANCE).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 40
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2120</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAD9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / World Stock Markets: Spain bucks easier European trend -
Turnover on continental bourses in February
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTONIA SHARPE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Turnover on European bourses, with the exception of Spain, eased back last
month after a strong January but was still above levels seen in the last two
months of 1991.
Mr James Cornish, who compiles the data for County NatWest, says the easier
trend has continued into March on most European markets, as investors wait
for prices to come back before making further purchases. 'It is more of a
pause than a sell-off,' he says. For example, turnover in Germany has tailed
off ever since the market peaked in early March.
Looking at the February data, Germany showed the most resilience, down only
6 per cent on the month and up 29.8 per cent on the average for the
November-January period. German volume fell back in the middle of February
as the market moved sideways but picked up again towards the end of the
month as domestic and foreign buying resumed.
French turnover dropped 17.7 per cent last month, the second worst fall
after the UK, and was 1.6 per cent below the three-month average. Volume
improved late in February as the index rose sharply, but it has since fallen
back in March, partly as a result of school holidays.
Spain saw turnover increase by 4.8 per cent in February as foreign investors
bought blue chips in anticipation of lower interest rates - the central bank
duly obliged the market towards the end of the month - and on optimism about
inflation and the economy.
Turnover remained buoyant during the first two weeks of March, but has since
declined on news of worse than expected inflation data for February. Daily
turnover has contracted to Pta10bn from between Pta16bn to Pta24bn.
Mr Stephen Hughes of Nikko Securities says the disappointing inflation
numbers have put back any chance of a further fall in interest rates by at
least two months. However, some domestic analysts are still confident that
another cut will occur in April.
'There is nothing to drive the market in the short term apart from
international events,' adds Mr Hughes. The company reporting season is over
for now and there are few developments on the corporate scene to revive
turnover. Looking further ahead, however, the government's plans to reduce
its stake in the oil producing and refining group Repsol from 66.5 per cent
to 50 per cent, and the likelihood of a 1 1/2 per cent cut in the central
bank's intervention rate to 11 per cent, should renew interest in Spanish
equities later this year.
The UK showed the biggest drop in volume terms in February, losing 18.7 per
cent on the month and down 3.7 per cent on the three-month average, as
general election uncertainties mounted.
Another casualty last month was Switzerland, which fell 17.4 per cent as
hopes of lower interest rates came to nothing. A weak Swiss franc has also
weighed on equities.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                      EUROPEAN EQUITIES TURNOVER
                Monthly total in local currencies (bn)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Bourse               Nov        Dec        Jan        Feb       US
                    1991       1991       1992       1992   Dollars bn
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Belgium            39.40      32.30      55.85      46.72        1.39
France            102.02     111.08     141.18     116.18       20.87
Germany            91.47      66.00     134.30     126.20       77.05
Italy           7,105.40   6,342.00   9,665.20   8,948.80        7.28
Netherlands        11.97       9.81      16.10      14.10        7.65
Spain             529.26     671.36     637.26     667.83        6.47
Switzerland        10.50       7.70      13.20      10.90        7.34
UK                 29.36      26.44      36.40      29.61       52.09
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Volumes represent purchases and sales.
Italian data adjusted to include off-market trading. Some figures may
be revised.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: County NatWest WoodMac.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2121</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAD8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / World Stock Markets (Europe): Individual stocks continue to
generate interest
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Markets Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ONCE AGAIN, individual stocks generated the most interest yesterday, writes
Our Markets Staff.
FRANKFURT was still nervous, marking time ahead of today's simultaneous
expiry of four major options and futures contracts, but news and comment
moved some shares.
In banks, Bayernverein fell DM4.50 to DM421 in response to a one-for-ten
rights issue at DM350; in chemicals, Schering which dropped another DM13.60
to DM835.50 on the expected official refusal to permit the sale of oral
contraceptives in Japan.
In carmakers, further press speculation about US problems for Volkswagen
left the shares DM6.10 lower at DM360.40, while Porsche's lack of prospects
left it DM19 down at DM570. However, BMW ended relatively strong on the day,
DM1 higher at DM554.50 on 1991 profits slightly higher than forecast.
After a 3.66 fall to 700.79 in the FAX index at midsession, the DAX closed
7.55 lower at 1,724.63. Turnover eased from DM4.3bn to DM4.0bn with Asko,
the discount retailer, accounting for DM314m of that as it took third place
among the most active stocks.
Asko denied rumours that friends were pushing up the stock ahead of its
planned rights issue which, it told analysts, will not happen until this
autumn. There were also suggestions that a big buyer was around, taking a
positive attitude to the company's exceptionally high financial gearing.
PARIS followed domestic bonds lower on a growing consensus that market
expectations of lower European interest rates had been premature. The Cac-40
index fell 6.19 to 1,921.99, off a high of 1,935.28, in turnover of
FFr2.5bn.
Among bigger stocks, Euro Disney slipped FFr21.0 to FFr161.30 on
profit-taking triggered by the leisure stock's anticipated entry into the
CAC-40 index. On the way up, LVMH added FFr9 to FFr4,499 after reporting
results in line with expectations. Some dealers said the stock was
attractive at current levels in spite of confirmation that Japanese demand
for its cognac and luggage has fallen back this year.
Smaller stocks were active, with Esso France jumping FFr22 or 3.1 per cent
to FFr730 after Wednesday's doubling of the dividend. Volume in Moulinex was
bloated by a large put-through of 113,000 shares by UBS for its own account.
The stock eased FFr2.10 to FFr182.90 in total volume of 131,000 shares.
MILAN continued to rise, but volume remained thin ahead of the batch of 1991
results over the next few weeks and the general election in April. The Comit
index rose 4.25 to 514.34 in turnover estimated at L95bn after L87.1bn.
Consob suspended the ordinary and savings shares of the state-controlled
holding company Sifa pending details of the group's role in enabling a stock
market listing for its parent company, Finmeccanica.
Among industrials, Fiat closed L67 higher at L4,913 and Pirelli L32 higher
at L1,229. Saipem, the oil industry services company seen as a turnround
situation, was steady at L1,640 ahead of an analysts' meeting today.
AMSTERDAM's sheaf of results did little to excite general interest and the
CBS Tendency Index rose only 0.4 to 126.0.
Hoogovens slipped after the steel group said it was to omit its dividend,
but the stock recovered to close up 70 cents at Fl 52.30. Analysts said that
the extraordinary charges it had taken to reorganise parts of its operations
were lower than feared.
Volmac, the software group, advanced 6.5 per cent following
better-than-expected results, closing up Fl 1.90 to Fl 30.90, while
Boskalis, the world's largest dredging company, firmed 20 cents to Fl 26.10
on a 52 per cent rise in net profits.
Nedlloyd lost Fl 3.9 or 6 per cent to Fl 59.40 after two of its creditors,
ABN and ING, said on Wednesday that they would be converting loans into
shares. Heineken set yet another record high, closing up Fl 3.7 or nearly 2
per cent to Fl 190.50. Analysts said that buy recommendations from the US
and UK have helped to stimulate activity. Elsevier declined Fl 1.70 to Fl
116.0 ahead of today's results.
ZURICH saw active buying in Brown Boveri as the SPI index rose 6.9 to 1,140.
Brown Boveri bearers rose SFr120 to SFr3,760; the company owns half of the
Swedish-Swiss ABB, whose annual press conference pleased markets on
Wednesday.
STOCKHOLM registered record volume of SKr1.73bn as the Affarsvarlden General
index rose 5.2 to 1,007.7.
Asea B rose SKr11 to SKr350 on its share in ABB's fortunes, while SKr560m
worth of Sandvik A were traded at SKr410 each. Dealers believed that the
1.3m A shares, 2.5 per cent of the equity and over 3 per cent of the votes,
were sold by Custos to Skanska.
BRUSSELS fell slightly: the Bel-20 index closing down 3.52 to 1,204.54.
Banque Bruxelles Lambert closed down BFr70 francs to BFr3,350 following its
announcement on Wednesday that it was going to involve all its insurer
shareholders in its planned development of a banking-insurance network.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                     FT-SE EUROTRACK 100 - MAR 19
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                            Hourly changes
  Open     10 am    11 am    12 pm    1 pm     2 pm     3 pm     close
 1152.77  1153.37  1152.86  1152.45  1152.35  1153.09  1153.53  1153.18
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
         Day's High  1153.97          Day's Low  1151.75
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
      Mar 18       Mar 17      Mar 16       Mar 13       Mar 12
     1153.82      1151.88     1145.61      1154.40      1149.99
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Base value 1000 (26/10/90).
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2122</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAD7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / World Stock Markets (Asia Pacific): Hopes of discount rate
cut push Nikkei above 20,000
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
REVIVED HOPES of a cut in the official discount rate prompted a surge in the
futures market, and the Nikkei average recovered the psychologically
important 20,000 level for the first time in four trading days, writes Emiko
Terazono in Tokyo.
The 225-issue average regained 420.78 to 20,185.09 after a day's low of
19,732.84 and high of 20,213.95. Volume rose to 550m shares from 400m on
cross-trading and bargain hunting by foreign and domestic investors.
Advances outnumbered declines by 880 to 155, with 101 issues unchanged. The
Topix index of all first section stocks strengthened 43.36 to 1,451.14.
Yesterday's recovery after a losing streak which had lasted 13 days relieved
traders. In London, the ISE/Nikkei 50 index put on 5.71 to 1,131.50.
Market participants were encouraged by news that the Japanese government
would announce emergency measures to stimulate the economy by March 27.
Speculation that the official discount rate might be reduced early next week
also prompted short-covering ahead of the long weekend. The market is closed
today for a national holiday. Mr Tsutomu Hata, the finance minister, said
that an easing in monetary policy could be implemented before the new fiscal
year.
Window dressing for tokkin - specified money trusts - and fund trusts, which
close their books today, also pushed up the Nikkei index. Mr Kaoru Shimura,
head of Sumitomo Life's securities investment division, said more
window-dressing buying could push the index up to 22,000 next week.
Leading large-capital issues advanced on bargain hunting. Nippon Steel,
which fell below Y300 on Wednesday for the first time since 1986, rebounded
Y14 to Y310 and Mitsubishi Heavy Industries moved forward Y14 to Y584.
Nippon Telegraph and Telephone, regarded as an indicator of market
sen-timent, improved Y21,000 to Y663,000.
Hopes of lower interest rates pushed up electric power companies, with Tokyo
Electric Power rising Y190 to Y2,960. Financial issues were also sought, and
Industrial Bank of Japan climbed Y80 to Y2,390 and Fuji Bank added Y70 at
Y2,000.
Brokerage houses rose on bargain hunting. The issues have been heavily sold
recently due to concern about earnings. Nomura Securities added Y70 at
Y1,190 and Yamaichi Securities advanced Y58 to Y580.
However, Yamatane Securities, a second-tier broker, dropped Y55 to Y540. The
company will post extraordinary losses due to its involvement in the tobashi
scandals, which involved improving some clients' accounts by transferring
loss-making investments to other clients. Investors were also discouraged by
the resignation of the firm's chairman.
In Osaka, the OSE average jumped 636.70 to 21,551.07 in volume of 542.8m
shares.
Roundup
HONG KONG further retreated from last Friday's record high as yesterday's
rally in Tokyo generally failed to encourage other Pacific Rim markets.
Bombay was closed.
Rumours in HONG KONG, later denied, that banks were planning to cut the
limit on mortgage lending accompanied a fall in the Hang Seng index to below
the 5,000 level. It closed above the day's worst but still a net 45.48 down
at 4,990.59 in turnover of HKDollars 3.9bn (HKDollars 3.4bn).
The property sector was depressed by the mortgage rumours, Henderson Land
shedding 50 cents to HKDollars 16.20 and Hong Kong Land 20 cents to
HKDollars 10.50.
The banks remained active, with HSBC Holdings falling a further HKDollars
2.25 to HKDollars 40.25 as investors continued to switch into other banking
stocks. Bank of East Asia gained 70 cents to HKDollars 22.70.
AUSTRALIA closed ahead for the first time this week, the All Ordinaries
index firming 3.4 to 1,571.4 in turnover of ADollars 167.4m. Bank and retail
sectors were well supported, Westpac rising 4 cents to ADollars 3.83 and
Coles Myer 16 cents to ADollars 11.16.
BHP gained 12 cents to ADollars 13.26, but Western Mining fell 12 cents to
ADollars 4.73, partly due to a strike at one of its operations.
KUALA LUMPUR was pulled lower by Telecom Malaysia, off 20 cents at MDollars
11.40. The composite index dipped 2.44 to 597.96 in volume of 31m shares
(34m). Gaming group Tanjong continued its strong run, adding 20 cents at
MDollars 11.00.
SINGAPORE declined amid selected selling of blue chips. The Straits Times
Industrial index lost 5.45 to 1,436.39 in volume of 24.7m shares (24.2m).
SEOUL had an early rise reversed and ended 1.69 down at 612.67 in turnover
of Won314.8bn. Analysts said the market was likely to remain fairly static
until after the elections on March 24.
BANGKOK rose modestly, the SET index firming 3.29 to 811.78 in turnover of
Bt6.9bn.
TAIWAN remained weak in nervous trading ahead of today's National Assembly
session on democratic reform. The weighted index fell 41.72 to 4,810.23 in
turnover of TDollars 19.7bn, against TDollars 24.4bn.
MANILA moved slightly ahead as activity remained low. The composite index
rose 3.80 to 1,105.07 in turnover of 140.3m pesos. Philippine National Bank
put on 2.50 pesos to 262.50, but Philippine Long Distance Telephone, which
fell in overnight trading in the US, shed 5 pesos to 865.
NEW ZEALAND lost ground for the third consecutive day, the NZSE-40 index
slipping 9.47 to 1,439.19 in turnover of some NZDollars 10m. Telecom
declined 3 cents to NZDollars 2.31.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2123</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAD6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / World Stock Markets: South Africa
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
SHARP gains in the financial rand sent Johannesburg share prices lower. The
all-share index closed 35 down at 3,539 and the industrial index lost 44 to
4,403. Weak bullion prices pushed the gold index down 42 to 1,125.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 37
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2124</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAD5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / World Commodities Prices: Fruit &amp; Vegetables
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Early forced rhubarb at 45-60p a lb (40-65p) is superb this week, reports
FFVIB. Grapes remain a superb choice with Cape seedless at 90p-Pounds 1.20 a
lb (90p-Pounds 1.20). Jaffa oranges at 12-30p each (12-30p) and Spania
strawberries at 65-80p a  1/2 lb (85p-Pounds 1.00) are also good value for
money. An excellent vegetable buy is French cauliflower at 50-75p each
(60-80p), also good is broccoli at 40-48p a 1/2 lb (35-45p), Spring cabbage
at 25-35p a lb (25-35p) and parsnips at 30-40p a lb (30-40p). The new crop
of English watercress is now available at 35-45p a bunch (35-45p), together
with radishes at 30-45p a bunch (30-45p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2125</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAD4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Wool demand moves ahead of
production
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BLACKWELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
RAW WOOL demand is outstripping new supplies for the first time in several
years, leading to better prices and the chance for the orderly disposal of
stocks, according to the International Wool Textile Organisation.
The US, Japan and Italy appear to be leading the textile industry out of
recession, while there is strong growth in demand from China, the
organisation says in a new publication entitled International Wool Textile
Overview. Latest figures show a 1 per cent year-on-year increase in wool
textile manufacturing activity after almost three years of decline.
'The progress, albeit small, that is being made towards liquidating the
stockpiles in Australia and New Zealand gives room for greater optimism for
the future,' the report suggests.
Wool growers in Australia, the world's biggest supplier, have sharply
reduced their flocks not only because of the financial hardship following
the end of the Australian Wool Board's price support measures, but also
through drought and other adverse climatic factors.
'The latest indications are that world wool production has been cut back by
as much as a tenth,' the report says. Almost three-quarters of the cut has
been achieved by the Australians.
As a result the availability of world supplies for 1991-92 has remained
unchanged at 2.45m tonnes clean in spite of the unprecedented level of
stocks carried forward from the previous season. This was accumulated before
Australia and New Zealand returned to a free market in wool early last year.
Stocks carried forward from 1990-91 are now put at a record 719,000 tonnes
clean, 37 per cent up on the previous season. At current rates this
represents about eight months requirements by the main importing countries.
The latest estimate of wool production this season is 1.73m tonnes clean.
'This takes production back to what it was in the mid-eighties,' says the
report.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                    WORLD WOOL SUPPLY ('000 tonnes)
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
               1986-87  1987-88  1988-89  1989-90  1990-91  1991-92
Production       1,771    1,812    1,866    1,961    1,927    1,734
Carry-over          17       96       73      132      526      719
Total            1,788    1,908    1,939    2,093    2,453    2,453
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: IWTO estimates
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2126</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAD3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Strike hits Australian nickel
mine
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
WESTERN MINING Corporation, the Australian resources group, yesterday
refused to comment on a further outbreak of industrial action at its
troubled Kambalda nickel mining site in Western Australia, writes Kevin
Brown in Sydney.
However, the Australian Workers Union said workers were on indefinite strike
over a claim for higher piece work rates for transporting ore to the
surface. Mr Ray Delbridge, president of the union's mining division, said
there was a 'stalemate' between the union and the company. He said no
meetings had been scheduled with WMC management.
'The guys have simply lost all confidence in management (and) there has been
a complete breakdown in communication. This issue has been bubbling along
since September,' Mr Delbridge said.
The strike is understood to have affected supplies of ore for smelting, but
both Kambalda mills were said to be working. The smelter is also fed by
other WMC mines in the area.
WMC shares fell 12 cents to ADollars 4.73 (Pounds 2.08) on the Australian
Stock Exchange as news of the strike filtered through.
The group lost 14 days nickel production in the December quarter because of
industrial action over proposals to replace five-day working with continuous
mining in shifts over seven days. WMC announced in November that it intended
to abandon plans for a ADollars 105m expansion of nickel production at
Kambalda because of opposition from the union, which it said had 'reneged'
on an earlier deal.
The proposed expansion would have increased deep mining at several mines in
the Kambalda area, where WMC produces about 35,000 tonnes of nickel a year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2127</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAD2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Optimism costs smelters dear
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KENNETH GOODING, Mining Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ALUMINIUM PRODUCERS had only themselves to blame for present excess supply,
high stocks and low prices, suggested Mr Ivor Kirman, marketing director of
Inco Europe, yesterday.
He said metals businesses could broadly be classified into two groups -
those run by optimists and those run by realists. 'Metals (industries) which
were run by optimists typically have expanded capacity too fast, now have
more than 30 per cent over-capacity and have built up substantial finished
stocks. Examples include aluminium and charge chromium (ferrochrome).
'Metals run by realists typically have capacity only marginally over current
demand and have built up limited stocks. Examples include copper and
nickel,' Mr Kirman pointed out at a Canadian Mining Investment seminar in
London.
The aluminium industry was already heading for over-capacity before its
position was further worsened by the collapse of the former Soviet Union and
the sudden jump in its aluminium exports, he insisted.
Mr Kirman said the 'realists' were clearly in better shape to weather the
present recession and would be the first to benefit from any price recovery.
'The optimists are currently suffering and will have to wait for their
reward until later in the decade.'
Experience suggested that when stocks of a metal were less than about six
weeks consumption there was the potential for any significant demand
improvement to lead to a dramatic price rise, Mr Kirman pointed out.
Conversely, if stocks exceeded three to four months consumption, there would
be enough metal to meet restocking demand and prices were unlikely to flare
up. 'Between the two is an interesting area where price will be most
strongly influenced by the actual behaviour of producers, converters and
fabricators.'
At present copper stocks represented five to six weeks of consumption;
nickel stocks six to eight weeks; zinc, six to eight weeks; aluminium eight
to ten weeks; charge chrome 12 to 15 weeks and molybdenum 40 weeks.
On this basis, 'nickel and copper are in relatively good shape, aluminium
less so, charge chrome and molybdenum look like sad cases requiring a long,
sustained demand boom to move prices dramatically'.
Mr Kirman said that the greatest uncertainty in the metals markets was about
'distress' exports from the former Soviet Union. Confusion was likely to
last at least another year. 'While it reigns, decision making in the metals
industry will be even riskier than usual.'
Inco, the western world's biggest nickel producer, estimated that the
Commonwealth of Independent States produced about 300,000 tonnes of nickel
last year and consumed domestically 160,000 tonnes. This left 30,000 tonnes
for export to the former eastern bloc countries and 110,000 for export to
the west. This year CIS production would be down but domestic consumption
was likely to fall even further.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2128</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAD1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Gold price retreat continues
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KENNETH GOODING
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AS GOLD slumped to new near-six-year lows yesterday dealers desperately
attempted to identify the east European central bank said to be responsible
for the wave of selling that has put relentless downward pressure on the
price this week.
Ms Rhona O'Connell, analyst with the Williams de Broe financial services
group, pointed out that, once the market identified the bank, it would know
how much gold was likely to sold. She said the Baltic states, which had six
tonnes of gold returned by the UK and Sweden recently, were most likely to
be responsible.
Five central banks - those of Poland, Hungary, Romania, Czechoslovakia and
Yugoslavia - told Reuter they had not sold the gold.
In London at one stage yesterday the metal's price dropped to Dollars 336.50
a troy ounce. It closed at Dollars 336,85, down Dollars 3.75.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2129</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAD0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Honduras legislates for farm
recovery - A wide-ranging reform of agricultural laws
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN WALKER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE HONDURAS government is boasting that it has 'the most comprehensive
agricultural policy law in Latin America' after the passing earlier this
month of an important measure streamlining farming legislation. And it now
expects the disbursement during April of a Dollars 70m agricultural sector
structural adjustment loan from the World Bank and Interamerican Development
Bank, which was conditional on the reform package.
The measure, which amends 20 previous laws and decrees, clarifies land
tenure rules and pricing and credit policies, and aims to reinforce the
boost to agriculture from 1990's lempira devaluation, which triggered price
rises.
The legislation follows tortuous negotiations between the government,
ranchers and peasant organisations. A mid-1991 draft drew heavy criticism
from peasants but the final version is supported by the leaders of about 80
per cent of organised peasants. Left wing protestors blocked roads in some
parts of the country, reviving the tactics successful earlier in forcing the
reversal of a forestry concession to Stone Container Corporation, the US
paper group. But they failed to make much impact on the National Congress.
On land tenure, the law simplifies the 1975 Land Reform, leaving just two
grounds for compulsory redistribution: abandonment for 18 months (or two
years in exceptional cases), and individual holdings above the (generally
high) ceilings established in the 1975 law. Joint ownership, renting and
technically inefficient exploitation all disappear as grounds for
redistribution. Mr Roger Norton, an American economist - the major
intellectual influence behind the law - hopes that market incentives will
succeed where bureaucratic rules failed. 'The single greatest lesson of
eastern Europe is that you can't mandate efficiency from the state,' he
says.
The law also scraps the five-hectare minimum area for land titles, and
requires the National Agrarian Institute to speed the land titling process.
These measures aim to boost investment, by giving farmers an incentive to
make improvements and by establishing loan collateral to increase their
access to credit.
Members of Honduras' 2,800 land reform co-operatives will receive
individual, negotiable shareholdings and will be allowed to break their
farms up into personal units. Future land reform beneficiaries - which for
the first time will include women in their own right - will decide the form
of their tenure for themselves. Under the 1975 law, the institute promoted
large scale co-operative enterprises, which generally proved unsuccessful.
During 1991 there was a controversial wave of sales of north coast
co-operatives' land to banana companies. In future, such sales will carry a
20 per cent tax to reflect the value of public investments in the reform
sector. Joint investments by reform enterprises and private corporations are
also legalised.
The law's critics argue that it rings the death knell of land
redistribution, casting in stone the existing, highly polarised tenure
structure. But its advocates stress that compulsory redistribution has been
a failure. They argue that simplified rules will revive the land reform,
while liberalisation will foster redistribution to small farmers through
non-confiscatory mechanisms such as renting. Coupled with improved grain
prices, according to Mr Norton, this should mean that 'one of the main
effects of this law will be to reduce rural poverty'. However the government
vetoed his proposal for a progressive land tax, designed to stimulate a
break-up of large estates.
Grain prices should be reinforced by the institutionalisation of changes in
the agricultural trade regime, implemented over the last year, including the
abolition of the state monopoly of foreign trade in grains, and 15 per cent
import tariffs for grains (20 per cent for processed products), which should
keep the sector profitable. Previously, grain imports were tariff-free.
Along with other Central American republics, Honduras has established a
price band system to insulate domestic grain prices from sharp fluctuation
in world prices. Linked to this is the opening of free trade in grains
within Central America, and Honduras hopes to be a net exporter to the
region, as it was in the 1960s.
The government hopes these changes will stabilise grain prices at profitable
levels. At the end of 1991, prices collapsed when private traders linked to
the armed forces imported large volumes of rice and maize just before the
national harvest. They were encouraged by a temporary reduction in import
tariffs to 5 per cent, leading to allegations of corruption from opposition
politicians. As a result of the imports, producer prices for maize fell
below Dollars 6 a quintal (100 kg), discrediting the agricultural
liberalisation strategy in the eyes of many producers. The 15 per cent
tariff levels should keep prices above Dollars 8 a quintal during 1992.
Other important changes in the modernisation law include the rationalisation
of the state agricultural development bank, Banadesa. The bank's trust fund
activities are to be transferred to a new network of rural credit houses
managed by peasant organisations and in future, Banadesa lending will
concentrate on small grain producers, with loans to state bodies banned and
big farmers also excluded. A state land bank is to be established to
reinforce the land reform process and reform beneficiaries are to receive
grants of seed capital.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2130</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGADZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / World Commodities Prices: Market Report
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ALUMINIUM prices broke above chart targets on the LME to end firmer. Dealers
said three-month metal moved above resistance around Dollars 1,320 a tonne
when US speculative buying touched off buy-stops, although profit-taking
emerged above Dollars 1,330 a tonne. LME stocks today are forecast to rise
by up to 3,000 tonnes. NICKEL moved off earlier lows on talk that the
Kambalda strike was escalating. The initial declines towards Dollars 7,400 a
tonne for three-month metal attracted Chinese buying and merchant covering,
dealers said. Fresh arrivals of Russian nickel are expected, and will keep
the market under some pressure. LME warehouse stocks are likely to rise
today. Nearby London COCOA prices closed ahead after rallying on the
dollar's strength against sterling. Dealers said short-covering, some
industry offtake and talk of fund buying all helped to support prices,
lifting the market off lows reached on unconfirmed rumours of origin sales.
The market was still looking for estimates of the Ivory Coast mid-crop which
could be more than 125,000 tonnes. In Chicago widespread market talk of
large-scale damage to WHEAT crops in the High Plains region contributed to
firmer prices by midday.
Compiled from Reuters
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2131</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGADYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Mexican oil giant raises
production
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAMIAN FRASER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MEXICO CITY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PETROLEOS MEXICANOS, Mexico's oil giant, has celebrated the 54th anniversary
of its foundation by releasing a string of figures revealing increases in
production and export volumes and productivity improvements, writes Damian
Fraser in Mexico City.
Nevertheless, the news was tempered by yet another fall in Pemex's official
reserves to 65bn barrels, in oil equivalent terms, from 65.5bn in 1990.
Further, income from hydrocarbons and petrochemicals exports dropped from
Dollars 10bn in 1990 to Dollars 8.15bn last year, reflecting lower oil
prices, and Mexico imported a record Dollars 1.25bn worth of petroleum and
petrochemical products, mainly due to purchases abroad of an average 68,200
barrels of oil a day.
Overall, Mexico's trade surplus in oil fell from Dollars 9bn in 1990 to
Dollars 6.9bn last year.
The apparent contradiction between rising production and increasing imports
stems from booming domestic demand in refined products that Pemex has been
unable to meet. Pemex announced it would start building a new refinery in
January 1993 to meet this gap, and invest heavily in providing cleaner,
environment-friendly fuels. It also claimed the fall in reserves would be
reversed this year because of important new discoveries.
Pemex's total crude production rose to 2.676m barrels a day in 1991, up 4.7
per cent on 1990, of which exports equalled exports 1.369m b/d, up 6.5 per
cent. Pemex has increased production by 10 per cent since 1987, despite
cutting its workforce from more than 200,000 people to current level of just
over 150,000.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2132</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGADXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Bonds: New paper adds to Ecu market's
disappointment
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TRACY CORRIGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Ecu bond market, which has performed disappointingly for most of this
year, is facing an overhang of paper after further supply of new issues
yesterday was added to Denmark's Ecu1bn 10-year domestic offering launched
on Wednesday.
Dealers reported some selling of the Danish deal yesterday, which had not
been fully placed. The price fell to 98.93, below the fixed reoffer level of
99.27, after the syndicate was broken.
The decline was roughly in line with the rest of the market, although the
spread widened a little from six to seven basis points above the 10-year
French government OAT issue.
Some dealers felt that the performance was disappointing, considering the
long build-up to the transaction, while others said that the deal had done
as well as could be expected, given lacklustre market conditions.
Yesterday, two French borrowers added to the existing supply of five-year
paper. Supply has been concentrated at the five-year area of the yield curve
due to an improvement in swap spreads at that maturity as a result of an
issue of CTE's - Italian domestic Ecu bonds - by the Italian government.
Credit Local de France launched an Ecu225m deal, which will be added to an
existing Ecu500m offering, while Caisse Centrale de Co-operation Economique
(CCCE) brought an Ecu200m offering. The Credit Local deal was swapped into
floating rate dollars, while the CCCE deal was swapped into a mixture of
fixed- and floating-rate French francs and Ecu.
Both deals were considered fairly priced, to yield 8.74 per cent and 8.67
per cent respectively, but are likely to take some time to place due to poor
market conditions and poor investor demand.
The Credit Local deal is expected to appeal to mainly institutional
investors who prefer large transactions, while CCCE borrows infrequently, so
its triple-A rating has some added rarity value. However, the deal is not
likely to be very actively traded once it is placed.
Also in the Ecu market, Bank of Greece launched an Ecu200m offering of
floating-rate notes, Greece's first such issue, although the central bank
has previously issued fixed-rate Ecu in the international markets, and has a
domestic programme of both fixed- and floating-rate debt.
In the Australian dollar sector, State Bank of New South Wales launched a
ADollars 100m seven-year deal via Deutsche Bank, while General Electric
Capital Australia launched a smaller ADollars 75m deal due 1997 via Hambros
Bank. Although there is a fairly heavy level of maturing debt in the sector
this year - with ADollars 1.5bn of Eurobonds redeemed this month - dealers
report a disappointing level of reinvestment by investors. However, some
fresh funds are going into the market.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2133</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGADWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Capital Markets: ROC Taiwan Fund makes equity
offer
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE ROC Taiwan Fund, a closed-end investment company listed on the New York
Stock Exchange and one of several quoted funds to invest in the Taiwan stock
market, is launching an international equity offering which could raise
Dollars 45m in new money, writes Sara Webb.
The ROC Taiwan Fund plans to increase the number of its shares from 25m to
29m by offering 2m shares in North America and a further 2m to international
investors.
The shares have currently been trading at around Dollars 11 1/8 with a
premium of about 17 per cent to the net asset value (NAV), according to
Credit Suisse First Boston, the lead manager for the international tranche.
First Boston Corporation is lead manager for the North American part of the
issue. The shares will be priced at the beginning of April.
Taiwan's central bank said earlier this year that it would restrict the flow
of equity investment funds into the island, much to the annoyance of Taiwan
fund managers. The central bank has delayed the approval of remittances of
funds by foreign firms investing in Taiwanese stocks because of concern
about the appreciation of the Taiwan dollar against the US dollar.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2134</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGADVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Capital Markets: Italians chase a futures fast
track - Plans for introducing a derivatives market
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HAIG SIMONIAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HAVING successfully revived its government bond market with a screen-based
trading system in 1988, Italy's regulators are now trying to do the same
with futures.
According to the Italian Treasury, a new domestic market for government bond
futures should be ready by July. If it opens in time, the Italians will
justly be able to claim to have created one of the world's fastest-developed
derivatives markets. A first hurdle will come at next week's annual meeting
of the roughly 300 participants in the existing cash market, who will decide
whether to back the new venture.
Regulators, Treasury officials and a sprinkling of bankers are now pressing
ahead with finalising the rules for the new project. Turnover in the cash
market for Italian government securities has soared since the arrival of
screen-based trading, which bolstered liquidity just as international
investors began to turn to Italian bonds on account of their relatively high
interest rates at a time of limited exchange rate risk under the European
Monetary System.
The growing appeal of Italian bonds was enough to persuade two derivatives
markets, the London International Financial Futures Exchange (Liffe) and the
Matif, the Paris-based exchange, to launch futures contracts on Italian
bonds last year.
Trading at Matif has dwindled, but Liffe's Italian bond future has become
one of its fastest-growing products, with more than 800,000 contracts
changing hands since last September's launch. The Liffe contract, now
supplemented by an option, 'has filled the gap in the market for a suitable
hedging instrument on Italian government paper,' says one dealer.
The Italian authorities, headed by the Treasury and the Bank of Italy, now
want to repeat Liffe's success at home. Officials argue that as the cash
market for government paper is based in Italy, domestic demand for futures
should be strong, too. Chauvinism has sometimes fuelled the calls for a
domestic venture.
But most bankers would balk at the idea of creating a new exchange in little
more than a year. Even European neighbours like Switzerland and Germany,
which set up derivatives markets in the late 1980s, found their projects
much more time-consuming than expected.
However, the Italian approach to the problem differs markedly from most
others. Rather than creating a large public exchange from scratch, futures
trading in Italy is to be an adjunct of the existing screen-based cash
market.
That should allow Italian banks to avoid some of the work required in
Switzerland and Germany. The Italians' venture will be based on the
technology already used for cash bond trading. By embarking on a less
ambitious project from the start it may be possible to get going more
quickly.
The timing will be accelerated by the decision to use foreign specialists on
two crucial elements of the new venture. Software for futures trading is
being developed by STM, a Canadian specialist which wrote the software for
the existing cash market in bonds. And ICCH Financial Markets, part of the
UK-based clearing group, will supply software for clearing.
Meanwhile, the Italian authorities have been free to concentrate on legal
and regulatory points. A ministerial decree in mid-February set out the
legal framework for the new market, which resembles that already in use for
the cash market. Working groups are now drawing up rules for operating and
trading bond futures, along with precise definitions for the clearing house
which will be set up alongside the futures market.
It is already clear that the clearing house will be a joint stock company,
in which all but one of the 25 existing 'primary dealers' will probably be
the initial shareholders. The exception, JP Morgan, may be prevented from
taking a stake on account of US regulatory requirements.
The capital for the clearing house is likely to start at around L50bn,
rising to about double that once the system is functioning. There will be
various categories of membership; the two most important being 'general'
members, which will need to have around L100bn in capital and will be
allowed to clear for themselves and third parties; and 'individual' members,
with a capital requirement of around L20bn, which will be authorised to
clear only their own contracts and those of clients.
Next week's meeting of the participants in the screen-based cash market
should provide the first indication of how many banks and brokers want to
trade futures. Under last year's reform of Italy's securities markets, at
least 30 participants are needed, five of them market-makers, for the
project to go ahead.
Bankers doubt there will be any problem raising the requisite numbers. 'Many
already want to take part from now,' says one expert involved in the
discussions. The Italian Bankers' Association, which is also involved in the
project, is thought to have received at least 100 expressions of strong
interest.
But, for the new market to open on time, progress must still be made on
certain key points. Those include drawing up contract specifications and
overcoming technological problems in making sure the software for trading
and clearing futures works on the cash market's existing system.
Discussions on contract specification, are 'at an advanced stage of
reflection', says one official. It is widely expected that first contract
will involve a notional 10-year bond, similar to that on Liffe. However, no
details have been released as to contract size or the range of bonds
suitable for delivery. 'Decisions on which bonds can be delivered will be
taken very close to the starting date of the project,' says one expert.
So far, the plans appear to be on schedule. Preparation of the software is
believed to be going well. The risk of delays on the clearing side is
limited by the fact that the new market is taking on software already in use
in Belgium and at a number of exchanges in Japan, according to ICCH.
However, with so much of the debate taking place behind closed doors,
precise progress is hard to judge. Some bankers involved warn of slippage
because of possible technical hitches when it comes to running the new
software on the existing system. 'Creating the right interfaces could still
take time,' says one consultant.
There is also some unease that precise rules for the clearing house are
still not ready, despite original hopes to have matters settled and the
operation established by the end of last year. 'There are still a lot of
loose ends,' says one banker.
Although the project is being co-ordinated by the Bank of Italy, some
participants also fear the timetable could slip owing to the fact that
responsibilities are divided between a number of regulatory and trade
agencies, with no single organisation cracking the whip. 'These processes
need to be managed. If they're not managed, they tend to get derailed,' says
one specialist with experience of setting up new futures and options
markets.
'So far, there is no reason to expect delays,' says an official from the
bankers' association. He points out that the first training courses for
dealers are due to begin later this month. With the new venture scheduled to
start in mid-year, that is barely a moment too soon.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2135</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGADUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Capital Markets: French plan relaunch of
second-tier market
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE French stock market authorities are formulating plans to relaunch the
Second Marche, or second-tier market, for companies too small or too young
to be quoted on the main stock market.
Mr Pierre Fleuriot, director-general of the Commission des Operations de
Bourse (COB), and Mr Jean-Francois Theodore, president of the Societe des
Bourses Francaises, yesterday announced the formation of a working party to
identify ways of trying to revitalise the market.
The Second Marche, which was launched in 1983 to offer a French counterpart
to other junior markets such as the Unlisted Securities Market in the UK,
now has 293 companies quoted on it.
Nearly 400 companies have joined the market since its inception, with 30
firms 'graduating' to the main market and two - Canal Plus, the pay-TV
group, and Cap Gemini Sogeti, the computer services company - joining the
CAC 40 Index of France's larger companies.
However, the Second Marche, like its counterpart in the UK, has been
struggling since the stock market crash in the autumn of 1987.
The flow of new issues has slowed, with just 11 new companies joining the
market in 1991 compared with 90 in 1987.
The volume of trading has also fallen from 64.4bn shares in 1984 to just
27.1bn last year.
As a result, the COB and the SBF have decided the time has come to try to
revive the market. Mr Fleuriot yesterday identified four key areas for the
working party - which will include members of the COB and SBF - to examine.
These include the marketing of the Second Marche, adapting the method of
quotation to meet the needs of smaller companies and reviewing the role of
intermediaries such as banks and brokers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2136</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGADTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Capital Markets: Coles Myer to raise ADollars
300m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MELBOURNE
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
COLES MYER, Australia's biggest retailer, said it would raise at least
ADollars 300m (USDollars 229m) through a one-for-50 renounceable rights
issue of converting preference shares, Reuter reports from Melbourne.
Coles Myer will issue ADollars 12m non-redeemable non-cumulative converting
preference shares at ADollars 25 each.
Mr Solomon Lew, chairman, said that funds raised from the issue would be
used to strengthen the company's capital base and reduce its gearing ratio.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2137</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGADSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Capital Markets: Four NY exchanges agree to
join Globex
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARBARA DURR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BOCA RATON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Chicago Board of Trade and the Chicago Mercantile Exchange have won an
agreement in principle from four New York commodities exchanges to join as
partners in the Globex system.
Globex is the international, after-hours electronic trading system that the
two Chicago exchanges are developing with Reuters.
The Coffee, Sugar and Cocoa Exchange, the Commodity Exchange, the New York
Futures Exchange and the New York Cotton Exchange said they would affiliate
with Globex 'subject to resolution of certain outstanding issues and
approvals by their boards and the boards of the CBOT and the CME,' according
to the announcement made by Mr Leo Melamed, chairman of Globex, at the
annual Futures Industry Association meeting in Boca Raton, Florida.
Mr Melamed said he could not detail the issues to be ironed out, but
contended that these were 'resolvable'.
The Matif, the Paris futures exchange, is the only international exchange
currently a partner in Globex.
Acknowledging the long delays in the launch of Globex, Mr Melamed said:
'It's taken longer than anyone anticipated.' He could not name a precise
date for the system to start up, but said it would be operational some time
later this year. He was less sanguine about its immediate success, saying:
'It'll take many years'.
The New York Mercantile Exchange, the world's largest energy market and the
largest of the five New York exchanges, decided last year to develop its own
electronic trading system, in co-operation with AT&amp;T, which is known as
Access.
Nymex, which once had been interested in joining Globex, will also part ways
physically with its four New York neighbours, with which it shares a single
cramped trading floor.
All five had been planning to build a new facility together and possibly
merge until Nymex chose last year to go it alone. This latest decision on
Globex by the other four will further separate the New York markets.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2138</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGADRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Capital Markets: DKB to rescue ailing
brokerage unit
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By AP-DJ
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DAI-ICHI Kangyo Bank, a leading Japanese commercial bank, has decided to
provide broad support to its affiliated company, Kankaku Securities, which
faces financial difficulties because of the stock market slump, AP-DJ
reports from Tokyo.
Specific rescue measures, which may include low-interest loans and
dispatching of bank personnel to help in administration, will be decided in
consultation with Kankaku, the bank said.
Kankaku this week announced its latest earnings forecasts for the fiscal
year to March 31. It predicted a pre-tax loss of Y47.5bn (Dollars 359m), one
of the largest losses in the current market downturn in the industry.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2139</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGADQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Capital Markets: Czechs to sell Dollars 360m
of T-bills
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ARIANE GENILLARD
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PRAGUE
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE government of the Czech republic yesterday launched only its second
issue of securities since the overthrow of communism two years ago, with
Kcs11bn (Dollars 360m) of Treasury bills to be sold to domestic buyers.
The paper has a maturity period of two months and a yield of 9.6 per cent.
One month ago, both the federal and the Czech government issued 30-day
Treasury bills with a yield of 12.3 per cent and 10.6 per cent respectively.
The federal issue was worth Kcs3bn and the Czech issue amounted to Kcs10bn
The decline in the yield of Czech Treasury bills, despite the longer
maturity periods, represents a fall in short-term interest rates which
coincides with a lower inflation rate.
The inflation rate in 1991 reached 58 per cent, but sharp rises were mostly
recorded in the six months following the one-off price liberalisation of
January 1991.
On a monthly basis, inflation was near zero throughout last summer and
picked up slightly in the autumn due to food price rises.
Inflation in February increased by 0.5 per cent over January, which itself
recorded a 1 per cent rise on December. The Czechoslovak central bank said
yesterday it expected 1992 inflation to be around 12 per cent.
Treasury bills are new financial instruments on the Czechoslovak market.
There is no outstanding long-term government debt in local currency in the
country.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2140</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGADPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: Minorco sees more acquisitions
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KENNETH GOODING, Mining Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MINORCO, the Luxembourg-based overseas investment arm of the Anglo
American-De Beers group of South Africa, spent more than Dollars 1bn on
acquisitions in the past two years, but still had Dollars 1.8bn in cash at
the end of December.
The group, which collected Dollars 2.5bn from the sale of its shares in
Consolidated Gold Fields of the UK following an unsuccessful bid, still
generates most of its earnings from financial income.
However, Minorco said yesterday that present conditions offered the
opportunity to make strategic acquisitions at attractive values'.
In the six months to December 31, Minorco's earnings before tax slipped from
Dollars 115.9m to Dollars 105.6m. Operating earnings contributed Dollars
72.3m of the total and financial income of Dollars 102.6m, compared with
Dollars 8.1m and Dollars 99.6m last time.
This was better than most analysts had expected. Minorco described the
results as satisfactory. However, it added: 'Prevailing economic conditions,
with weak commodity prices and a trend towards lower interest rates,
persuade us to remain cautious about our results for the second half.'
Nevertheless, the company is lifting its interim dividend by 6 per cent,
from 17 cents a share to 18 cents.
In the half-year, Minorco bought Buxton Lime Industries in the UK from ICI
for Dollars 207m, and acquired another quarrying operation near Berlin to
add to Elbekies, one of the assets currently being sold off in east Germany.
In the half-year, the German aggregates business did better than expected
and turned in a 'satisfactory' performance.
Minorco's biggest purchase was the Freeport McMoran gold operations,
subsequently renamed Independence Mining, for Dollars 705m. In the six
months, Independence produced 172,000 troy ounces of gold, a 22 per cent
increase.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2141</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGADOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: US thrifts on 'road to recovery'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN FRIEDMAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE long-suffering US savings and loan (S&amp;L) industry is on the road to
recovery, with virtually all of the weakest institutions having been
disposed of, according to the head of the industry's largest trade
association.
Mr Don Shackleford, chairman of the US League of Savings Institutions, which
represents 1,800 S&amp;Ls across America, said the industry had returned to
profitability last year, for the first time since 1986.
The industry had earned a net total of Dollars 2bn in 1991, with 86 per cent
of private-sector institutions in the black, Mr Shackleford said in a speech
in New York yesterday.
Mr Shackleford acknowledged that among the reasons for the improving trend,
aside from a strengthening of capital ratios to an average of 4.9 per cent,
was the altered structure of the industry following many government seizures
that form part of the US government bail-out.
The bail-out is estimated to carry a long-term cost of as much as Dollars
500bn over the next 20 years, if compound interest expenses are included.
Between August 1989 and November 1991 the Resolution Trust Corporation
(RTC), the federal agency handling S&amp;L seizures, closed 583 institutions,
accounting for some Dollars 279.7bn of assets.
Mr Shackleford said the total assets of the S&amp;L industry rose from Dollars
1,100bn in 1985 to a peak of Dollars 1,350bn in 1988. Total assets of the
thrifts now amount to around Dollars 950bn.
He said the number of members of his association had been more than halved
since 1985, from 4,000.
Since the end of 1991, the Office of Thrift Supervision (OTS), the S&amp;L
regulatory agency, had reduced from 65 to 55 the number of institutions that
were expected to fail.
At the end of last year, the OTS classified some 437 of 2,096 private-sector
US S&amp;Ls as either troubled by poor earnings and low capital, or likely to be
closed by the RTC. These represented more than 30 per cent of total US S&amp;L
industry assets.
Mr Shackleford argued that 'decent directors who represent the potential for
attracting sound capital' should not be subject to what he called
'indiscriminate intimidation'.
He was remarking on the legal legacy of the S&amp;L crisis, which is now
resulting in a number of lawsuits.
Mr Shackleford argued that while he recognised the need to prosecute former
S&amp;L executives, such as Mr Charles Keating, who was recently convicted on
charges of defrauding bond investors, 'it is important that we go for the
rapists, not the jaywalkers'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2142</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGADNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: Restructuring to hit Lawson
Mardon staff
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GIBBENS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LAWSON MARDON, the inter-national packaging group, is cutting 600 jobs from
its total workforce of 7,600 over the next 18 months and has taken a
CDollars 31m (USDollars 26.2m) special restructuring charge.
Mr Lawrence Tapp, president, said Lawson's organisational structure has been
outdated by the global recession and intense international competition .
Including the special charge, Lawson posted a 1991 loss of CDollars 10.8m,
or 38 cents a share, against a profit of CDollars 25.5m, or 89 cents, in
1990. Revenues were CDollars 1.2bn against CDollars 1.1bn.
The company, 52 per cent held by Cragnotti Financial of Ireland, will
consolidate five divisions into three main operating units - two in Europe
and one in North America.
The company is a leader in European flexible packaging, especially for food
products.
The European units will be known as LMG Packaging and LMG Folding Cartons
and the North American unit as LMG Packaging and Labels.
The job losses will be spread throughout the company's operations as support
staff are merged. Lawson expects to trim annual operating costs by about
CDollars 4m.
Commercial printing and finishing operations in Toronto and New Jersey are
being sold. A Toronto packaging plant has been moved to New York state.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2143</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGADMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: Mentor Insurance creditors set
to receive first pay-out
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CREDITORS of Mentor Insurance, the collapsed Bermuda-based reinsurance
company, will receive a first dividend of 25 cents in the dollar, the joint
liquidators announced yesterday.
Nearly 800 creditors will receive payments after the end of this month,
followed by a second dividend in two or three years' time, said Mr Nigel
Hamilton and Mr Charles Kempe of Ernst &amp; Young, the joint liquidators.
The news came after approval of the arrangement by the creditors' committee
meeting in Bermuda. The first payment had been thought likely to be smaller
and come much later.
Mentor, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Ocean Drilling and Exploration Company
of New Orleans, which was set up as a captive insurance company to its
parent company, collapsed in 1985 with undiscounted gross liabilities of
Dollars 790m when it lost heavily on attempts to insure other companies. It
was wound up by the Bermuda government.
The settlement was eased by a Dollars 40m out-of-court cash payment and
withdrawal of Dollars 90m in claims by banks, announced last month following
legal action brought by the company against its parent and KPMG Peat
Marwick, its auditors.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2144</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGADLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: ConAgra advances 20.5%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CONAGRA, the diversified US food group, yesterday reported a 20.5 per cent
improvement in third-quarter profits at Dollars 84.1m after tax, writes
Nikki Tait.
The figures, for the three months to February 23 were scored on slightly
lower net sales of Dollars 4.85bn, from Dollars 5.04bn in the year-earlier
period, and translated into a 17.9 per cent rise in earnings per share, at
33 cents.
In the first nine months of the year, ConAgra - whose brands range from the
Healthy Choice frozen dinner line to La Choy oriental products  - has seen
net profits increase to Dollars 264.5m from Dollars 228.1m in 1990-91.
The company, based in Omaha, said there had been 'unusual industry-wide
pressure on a number of businesses and markets', and reported mixed results
on a division by division basis.
The largest industry segment, processed foods, saw operating profits fall
slightly compared with the same quarter last time.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2145</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGADKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: Schindler in sharp decline
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN RODGER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ZURICH
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SCHINDLER, the world's second-largest lifts group, suffered a 34.7 per cent
fall in consolidated net profit to SFr87.3m (Dollars 58.5m) in 1991, writes
Ian Rodger in Zurich. The decline reflected sharp reductions in demand,
mainly in the UK and North America, and pressure on world prices.
Group operating revenue was nevertheless up 8.8 per cent to a record SFr4bn,
with currency translation contributing 3.3 per cent.
Operating revenue in the elevators and escalators division was up 9.9 per
cent to SFr3.7bn, while revenue from rolling stock sales fell 3.4 per cent
to SFr283m.
However, new orders for rolling stock soared from SFr95m in 1990 to SFr554m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2146</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGADJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: Seagram achieves record sales
for year
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GIBBENS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MONTREAL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SEAGRAM, the international drinks group, notched up record sales and
operating profits for 1991, but net profit slipped 4 per cent to USDollars
727m.
The company also announced a four-for-one share split and dividend increase.
The quarterly dividend initially will be 14 cents a share on the new split
stock, up 12 per cent from the present level. On an annual basis, Seagram
will pay 56 cents a share, against the equivalent of 50 cents.
'Economic conditions in many markets could be improved but we make decisions
for the long term,' said Mr Edgar Bronfman, chairman and chief executive.
'We have enormous confidence in our brands and we will continue to invest
and expand our business.'
Sales for the year ended January 31 rose 3.6 per cent to Dollars 6.35bn, and
operating income before special items was up 7.3 per cent to Dollars 760m.
After gains on asset disposals, operating income was Dollars 961m, against
Dollars 708m a year earlier.
Including dividends from its 25 per cent interest in Du Pont of the US and
its share of Du Pont's unremitted earnings, Seagram's final net profit was
Dollars 727m, or Dollars 7.67 a share. The result was down nearly 4 per cent
from Dollars 756m, or Dollars 8.03, due to lower unremitted earnings from Du
Pont, which was severely hit by the recession in 1991.
Seagram's spirits and wines group posted a 9.5 per cent gain in operating
income, with higher margins and lower overheads. A decline in the US and the
effects of a higher US dollar were offset by a strong performance in Asia
and Latin America.
Fourth-quarter final net profit was Dollars 197m, or Dollars 2.07 a share,
against Dollars 175m, or Dollars 1.87, a year earlier. Revenues were Dollars
2.06bn against Dollars 1.93bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2147</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGADIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: LVMH improves on late surge
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
LVMH, the French luxury goods group run by Mr Bernard Arnault, yesterday
announced an 11 per cent increase in net profits to FFr3.74bn (Dollars 669m)
in 1991 from FFr3.37bn the previous year.
The group, which owns a string of prestigious brand names including Louis
Vuitton luggage, Christian Dior perfumes, Moet et Chandon champagne and
Hennessy cognac, saw sales slip in the opening months of last year because
of the impact of the Gulf war on international air travel and the important
duty-free market.
However, it managed to stage a recovery in the second half of 1991. By the
end of the year, group sales rose by just over 11 per cent to FFr22.04bn
from FFr19.83bn, and operating profits increased 13 per cent to FFr6.41bn,
against FFr5.67bn.
As a result, net earnings per share rose 11.5 per cent to FFr252, compared
with FFr226 last time, and the board proposed a dividend of FFr68 a share
for the year.
The champagne and wines division sustained a slight fall in operating income
to FFr1.33bn, against FFr1.34bn, on sales ahead to FFr5.55bn from FFr5.15bn.
The downturn in operating income reflected the impact of the economic
recession in its key markets of the US and UK.
By contrast, cognac and spirits saw operating profits rise to FFr2.79bn from
FFr2.3bn, on sales of FFr6.23bn, against FFr5.07bn. This reflected the
buoyancy of the Asian market and strong growth in sales of older quality
cognacs.
Luggage and leather goods reported a rise in operating profits to FFr1.88bn
from FFr1.75bn, on sales of FFr4.85bn, up from FFr4.45bn. The recently
introduced cuirepi range experienced a 50 per cent increase in sales.
Perfumes and beauty products benefited from the launch of two new fragrances
 -Dune by Dior and Givenchy's Amarige - and saw operating profits rise to
FFr636m, against FFr462m last time, on increased sales of FFr4.87bn, against
FFr4.65bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2148</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGADHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: Vereinsbank plans rights issue
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID WALLER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BAYERISCHE Vereinsbank, the larger of Germany's two big Bavarian banks,
plans to hold its third rights issue since the beginning of last year.
It is offering one new share for every 10 already held to raise a total of
DM627m (Dollars 382.3m), following a total of DM968m raised in two issues
last year. The new shares will be offered at DM350 each.
The Munich-based bank also announced yesterday that its group partial
operating profits had risen 21 per cent to DM1.19bn last year, while parent
company partial operating profits - which are a more direct reflection of
conditions in the domestic banking market - rose 31.4 per cent to DM763m.
As with all of Germany's big banks, the Vereinsbank - the country's fourth
largest - has been a beneficiary of strong demand for credit in the past
year.
The bank gave no reasons for its rights issue, but it is likely that the
proceeds will be used to finance further lending and its continued expansion
into the five new eastern German states, where it has built up a network of
around 50 branches from scratch since the summer of 1990.
The bank said yesterday that its dividend for the current year would be DM13
a share, the same as in each of the past five years.
The rights issue will create a total of 1.79m shares. These will qualify for
the 1992 dividend, and the subscription period will last from April 30 to
May 15.
On Monday this week, the Bayerische Hypotheken-und Wechsel-Bank (the
Hypo-Bank), the other large Bavarian bank, announced a one-for-six rights
issue to raise DM910m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2149</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGADGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: Eon lifts annual net profits to
MDollars 103.99m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KUALA LUMPUR
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
EDARAN Otomobil Nasional (Eon), the Malaysian distributor of the Proton car,
which last year took a 15.1 per cent holding in Cycle Carriage (CC), a
publicly-listed car assembler operating in Singapore and Malaysia, yesterday
reported a rise in net profits to MDollars 103.99m (USDollars 39.96m) for
1991 from MDollars 68.98m a year earlier, Reuter reports from Kuala Lumpur.
Turnover advanced to MDollars 2.57bn from MDollars 2.08bn and pre-tax
profits moved ahead to MDollars 174.16m from MDollars 112.84m.
A maintained final dividend of 10 cents a share has been recommended, making
a total of 20 cents for the year compared with 10 cents for 1990.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2150</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGADFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: Dairy Farm earnings decline 3%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON DAVIES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DAIRY FARM International, Jardine Matheson group's food retailing arm,
announced a 3 per cent decline in net earnings for 1991 as a result of the
impact of acquisitions in Spain and New Zealand in mid-1990 and the effects
of a price war in Australia.
The company also announced it would follow Jardine Matheson in pushing for a
primary listing in London with a secondary listing in Hong Kong if the Hong
Kong Stock Exchange implements the changes in secondary listing
requirements, which were hammered out following Jardine's threat to delist.
'This would enable us to be represented in a consistent regulatory framework
over the long term,' said Mr Owen Price, managing director. The announcement
had been expected.
Dairy Farm's results were also in line with expectations. Profit after
taxation and minority interests fell to Dollars 146.8m, from Dollars 151.8m,
while turnover increased by 26 per cent to Dollars 4.62bn, from Dollars
3.65bn in 1990.
The company had been rumoured to be announcing a rights issue, but Mr Price
said that with a debt-to-equity ratio of 26.6 per cent and strong cash flow,
there would be no need. And the company provided an optimistic forecast for
1992.
Wholly-owned Australian supermarket chain Franklins succeeded in increasing
market share during last year's price war, although profit margins were
pared. Margins were expected to improve in 1992, he said.
The company saw a maiden full-year contribution from recently-acquired
Woolworths New Zealand, where a change of marketing strategy increased its
share of the market, although sales were affected by the weak economy. Hong
Kong operations continued to grow, but with high market share in a limited
area, Mr Price indicated its Wellcome Supermarket sales would see slowing
growth.
The outlook for Taiwan was positive. The operations continued to lose money
in 1991, but it emerged as the largest supermarket chain in the country and
set up a central warehouse in Taipei, the rewards of which will be seen in
1992.
Simago, the recently-acquired Spanish retail chain, remained a drain on both
management and financial resources. Mr Price said large changes were
implemented in 1991, with a significant retrenchment of staff, and 'we would
expect an improvement in 1992'.
At the year end, Dairy Farm had a total of 985 stores and a gross trading
area of 10m square feet. The company recommended a dividend of 3.25 cents
per share, making a full year dividend of 4.6 cents, the same as 1990.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2151</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGADEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: TNT in international mail deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TNT, the Australian transport group, yesterday said it had completed a deal
with five European and North American post offices to operate a joint
international express mail service.
The venture, to be known as GD Net, will significantly increase the volume
of packages being carried by TNT's extensive European network of trucks and
air-craft.
Mr John Mullen, chief executive, said the agreement was 'an historic day for
the world express industry. It makes the world we do business in that little
bit smaller.'
The completion of the deal ends nearly a year of detailed negotiations
between TNT and the post offices of Canada, Sweden, France, Germany and The
Netherlands.
TNT has suggested that a number of other European post offices might seek to
join GD Net, which will be based in Amsterdam, and will employ more than
10,500 people servicing deliveries to 190 countries.
The group said GD Net would use the brandnames of TNT Express Worldwide and
EMS, the international express mail system operated by European and North
American post offices, for the 'foreseeable future.'
The deal represents a considerable coup for TNT, which had struggled to
generate sufficient volume for its loss-making distribution network in the
heavily competitive European market.
Earlier this week, TNT announced a USDollars 18m deal to acquire
Chronoservice, a leading French domestic express carrier, and deliver
in-bound shipments in 10 European countries for Federal Express of the US.
The group has recovered strongly since the beginning of last year, when its
share price fell below ADollars 1 on the Australian Stock Exchange on
worries about its liquidity and profitability. The shares closed 5 cents
lower in Sydney, at ADollars 1.88.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2152</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGADDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: HK hotels group posts 6% fall
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON DAVIES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   HONG KONG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
HONGKONG and Shanghai Hotels, which owns the luxury Peninsula hotel group,
reported net profits of HKDollars 313m (USDollars 42.64m) for 1991, a 6 per
cent decline from 1990's HKDollars 333m.
The results showed a marked improvement over the interim stage, when the
hotel group saw profits drop by HKDollars 32m. Operating profits were 5 per
cent down for the full year at HKDollars 479m, on turnover up 1 per cent to
HKDollars 1.74bn.
Profits were hit by the effects of the Gulf war and recession in Europe and
the US. But Mr Hanmer Webb-Pebloe, managing director, said: 'The
lower-than-expected returns from the hotel and restaurant business were
offset to a significant degree by the strong revenue generated by the
company's property portfolio and non-hotel operations, which continued to
perform well.'
Earnings were also affected by the closure of 54 rooms in the flagship
Peninsula Hotel in Hong Kong while a 32-storey tower extension is built.
But Mr Webb-Pebloe indicated the hotel and restaurant operations would
experience only a slow recovery in 1992 'as a result of the continuing
recession in several major western economies'.
Hongkong Hotels recommended a final dividend of 11 cents, making a total of
17 cents in 1991, the same as in 1990.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2153</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGADCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: Watchdog drops case on Air NZ
stake
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WELLINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE New Zealand Commerce Commission, the monopolies watchdog, yesterday
withdrew its case against Brierley Investments (BIL), the New Zealand
investment and trading group, and Qantas Airways, the Australian national
carrier, over their stakes in Air New Zealand, Reuter reports from
Wellington.
The commission said it had withdrawn because it had achieved its main
objective of preventing the acquisition by Qantas of further shares in Air
NZ without commission clearance.
Qantas holds 19.9 per cent Air NZ and BIL 42.5 per cent.
'The commission has concluded that its action to block the acquisition by
Qantas has been vindicated and has been successful,' Ms Susan Lojkine, the
commission chairman said.
The commission had alleged that Qantas and BIL made an oral agreement before
they, along with Japan Airlines (JAL) and American Airlines, bought Air NZ
in April 1989.
American, a unit of AMR of the US, recently sold its 7.5 per cent stake to
BIL. Qantas had earlier sought to buy the stake.
Ms Lojkine said Qantas and BIL would give undertakings to the New Zealand
courts, including an undertaking in respect of BIL's purchase of American's
stake.
The commission had received an affidavit from Mr Paul Collins, BIL chief
executive, stating that there was not, and never had been, any arrangement
or understanding between Qantas and BIL that Qantas was to exert management
control over Air New Zealand.
When the consortium to buy Air NZ was set up, Qantas agreed to guarantee the
dividend for BIL's Air NZ shares and to assure BIL a minimum selling price
on part of its stake.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2154</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGADBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: ASC files against Compass
management
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Australian Securities Commission (ASC), the corporate watchdog,
yesterday launched a court action for damages against seven directors and
three senior managers of Compass Airlines, which collapsed in December.
In a suit filed in the federal court in Brisbane, where Compass was based,
the ASC alleges that the 10 breached their duties under the corporation law
by allowing Compass to trade whilst insolvent.
The suit seeks unspecified damages which would be paid to Compass Airlines
and Compass Holdings, its parent company, both of which are in provisional
liquidation.
The ASC said there was no suggestion that any of the respondents engaged in
any dishonest conduct. The suit alleges the airline was kept flying after
ceasing to be viable.
The suit was heavily criticised by Mr Bryan Grey, the chief executive of
Compass, who founded the airline after a change in federal aviation policy
allowed new entrants to challenge government-owned Australian Airlines and
Ansett Australia, jointly owned by TNT and News Corporation.
'At no time did Compass trade while it was insolvent. I am absolutely
disgusted,' Mr Grey said. Mr Leigh Brown, a former Compass director, said he
believed the case would fail.
Compass ceased flying after a long struggle against the two leading carriers
which sparked an escalating price war in which all three lost revenue.
The airline's management claimed it had been the victim of predatory
price-cutting. Mr Grey also said Australian Airlines had failed to provide
ground facilities required by the government.
Southern Cross Airlines, which hopes to begin services later this year, said
the court action would not affect its plans for a merger with Compass, which
is being worked out with Mr Ian Ferrier, the provisional liquidator.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2155</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGADAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: Kumagai Gumi to cut work abroad
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT THOMSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
KUMAGAI Gumi, the aggres-sive Japanese contractor, yesterday forecast that
pre-tax profit for the year would fall by 24.7 per cent, and predicted that
the value of its international contracts would plunge to Y50bn (Dollars
378m) next year from Y150bn.
The company, which had been one of the most international of Japanese
contractors, had indicated that it would reduce the ratio of contracts
abroad, but the suddenness and scale of the retreat came as a surprise
yesterday.
Kumagai said that orders received during the year to end-March are likely to
total Y1,250bn, down Y150bn on a previous forecast, with a pre-tax profit of
Y38bn on sales of about Y1,150bn, a 4 per cent fall on a year earlier.
It said that calculating net profit has been complicated by the Tokyo stock
market's volatility, which has affected stock appraisal losses for the
period. Those losses are expected to total more than Y5bn, and net profit
could be down about 12 per cent to Y16bn.
Japanese contractors report that the weakness of the domestic property
market has forced the postponement of a growing number of projects, and
Kumagai said that it was also bruised by an increase in delayed payments
from clients.
The decline of the Japanese property market has been uneven, although land
prices are reckoned to have fallen 30 per cent nationally over the past two
years, with some apartment prices in the west falling by as much as 50 per
cent.
Kumagai has intended to sell as much as Y1,125bn in overseas property
holdings to reduce its debt burden, but this has been delayed by the slump
in the international market, in which it had been an aggressive developer,
with projects in New York, London, Sydney and Beijing.
Two years ago, the company reported that overseas contracts made up about 26
per cent of its total operations, but the level fell to 14 per cent last
year and is likely to be less than 5 per cent next year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2156</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAC9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: Kumpulan Guthrie advances 149%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KUALA LUMPUR
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
KUMPULAN Guthrie, Malay-sia's largest plantation group, yesterday reported a
149 per cent advance in group net profits to MDollars 57.22m (USDollars
21.99m) for 1991 from MDollars 22.97m in the previous 12 months, Reuter
reports from Kuala Lumpur.
The company said the higher profits were due to increases in commodity
prices and a favourable performance of overseas marketing companies. The
directors expect higher profits in 1992.
The directors are recommending a final dividend of 7 cents a share, making
10 cents for the year, up from 9 cents in 1990.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2157</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAC8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: Volvo swings back to the black
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BURTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
VOLVO, the Swedish vehicle group, returned a profit (after financial items)
of SKr1.5bn for 1991 after incurring a loss of SKr327m in 1990. It is
holding the dividend at SKr15.50 a share.
The return to profit was due to income from Volvo's shareholdings in the
French vehicle group Renault and the Swedish pharmaceutical and food company
Procordia, and the sale of shares in Saga Petroleum, the Norwegian oil
company.
Profits after financial items, however, dropped by 28 per cent if
restructuring costs of SKr2.4bn are excluded from the 1990 results. There
was an an operating loss of 1.16bn against a profit of SKr567m in 1990.
Car division losses grew to SKr1.7bn from SKr855m. The bus division also had
a loss of SKr152m against a profit of SKr67m in 1990, while marine and
industrial engines had a deficit of SKr84m against a profit of SKr69m.
The truck group made a profit of SKr788m, a 44 per cent fall. Aerospace was
the only division to improve, with earnings of SKr128m against SKr43m.
Sales fell by 7 per cent to SKr77.2bn as the recession kets. Net earnings
from associates totalled SKr1.2bn once a loss of SKr510m was deducted from
Volvo's other corporate holdings, including its stake in Nedcar, the Dutch
auto joint venture.
Renault contributed SKr561 to earnings and Procordia SKr1.16bn. Volvo owns
20 per cent of Renault's car division and 45 per cent of the Renault truck
group, while it holds 43 per cent of Procordia's voting rights.
The sale of shares gained SKr2bn for Volvo, with the sale of the Saga
Petroleum securities providing SKr1.43bn.
Mr Christer Zetterberg, chief executive, said fortunes may now be improving,
with a small operating profit of SKr88m posted in the fourth quarter of 1991
following five consecutive quarters of losses, including a deficit of
SKr697m in last year's third quarter.
Sales in the last quarter of 1991 rose 19 per cent to SKr21.6bn from the
preceding quarter, but were only 4 per cent above sales a year earlier.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2158</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAC7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: Cerus expects another heavy
deficit
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CERUS, the troubled French holding company of Mr Carlo De Benedetti, the
Italian financier, expects to record another heavy loss for 1991, though the
deficit will be well down on the previous year, writes William Dawkins.
The group expects to make a FFr1.3bn (Dollars 230m) net loss for last year,
against the FFr2.2bn net loss recorded in 1990. It attributed the deficit to
FFr470m write-downs on the reduced value of Cerus' investments in Spanish
industry, a FFr400m loss from Dumenil Leble, Cerus' French banking arm, plus
provisions for losses on further asset sales.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2159</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAC6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: BASF warns of large-scale
lay-offs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID WALLER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BASF, the German chemicals group, yesterday announced a slow start to
profits for this year and warned of large-scale lay-offs.
Group sales have risen by about 2 per cent to DM7.7bn (Dollars 4.66bn) in
the first two months of the year - but earnings in that period have not come
up to the same level as last year.
Mr Jurgen Strube, chief executive, disclosed this at a press conference at
the company's headquarters in Ludwigshafen yesterday.
He predicted that sales for the whole of the current year would probably
rise by more than 2 per cent - but refused to be drawn on the likely outlook
for profit, or whether he thought the worst was over for the blighted
industrial chemicals industry.
'Indications of a quick recovery are nowhere in the offing,' Mr Strube said,
describing 1991 as a year of disappointment for the company.
As announced last week, pre-tax profits dropped by 23 per cent to DM2.18bn
on stagnant sales of DM46.6bn and the company has decided to cut its
dividend for 1991 by DM1 to DM12 per share.
BASF said it would be exploiting 'all opportunities for optimisation and
cost cuts' and that jobs in the group were likely to shrink by around 9,500
to about 120,000 during the current year through early retirement and
attrition. Capital investment was DM4.8bn last year and is likely to be at
the same level in the current year.
At present, earnings remain unsatisfactory and incoming orders show no sign
of bucking the trend, the chief executive said yesterday.
'Persistently declining selling prices were not offset by a corresponding
drop in prices for raw materials and as a result, margins shrunk,' Mr Strube
said about the first two months' trading. 'We were unable to cushion the
decline in contribution margins as we were not successful in cutting fixed
costs as planned.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2160</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAC5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: Hoogovens falls into loss and
omits dividend
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RONALD VAN DE KROL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   AMSTERDAM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
HOOGOVENS, the Dutch steel and aluminium group, is to omit its 1991 dividend
after falling into loss last year.
The group foresees no improvement for the first half of 1992.
The company made a net loss of Fl 51m (Dollars 27m) last year compared with
a net profit of Fl 298m in 1990, when it paid a dividend of Fl 4.40, down 23
per cent from 1989.
It blamed the profit decline mainly on an 8 per cent fall in the selling
price of its principal steel and aluminium products. This pushed group
turnover down by 4 per cent to Fl 8.1bn.
The company, the Netherlands' only steel producer and the sixth biggest in
Europe, noted that difficult economic conditions in western Europe had
resulted in the postponement of both corporate investment projects and
purchases of consumer durables.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2161</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAC4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: Cariplo agrees to acquire 21%
share stake in IMI
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HAIG SIMONIAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MILAN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CARIPLO, Italy's biggest savings bank, yesterday ended months of speculation
by signing a letter of intent to buy a 21 per cent stake in Istituto
Mobiliare Italiano (IMI), the big Rome-based investment banking and
financial services group.
No price for the deal, which is part of the current wide-ranging restructure
of Italian banking, has been revealed. However, S. G. Warburg, the UK
merchant bank which valued IMI for the Treasury, is thought to have put a
L6,000bn to L8,000bn price tag on the company, valuing the deal at between
L1,250bn (Dollars 1.01bn) and L1,680bn.
IMI is 50 per cent owned by the Italian Treasury, while the remainder of the
shares are held by a number of public and private-sector financial
institutions. Cariplo is controlled by a public-sector charitable
foundation.
The link between the two could provide the first step towards creating a
third big, full-service bank alongside Istituto Bancario San Paolo di Torino
and the big new bank being established in Rome via the merger of Banco di
Roma, Banco di Santo Spirito and the Rome savings bank.
However, although the Cariplo-IMI deal is appealing in business terms, it
has been criticised by some politicians as furthering the expansionist aims
of big north Italian banks, while doing nothing for their poorer southern
counterparts.
Such views have sometimes masked more complex political considerations,
linked to the some politicians' views that the Christian Democrats, Italy's
biggest party, is already over-represented in the highly-politicised
public-sector banking world. Cariplo, chaired by a former leading member of
the party, Mr Roberto Mazzotto, is firmly in the Christian Democrat camp.
The political impact of letting Cariplo, which had total assets of
L120,000bn at the end of 1990, buy into IMI will be softened by offering a
further 21 per cent stake in IMI to other savings banks over the next 15
months, with the aim of counterbalancing Cariplo's presence. The Treasury
would retain 8 per cent of IMI.
However, the proposal is still vague, and it remains to be seen whether
other savings banks will want to join in the deal. Long-running talks last
year between Cariplo and four other big city savings banks on a joint
investment in IMI foundered on political differences and hostility among the
smaller banks to paying large amounts in return for what seemed little say
in IMI.
The go-ahead for Cariplo to buy into IMI may also be the first stage in
other politically-sensitive banking transactions, notably a recapitalisation
of Banca Nazionale del Lavoro (BNL), the Treasury-owned bank.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2162</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAC3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: Renault's operating profit sags
as sales mark time
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
RENAULT, the French state-owned car and truck maker, yesterday unveiled
profits more than double those of the previous year, although operating
earnings fell sharply in difficult market conditions.
Net profits at Renault, which has been allied with Volvo, the Swedish
automotive group for the past two years, rose to FFr3.08bn (Dollars 550m) in
1991 from FFr1.21bn. This was due to a steep drop in exceptional charges and
a fall in the interest bill, the benefits of earlier years' efforts at
trimming the workforce and paying off the group's still heavy debts.
Sales rose from FFr163.6bn to FFr165.9bn, but operating profits fell 25 per
cent from FFr6.2bn to FFr4.6bn. That represented 1.9m cars and trucks sold,
a fraction ahead of 1990, giving Renault 10 per cent of the European market,
against 9.9 per cent previously.
The fall in operating earnings was partly due to the freeze on demand caused
by the Gulf war, but also reflected the impact of last autumn's strike at
Renault's two main plants.
Sales in France fell by 14.5 per cent, bringing Renault's market share down
fractionally to 29.1 per cent, where it is still domestic leader.
Its other two main European markets, Spain and Britain, also declined
sharply. But Germany rose by 36 per cent and Renault doubled its sales
there, so lifting its German market share by nearly two points to 5.4 per
cent.
Interest charges fell from FFr1.98bn to FFr1.19m, reflecting the reduction
debt made possible by Renault's sale of FFr9bn of new equity to Volvo and
the French government, and by last year's cash-flow. Net debts fell by 43
per cent to FFr15.5bn.
The fall in exceptional charges reflects the previous year's write-offs for
Renault's subsidiary in Argentina and its truck units's US business, Mack
Trucks. There was also a one-off FFr969m gain, a payment from Chrysler
relating to a rise in Jeep sales since it bought Renault's American
interests in 1987.
Volvo contributed a small loss of FFr12m to Renault's results, though the
French group estimates that it has already saved FFr1bn on its development
bill by deciding to use Volvo's larger - more than two-litre capacity -
petrol engines.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2163</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAC2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / International Company News: BMW pegs payout despite 12.5%
gain
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW FISHER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
NET PROFITS of BMW rose last year by 12.5 per cent to DM783m (Dollars 475m),
but the German luxury car company decided to keep its dividend unchanged at
DM12.50 per voting share and DM13.50 for the preference stock.
The Munich-based company gave no further information about its progress in
1991 ahead of its annual press conference on April 1. It has already said
that deliveries to customers in 1991 rose by 5 per cent to 552,660 cars and
that turnover advanced by 10 per cent to nearly DM30bn.
Much of BMW's improved performance stemmed from the success of the latest
generation of its 3-series model, the smallest car in its range. Despite
some disruption caused by the changeover to the new model, car production
was 6.5 per cent higher at 553,000 units.
BMW is now working on a version of the 3-series to compete with the powerful
six-cylinder model at the top of Volkswagen's latest Golf range. The company
said nothing about this yesterday, but recently confirmed a statement by Mr
Wolfgang Reitzle, BMW's research and development director, that such a car
was being planned.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2164</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAC1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Steetley attacks Redland in final missive
to holders
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW TAYLOR, Construction Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
STEETLEY yesterday made a final appeal to shareholders to reject a Pounds
600m bid from Redland, its rival building materials group.
Redland's increased offer of 87 shares for every 100 Steetley shares is due
to close at 1pm next Thursday A cash alternative is pitched at 365p per
share.
Steetley, in a document sent yesterday to its shareholders, said that the
offer was worth only approximately 11 times 1990 earnings. This was a fairer
measure of the company's performance than 1991 earnings which had been hit
by one of the worst downturns in UK construction for half a century.
The offer was equivalent to an exit multiple of only 12 times average
earnings of the last five years, according to Mr David Donne, Steetley's
chairman. He said in a letter to shareholders: 'Redland is trying to buy
your company in the trough of recession at a price which undervalues
Steetley and ignores its recovery prospects.'
The group estimates that about 18 institutions control about 55 per cent of
its shares. It argues that Redland is trying to pick up, on the cheap, its
strong market positions in French aggregates, British bricks and in
aggregate and ready-mix concrete in the Madrid area.
It says that its markets are poised to recover in the UK, where it has made
substantial cost savings reducing its labour force by about 19 per cent
since 1989. Brick sales In North America are expected to rise by about 18
per cent this year.
Mr Robert Napier, Redland chairman, said Steetley's defence showed 'impudent
optimism about future recovery'.
'Steetley is offering unrealistic hopes for UK recovery, delayed cost
cutting and speculative future land-fill profits' he said.
Redland's offer would provide Steetley shareholders with immediate capital
and income uplifts, Mr Napier added.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2165</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAC0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: UniChem hits Pounds 21m and loses interest
in Macarthy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JANE FULLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
UNICHEM, the pharmaceut-icals wholesaler, yesterday announced a 31 per cent
increase in annual pre-tax profits and its withdrawal from the battle for
Macarthy.
The company's decision not to renew its bid for the retailer, in spite of
clearance from the Monopolies and Mergers Commission, comes a week before
the first closing date for the new Pounds 96m agreed offer from Lloyds
Chemists.
UniChem's profits rose from Pounds 16.4m to Pounds 21.4m last year, about
Pounds 400,000 ahead of the forecast made with December's Pounds 35.1m
rights issue.
The figures included a Pounds 2.5m reduction in net interest costs to Pounds
288,000. Turnover was Pounds 920.1m (Pounds 873.3m).
Mr Jeff Harris, who in May will take over from Mr Peter Dodd as chief
executive, said pharmaceuticals sales grew 9 per cent, in line with the
market, while the over-the-counter business was much flatter.
The account with Kingswood chemists was lost in May, when Lloyds took it
over. Savory &amp; Moore, part of Macarthy, was gained as a customer in
November, but would be lost if the Lloyds bid succeeded.
Operating margins in wholesaling, still the vast majority of the business
with retail contributing only Pounds 12m to sales, improved from 2.2 per
cent to just over 2.3 per cent.
Group operating profit rose by 12 per cent to Pounds 21.7m (Pounds 19.3m).
The retail division, started a year ago, had grown to 145 shops - of which
92 were added in December via the Pounds 27m acquisition of E Moss. The
group operates a franchise scheme.
Mr Dodd said some of the Pounds 17.5m cash that UniChem had at the year-end
would be used to buy more chemists. On the wholesaling side, there was still
scope to expand in the UK - where it had between 25 and 30 per cent of the
market, depending on definitions. On the Continent, both UniChem and its PAG
associate were looking at acquisitions.
Fully diluted earnings per share rose 10 per cent to 13.6p (12.4p).
A final dividend of 3.3p makes a 5p total. For 1990, the year the company
floated on the stock market, a single dividend of 1.5p was paid.
Costs of the Macarthy bid and the MMC inquiry amounted to Pounds 1.03m,
taken as an extraordinary item.
COMMENT
It is less than two years since the pharamcist members of what was then a
co-operative voted overwhelmingly for public company status. Their faith has
been handsomely repaid with the share price more than doubling since the
November 1990 launch. Meanwhile, pre-tax profit has grown by nearly 50 per
cent since 1989. Last year was a perfect illustration of UniChem's defensive
qualities, including its powers of cash generation. Net assets advanced by
Pounds 20m to Pounds 111m after acquisitions and a Pounds 33m goodwill write
off. UniChem does its image no harm by resisting the temptation to put
pharmacy licences on the balance sheet, as Lloyds does. Market growth, the
withdrawal of Medicopharma as a competitor and retail expansion should help
pre-tax profit to approach Pounds 30m this year, but earnings growth will be
weighed down by extra equity. A prospective multiple of 14.5 to 15 on
yesterday's 212p looks high enough.
See Observer
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2166</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGACZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Thornton Asian net assets improve
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Net asset value per share of Thornton Asian Emerging Markets Investment
Trust stood at 68.8p at the December 31 year end against 61p 12 months
earlier.
Gross income increased 5 per cent from Pounds 2.15m to Pounds 2.27m.
A same again dividend of 0.5p is proposed, payable from earnings per share
of 0.55p (0.5p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2167</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGACYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Belgians buy Cresta Holidays for Pounds
8.42m
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Cresta Holidays, the UK short holiday operator, has been bought by Sun
International of Belgium for about BFr500m (Pounds 8.42m).
Mr Mark Vanmoerkerke, Sun's general manager, said Cresta's management would
remain in place and the UK company would continue to function independently.
Mr Vanmoerkerke will join Cresta's board.
Cresta had turnover last year of Pounds 30m and carried over 100,000
passengers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2168</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGACXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: RPS falls sharply into the red
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
RPS Group, the environmental consultancy, fell sharply from pre-tax profits
of Pounds 1.74m to losses of Pounds 493,000 in the year to December 31.
The decline was struck after exceptional charges, relating to
reorganisation, of Pounds 928,000.
Turnover slipped to Pounds 8.83m (Pounds 9.63m) and the cost of sales grew
to Pounds 6.31m (Pounds 5.72m), leaving gross profits down at Pounds 2.52m
(Pounds 3.91m).
Losses per share emerged at 3.36p (earnings 9.49p) and the final dividend is
reduced to 0.6p for a total of 2p (3.2p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2169</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGACWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: M&amp;G Income net asset value at 52.04p
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
M&amp;G Income Investment Trust, which came to the market last October, repor-
ted net revenue of Pounds 3.77m for the period to Jan- uary 31.
Earnings per income share emerged at 1.53p and an interim dividend of 0.75p
is declared.
Net asset value amounted to 52.04p per capital share and 35.18p per zero
dividend preference share.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2170</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGACVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Vinten moves ahead to record Pounds 9.2m
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Vinten, the broadcast and photographic systems and electro-optics company,
increased pre-tax profits by 6 per cent, from Pounds 8.65m to a record
Pounds 9.18m, in the year to December 31. Turnover was little changed at
Pounds 63.3m.
Mr Humphrey Wood, chairman, said that the performance reflected the
anticipated recovery in profits from the surveillance systems division,
which entered 1992 with a strong order book, and lower interest costs
resulting from a further reduction in borrowing.
Earnings per share were 20.5p (19.8p) and the dividend total is increased
from 6.2p to 6.6p with a proposed final of 4.8p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2171</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGACUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Net assets down at BZW Convertible
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Net asset value of BZW Convertible Investment Trust was 97.04p at
end-January, a marginal decline on the 97.15p at the trust's year-end in
July.
The value had fallen to 96.45p by March 13 this year.
Net revenue for the six months to end-January amounted to Pounds 2.27m
(Pounds 1.92m), equal to earnings of 4.49p (3.81p) per share. A second
interim dividend of 1.5p makes 3p so far this year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2172</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGACTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Ferromet statement on US subsidiary
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Ferromet Group, which supplies raw materials to the stainless steel
industry, stated that an involuntary petition under Chapter 11 of the US
Bankruptcy Code, was filed in Texas on Tuesday against Ferromet Resources,
the group's principal operating subsidiary in the US, by certain of its
bankers.
This followed an announcement on March 6 that the offshoot was expecting to
report substantial losses.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2173</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGACSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Arcolectric falls to Pounds 318,300
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Arcolectric, a maker of lighting and other electrical equipment, suffered a
downturn from Pounds 446,665 to Pounds 318,299 in pre-tax profits in 1991
although turnover showed a marginal increase to Pounds 10.88m.
Mr Rodney Collier, chairman, said the reduced profit was explained by
reorganisational costs and lower than expected sales at the end of the year.
He said the current sales outlook was good.
Earnings per share came through at 3.8p (4.39p) and the proposed final
dividend is 0.58p to make 1.11p (1.06p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2174</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGACRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Stag cautious despite 75% leap
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Despite continuing difficult trading conditions, Stag Furniture Holdings,
the Nottingham-based cabinet furniture manufacturer, lifted profits for 1991
by 75 per cent.
However, Mr Peter Ryan, chairman, warned: 'It needs a resurgence of consumer
confidence and an upturn in the housing market if we are to maintain the
1991 level of profitability.'
The pre-tax outcome - Pounds 2.04m against Pounds 1.17m - reflected improved
production efficiency and reorganisation benefits, Mr Ryan said. The
increase came on turnover down 6 per cent at Pounds 26.8m.
Earnings per share jumped to 16.4p (6.1p); a proposed final dividend of 4p
brings the total for the year to 6.5p (5.5p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2175</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGACQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Lionheart sharply ahead at Pounds 2.63m
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Lionheart, the housewares, paint brushes and retail display equipment group
formerly known as Spong, returned to the dividend list after a three-year
absence for reconstruction.
Pre-tax profits for 1991 amounted to Pounds 2.63m, sharply ahead of the
previous year's Pounds 704,000. Turnover rose some 83 per cent to Pounds
32.3m (Pounds 17.6m).
A dividend of 0.3p is proposed, payable from earnings per share of 1.3p
(0.62p). This will cost nearly Pounds 1.6m and leave retained earnings of
only Pounds 210,000, but comes after clearing preference dividend arrears of
Pounds 1.03m to 12 institutions.
The Cheshire-based group was formed from the rescue of Spong by Hillsdown,
ECI and Scimitar in 1989, when Hillsdown paid Pounds 3.4m for an 8.7 per
cent stake. Mr Paul Lever was recruited as chairman from Crown Paints, where
he was chief executive.
Mr Lever said gearing was only 10 per cent and the group was looking for
more acquisitions to broaden its base of products sold through mass market
outlets.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2176</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGACPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Modest advance to Pounds 2.64m at Ferrum
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Ferrum Holdings, the engineering group, reported a 3 per cent advance in
pre-tax profits, from Pounds 2.57m to Pounds 2.64m, in the 1991 year.
Turnover was higher at Pounds 44.3m, against Pounds 41.9m.
The pre-tax figure was struck after lower net interest charges of Pounds
324,000 (Pounds 705,000) and an exceptional provision of Pounds 250,000
relating to the company's planned move to Edinburgh.
Earnings per share came out at 7.13p (8.16p) and a final dividend of 1.4p is
proposed making a total of 2.5p (2.25p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2177</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGACOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Law Debenture net assets up 17.3%
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Net asset value per ordinary share of the Law Debenture Corporation rose by
17.3 per cent, from 363.4p to 426.3p, over the year to end-December.
Net profits emerged at Pounds 4.3m (Pounds 4m), equal to earnings of 18.92p
(17.61p). A proposed final dividend of 11.5p makes a 17.5p (16p) total.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2178</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGACNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Recovery continues at World of Leather
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Following its return to profits in the first half, World of Leather, the
USM-quoted furniture retailer, reported a further advance in the rest of the
year to December 31 ending with pre-tax profits of Pounds 115,000, against
losses of Pounds 823,000.
Earnings per share were 0.9p (10.5p losses) but the dividend is again
passed.
Turnover was static at Pounds 24.6m despite the sale of two units cutting
the number of stores to 27.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2179</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGACMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Scottish Asian assets at Dollars 11.41
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The Scottish Asian Investment Company, launched two years ago by Murray
Johnstone, the fund management group, had a net asset value per share of
Dollars 11.41 (640p) at January 31 compared with Dollars 9.35 a year
earlier.
Losses for the six month period worked through at 10.21 cents per share, or
8.51 cents assuming full conversion of warrants.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2180</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGACLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Foreign &amp; Colonial High assets up 23%
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Net asset value of Foreign &amp; Colonial High Income Trust, formerly the London
&amp; New York Convertible Trust, rose 23 per cent to 52.9p at December 31,
against 42.9p a year earlier.
Net profits for the six months to end-December rose from Pounds 274,000 to
Pounds 467,000 but the interim dividend is held at 1.2p from earnings of
1.56p (1.82p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2181</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGACKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Nestor-BNA declines 34% to Pounds 5.31m
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE EFFECTS of the UK and US recessions together with political factors were
blamed by directors of Nestor-BNA, the international healthcare and
specialist personnel group, for a 34 per cent fall in 1991 profits to Pounds
5.31m pre-tax.
Part of the downturn, an exceptional charge of Pounds 840,000, reflected
reorganisation costs. Earnings worked through at 5.81p (8.64p) but a
proposed final dividend of 2p maintains the total at 3.15p.
Turnover slipped from Pounds 104.4m to Pounds 100.5m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2182</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGACJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Landfill activities boost Caird
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CAIRD, the waste management company, yesterday reported a 41 per cent
increase in profits for 1991 after strong increases in its landfill and
special waste divisions.
Pre-tax profits jumped from Pounds 4.86m to Pounds 6.87m on sales down 18
per cent at Pounds 26.2m. Earnings per share almost doubled to 4.75p and an
increased final dividend of 1.37p is proposed, giving 2.7p for the year.
Mr John Ashton, chairman, said the group had made progress concentrating on
the landfill and special waste sides with the disposal of the dry waste and
non-core businesses.
Debt rose to Pounds 12m, for gearing of 25 per cent, from no debt at the end
of last year end if off-balance sheet debt was included. Since the year end
Caird has received Pounds 5.4m from the sale of businesses, including the
English Dry Waste division, and is expecting to sell more assets with a net
realisable value of Pounds 4.1m this year.
Caird reported its results as Waste Management Inc, the world's largest
waste group, announced it was to float 20 per cent of its international
operations in order to take advantage of intensified environmental
regulation.
Overall profit margins at Caird rose from about 10 per cent to more than 26
per cent. Operating profits doubled to Pounds 7.23m at the landfill division
as a result of the increased sale of materials from recycled waste and the
sale of quarried materials. Margins in this division rose from 60 per cent
to more than 73 per cent. It takes very little low margin domestic waste.
Margins in the special waste division rose from 8 per cent to more than 20
per cent as the group moved out of treatment of bulk products and focused
more on smaller, more hazardous chemicals. Profits rose from Pounds 350,000
to Pounds 1.29m in this division.
Capital expenditure was Pounds 21.5m, most of it on site development. This
year the figure is likely to fall to Pounds 6.5m.
Extraordinary items of Pounds 1.02m covered withdrawal from non-core
businesses and the final portion of a total Pounds 1.2m bill for fighting
off Severn Trent's hostile bid.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2183</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGACIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Consumer credit side lifts Cattle's to
Pounds 9.8m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROLAND RUDD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CATTLE's (Holdings), the consumer credit company, yesterday reported a 19.5
per cent increase in pre-tax profits, from Pounds 8.2m to Pounds 9.8m, for
the year to December 31.
Mr Eddie Cran, deputy chief executive, said that despite no recovery in
consumer demand a reorganisation at the consumer credit division, offering
weekly credit to about 250,000 customers, saw profits rise from Pounds 6.7m
to Pounds 9m.
The hire purchase and leasing division, adversely affected by bad debts from
small businesses, reported a loss of Pounds 1.5m compared with profits of
Pounds 400,000. The number of debtors declined to 33m (40m).
Profits from insurance services were marginally up at Pounds 560,000 (Pounds
400,000). After the rapid expansion in 1990 the number of branches have been
maintained at 50.
Last month's 55 per cent flotation of Rosebys, the retail business,
generated Pounds 10m, which helped bring down borrowings to Pounds 65m
(Pounds 80m), representing 200 per cent of shareholders funds.
Mr Cran said it was encouraging to see Rosebys increase its profits to
Pounds 2.17m (Pounds 2m) in a 'dismal year for retailing'.
An extraordinary item of Pounds 500,000 relates to the costs arising from
the withdrawal from servicing small third party video retail sites.
Turnover was up at Pounds 245m (Pounds 203m). Earnings fell to 6.1p (7p). A
maintained final dividend of 2.3p is recommended for an unchanged total of
3.8p.
In addition, a special interim of 0.5p will be paid reflecting the gain from
the company's sale of part of Rosebys.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2184</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGACHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Davis Service falls to Pounds 16.7m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS FOSTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DAVIS SERVICE Group, the business services company formerly known as Godfrey
Davis, yesterday announced a 25 per cent fall in annual profits.
The company reported pre-tax profits of Pounds 16.7m (Pounds 22.3m) for 1991
as most divisions were hit by reduced demand and lower margins.
Earnings dropped to 13.24p (17.57p) per share but the final dividend is held
at 5.25p for an unchanged total of 7.98p.
Turnover fell to Pounds 309m (Pounds 353m), partly reflecting the sale of
three of its four Ford dealerships last May. The remaining dealership in St
Albans recorded lower profits due to reduced new car sales.
Profits from textile maintenance fell to Pounds 12m (Pounds 14.1m).
Recession and the Gulf war affected hotels and rising unemployment meant
lower garment rentals. The site services division was affected by local
authority spending constraints and recession among builders. The rental
business held up better due to lower prices.
Support services, which covers cleaning and catering, increased operating
profits to Pounds 2.51m (Pounds 1.81m) as a number of contracts won in 1990
contributed for the first time.
Contract hire was hit by clients reducing their fleets and weak second hand
car prices.
Interest charges, mainly related to the contract hire business, increased to
Pounds 11.7m (Pounds 9.79m). Excluding contract hire borrowings, gearing
fell to 15 per cent from 18 per cent.
COMMENT
Davis managed to keep up its volumes through aggressive price discounting in
its garment and site services division. Assuming demand returns, so should
margins. The site service side is theoretically an early beneficiary of
economic upturn, but exposure to the construction industry complicates
matters somewhat. The support services division performed well, but again
there is a question mark because 20 per cent of turnover stems from
competitive tendering in the health service, which is at risk if Labour wins
the election. Forecast pre-tax profits this year are Pounds 18m putting the
shares on a multiple of 12 and ranks them as no more than a hold.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2185</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGACGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: US buy behind 35% rise at Wassall
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROLAND RUDD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WASSALL, the mini- conglomerate run by former Hanson executives, yesterday
reported a 35 per cent increase in pre-tax profits on the back of its recent
acquisition of DAP, a US supplier of construction products and filling
compounds.
For the year to end-December pre-tax profits rose to Pounds 10.3m (Pounds
7.6m) on sales up by 27 per cent from Pounds 130m to Pounds 165m.
Without the 14-week contribution from DAP, which was acquired in September
for Pounds 58m, taxable profits would have remained unchanged from last
year.
The consumer division, which includes DAP and Antler, the UK luggage
manufacturer, increased trading profit to Pounds 3.98m (Pounds 1.03m).
DAP is undergoing a rationalisation programme, which could see a reduction
in the number of plants, and a wide-ranging evaluation of its business.
The acquisition is concentrating on the expanding DIY market in the US.
Wassall is confident of doubling its current 5 per cent return on sales.
Provisions of Pounds 7.7m were taken to cover reorganisation and
environmental costs as well as other post-employment benefits at DAP, which
include pensions and private health care.
The closures business, which includes bottle top companies in the UK, Italy
and South Africa, increased trading profit to Pounds 8.02m (Pounds 7.02m).
The industrial and commercial side saw a fall in profits from Pounds 3.02m
to Pounds 816,000 as office furniture reported a small trading loss. A
reorganisation, which saw the number of plants decrease from five to three,
cost Pounds 450,000.
Earnings per share increased to 13p (11.9p). A final dividend of 2p raises
the total to 3p compared to 2.5p. The group proposes to make a scrip issue
of one new share for every two held.
COMMENT
Wassall's results pleased the City more for its reduction in debt and
conservative accounting policies than its record profit increase. DAP's
contribution should not, however, be underestimated, producing operating
profits of Pounds 2.77m with a significant contribution still to come. The
group may also expand its US operations with a few strategic bolt-on
acquisitions. The reduction in net debt from Pounds 47m to Pounds 24m,
bringing gearing down from 140 per cent to 43 per cent, underlined the
group's ability to generate cash. The market also welcomed the group's
decision to take its Pounds 450,000 rationalisation cost above the line.
With forecasts of pre-tax profits of about Pounds 18m, the shares, up 9p to
235p, are on a prospective multiple of 15.2. Not a demanding premium given
the group's momentum.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2186</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGACFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Schroders beats expectations with 64%
advance to Pounds 52.1m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BARCHARD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SCHRODERS, the London-based international merchant banking group, raised its
profits by 64 per cent in 1991, a year which, according to Mr Wim Bischoff,
chief executive, turned out better than expected.
Total disclosed group post-tax profits were Pounds 52.1m, up from Pounds
31.6m before an extraordinary profit in 1990. Analysts noted that Schroders'
1991 performance was also 10 per cent up on 1989, the best-ever year in the
group's history.
Disclosed earnings per share rose from 50.1p to 82.2p, and the total
dividend is increased by 28 per cent from 14p to 18p.
Dividend cover is 4.5 times disclosed profits.
The improved profitability in 1991 seemed to reflect a successful year by
all the group's main operations, and the absence of any problems comparable
to those which hit its balance sheet in 1990 in the UK and US.
Mr Bischoff said that 1991 had been a very good year for Schroders'
operations in both London and Hong Kong.
In New York, the results of Wertheim Schroder had been substantially
improved, and transactions and revenues had both gone up. The Los Angeles
operation was also doing well.
There was also significant profits growth in the Japanese division, in spite
of the problems in the country's securities industry.
Venture capital and management buy-out operations increased funds under
management to Dollars 1.5bn. During the year the group repaid Pounds 27.8m
of debt, leaving only Pounds 10m of loan stock outstanding which matures in
2002.
Schroders is one of the most strongly capitalised banks in the London
market, with a risk asset ratio described as well over 16 per cent, twice
the regulatory minimum.
In the UK, the group's loan book rose from Pounds 732m in 1990 to Pounds
900m.
Mr Bischoff said Schroders took advantage of widening margins to lend to
good customers at a time when other banks were withdrawing from the market.
Despite the profits growth of 1991, Mr Bischoff was cautious about prospects
for the current year, which he said would be difficult.
Schroders had some terrific opportunities outside the UK, but would stick to
its traditional policy of trying to do a few things well.
'The high calibre of our staff worldwide enables us to face the present year
with confidence,' Mr Bischoff said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2187</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGACEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Courtyard bid talks discontinued
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Shares of USM-quoted Courtyard Leisure fell 5p to 21p yesterday on news that
bid talks with TW Consultants had been discontinued by mutual agreement.
TWC acquired a 13.9 per cent holding in Courtyard in January and talks began
at the end of last month when TWC made it known that, together with other
shareholders deemed to be associates of TWC, it had 27.64 per cent of
Courtyard.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2188</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGACDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Provisions put Laing Pounds 65.3m in red
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW TAYLOR, Construction Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
JOHN LAING yesterday became the second large construction group this week to
announce a pre-tax loss for 1991 after making large provisions to cover the
collapse of UK property values.
The deficit was Pounds 65.3m after an exceptional provision of Pounds 87.8m,
compared with profits of Pounds 20.1m. About two thirds of the writedown was
against housing land in southern England.
It is Laing's first pre-tax loss since it was floated in 1954. Immediately
after the announcement the shares fell from 160p to 128p but later recovered
to close 5p down at 155p.
Mr Martin Laing, chairman, said in the light of 'a thumping great loss' the
company had decided to cut its final dividend from 10p to 6p for a total of
9p (13p) for the year.
Group turnover rose from Pounds 1.53bn to Pounds 1.59bn. After all
deductions the group incurred losses per share of 57.4p in 1991 resulting in
a Pounds 58m transfer from reserves.
The Pounds 7.9m cost of funding dividends was met from cashflow. At the end
of last year net cash was Pounds 23.4m.
A divisional breakdown showed operating losses for housing of Pounds 2.8m
(Pounds 5.8m), Pounds 3.9m (Pounds 3.1m) losses for property development,
Pounds 2.8m losses, compared with Pounds 1.5m profit, for the technology
division and profits of Pounds 30.9m (Pounds 27.8m) for contracting, which
produced a slightly higher margin of 2.4 on turnover increased from Pounds
1.22bn to Pounds 1.29bn.
The number of UK private homes sold by the group fell from 1,627 to 1,231.
Average prices, however, were marginally higher at Pounds 68,800. The number
of homes sold in Virginia and California rose from 360 to 374 but average
prices fell by about a tenth.
Construction profits are likely to fall this year with the group's order
book worth Pounds 1.38bn at the end of 1991 compared with orders worth
Pounds 1.88bn at the end of 1990. Margins are also likely to come under
pressure as a result of a sharp downturn in UK construction activity.
Mr Laing said that UK house sales had improved by about 10 per cent in the
first 2 1/2 months of this year. However, that compared with a depressed
period last year when sales were affected badly by the Gulf war. The
improvement in sales had been much greater in California.
COMMENT
The fall in Laing's share price, after the initial shock at the size of the
writedown, was limited to just 5p. The market appeared to be taking the view
that the worst was now over. Laing previously had made only a small
provision against its UK housing operations, which it had hoped would have
been starting to improve by now. Instead things have got worse. Furthermore,
Laing is heavily involved in south-east England where values have been hit
badly by the recession. Following the provisions, the company should make an
average profit of about Pounds 12,000 a house. Any price rises should come
straight through to profit. Contracting earnings, however, will fall this
year. A group profit of Pounds 20m on a 33 per cent tax charge would place
Laing on prospective p/e of about 10. The balance sheet is strong but after
last year's shock the shares may be under pressure for a while.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2189</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGACCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Sotheby's drops 86% to Dollars 22m despite
strong final quarter
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAGGIE URRY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SOTHEBY'S HOLDINGS, the auction house, made up for losses earlier in the
year in its fourth quarter to report pre-tax profits of Dollars 21.5m
(Pounds 12.4m) for 1991. However, this was 86 per cent lower than the 1990
figure of Dollars 154.6m.
The fourth quarter pre-tax profit was Dollars 30.4m (Dollars 42.9m).
Even so, Sotheby's held its total dividend at 60 cents, although earnings
per share were down to 25 cents, (about 14p) compared with Dollars 1.66.
Earlier this week Christies International, Sotheby's rival, also reported a
sharp fall in earnings but cut its dividend. Sotheby's shares were unchanged
at 825p.
Mr Michael Ainslie, Sotheby's president and chief executive officer, said
there were signs that the art market was picking up again. He said that the
1992 dividend would be reconsidered during the year if Sotheby's felt that
earnings would not reach 60 cents.
Mr Ainslie countered claims by Christies to have increased market share to
48 per cent by saying that Sotheby's market share had risen again in the
early months of 1992 and that Sotheby's made proportionally larger profits
from its share of the market. Like Christies, Sotheby's suffered from the
souring of the market for impressionist and contemporary paintings after the
inflated prices seen in the late 1980s.
Mr Ainslie said that the market hit bottom in the first half of last year
and improved in the second half. So far this year sales were 12 per cent
ahead of the same period last year.
In 1991 auction sales totalled Dollars 1.1bn (Dollars 2.4bn) with the number
of lots sold down from 180,000 to 135,000. But the fall in total revenues
was less severe to Dollars 222m (Dollars 378m). Revenues from auctions were
Dollars 194m, 17.6 per cent of auction sales, down from Dollars 347m or 14.2
per cent of sales. The improved margin reflected higher vendor commissions
on lower priced lots. Operating profits from auctions were Dollars 12.1m
(Dollars 139m).
Sotheby's finance operations - lending to sellers ahead of auctions - made
an operating profit of Dollars 7.8m (Dollars 8.1m), while the international
real estate business increased profits to Dollars 312,000 (Dollars 52,000).
Costs had been cut by Dollars 42m to Dollars 198m, Mr Ainslie said, and this
would mean that slight revenue gains this year would have a larger impact on
profits. Interest income fell from Dollars 14.6m to Dollars 6.85m.
COMMENT
Unlike Christies, which jacked up its dividend to unsustainable levels in
the late 1980s, Sotheby's feels justified in maintaining its pay-out in a
difficult year. It appears to think it could earn enough to cover a repeat
payment in 1992 which suggests a p/e of about 24 or less and a yield of 5.6
per cent. But that would translate to pre-tax profits of about Dollars 70m,
a rather steep recovery even if costs come down another 5 per cent and
confidence rebuilds in the art market. A more conservative estimate might be
about Dollars 40m pre-tax, with a correspondingly higher p/e. Investment in
the shares demands faith in the long-term growth of the art market.
Sotheby's shares have outperformed Christies' of late, but on balance look
the better bet.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2190</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGACBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Depressed car market behind decline at BSG
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL CHEESERIGHT, Midlands Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PROFITS at BSG International, the motor components, vehicle distribution and
consumer products group, slipped back for the second year running,
reflecting lower car sales volume and a sluggish leasing market.
Pre-tax profits for 1991 amounted to Pounds 11.1m (Pounds 13.1m) which
translated into earnings per share of 3.32p (4.29p).
However, the final dividend is maintained at 2.5p to make a barely covered
total of 3.2p, the same as in 1990.
The group is looking for better results in the current year. 'The first two
months have been encouraging, except for car distribution and leasing,' said
Mr Tom Cannon, managing director, noting that the budget had made no
difference to new car sales so far.
'We can trade more profitably in today's economy because we've cut back so
much. Even if the economy doesn't move, we'll make more money,' he said.
Indeed, Pounds 1.1m of the Pounds 2.03m profits reduction came from
redundancy payments, largely at the Birmingham car sales and leasing
operation, which has been reduced in scale and from which Pounds 4m in
working capital has been removed. Reduction in costs helped to reduce
gearing from 44 per cent to 39 per cent.
Despite problems with an Australian lighting plant, which has not yet found
any export markets, the group's international component operations held up
strongly. Sales in the consumer and special products division, making
children's car safety seats, pushchairs, nursery furniture and aircraft
lavatory cubicles, rose 7 per cent and trading profits more than doubled to
Pounds 8.76m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2191</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGACAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Manders at Pounds 6.04m after second half
improvement
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL CHEESERIGHT, Midlands Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MANDERS (HOLDINGS), the Wolverhampton-based inks, paints and property group,
showed an improved performance in the second half of 1991 and ended the year
with pre-tax profits of Pounds 6.04m compared with Pounds 6.6m in 1990.
Operating in sluggish markets, the group faced continuing pressure on
margins and suffered from the growing incidence of bad debts.
Turnover amounted to Pounds 101.6m (Pounds 104.8m). Earnings per share were
13p, against 14.31p. The final dividend is 5p, making an unchanged total of
7p.
Reorganisation of factories in the inks division, a change in distribution
methods of the paints business and moves to boost productivity began to take
effect in the second half. This meant that, for example, the 5 per cent
turnover fall in the paints division was half that of the industry
generally.
But the tile business slipped into loss. Mr Roy Amos, chairman, said that
'the tile business is not really strategic,' and, hinting at a possible
disposal, added, 'we need to do something about the tile business.'
Manders's property interests, based on the eponymous shopping centre in
Wolverhampton, increased revenue because of higher rents but were revalued
at Pounds 57.5m, a reduction of 11.5 per cent since the last revaluation in
1989. To cover this adjustment, Pounds 7.77m is being deducted from group
reserves.
The group expects financial benefits to flow through from the recent
acquisition of Windeck Paints, a move which takes it into the own-brand
business at retail multiples. But Mr Amos warned that 'there is no end to
the recession as far as we can see.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2192</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAB9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: International Rescue launched to prove
Clarke Foods' Lyons Maid is FAB
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HENRY D Clarke, Jr, took one look at the British ice cream market and made
an urgent call to International Rescue. Whether he had to pull strings to
get Brains and Virgil, he would not say, but the sound and light
extravaganza produced for retailers yesterday was nothing short of
spectacular.
For Mr Clarke, the American chairman and 'Big Daddy' of Clarke Foods, which
became Britain's second biggest ice cream manufacturer when it bought Lyons
Maid in January, is determined to spare no expense in promoting his assault
on the UK ice cream market, including drafting in the Thunderbirds.
In a homey and comforting voice, more akin to bedtime story-telling than
advertising hype, Mr Clarke told a packed West End theatre about his
family's obsession. And one by one, his sons appeared on stage to confirm
that ice cream was what kept the Clarke family together.
The speeches, interspersed with bright lights and rousing music, had one
purpose: to relaunch Lyons Maid and introduce the Clarke brand of super
premium ice cream.
'We have got Lyons Maid, the great sleeping giant of the UK ice cream
industry and we are going to shake it awake,' declared Henry D.
The Clarke credentials for promotion are legendary in the ice cream
industry. Mr Clarke was the Brains behind the runaway success of the
Klondike bar in the US - America's best-selling novelty ice cream.
Clarke Foods has returned to a version of Henry D's first love in the Clarke
Bar. But now, says Mr Clarke, he has the chance to do what he never could to
Klondike' improve the quality. Quality was the main message in yesterday's
production. Clarke has relaunched Lyons Maid with the promise that fruit
flavours and sauces would be made with the real thing.
A Pounds 3.5m advertising campaign to promote the improved Lyons Maid is
waiting to swamp Britain from June, while the Clarke brand will get Pounds
1m in exposure.
Packaging of the old familiar favourites, such as the Zoom rocket bar and
fruit Mivvi, has even been given a space age look to attract today's Star
Wars generation.
The Clarke brand will go heavy on nostalgia, perhaps most importantly for Mr
Clarke whose photograph at the age of seven appears on the tubs. He claims
he was setting off to get a Klondike bar.
All this razzamatazz might seem more appropriate to an US election campaign
than the relaunch of Lyons Maid and introduction of a new product. But it
cannot be denied that there was something almost patriotic in the way Mr
Clarke swore his allegiance to the product. The only thing missing was the
flag.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2193</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAB8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: MGN Pension Trustees chairman
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Mr Colin Cornwall has been appointed as independent chairman of MGN Pension
Trustees. He has previously been director of pensions and company secretary
at Courtaulds.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2194</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAB7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: C and W moves could save Pounds 175m next
year
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHIYO NAKAMOTO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CABLE AND Wireless is restructuring its business services units and merging
its personal communications network business with Unitel, a US-owned
operator, in moves that will lead to savings for the group of Pounds 175m in
the next year.
The UK-based international telecommunications group is, however, making an
exceptional charge of Pounds 50m in the current year to March 31 to cover
the costs of the restructuring.
Shares in C and W dropped sharply on the news before closing down 28p at
555p as investors were disappointed by the prospect of another year of flat
earnings. In the year to March 31 1991, C and W reported pre-tax profits of
Pounds 609m against Pounds 527m but earnings per share were flat at 31.3p.
The restructuring would provide the foundation for a more focused strategy
for C and W's business services activities, an area where it expects to see
the greatest competition.
C and W was not interested in building a mega-network around the world but
would concentrate on areas where it already has strength. The move was aimed
at 'clearing the decks for the nineties,' said Lord Young, chairman.
The merger of Mercury Personal Communications, a wholly owned C and W
subsidiary, with Unitel, a consortium led by US West, a diversified
communications company based in Colorado, brings together two of three
competing operators of personal communications networks (PCNs).
It highlights the difficult market faced by groups licensed to operate PCN,
a mobile communications system based on digital cellular radio technology.
PCNs were initially hailed as a low-cost mobile system which could compete
against BT's fixed-link telecommunications network.
However, the market for mobile communications has failed to grow according
to the industry's initial optimistic forecasts. Mercury acknowledged that
with two analogue networks - Vodafone and Cellnet - already well
established, 'it may well be that the market can only support one digital
cellular network.'
In addition, the costs of installing PCN infrastructure are prohibitively
high. Mercury PCN and Unitel had already agreed last July to share the costs
of building a new infrastructure for PCNs to reduce costs by about Pounds
400m.
A merger would cut costs by approximately a further Pounds 200m over the
next three years, C and W said.
C and W indicated that it could tie up with Microtel, the only other PCN
operator, to share a single network.
Since the UK government awarded licenses in 1989 to three consortia of
several companies each to develop and operate PCNs, most have withdrawn from
participation leaving only C and W, US West and Hutchinson
Telecommunications.
See Lex
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2195</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAB6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Arjo Wiggins declines to Pounds 231.5m -
Figures short of expectations as falling paper prices take their toll
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL ABRAHAMS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ARJO Wiggins Appleton, the Franco-British pulp and paper group, yesterday
reported pre-tax profits down 10.8 per cent from Pounds 259.6m to Pounds
231.5m for the year to December 31.
Mr Cob Stenham, chairman, said the result was strong given market conditions
and that the underlying strengths of the new group, formed by the merger in
1990 of Arjomari-Prioux and Wiggins Teape Appleton, had become apparent.
However, the results, compared with non-statutory pro-forma results of the
enlarged group in 1990, were below analysts expectations. Although sales
volumes increased 3 per cent, group turnover was down 4 per cent from Pounds
2.6bn to Pounds 2.49bn reflecting weak prices. However, the shares rose 13p
to 241p.
Most of the profits fall was caused by a Pounds 26m decline at the Iberian
forestry and pulp operations. A new paper machine at the Iberian Soporcel
subsidiary came on stream at a time when demand and prices were already
weak, said Mr Stephen Walls, chief executive.
Pulp prices had fallen by a third over the past 12 months, he added.
The new Soporcel machine would adversely affect results in 1992, he said. In
January, AWA broke off negotiations with South-Africa-based Mondi Paper,
part of the Anglo-American group, for the sale of its 42.86 per cent stake
in Soporcel.
The group's worldwide forestry and pulp operations fell into a Pounds 9.4m
loss compared with a profit of Pounds 5.7m last year.
The group's results were also affected by poor paper demand throughout
Europe, said Mr Walls. Demand in Germany and France had slowed, while the UK
and Scandinavia remained locked in recession. Profits from the European
paper operations fell 5.2 per cent from Pounds 141.6m to Pounds 134.1m.
However, the North American paper operations performed extremely well, said
Mr Walls, with profits up 12 per cent from Pounds 92.6m to Pounds 104.2m.
The paper merchanting operations reported a 33 per cent fall in profits from
Pounds 26.8m to Pounds 17.9m, a result described by Mr Walls as commendable.
The benefits of the merger had been greater than expected, said Mr Walls. He
forecast savings of Pounds 15m this year and Pounds 25m next. A provision of
Pounds 17.1m has been added to the original Pounds 43.2m put aside to cover
the rationalisation of the group following the merger.
The outlook was dependent upon an upturn in the world economy, said Mr
Walls. The sector was not out of the woods of overcapacity and low prices.
Pulp prices had started to increase, but paper prices had a long way to go
until he would feel comfortable. There also was still a continuing problem
of poor demand, he said.
Earnings per share were 18p (21.5p). The recommended final dividend is again
5.05p, maintaining the total at 8.35p for the year.
COMMENT
AWA came to the market blandishing both its qualities as a defensive stock
and a progressive dividend policy. Neither has materialised. Last year's
results were uninspired, while trading conditions this year look to be
increasingly difficult. A strong German market during the first half which
boosted the results last year will not be repeated, and the company looks
vulnerable to an increase in pulp prices which, given the state of demand
for paper, it would have difficulty passing on to customers. With analysts'
profits forecasts for next year wavering at about Pounds 219m, giving a
multiple of 14, the stock looks decidedly dull. A poor defensive stock with
limited recovery potential.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2196</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAB5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Ex-Ashley chief to get pay-off
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAGGIE URRY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Ashley Group, the window blind distributor and Spanish food retailer, will
incur a loss in its current financial year and is paying compensation of
Pounds 593,000 to Mr Tony Butler, who resigned as chief executive earlier
this month.
Mr Butler resigned following disagreements over strategy and pressure from
institutional shareholders for change.
Mr Alan Thomas has been appointed group managing director. He ran the window
blind business and before joining Ashley was managing director of Linfood,
the cash and carry company.
Mr James White, chairman, said that Mr Butler's compensation was in line
with his three-year, Pounds 250,000 a year contract.
The group said that results for the year to end August 'may not exceed break
even' before exceptional charges.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2197</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAB4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Porter Chadburn expands in US
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Porter Chadburn, a producer of notepaper and labels, is to acquire Lancer
Label, a Nebraska-based specialist maker of self-adhesive labels.
Consideration for the purchase, which is to be effected through Porter
Chadburn Holdings, the group's US subsidiary, is Dollars 25.8m (Pounds
14.9m). This is payable in cash over five years, of which Dollars 16.4m is
payable on completion.
The company also revealed that it had disposed of Compular for Dollars 3.1m
(Pounds 1.8m) in cash.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2198</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAB3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: S&amp;N static at Pounds 132m in spite of
underlying sales upturn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SMITH &amp; NEPHEW, the international healthcare and consumer products group,
yesterday reported virtually static profits of Pounds 132.4m pre-tax for
1991 in spite of a 9 per cent rise in underlying sales.
The group saw particularly strong growth in its trauma and arthroscopy
division and in orthopaedic implants, which grew by 31 and 29 per cent
respectively.
Mr John Robinson, chief executive, said Smith &amp; Nephew had continued to
build its position as a world-wide healthcare group which commanded about 15
per cent of a world market worth approximately Pounds 4bn.
Earnings per share slipped from 9.2p to 9p but the company is paying a final
dividend of 2.69p, bringing the total for the year to 4.44p, up 2 per cent.
Turnover grew 8 per cent to Pounds 792m.
The result was achieved despite recession in the UK consumer market, a hit
from currency translation that cost Pounds 8m and a sharp turn down in the
US optical lens business, which cost another Pounds 7m.
Mr Robinson said that in the long run Smith &amp; Nephew would be unaffected
should a Labour government be returned as its products tended to help save
money by shortening a patient's stay in hospital.
The company could enjoy a short term boost after a Labour victory, he said.
Gearing during the year fell from 31 per cent to 23 per cent but the tax
rate rose to 27 per cent and is likely to be 29 per cent this year.
COMMENT
S&amp;N is in some exciting growth markets, particularly arthroscopy and
non-invasive orthopaedic implants. But until now one could not avoid
wondering why the company had done so little with them; after all, earnings
per share since 1988 has grown by only 4 per cent. This may be about to
change and boost S&amp;N's market rating. Despite recession, underlying sales
grew by 9 per cent last year, management appears to be sorting out the less
successful acquisitions made during the 1980s drive for international
coverage and this year it should avoid the adverse effects of currency.
Pre-tax profits are likely to rise to at least Pounds 146m, or earnings of
9.9p, giving a prospective multiple of under 15.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2199</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAB2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Johnson Group dividend frozen
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
JOHNSON Group Cleaners, one of the world's largest dry cleaning companies,
is freezing its dividend for the second consecutive year as it reported an 8
per cent decline in pre-tax profits to Pounds 16m for the 12 months to
December 28.
The decline in profits was entirely due to a Pounds 1.6m fall in the
property surplus. Stripping out property gains, profits rose slightly from
Pounds 15.6m to Pounds 15.8m.
Mr Terry Greer, chairman, warned that the outlook for this year was not
encouraging. '1992 is most unlikely to show a big movement upwards,' he
said. 'Another cautious year is what we are looking for.'
The group proposed a final dividend of 18.7p, for a total of 25.7p. Mr Greer
said that due to the company's 'extremely cautious attitude to profits in
1992, we would be unlikely to show an increase in the dividend unless
something big happened'.
The group's two divisions, dry cleaning and textile rental, enjoyed mixed
fortunes on both side of the Atlantic. Dry cleaning in the UK, where Johnson
commands more than 20 per cent of the market, had maintained sales in a
difficult environment, while textile rental had improved both turnover and
margins. However, growth in textile rental had slowed significantly by the
year end.
In the US, losses at the dry cleaning franchise division had been cut from
Dollars 1m to Dollars 250,000 through reduced overheads. Mr Greer said he
expected the losses to remain at that level for 1992. 'We hope to see real
movement after 1992,' he said.
Both dry cleaning and textile rental had remained static in the US.
Altogether, group turnover rose from Pounds 149.4m to Pounds 154.5m.
Fully-diluted earnings per share fell from 55.41p to 49.02p. Stripping out
the property surplus, however, earnings increased from 46.98p to 48.7p.
During the year, Johnson strengthened the balance sheet through cutting
capital expenditure by 50 per cent to Pounds 7m and controlling costs, said
Mr Greer. Gearing had been reduced from 54 per cent to 39 per cent.
There was a Pounds 1.7m extraordinary charge for the demolition of an old
factory at Bootle, Merseyside. Mr Greer said Johnson eventually intended to
expand the remaining workwear factory on the site.
The acquisition programme, put on hold last year when the recession began to
bite, would be further delayed, the chairman said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2200</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAB1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Loss at Select Appointments
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Select Appointments (Holdings), which operates miscellaneous business
services including permanent and temporary staff placements, went sharply
into reverse in the six months to October 5 ending with a pre-tax loss of
Pounds 508,000 compared with a profit of Pounds 711,000.
Sales of this USM-quoted company totalled Pounds 10.1m (Pounds 31.3m) but
the current figure related only to ongoing operations in the UK, Australia
and New Zealand, while the previous year's included Pounds 15.3m sales of
the discontinued businesses of Morgan and Banks and Select USA.
Disposal of these companies was reflected in an extraordinary charge this
time of Pounds 21.1m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2201</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAB0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / UK Company News: Higher margins help Kwik-Fit
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JANE FULLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A TWO THIRDS increase in pre-tax profit is a rare sight in a recession, but
Kwik-Fit Holdings, the tyres and exhaust fitter, delivered it yesterday.
By pushing operating margins up from 10 per cent to 15 per cent and reducing
interest costs by nearly Pounds 4m, it turned a 17 per cent rise in sales
into 66 per cent at the pre-tax level. This was in spite of losing Pounds
770,000 on asset sales, compared with a Pounds 2.04m profit.
The pre-tax figure for the year to February 29 rose to Pounds 32.1m (Pounds
19.4m) on turnover of Pounds 253.8m (Pounds 229.4 including a discontinued
business). Earnings per share, helped by a lower tax rate of 30 per cent,
rose 73 per cent to 13.27p (7.67p).
The previous year's pre-tax profit and earnings figures were restated from
the original Pounds 24.5m and 10.82p respectively to show a reduction in the
exceptional gain on a business sale. This was caused by the reinstatement of
a Pounds 5.08m goodwill write-off to comply with a new accounting standard.
Operating profit, unaffected by the changes, advanced by 51 per cent to
Pounds 34.5m (Pounds 22.8m). Net debt of Pounds 19.1m at the previous
year-end was turned into Pounds 3.52m cash.
Mr Tom Farmer, chairman and chief executive, said margins had been helped by
an increase in sales of higher margin products, especially exhausts. Prices
had gone up by 7 per cent but the cost of running a depot had been kept
level by focusing on savings.
A net 13 depots were opened, bringing the total to 599, of which 480 are in
the UK with most of the rest in the Netherlands, where record results were
achieved. Mr Farmer said 27 outlets would be opened in the first half of
this year.
Tyres, which carry a lower margin, accounted for 50 per cent of sales. There
had been an upsurge in demand in December and January as tighter regulations
on tread depth took effect. Most of the fleet business is in tyres.
Exhausts accounted for 32 per cent of sales. Mr Farmer said the market had
got over a dip caused by manufacturers fitting longer-lasting products,
which had delayed replacement.
A final dividend of 2p makes a total of 3.35p (2.75p).
COMMENT
Kwik-Fit has responded to the recession as if its market had been seriously
affected, which it has not. Two years ago it curtailed its expansion
dramatically after increasing the number of outlets by 55 per cent in a
similar period. The big cut in capital spending has been mirrored in the
control of cost minutiae from head office to the depots. Coupled with price
and demand increases in a make-do-and-mend era, the cash has rolled in. The
company even shrugged off criticism from the Consumers Association with the
help of its well-oiled marketing machine. This year, from a strong financial
position, the rate of openings is being stepped up, as it must be for future
growth. A pre-tax profit forecast of Pounds 36m gives a prospective p/e of
about 13 on yesterday's close of 189p, a little short of the market. With
the UK's vehicle fleet still ageing and additional custom causing little
extra cost, this looks undemanding.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2202</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGABZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / RVI learns from its experience
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The problems at Mack Trucks are only too familiar to Renault Vehicules
Industriels (RVI), its French owner, writes William Dawkins in Paris.
Less than 10 years ago RVI was one of French industry's costliest headaches.
Its experience in trimming costs and improving quality means RVI feels
qualified to do the same to Mack.
From 1983 to 1986, the Lyon-based group lost FFr7.5bn (Pounds 760m), as it
entered the recession with surplus capacity and a too large workforce. In
seven years, it shed nearly 13,000 jobs to about 28,000 by the end of last
year; improved training; and cut inventories.
RVI nearly went bankrupt before its restructuring took effect. But it
responded to the upturn with a profits recovery in the late 1980s, helped by
lower break-even.
When the latest downturn hit, RVI suffered a relatively small loss, of
FFr102m in 1990. It edged back to profit of FFr23m net last year.
Mr Jean-Pierre Capron, RVI's chairman, is convinced the Mack revival plan is
paying off. He points to a 16 per cent average rise in productivity in the
past year. 'More than ever a big manufacturer needs to be present in north
America,' he said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2203</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGABYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Guinness buoyed by 13% increase
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP RAWSTORNE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GUINNESS, the UK-based international drinks group, matched market
expectations yesterday with a 13 per cent increase in 1991 pre-tax profits
from Pounds 847m to Pounds 956m.
Mr Anthony Tennant, chairman, said further 'acceptable growth in profits'
should be achieved this year, and industry analysts are forecasting a 12 per
cent rise to about Pounds 1.07bn.
However, the company's shares closed 14p down at 556p on Mr Tennant's
warning that trading conditions were likely to be no easier than last year.
'There seems to be little prospect of a speedy end to the recession in
several major markets, notably the UK and North America,' he said.
Group trading profit improved 19 per cent last year from Pounds 837m to
Pounds 995m on turnover up 16 per cent at Pounds 4.07bn.
Guinness's 24 per cent stake in LVMH, the French drinks and luxury goods
group, contributed additional profits of Pounds 123m.
Diluted earnings per share increased 15 per cent to 33.6p. The dividend is
raised 15 per cent with a 7.75p final payment making a total 10.8p.
Guinness spent Pounds 881m on acquisitions during the year - notably
Cruzcampo and Union Cervecera, the Spanish brewers; Asbach, the German
brandy; and Pampero, the Venezuelan spirits company. In spirits,
acquisitions contributed Pounds 299m to turnover, up 13 per cent to Pounds
2.44bn; and Pounds 37m to profits, 12 per cent higher at Pounds 749m.
The Cruzcampo group's contribution to the brewing division more than covered
the financing cost of its acquisition. It accounted for Pounds 61m of total
brewing profits of Pounds 244m (Pounds 160m) and Pounds 283m of the Pounds
1.59bn turnover (Pounds 1.3bn).
Since 1987, in addition to its Pounds 1.1bn stake in LVMH, Guinness has
invested Pounds 1.5bn in acquisitions. 'We believe there will be further
opportunities in both beer and spirits,' Mr Tennant said. The group's free
cash flow last year amounted to Pounds 182m.
Continental Europe now contributes the largest slice of profits, up from 24
per cent to 30 per cent after acquisitions.
The accounts include an extraordinary charge of Pounds 41m reflecting the
Pounds 70m net cost of settling the Argyll Group's claim for compensation
arising from the 1986 Distillers takeover, partially offset by the recovery
of Pounds 29m of Pounds 68m invested in the Ivan Boesky partnership.
Lex, Page 18
LVMH results, Page 27
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2204</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGABXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / GRE cuts payout 41% as losses rise
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GUARDIAN Royal Exchange, the fourth of the UK's five leading composite
insurers to report 1991 results, yesterday cut its dividend by 41 per cent
after announcing a 33 per cent increase in pre-tax losses to Pounds 210m.
However, the City reacted positively to the results. The size of the loss
was less than feared and investors were reassured by signs that underwriting
results are improving and costs under control.
The shares were marked up by 13 1/2 p on the day to close at 128p.
Mr Sid Hopkins, chief executive, said the 41 per cent cut in the dividend
would 'enable GRE to participate more fully in the emerging business
upturn'.
The final dividend was 2.6p making a total of 7.0p for the year. Losses per
share were 21.2p compared with 22p.
The group is to merge its Australian subsidiary with that of Zurich
Insurance, one of Europe's biggest insurers. GRE will obtain 25 per cent in
Zurich Australian Holdings. It has an option to sell its holding in ZAH to
Zurich for ADollars 110m (Pounds 48.4m) in three years.
Worldwide underwriting losses amounted to Pounds 491m against Pounds 445m,
life profits were Pounds 23m compared with Pounds 25m, investment income was
Pounds 268m against Pounds 267m with merged operations producing a loss of
Pounds 10m.
As with its competitors, UK underwriting losses dominated the results
amounting to Pounds 332m, up from Pounds 250m.
However, a combination of rate increases of around 30 per cent and much more
selective underwriting reduced losses on the private motor account to Pounds
65.9m from Pounds 77.4m.
GRE reduced its exposures by 23 per cent and now insures some 675,000
motorists compared with 878,000 a year ago.
Commercial insurance losses increased marginally from Pounds 185m to Pounds
186.5m in spite of a rise in liability claims from Pounds 44.1m to Pounds
73.6m with increasing numbers of negligence awards against surveyors
identified as one reason.
GRE also reduced costs in its UK operations and has reduced staff numbers by
1,100 over the past 14 months.
General expenses at GRE (UK) were cut 9.6 per cent to Pounds 78.6m.
The dividend cut has also protected solvency. The solvency margin (the
yardstick which measures net assets as a percentage of non-life premium
income) amounted to 43 per cent at the end of 1991.
Lex, Page 18
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2205</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGABWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Letter: Unfair gastronomic comparison
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr S P HARRISON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Your Observer column ('Indigestion', March 3) is unfair to say that
3-star Michelin restaurants cost 'an arm and a leg'. They are not
unreasonably priced relative to two, one or even some unstarred restaurants
and certainly not compared with many London restaurants.
For the French, eating out is not a luxury. An evening at the opera is now
more expensive. Sometimes the wine is overpriced but rarely the food.
P Harrison,
Residence Les Iris,
1115 Vullierens,
Switzerland
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2206</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGABVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Cash without tears, across EC frontiers: Improving the
system of European cross-border money transfers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BARCHARD and ANDREW HILL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sending money across the European Community is an experience calculated to
remind consumers that they still live in a patchwork of national economies
and banking systems rather than a truly integrated market.
While cash machines and credit cards have made it possible to obtain cash in
seconds virtually anywhere in the EC, sending money is a different matter.
Most methods are liable to take days and are only available at a charge of
anything from Pounds 5m to Pounds 30.
The contrast with the cheap, rapid, and reliable money transmission services
which the domestic banking systems of most European countries now offer
consumers is glaring.
In the summer of 1990, the European Commission flung down the gauntlet in
front of the banks and published a preliminary discussion document about
ways of providing cheaper and more efficient cross-border money transfers. A
refined version of that document should be published on Wednesday, the fruit
of several months' research by two Commission working groups.
The Commission stresses that this is not a 'bank-bashing exercise'. Indeed,
directors of retail banks and national central banks are well represented on
the working groups. But officials expect resistance from the banking
community, which they may decide to combat with a more forceful approach,
perhaps by imposing legislation and investigating possible excessive
charges.
The impetus for improving the system comes from the imminent arrival of the
single market. 'There's not much point in telling people they can sell and
buy across borders if it takes a week to get their mon-ey,' says one
Brussels official.
The Commission estimates that some 200m separate cross-border transactions
of less than Ecu2,500 (Pounds 1,777) are made annually, a figure bound to
increase when EC trade barriers come down on January 1 1993. The fee for
each payment varies between Ecu7 and Ecu40 (Pounds 28.44) depending on the
urgency of the transfer, and whether the sender wants to pay the receiving
bank's fees.
According to the Commission's conservative estimates, that means it costs
the client about 20 times more to make a payment across EC borders than it
does to make a similar domestic transfer. But reliable statistics on volume,
costs and fees are hard to obtain. To an extent, the Commission has had to
fall back on anecdotal evidence.
'We hear a sufficient number of stories about serious people taking
thousands of pounds or francs in notes across frontiers (to avoid transfer
fees) to suggest there is a certain volume of demand which is not being
fulfilled,' says one official.
According to the Commission, many small businesses, both buyers and sellers,
abandon attempts to trade across borders rather than have their margins
eroded by banking fees. The smaller the transaction, the worse the problem:
among the most vociferous critics of the current situation are specialist
publishers, used to sending one or two books to other EC clients who incur
transfer fees out of proportion to their small bills.
The banks argue that harmonisation of systems should wait until the EC
introduces a single currency towards the end of the decade, eliminating the
need for the costly clearing of foreign currency. But Commission officials
are sceptical about this argument. They point out that banks in Belgium and
Luxembourg still charge each others' clients as though they are making
cross-border payments, even though the two countries have enjoyed the
benefits of currency union for some 70 years. In any case, they believe
currency exchange and telephone charges make up a much smaller proportion of
the fee to the customer than the administrative commission charged by the
sender's bank and the correspondent branch.
The Commission's ideal solution would be to link the automated clearing
houses (ACH) - the inter-bank cheque-processing centres - in each EC
country, and turn them into a single system. But there are obstacles. The
cost is high, the technological difficulties daunting and inter-bank
clearing arrangements vary.
Mr Bert Morris, chief executive, support services, at National Westminster
and chairman of BACS, the British inter-bank automated bulk clearing system,
says: 'You have to bear in mind that not everyone in Europe wants ACH
linkages; the French and Germans in particular are wary of this approach. We
may well end up with a basket of measures to meet different needs.' If the
banks cannot provide a system of easy cross-border transfers, several other
financial institutions are eager to do so. Both Visa International, which
operates a wide variety of clearing and payment systems as well as its
credit cards, and American Express, have put forward proposals to the
Commission.
'We are talking about a cross-border money transfer market which is probably
larger than the European travellers' cheque market which is around Pounds
20bn,' says Mr Patrick Bowden, assistant general manager at Visa's European
headquarters in London.
Visa envisages building a network with banks from France, Belgium, Spain,
Italy, the UK and Scandinavia which would enable sums of money to be sent
through the Visa system, with price and delivery times guaranteed in
advance.
The principal American Express offering appears to be the Moneygram. This
system telegrams money across borders within minutes, but it is fairly
expensive - a money order costs a minimum of Dollars 35. Distribution
outlets could be broadened to include, for example, post offices.
One snag for both Visa and American Express is that the large banks in some
European countries, particularly Germany, view them as American interlopers
and are deeply suspicious of them.
Not that the banks are unaware of the cross-border payment market. Some
already offer limited services aimed at customers who need to make or
receive regular payments across frontiers: pensioners or migrant workers.
Other banks have combined into groups to offer their customers branch
services in other EC countries. One such system is IBOS, established by
Royal Bank of Scotland, Banco Santander in Spain, Banco de Comercio y
Industria of Portugal and Credit &amp; Commerce de France. Another has been set
up by Lloyds Bank working with Credit Agricole in France, Banco Ambrosiano
Veneto in Italy, Bayerische Vereinsbank in Germany, Rabobank Nederland in
the Netherlands, and Banco Bilbao Vizcaya in Spain.
The Commission has welcomed such initiatives, but it is convinced of the
need for a basic 'safety net' standard, which all customers could rely on
without having to bank with a particular group or own a certain credit card.
The Commission's document will make recommendations, including:
A 'consumer's charter' to ensure that consumers know their rights. When
making a cross-border payment the client should be told how it is done, much
it costs, and how long it will take. In addition, the sender should pay all
the fees, including those of the correspondent bank;
A right of redress through a national banking regulator if there are
problems;
Improvement of cross-border links between national domestic clearing
systems. Some southern member states may need grants to improve their
domestic payment systems - perhaps from EC funds set aside for improving
trans-European networks;
A minimum threshold - probably Ecu10,000 per transaction - below which
national authorities will be unable to insist on cross-border transfers
being notified to central banks, a practice which adds to costs in countries
such as Portugal and Greece.
According to one Brussels official, the carrots for improving the system are
the commercial advantage of being first into the growing market, and the
promise of central funding. The stick is the threat of legislation.
If legislation proves necessary, the Commission - wary of interfering in
commercial policy decisions - will not force the banks to build an expensive
infrastructure. Instead, Sir Leon Brittan, the commissioner responsible for
competition and financial services, would probably lay down certain firm
legislative criteria, applying the same consumer standards to cross-border
payments as to domestic banking. So far, Brussels has been generally
impressed by the banks' response to its gentle pressure. But if the same
groups fail to improve their performance, the indications are that
bank-bashing will begin in earnest.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2207</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGABUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Letter: Freedom of choice is important element of UK pension
system
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr JOHN CRADDOCK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, As providers of both final salary and money purchase schemes, including
personal pensions, my company has no need to take sides over their rival
merits. Our views are therefore likely to be more balanced than Philip
Chappell's (Personal View, March 13).
Each method has considerable merits and can deliver substantial pensions.
Equally, each has shortcomings when compared with the other. With money
purchase, for example, the pension you retire on cannot be finally known
until the day you retire - a disconcerting thought if you have fastened on a
particular proportion of final pay as the pension you want. Final salary
safely delivers certainty, assuming no Maxwell rerun, but the uncertainty of
money purchase might mean a better than expected pension, not worse.
Final pay can be criticised for its cross-subsidies. But these do not work
uniformly from leavers to stayers, young to old, or low paid to high paid.
They can, and frequently do, operate by means of enhanced benefits, for
example, for ordinary employees who are forced into retirement by ill-health
or redundancy. A strict money purchase approach could not manage such
treatment.
The important element in today's pension system is the genuine freedom of
choice for employers and their employees to exercise over which pensions
route to follow. John Craddock,
managing director,
(life and pensions),
Legal &amp; General,
Legal &amp; General House,
Kingswood, Tadworth,
Surrey KT20 6EU
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2208</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGABTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Letter: Political parties wasting money with poster
advertising approach
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr CHRIS KING
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, It is evident from reading David Owen's article (Management: Marketing
and Advertising, March 12) on the scramble for poster sites by the political
parties that much time, effort and money goes into this operation. What a
pity most of it is totally wasted.
In our own independent research, most political poster advertising misses
the mark, with only 8 per cent of the audience recalling specific
executions. This is not surprising as much of this advertising breaks the
rules of effective communication.
Let us use Castlemaine XXXX as an example, as this brand is featured in
Owen's article. First, if a selling message from Castlemaine basically said
that Fosters lager tasted like XXXX, it would not only fall foul of the
regulatory bodies but would carry no persuasive selling power whatsoever.
Yet this is the basic tenet of all the political ads from Labour and Tory
alike.
Second, if the poster had the word 'Fosters' in 3 feet high letters and
'Castlemaine' in 1 foot letters, it would be no surprise to find most people
thinking the ad is for Fosters not Castlemaine. Look again at political ads
 -everyone's so keen to bash the opposition, they've forgotten the basics of
branded communication.
The net effect of all this is further to exacerbate a cynical electorate. If
parties are so keen to spend millions of pounds on ineffective advertising,
how will they spend the cash in the nation's coffers?
Chris King,
board account director,
Reay Keating Hamer,
65-66 Frith Street,
London W1V 5TA
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2209</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGABSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Observer: Speechless
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
An unexpected visitor turns up in heaven. St Peter asks for some
identification. The new arrival is a little taken aback, and insists that he
is who he says he is. St Peter is still not sure.
Suddenly, the new arrival spots someone he knows. 'I'm sure that's Mrs
Thatcher over there - she'll be able to vouchsafe for me.'
Non-plussed, St Peter replies: 'That's not Mrs Thatcher, that's God.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2210</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGABRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Observer: Breathing easy
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
How refreshing to find a chief executive bowing out in the peak of fitness
and not hanging on to collect his old age pension. Peter Dodd, who has spent
over 20 years at the helm of drugs wholesaler Unichem and navigated two MMC
investigations, always said he would retire at 55. And he has stuck to his
word.
'As a chief executive you sacrifice most of your outside interests,' he
said. 'If you come across a boss with a decent golf handicap, sell the
shares.' Perhaps he should also include his own passion for scuba-diving in
a list of corporate warning signals.
After all, he was submerged in the Caribbean when the MMC cleared his
company and arch rival Lloyds Chemists to relaunch bids for Macarthy. Having
retired from that battle, Dodd now plans to spend more of his time under
water.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2211</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGABQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Observer: Souvenir
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Any takers for a used Sputnik satellite, complete with re-entry
scorch-marks?
The said curio landed in Paris recently and its businessman owner has put it
up for sale by auction on April 23. Maitres Poulain and Le Fur, partners of
the auction house Drouot, who will be handling the sale, claim this will be
the first time 'a space object' has been auctioned.
It might seem a bit expensive, with a starting price of FFr 400,000 (Pounds
41,237). However, it is quite big - at 2,300 kilos weight and 2.3 metres
diameter - and has been used only once. The Photon-type module, built by the
one-time Soviet Progress factory, spent 14 days in orbit in April 1985,
doing micro-gravity experiments. It could make quite an impact in the
company lobby. A drinks-dispenser perhaps?
Present owner Paul Aouizerate bought it legally from the Soviet Union last
October and says he is selling to attract publicity for his company, Flava
Cosmos. As the auctioneers point out: 'No-one can tell the price of a
dream.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2212</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGABPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Observer: Hong Kong exit
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The Americans have finally conquered another Far Eastern outpost. Five years
after buying control of the Far Eastern Economic Review, Dow Jones has put
its own man in as editor of the respected Hong Kong-based weekly magazine.
Out goes Philip Bowring, prickly in temperament but respected throughout
Asia for his knowledge, and feared for his acerbic, iconoclastic coverage of
economies and companies. (He was once the FT's Hong Kong correspondent.) In
comes L Gordon Crovitz, a senior member of the Wall Street Journal's
editorial board, but a bit thin on Asian experience.
Under Bowring and his predecessor, the long-serving Derek Davies, the Review
has remained mercifully free of the right-wing dogma which might be expected
of a Dow Jones publication.
But there has been increasing friction between the American owners'
management style and the quirky British traditions of the magazine. This may
be because the Review has run into lean times financially while the
countries it reports on have been surging.
Devotees who have seen the magazine's coverage, especially of business,
becoming more incisive are fearful of possible changes. But if the move
leads to shorter and better subbed articles, it will be an improvement.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2213</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGABOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Observer: Yellow peril
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
There were worried frowns recently at Thompson Clive Investments, a
specialist venture capital investment trust, when a look through its stock
exchange yellow book revealed that it was supposed to notify the market
about 'any change in the directorate'. So it rushed in a letter about one
Stephen Black who resigned last June.
Imagine the surprise of the company secretary yesterday when Observer told
her that the announcement was running on Topic, the stock exchange
information service. 'They shouldn't have done that,' said she - obviously
still less than an expert on the ways of the market.
'We were only floated in September 1988, and we're still on the learning
curve,' explains director Charles Fitzherbert.
Hardly an encouraging message for his shareholders.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2214</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGABNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Observer: Flutters over Emu
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Like the famous fog in the Channel, the election campaign has somewhat
isolated Europe from current British politics.
In particular, the demands of the hustings leave Premier Major and
colleagues little time to reflect on the implications of the flutters in
German parliamentary opinion about the march towards European monetary
union, given the go-ahead in Maastricht three months ago.
Even so, there are distinct signs of Schadenfreude in the British government
that the idea of relinquishing monetary sovereignty has begun to provoke the
same sort of questioning in Germany as it has done in Britain during the
past few years.
At the European Community summit in December, the UK won a hard-fought right
to decide afresh in 1996 whether it wanted to be part of Emu. Now, foreign
secretary Douglas Hurd believes that the Germans will request the right for
a similar form of reconsideration before progressing to the final stage of
Emu.
He also believes that the target date for a decision on moving to a single
currency may be delayed from the objective of 1996. Should economic
difficulties in Germany place obstacles across the route to Emu, a future
Conservative government would evidently not be that much displeased.
The same can surely be said - in spite of John Smith's pro-Emu rhetoric - of
any future Labour administration.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2215</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGABMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / A shock to the political system: Sunday's regional elections
will demonstrate the dissatisfaction with France's traditional parties of
government
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN DAVIDSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
If the opinion polls are to be believed, the vote in Sunday's regional
elections will detonate a seismic rearrangement of the political landscape
in France. At the very least, it will open a new and decisive phase in the
presidency of Mr Francois Mitterrand. But if he and the French people are
unlucky, it could even herald a return to the political instability which
was supposed to have been banished with the establishment of the Fifth
Republic 33 years ago.
The polling forecasts have been simple, striking and remarkably consistent.
The ruling Socialist party is set to see its popular support fall by more
than a third to less than 20 per cent; but the traditional conservative
parties will also sink significantly, to about 33 per cent. By contrast, the
extreme right-wing National Front and the ecologists will both surge ahead,
to about 14-15 per cent each. Only one political group appears virtually
untouched by this prospective earthquake: the Communist party, which should
hang on to 8-10 per cent.
For many commentators, the breakthrough by the National Front is the most
important development, as it would give France the largest ultra-right-wing
party in western Europe. Others have highlighted the collapse in support for
the ruling Socialist party, because it reinforces the vertiginous drop in
the popularity of Prime Minister Edith Cresson since she was appointed 10
months ago, and calls into question the future legitimacy of a Socialist
government.
Yet the real significance of these polling forecasts is the aspect which
appears least dramatic: the small but unmistakable slump in support for the
mainstream conservative parties, the centre-right UDF umbrella grouping, and
the Gaullist RPR party. Whatever the meaning of the 15 per cent swing behind
the National Front, it is dwarfed in significance by the collective
rejection of all the traditional parties of government. It is easy to
identify some of the obvious but if the conservative opposition parties
cannot gain extra votes from the Socialists' unpopularity, then the
traditional political establishment is in a bad way.
The Socialists' main point of vulnerability is high and rising unemployment.
From 1987 to 1990 it steadily declined, from a peak of 10.5 per cent to a
low point of less than 9 per cent, but since then it has been creeping up
and may hit 10 per cent again. The government's many job creation and
training schemes have failed to stem the tide.
Second comes immigration. Stricter rules and tighter restraints on asylum
have failed to prevent a continued small inflow of immigrants, mainly for
family reunion. The real problem is the multiplier effect between the
immigrant community from North Africa, unemployment, deprivation in the
outer suburbs, and anxieties regarding law and order.
Third is political corruption. Public esteem for the Socialists dropped
steeply with the revelation in 1988 of a nationwide system of party
kick-backs. Former Prime Minister Michel Rocard tried to wipe the slate
clean with tough new rules on party financing, but the move backfired when
it was coupled with an amnesty for past offenders. This enraged a number of
magistrates and, since then, investigations into the scandal have been
repeatedly relaunched, in the glare of the television cameras, manifestly
for political reasons.
This list of complaints against the Socialists explains why the
conservatives are suffering too. They do not pretend to have any better
solutions for unemployment or immigration; and they are only slightly less
vulnerable to suspicions of corruption.
The popular rejection of the Socialists and their conservative opponents,
though not in doubt, may however be overstated in Sunday's vote, because of
the peculiarities of the event:
The timing: this is tailor-made for a gratuitous protest vote since it falls
between two general elections.
The abstention rate: this is expected to be as high as 50 per cent and will
penalise mainstream parties much more than protest groups.
The voting rules: minority parties will gain maximum benefit from these
elections, which are based on complete proportional representation.
Finally, there is the intense publicity drawn by the National Front
breakthrough, which has transformed these elections for 22 separate regional
councils into something like a national opinion poll. Only half the voters
say they will make their minds up on local grounds; the rest will therefore
give vent to their feelings of discontent and disarray almost regardless of
the local consequences.
On all these grounds, the Socialists will seek to discount the significance
of Sunday's vote. Indeed, Mrs Cresson is already downplaying the results in
advance: 'There will certainly be a drop in the Socialist electorate,' she
said this week, 'but I do not think one can speak of a defeat.' Even so, the
voting figures will themselves influence the political debate.
The most immediate problem in the regions will be how the mainstream
conservative parties react to a significant advance by the National Front.
They have vowed to form no alliance with the FN; but in many cases they will
be unable to form a working majority alone. No doubt some local parties will
be unable to resist the temptation to go back on their pre-electoral vows,
which would inevitably provoke a row between the Gaullists and the UDF at
national level. This could undermine their attempts to form an electoral
alliance in time for next year's general elections.
Yet the most critical new factor will be the level of support for the
Socialist party. Locally, they may be able to take advantage of the FN
breakthrough to gain minority control of one or two extra regions through
alliances with the ecologists. But if the national vote for the Socialist
party falls below 20 per cent, the credibility of Mrs Cresson's government
will be damaged beyond repair.
France will then wait with bated breath to see what Mr Mitterrand does next;
for no one doubts that the president is a politician of resource and
ingenuity; that he will have several surprises up his sleeve; and that he is
likely to spring some of them before the year is out.
Neither of his most obvious options looks satisfactory. Mrs Cresson has
become a serious handicap; the name of Mr Jacques Delors, president of the
European Commission, has been widely canvassed as a more popular
alternative. Yet it is difficult to imagine that any new prime minister will
save the Socialist party from a crushing defeat in the general elections.
Hence the idea of a shift in the voting rules before then. This has been
repeatedly alluded to by President Mitterrand, and is now being echoed by
some leading Socialists. But there is a clear difference of objective
between him and them. Their ostensible argument is that parliament should be
more representative of the diversity of public opinion; but they are only
prepared for a small element of proportional representation because they
want to keep the logic of majority voting which might one day return them to
majority govobjective would be to prevent an overwhelming conservative
victory, which would render miserable the last two years of his mandate; so
his need would be for a large dose of PR.
If the government were to change the general electoral system from majority
voting (as it is now, and was in 1988), to full-blooded proportional
representation (as it was in the 1986 general elections, and as it will be
in Sunday's regional elections), it might just succeed in limiting the
conservative parties to 270 or 275 seats, a handful short of a parliamentary
majority. But the cost would be high: 50-90 seats for the National Front,
and 35-60 for the ecologists, while the Socialists would shrink to 110-140.
Such a change in the rules would be nothing new. Throughout their agitated
parliamentary history, the French have repeatedly juggled with their voting
rules, always for opportunistic reasons. The conservatives are already
crying 'Foul]', in rage that they may be robbed of victory; yet the change
would be entirely legal, if the government could secure the necessary
majority in parliament.
Apart from a change in the rules, President Mitterrand may be looking to two
policy issues to restore his fortunes. The first will be the ratification of
the Maastricht Treaty on European union, which should stir a national
debate, and may inspire popular enthusiasm for his European achievement. The
second will be a package of constitutional reforms next autumn, including a
reduction in the presidential term of office (currently seven years
renewable), a change supported by all parties.
Yet even if President Mitterrand should carry off both these reforms in
triumph, he would still face a political and constitutional crisis.
The political crisis has been highlighted by the apparent exhaustion of the
left-right debate between the Socialists and the conservatives. One of the
reasons for the Socialists' unpopularity is that they have largely abandoned
their socialist rhetoric, and are in effect managing the economy by
conservative rules, in obedience to the imperatives of the European
Community. Part of the case for electoral reform rests on the need to find
an alternative dialectic to the old left-right antithesis.
The constitutional crisis is more serious. By accident or design, President
Mitterrand has accumulated more power and influence than any predecessor
apart from General de Gaulle. His most pressing need is for a parliamentary
majority which is strong but respectful; but it is his personal accumulation
of power which has weakened both the parliament in general and his
government in particular. He and his government now appear chained together
by their common unpopularity.
Public opinion is notoriously volatile, however, and time may change the
government's standing. The economy will probably revive. The rise of the
National Front may drive a wedge through the traditional conservative
parties, and thus seriously damage their electoral chances. In combination,
a series of small plus-factors could add up to a significant improvement in
Socialist prospects in 1993.
But if their prospects do not improve, the price of preventing a
conservative majority would seem to be a National Assembly which might be
unable to muster a governing majority at all, except through a tacit
alliance between the conservatives and the National Front. This cannot be
the effect sought by Mr Mitterrand; as a conservative, a lawyer and a
statesman with a strong sense of history, he will surely not seek to bring
down the pillars of the temple.
So unless he were prepared to endure another bout of cohabitation with a
conservative government, he might have no alternative but to resign. And yet
resignation is a strategy which he just might be able to use to confound the
conservatives. After successfully leading two national debates, on Europe
and the reform of the constitution, he could declare that his task was done,
and that he would immediately implement the new, shorter presidential term
of office. The conservative parties would have no time to choose a single
presidential candidate; Mr Jacques Delors would capture the presidency; and
new general elections would produce a centre-left government.
This is not Mr Mitterrand's preferred strategy. His natural inclination is
to play along, and to wait on events before making decisions. He is stubborn
and obstinate. But he will need all his resource and ingenuity if he is to
stay on top of the game.
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
Share of election votes
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                          Regional
                                                            1992
                       Regional   General   European       voting
                         1986      1988       1989       intentions
                         (%)       (%)        (%)           (%)
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
Extreme left              1.3       0.4        2.0           1.0
Communist party          10.2      11.3        7.8           8.0
Socialist party          30.0      36.4       23.6          19.5
Other left                1.5       1.2        0.4           2.0
General ecologists                                           7.0
                          2.3       0.4       10.7
Greens                                                       8.0
Local parties             0.2        -          -             -
Hunting rights             -         -         4.2
                                                             4.5
Animal rights              -         -         1.0
UDF-RPR                  39.9      37.7       37.1          33.0
Other right               4.9       2.9        1.4           3.0
National Front            9.7       9.7       11.8          14.0
Abstentions              22.0      34.0       52.0          47.0
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: IPSOS-Le Point
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2216</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGABLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Leading Article: Propping up Japan Inc.
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MR YASUSHI Mieno, the governor of the Bank of Japan, has made his point.
Having asserted his independence by conspicuously failing to respond to
pleas from leading politicians for a cut in interest rates, he should now do
what he probably intended to do all along. The latest GNP figures, which
showed that the Japanese economy was shrinking marginally in the final
quarter of last year, merely provide a formal excuse. A cut in the discount
rate must be odds-on before March 31, an important reporting date for
Japanese financial institutions.
Mr Mieno would, of course, be entitled to plead that the views of leading
members of the ruling Liberal Democratic party on monetary policy are
scarcely impartial. Just as the stock market boom provided them with
fund-raising opportunities, both legitimate and scandalous, the subsequent
crash has had an equal and opposite effect on their finances. The LDP is
thus one of many victims of Mr Mieno's tough monetary stance. But in this
instance, its deputy president, the vociferous Mr Shin Kanemaru, is right,
even if his motivation is open to question.
The Bank of Japan's reluctance to bring down interest rates more rapidly is
rooted in the fear that asset price inflation could be re-ignited. This is
understandable on the part of any guardian of the currency; but in this
instance it is a case of responding to the last crisis but one. The Japanese
financial system is creaking at the seams. And as the scandal at Daiwa
Securities revealed last week, there are still substantial losses in the
system which have yet to be recorded and absorbed because no one can agree
on where those losses should properly fall. Put another way, the
understandings on which many of the trade-offs and cross-subsidies in the
Japanese financial system have been based are coming unstuck. There are
likely to be more uncomfortable revelations in the pipeline.
Real economy
The more important reason for questioning the present monetary stance lies
in the real economy. Many leading Japanese industrialists have been arguing
that Japan Inc. is fundamentally sound and that it faces no more than a
cyclical upset. Yet there are good grounds for thinking that the problem is
structural. Growth in the late 1980s was driven primarily by business
investment, which was undertaken on the kind of scale that prevailed when
Japan was still capable of generating double-digit growth. The investment
boom was financed at what were perceived to be minimal, or even negative,
borrowing costs. Much of that investment thus went into sub-optimal
projects, which is the polite economist's way of saying that it was wasted.
Inescapable fall
Against that background, and with real financing costs looking exceptionally
high, a fall in capital spending was inescapable. Meantime, in the aftermath
of the asset price bubble, it is hardly surprising that the debt-laden
personal sector is reluctant to spend and that the trade surplus is rising
ominously. Yesterday's news that volume limits on car exports to the US are
to be cut will probably make little difference to the political fallout in
the run-up to the presidential election. Japanese car production in the US
was no doubt undertaken to deal with just such a contingency, and it is
soaring.
The question now is whether a cut in interest rates and accelerated public
works spending will be sufficient to stave off a serious recession. The
lesson from the US appears to be that a heavily indebted economy with big
financial problems is much less responsive to relaxations in monetary policy
than expected. The scope for a significant fiscal expansion in Japan is far
greater than in the US; but the traditional Japanese reluctance to loosen
the purse strings will limit the extent of any boost. So, too, will the fact
that the construction sector still suffers from bottlenecks and labour
shortages left over from the boom. The government and the central bank will
probably provide a modest prop to confidence in the short run. But it will
be some time before Japan returns to the 5 per cent growth of the late
1980s.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2217</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGABKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Arts: Jumping on a circus roundabout - Susan Moore visits
the 'Automata' exhibition on the South Bank
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SUSAN MOORE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
By happy coincidence the film of Alexander Calder operating his wire circus
plays in two London exhibitions. At the Royal Academy, amid his mobiles,
wire sculpture, jewellery and drawings, Ringmaster Calder is filmed bringing
to life his extraordinary miniature troupe. Trapeze artists somersault and
fly from bar to bar, fall off into the safety net and, with Calder's
assistance, make their way to the edge and swing to the floor. A horse,
cranked into action by the turn of a handle, revolves around the ring and an
acrobat flips into the air to land on its back. An exotic dancer, the victim
of an incompetent knife-thrower, is removed from the scene by stretcher.
There is no attempt at illusion or deception. The lumbering, bear-like
impresario is only too apparent. He simulates the lion's roar, blows the
whistle between acts and introduces each performer in gutteral musical hall
French. His stubby fingers unfurl and roll up the different coloured mats
used for each act, and help the improvised and only partially automated
performers and animals on their way.
The performance is pure delight. His audience is transfixed by the way these
tiny perfunctory people - confected out of wire, cork and fabric scraps -
are able to replicate human movement by the most economical of means. We ooh
at the trundling gait of the stretcher bearers, and the gyrations of the
belly dancer's hips, and ahh as the strong man Rigoulot, clad in a scrap of
leopard skin, raises his great weight in a sequence of authentic jerks.
The Circus, begun in Paris in 1926, proved the precursor of the mobile and
of a new kind of automaton or man-made man, far removed in spirit and
appearance from the slick clockwork parlour toys of the 18th and 19th
century, Imperial Easter eggs and Laughing Policemen. Its progeny currently
fill the foyer of the Royal Festival Hall, their grindings, honkings and
rattlings drowning Calder's recorded roars and whistles.
Modern automata defy classification. The motley wood and metal constructions
of the 25 makers here inhabit very different planes of a strange, whimsical
world born of folk art, toy-making and the kinetic sculpture of Tinguely and
Calder. What they have in common - and what distinguishes them from the
likes of chess-playing mechanical boffins and writing boys - is both a
deliberate lack of technical sophistication and a self-consciously ironical
wit. These automatists make no attempt to conceal the enchantingly simple
mechanisms of their creations. They simply invite the spectator to share the
joke.
Sam Smith is perhaps the real father of the new generation of British
automatists - and it is essentially a British and a narrative genre.
Tableaux such as 'Custer or a second groom being rowed across the lake by
his third bride' combine folk art with Absurdist humour. His brightly
coloured and minimally articulated carved figures leapt out of the
fairground and into the gallery. There modern automata have sat, albeit
uncomfortably, ever since.
Absurdity runs rife. All we see of Peter Ellis's 'Injuns' is two tiny
feathers hopping up and down behind a massive block of wood. Likewise his
'Hoe-down' is reduced to a pair of miniature dancing cowboy boots at the end
of very long poles. As a yacht bobs up and down in the distant waves in Tom
Wilkinson's 'The Crustacean Keep-Fit', a crab on a treadmill daintily hops
over its course of beached shells and starfish to the balmy strains of an
Hawaiian band.
Wit and subversion often go hand in hand. Ron Fuller's version of sheep
shearing has the woolly one wielding the giant sheers and every now and then
chopping off the head of the farmer presented for crew cut. John White's
grinding 'Cycling to Work' offers satirical social comment. His 'But soft,
what lout thro' yonder window breaks' is what else but a winged, bald
fat-bellied lager lout blowing a horn? Jon Mills's metal Punk steadily
bashes a nail into his head.
Some automata are made simply to amuse the person who pushes the button,
turns the handle, pedals the bicycle wheel or slots in the 10p. Others are
intent on unsettling their audience. Human behaviour is horribly well
observed and aped with uncomfortable accuracy. Paul Spooner sets his six
blank-faced sailors around a table eagerly awaiting their share of the
substantial roast the captain is carving. Turn the handle and the sailors
impatiently bang the table with their knives and forks. It is 1618, and in
their ignorance they are clamouring to devour the last Dodo.
In contrast to colourful end-of-pier complexity come the likes of Benedict
Whybrow's life-size metal party guest - complete with moving wire-mesh
waistcoat - and calligraphic woman with a poodle, achieved with a
caricaturist's telling economy of line. Tim Hunkin's fairly crude papier
mache busts are again extraordinarily expressive, registering a variety of
all too convincing reactions to abstract art; wide-eyed incomprehension from
the builder who scratches his head, a shrug from his wife nicely pasted up
in pink floral wallpaper. Salvaged materials are ever imaginatively
recycled.
Jan Zalud's highly polished mask-like heads are more disturbing. With poking
tongues, pointed teeth and waggling hair they are grotesque but sadly not
unhuman. His brilliant Heckler is animated by convincingly loutish and ugly
lunges and jeers.
One of the automatist's greatest assets is our underlying unease about
technological progress. Can it be a coincidence that Calder's faux-naive
moving figures date from the first days of the robot? We are surrounded and
confounded by technology which we cannot begin to comprehend. Adrian
Moakes's Heath Robinson contraption to hail a bus is really no more
ridiculous than the over-complicated gadgets we use daily.
A first hint of the machine's manic wilfulness comes with Lucy Casson and
Andy Hazell's tin trouve juddering and clattering washing machines and
refrigerators. Oliver Langham goes further and harnesses animal aggression
to exploit our subliminal fear of not being able to hold our mechanical
monsters in check. He offers giant spiders and enmeshed flies, and menacing
propeller bees with legs like mechanical grabbers that whirr and flap all
around us.
'Automata' continues at the Royal Festival Hall until April 12; and at the
John Hansard Gallery, Southampton, April 28-May 30.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2218</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGABJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Arts: Caligula - Comedie Francaise, Paris
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JACKIE WULLSCHLAGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
'Le theatre n'est pas un jeu, c'est la conviction', Camus once said. It has
taken the conservative Comedie Francaise over 50 years to risk Camus' drama
of existentialist conviction, but now amends have been made. The theatre's
first Caligula (to June 24) is a stunning production.
Camus' drama follows the facts of Suetonius' history, but his hero is an
existentialist philosophe housed in the body of a Roman dictator: the mad
logic of nihilism drives this Caligula to tyranny. The play was written in
1938 but war delayed performance until 1945, when it was seized on as a
prophetic wonder which had anticipated Hitler. 'Our century is the century
of fear', wrote Camus, but he always denied the precise political analogy,
and time has proved 'Caligula' a broader statement of the themes of fear,
despair, nihilism.
Youssef Chahine revives it as a vision of contemporary horror: urban
violence, terrorism, mass media as both a creator of dangerous orthodoxies
and a force for banalising our responses to them. Inserts of films and other
non-conventional staging - Chahine is a film-maker - underline the
interpretation. The result is chic, radical and, to foreign eyes at least,
typically Parisian in its mix of philosophy, politics and stylish
aesthetics.
Sandwiched between crumbling classical columns and stone walls, a huge steel
and glass office block rises to the roof of the Comedie Francaise stage.
Sometimes, it reflects a cityscape painted on panels in the wings; sometimes
it is a screen projecting rabble-rousing crowd scenes or Caligula's face,
many times enlarged, as it booms out to the audience while the dictator
stands dwarfed beneath it. A forum at the front also merges old and new:
ruined arches and pillars, flights of stone steps, a yellow moped, flashing
roadwork lights, cordons, signposts.
The ancient/modern mix suggests Rome, but Chahine widens the image to any
city. Drills whirr, workmen in helmets alternate with wailing veiled women
at an Islamic funeral, an old pinstriped banker shuffles round the rubble;
kids lounge on the steps, cameramen from 'Satellite TV' pop up from each
corner. As on television, the exotic cuts into the everyday: Chahine shares
Camus' North African background and recalls it through an Arab bazaar, and
in the drums and tambourines of Mohamed Nouh's specially composed music.
By contrast the Roman patricians are the western, chattering classes: puffed
up in gold togas, they sample grapes, prattle, giggle and massage one
another - a smoke-filled box in the auditorium is converted to a Roman bath
for the evening. This sort of decadence needs a Caligula, suggests Chahine:
Jean-Ives Dubois, lean and long in black tracksuit, swivels round in an
office chair, cool, efficient, deliberate in movement, calm in his
dissection of their false values: 'Les hommes meurent, et ils ne sont pas
heureux'.
The drama is that he loses his sanity as the patrician-puppets, and
especially Cherea (Michel Favory), grow through fear and bereavement into
warm, vulnerable characters. Backed by screen and microphone, Dubois becomes
an automaton of terror, only human - and comic - in his crazy obsession that
his slave will fetch him the moon, symbol of impossible attainment
(according to history, Caligula had a moon fetish.)
Black humour hints at rather than wallows in violence: the menace of
Caligula got up like Botticelli's Venus, emerging from below the stage and
demanding obeisance; corpses wheeled across Caligula's diner party and
ignored; a speeded-up poetry competition where each poet is allowed a few
seconds to speak, and the last one only to part his lips, before black hoods
are thrust over them and they are lead off to execution. Fights are stylised
into acrobatics. Caligula and the poet Scipio (Lilah Dadi, a touching blend
of worldliness and naivety) joust while turning somersaults on a trampoline;
there are jugglers, knife-throwers, a danse macabre of punks and soldiers
slicing into one another.
To reveal the dynamics of the climax would be to play spoilsport; but in a
mix of old-fashioned theatrical chill and clever cinematic tricks Chahine
pulls his themes together and has Caligula, tragic hero in spite of all,
literally reaching for the moon. But every scene is dramatically inventive,
different, and acted and choreographed with consummate skill and apparent
ease. Cumulatively they question everyday assumptions, moral tabs, political
involvement (Favory's Cherea, reluctantly bloodstained, points a dripping
hand at the audience), our own distancing of terror as it is 'stylised' by
repetition on the small screen. This is the most exciting theatre in Paris
since Peter Brook's multi-cultural Tempest here two years ago.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2219</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGABIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Arts: Today's Television
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER DUNKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
As often as not Tomorrow's World seems like a programme for the sort of
know-all child scientist who used to irritate me at school, but two of the
subjects tonight might interest many of us. The first is a cheap method of
making high quality paper out of corn (feed it to animals when you have
finished with it) and the second is the world's first 'virtual reality'
theme park which has opened in Nottingham (7.30 BBC1).
C4's series of documentaries made by directors new to television, Short
Stories, follows two elderly members of the British Communist Party to the
43rd Congress in November 1991 where the party voted itself out of existence
(8.30).
The most famous zoo animal of all time was probably Jumbo. In my lifetime it
would be difficult to decide whether the greatest stir was caused by Brumas
(a baby polar bear of such popularity that you could buy replicas not only
in the normal soft toy material but also in soap and white chocolate), Guy
the Gorilla, or Goldie the golden eagle. All seem to me more interesting
than Chi-Chi, the sulky giant panda who became involved in the cold war and
east-west diplomacy, yet Chi-Chi is the subject of today's Arena (9.30
BBC2).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2220</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGABHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Arts: Dance in 'Death in Venice' - Covent Garden
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALASTAIR MACAULAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Covent Garden's new staging of Death in Venice deserves its acclaim. Anyone
interested in movement must particularly rejoice in Philip Langridge's
Gustav von Aschenbach, even more full of beautifully expressive detail in
stance and gesture than his recent Captain Vere and Peter Grimes.
My brief, however, is to talk of the staging's new dances. Kim Brandstrup's
choreography is unobtrusive, well-made and in no respect interesting. It
fits tactfully into the overall scheme of things, but it makes Tadzio appear
a creature of thoroughly finite variety. His dances are an array of
half-a-dozen movement motifs that seldom coalesce into a phrase. As a result
everyone can see that young Giacomo Ciriaci is very pretty, but no one can
be sure how good a dancer he is.
And he looks very real. Tadzio's music, inspired by the tintinabulations of
the Javanese gamelan, is unmistakeably Other; it shows that he exists on a
different plane. And in this respect Brandstrup's choreography is unmusical.
The biggest disappointment occurs at the end. As Tadzio summons Aschenbach's
soul into the horizon, the music evokes the end of Mahler's Lied von der
Erde. This Tadzio, however, just swings his legs and strikes a static
classic pose. It was just here that Frederick Ashton's choreography for the
original production was most masterly. His Tadzio slowly swam through
flowing classical poses, travelling as if in slow motion into the distance.
Ashton's dances were generally the least admired feature of the original
staging - partly because the first Tadzio, Robert Huguenin, with thighs too
powerful to make sense of the role's boyishness, looked too knowing, and
partly because, as Ashton remarked, Britten was not interested in writing
dance music. Brandstrup has had the same problem with the pentathlon dances
in Act I as Ashton had in 1973: the music asks for activity too literal to
be interesting as dance.
I saw the old staging in 1973, '75 and '78; the latter revival was when
Ashton's dances came into their own. The Tadzio then, Douglas Howes, was not
a classic pretty-boy type, and his serenely excellent dancing and
exceptionally innocent manner made new sense of the choreography's
classicism. Even the beach dances seemed to have doubled in substance.
Ballet, said Balanchine, is Woman; and it is essentially a heterosexual art.
The woman dances on pointe; the man does not. He partners her. She can do
more than he. The positions may not be reversed without a diminution of the
art's classical dimension. The danseur is human, the ballerina becomes an
allegory. Ashton usually followed these principles.
But in the ending of Death in Venice is a boy who summons the poet into
eternity. This is really the gay equivalent of the end of Stravinsky's
ballet Le Baiser de la Fee, in which the fairy (or muse) leads the hero (or
poet) into her eternal kingdom.
When Death in Venice was new, Nureyev and Dowell had won for the male dancer
a status equal to the ballerina. One may not altogether enjoy that; 'The era
of the ballerina is over,' remarked Fonteyn. But it gave a special
significance to Ashton's finale to Death in Venice that is absent from
Brandstrup's new choreography. Ashton's Tadzio was male and a ballerina.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2221</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGABGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Arts: Straight and Narrow - Wyndham's Theatre
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MALCOLM RUTHERFORD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Straight and Narrow is an undemanding family comedy of the kind that one
thought nowadays was confined to television, from where most of its stars
come. The most striking fact about it is the social change that must have
taken place about what is acceptable in the West End theatre over the last
decade or so.
Jimmie Chinn's play treats male homosexuality as normal. There is no attempt
to be daring or to shock. As one of the female characters remarks, the
homosexual couple has a way of life just as 'dreary and respectable' as the
rest of the family who are married.
Indeed it appears that homosexuality has been running in the family for
years. The dead father is revealed to have been prone to it. One of the
married male characters admits to having an uncle who goes on marches for
gay rights in Manchester. Another, who has just returned to his wife after a
fortnight's fling with an oversexed (female) shop assistant at Boots the
chemists, reflects that he has often thought that he might like to be gay.
This ought to be interesting stuff. The trouble is that the female character
is right: all the couples are dreary and respectable, regardless of their
sexual proclivities. The setting moves between Manchester and Malta, though
without a change of scenery. What drama there is hinges on a possible
break-up between the homosexuals. One of them, Jeff, has previously had
relations with women. He hankers now after another, if only to father a
child. Curiously, it turns out that he has already done so, but failed to
keep in touch. The plot has the odd surprise.
There are some good performances. Carmel McSharry, who appears in In
Sickness and in Health on television, plays the mum deliberately dressed as
a lower middle class version of the Queen Mother. She is a very accomplished
actress. Nicholas Lyndhurst plays her homosexual son, Bob, partly in the
guise of a stand-up comic telling sad stories, but adding the occasional
joke. Only Neil Daglish as Jeff, however, suggests that there might be a
world beyond the Manchester suburbs, and even he succumbs to routine in the
end.
Straight and Narrow is directed by the immensely experienced Allan Davis who
achieved such a long-running success with No Sex Please - We're British. One
assumes that he knows what he is doing here, but I wouldn't bank on it.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2222</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGABFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Management: Blueprint for design supremacy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER LORENZ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Nine years ago this month, Margaret Thatcher set about trying to help
British industrialists fill a yawning gap in their competitive armoury
against Japan, Germany and Italy. 'Design your way out of recession'
proclaimed the then Department of Industry in a 'design for profit'
awareness campaign targeted at managing directors and finance chiefs.
The industry minister responsible for design went on to declare that
companies should cease their futile practice of calling in designers only as
an afterthought, merely to put products in an attractive package. Instead,
he said they should be made key members of the product and production team
and have as much influence in the boardroom as marketing and finance. Quite
so.
A month later the government announced it would put its money where its
mouth was, by tripling to Pounds 10m its funding of a Design Council
advisory service which provided free consultancy to small and medium-sized
companies.
By the end of that year, the London stock market had begun to wake up to the
attractions of design. Through Terence Conran of Habitat-Mothercare and
Ralph Halpern of Burton, design was suddenly the 'in' competitive weapon in
retailing.
Then all sorts of other service organisations caught on, calling in
specialist consultants to re-design their 'corporate identities'. British
Airways changed livery, the Woolworth group became Kingfisher, and British
Rail revamped all its colours.
Though product design fared less well than retail or graphic design,
fortunes were made all over the design profession as consultancies went
public and their shares were snapped up.
Across the Atlantic, however, design was still generally seen as a corporate
also-ran. It usually operated as a poor relation of more 'professional'
disciplines such as marketing or engineering.
Now these Anglo-American roles seem almost to have been reversed. Having
boomed through the 1980s, the British retail design bubble has burst. Many
corporate identity schemes have been frozen, either because of the recession
or in the wake of the controversy over the most recent, Pounds 60m revamp at
British Telecom, which has scared off many boardrooms.
Several consultancies have suffered spectacular crashes, and with a few
notable exceptions, only three sectors are doing well: brand identity,
packaging and, significantly, product design. That the latter is thriving
amid the depressed state of UK manufacturing is a particular tribute to the
high standard of its work for a growing number of foreign clients. Some
consultancies are doing more than 80 per cent of their work abroad.
On the institutional front, government finance for design consultancy has
tailed off just when manufacturers most need it - even if they don't realise
they do. The Design Council (of which I am a member) has emerged much leaner
than before from a period of retrenchment, but continues to be frustrated at
the reluctance of many manufacturers to use design to the full, even after a
decade of propaganda and education. Far too many still see it as merely a
surface activity.
In America, things are now a very different story. Despite the recession -
or partly because of it - business interest in design is booming after a
series of heroic, design-led successes. These include Ford's Taurus and
Sable models, a string of Japanese products from Sony and others, and, most
recently, Apple's PowerBook laptop computers.
While press interest in Britain has faded from its peak, the serious
American business press has gone wild about design.
What accounts for this transatlantic gulf? Is it just a natural time-lag as
corporate America wakes up belatedly to a management fashion which has
peaked in Britain? Will its own interest also wane?
The answers to these questions lie, above all, in the more professional way
in which American companies have gone about using design.
First, the American design wave is very much more product-led than was the
British, where retail and graphic design left product design very much in
the shade. Yet, as the Americans are finding, product design and development
is a much deeper and longer process than the surface work of retail and
graphic projects, and cannot be stopped so quickly when times turn tough, or
management fashions change. So it provides a more solid base on which to
build design into the fabric of a company.
Second, the American design community, and those Britons and others who
export designs to the US, have benefited immeasurably from having come in on
the coat tails of the powerful quality movement. In Britain it was the other
way round.
The 'design message' was promulgated in the early 1980s before the quality
fashion arrived from the States - in some companies it swamped their nascent
interest in design.
In a well run company, quality and design should go hand in hand, two
relatively new disciplines - or ways of thinking - which must be integrated
into the product development process with the more established ones of
marketing, engineering, production and so forth.
Such integration within Ford of America is precisely what made the
Taurus-Sable project so remarkably successful; in Europe, however, design
has fared less well within Ford's management hierarchy, as the lacklustre
new Escort demonstrates.
The need for design to be integrated as a team player with quality,
marketing and so forth is very much the message of a highly influential US
research body, the Design Management Institute (DMI). By collaborating with
the Harvard Business School, this Boston-based organisation has developed a
set of increasingly popular international teaching case studies, some of
which are now being taught on Harvard's 'core' courses and elsewhere.
In Britain, the London Business School is now also taking the integrated
route. LBS was the world's pioneer in teaching design to students and
executives, though it is now being challenged by Harvard. Its work is being
focused more than in the past on product design and development - a well
known Japanese professor of technology management joins its staff next
month, when it also hosts the DMI's annual international research forum of
design academics.
But a few swallows in Regents Park cannot, on their own, create a summer of
revolution in the engine rooms of UK industry. There is still far too little
evidence in Britain that industrial designers are being taken as seriously
as in many US companies, where they really are becoming full team players.
One of the few exceptions is the Rover Group, whose chairman, George
Simpson, was guest speaker at last week's announcement of the Design
Council's British Design Awards.
Industry and designers alike will be helped if more companies take a leaf
out of the American and LBS book, and make integration a priority. As
Simpson argued last week, design is, in every sense, a multi-disciplinary
team activity with intimate connections to quality, marketing and
production. It should not be seen as an independent cure-all.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2223</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGABEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Management: The Russian revolution - Difficulties facing
investors
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LEYLA BOULTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Leonid Grigoriev, the economist responsible for attracting foreign capital
to Russia, compares his job to that of a gardener. As head of a
newly-created Committee for Foreign Investment, he says he has to clear away
a multitude of rocks and wild growth before foreign investment can flourish.
As foreigners already trying to do business in the former Soviet Union will
confirm, the environment remains distinctly hostile.
The economy is crying out for foreign investment to convert military
production to civilian output, to modernise creaking old factories, and to
cut huge waste in the exploitation of natural resources. Yet, after seven
decades of protection against foreign capitalists, everything about the
place seems designed to discourage foreign investment - apart from jealously
guarded natural resources and the potentially enormous future markets.
Businessmen cannot get visas upon arrival but need to apply for them in
advance, with the support of a local sponsor and specifying which
destinations they propose to visit. Private ownership of land is not allowed
and that of other assets is difficult; the banking system is paralysed;
missing bits of legislation and the existence of powerful vested interests
mean that even deals agreed with a Russian partner are obstructed within the
state bureaucracy or parliament.
Pacing around his office in the former Gosplan building - where officials
used to plan the Soviet economy five years at a time - Grigoriev complains
that most of his compatriots have no idea of what makes foreign capitalists
tick. 'Many people think foreign investment is a substitute for the
centralised investments of Gosplan, that the money they used to get from
Gosplan will now come from foreigners.'
One of the authors of the 500-Day Programme for radical economic reform,
Grigoriev still teaches a Moscow university course on US financial
corporations, mergers and acquisitions, and bankruptcy.
But apart from education, he sees his main task as providing the legislative
base for investment - the law on foreign investment adopted last July is
already out of date - and convincing the government to provide conditions
for investment to flourish.
For despite the symbolic victory of occupying the Gosplan building, the
young government of economic reformers which he joined three months ago has
yet to gain real power over the vast state machinery it inherited from the
former Soviet Union.
Grigoriev has to break off the interview a few times to shout down the
telephone to secure hard currency for colleagues to fly to Washington the
next morning. Their mission is to negotiate a bilateral agreement to protect
US investors in Russia.
In fact, Russia is suffering not so much from an absence of foreign
investors as from its inability to satisfy those prepared to defy present
problems to do business.
The government has achieved many firsts since coming to power: it concluded
Russia's first oil production sharing agreement, got a crucial mineral
deposits law through parliament, and selected a US-Japanese consortium to
investigate huge oil and gas resources off Sakhalin Island. It is even
negotiating the first ever deals allowing foreign companies to exploit
Russian gold mines. But most of the projects are still facing snags getting
off the ground.
What is Grigoriev's advice for foreign investors? 'As a government official
I say 'You must come here'. But as an honest man, I'm saying 'We're starting
from the beginning'. Things may yet get worse before they get better but
gradually we will create decent conditions for investment.'
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
               What do you need to clinch a deal in Russia?
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Strong direct ties with a local partner such as a region or enterprise;
high-level political connections can help.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
A presence in Russia, preferably with a permanent office which can be
cheaper than several trips a year. There is a limit to how much business
can be done over the telephone.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
More funds than you first thought
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Alternative ways of generating revenue alongside your main project, like
buying an office block or setting up a furniture factory alongside a
substantial industrial project
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Start with a small project to test the market and gain experience.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Be prepared to pay bribes: the perk is a trip to headquarters in the
west for travel-hungry Soviet partners who want to do a deal.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2224</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGABDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / The Property Market: The people's jury is out
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VANESSA HOULDER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Canary Wharf, the largest, most expensive office project in Europe, is being
put to the test.
More than 3,000 people have arrived at the development in London's Docklands
over the past few months including the staff of Morgan Stanley, Ogilvy &amp;
Mather and the Daily Telegraph. So does their experience justify the
long-held belief of Olympia &amp; York, the developers, that 'once people are
there, Canary Wharf will sell itself'?
The project has some enthusiastic advocates. 'It looks absolutely first
class,' says a senior executive of Morgan Stanley, which has swapped five
cramped buildings in the City and West End for spacious, state-of-the-art
offices, a canteen and a gymnasium.
'Marvellous,' says Mr Mike Walsh, chairman of Ogilvy &amp; Mather, which has
moved its staff away from a tatty, 70-year-old building north of Waterloo
Bridge to two open-plan floors in Cabot Place.
Staff milling around the shopping mall at lunchtime have mixed views. 'It is
disastrous,' says a brisk, smartly dressed Morgan Stanley employee, scanning
the bookshelves in the newsagent. 'I hate it. It's like Ford open prison,'
she adds.
Although Canary Wharf boasts a dozen shops, a pub, a restaurant and two
cafes which report brisk trade, the range of diversions in the West End is
widely mourned. 'There is nothing here for anyone. What there is, is too
expensive,' says a young back-office worker at Morgan Stanley.
Even the limited amusements offered in the southern Isle of Dogs inspire
nostalgia in one Daily Telegraph employee. 'I never thought I'd say that,'
she says wryly.
Transport heads the list of complaints, although several Canary Wharfers
have found it better than they feared. Employers are smoothing the
transition with free car parking, free river bus passes and even, in the
case of Morgan Stanley, a temporary private bus service.
Heavy car parking charges (up to Pounds 35 for a day) are designed to
encourage people to use public transport. But the Docklands Light Railway
(DLR) is still unreliable and overcrowded. The riverbus does not currently
have sufficient capacity to cope with peak demand. Getting to Westminster
through lunch-hour traffic takes up to an hour.
Many of these gripes will disappear in time. Two extra riverbuses will be in
service by May, reducing intervals between the boats to just 10 minutes; the
DLR is being upgraded; the opening of the Limehouse Link next year will cut
congestion on the roads; the Jubilee tube line will be in place in 1996.
Several other shops and restaurants are due to arrive, including Marks and
Spencer. A post office counter will open in May; there will be a health
club, although its opening has been delayed for six months until next
spring.
In the summer, the 25 acres of open space and riverside promenades will seem
more inviting for the office workers who complain of having nowhere to go at
lunchtime.
That said, Canary Wharf's claim that 'the environment offers a higher
quality of working life than any other in London, with incalculable benefits
in terms of morale, productivity and staff retention' looks far-fetched at
present.
What of Canary Wharf's central claim that it offers 'unprecedented benefits
to modern, competitive businesses' compared with London's other inadequate
and dear office accommodation?
The property industry would largely agree with Canary Wharf that 'the
quality of the buildings surpasses that of any other office accommodation in
the capital'.
Nonetheless, there is no shortage of high-quality, modern buildings in other
parts of London. According to APR, an independent research body, two-thirds
of the 40m sq ft available for let in central London is brand new. In any
case, the problem for London developers is not that companies are happy with
their existing offices, but that they cannot escape from lengthy leases at
overpriced rents.
Similarly, Canary Wharf is not unique in its promise to help companies
'improve their operational efficiency and competitiveness', although the
claim is well founded. Ogilvy &amp; Mather is pleased with the improvement in
culture and communications that has resulted from its move. 'There is a real
buzz,' says Mr Walsh.
The cost savings of moving to Canary Wharf have narrowed over the past two
years, as rents in some parts of central London have halved. Ogilvy &amp;
Mather, which is thought to be paying around Pounds 30 per sq ft at Canary
Wharf, signed its lease when the rent at its old headquarters was
threatening to soar. Now agents reckon that renewing its old lease would
cost the same as or less than it is paying at Canary Wharf.
Canary Wharf is expensive compared with the rest of Docklands, where it can
cost less than Pounds 10 per sq ft to rent modern, air-conditioned space.
If, for instance, the Department of the Environment moves to Docklands, it
will be difficult to justify a deal with Olympia &amp; York, unless it is at an
unprecedentedly cheap rate.
Canary Wharf also claims that its tenants 'will be at the heart of the most
rapidly improving transport infrastructure in the country, in an area which
will become the most accessible in the capital'. The first point is probably
true: Pounds 3.5bn is being ploughed into Docklands transport links. The
second point is more controversial. Some commentators think that, if Canary
Wharf achieves its projected 50,000 jobs, the rail, riverbus and road
capacity may be stretched.
The reservations expressed by some occupants and potential tenants are not
usually shared by casual visitors. The scale, detail and sheer novelty of
the project impress many who flock to it at weekends.
Visitors' reactions to the architecture vary hugely. Cesar Pelli's imposing
steel tower has been widely acclaimed, but many, like Prince Charles, detest
the monolithic scale of the buildings. Canary Wharf's visitors' centre
plaintively reminds critics: 'Sir Christopher Wren's plans for St Paul's
attracted a considerable amount of criticism for its size at the time.'
The verdict is also mixed on the interior, which ranges in style from an
elegant glass dome at Cabot Place East to a slightly oppressive atrium tower
clad in 199 tonnes of streaky, blood-red marble.
Visitors are not just regaled by the architecture. A thousand people a day
visit Canary Wharf's visitors' centre, which is an entertaining mix of
history and hyperbole. 'Canary Wharf, London's third business district, is
perhaps this century's prime example of Britain's unwavering strength and
confidence,' says a display board. 'The best transport system in London,'
trumpets another.
The greatest attraction of Canary Wharf lies in the views from its 800 ft
tower, the tallest in the UK. Visits have been limited to potential tenants,
opinion-formers and potential investors in the Enterprise Zone Trust - which
was trying to raise Pounds 215m on one of the Canary Wharf buildings before
it was withdrawn yesterday. But O&amp;Y is 'seriously considering' extending
this opportunity to the public.
A chance to see a view of London hitherto confined to aircraft pilots is
likely to pull in the crowds. From 800 ft up, there is a panoramic view
across areas as diverse as the City, Wapping, Limehouse, Stepney, the Royal
Docks, Bromley, Stratford, Greenwich and the Isle of Dogs, displaying
dramatic contrasts in architecture and wealth.
Letting visitors up the tower could be a profitable marketing ploy. Anything
that adds to Canary Wharf's profile could help overcome the business world's
ambivalence towards the project. As a starting point, the invitation to the
top of the tower has been extended to London's taxi drivers - some of the
most influential arbiters of opinion in the capital.
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
CAPITAL GROWTH (%)
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
                     Retail   Office   Industrial   All Properties
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
Year to Jan 92         -2.9    -13.8         -1.1             -6.9
Quarter to Jan 92       0.6     -3.0          0.3             -0.8
Month of Jan 92        -0.1     -0.9          0.2             -0.3
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
Investment Property Databank
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2225</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGABCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Technology: Computer auditors take a fresh look at the books
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN HOLDSWORTH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A new report* which is likely to set global standards for the audit and
security of IT systems was launched in the UK this week.
Systems Auditability and Control (SAC), published by the Institute of
Internal Auditors, is the first study for 15 years to present auditors with
a comprehensive analysis of risks and best practices in the control of IT.
Its predecessor in 1977 became the standard reference work for computer
auditors. The 1992 version, launched at Compacs, the IIA's annual
conference, is designed to be of wider appeal reflecting a trend for
auditors to cover both IT and non-IT aspects.
SAC has a trenchant message for managers. Some 40 per cent of IT systems
fail to meet business requirements, it says, while only 11 per cent of
organisations operate effective controls during systems development. Many
new systems are late, overrun their budget or are abandoned before
completion.
'This is not the auditor's responsibility - it's top management's,' says
David Bentley, chief internal auditor at Leeds Permanent Building Society,
and chairman of Compacs.
Specific IT risks identified by SAC include: poor controls in end-user
systems; the openness of systems to intruders; impaired accuracy and
integrity of data; and interruption of business due to system or network
failure.
SAC also details the use of IT in auditing. 'There's no way we can audit a
mass of networks and computer systems using traditional techniques,' says
Charles Le Grand, director of research at the IIA.
SAC is based on a survey of 400 companies worldwide including Rolls Royce,
Lloyds Bank and British Petroleum in the UK. It was launched in the US last
May and is being translated into French, Japanese and German.
*The SAC report, Pounds 147 for IIA-UK members, Pounds 175 for non-members,
is available from: The Institute of Internal Auditors - UK, 13 Abbeville
Mews, 88 Clapham Park Road, London SW4 7BX.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2226</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGABBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Technology (Worth Watching): Dirty laundry looks to its past
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHILE few may remember the drudgery of the traditional Monday wash, modern
washing machines are arguably not as economical, effective or
environmentally friendly as a washing board and a pair of hands.
But now a French invention called the Wash'ball marketed by Welcom
International promises a simple but ingenious solution. When a set of the 12
black shock-resistant balls are put in the washing machine along with the
dirty laundry their mechanical action compliments the stirring and shaking
movements of the machine to produce the effect of 'a good, old fashioned
hand scrubbing'.
Using the environmentally harmless 37mm diameter balls improves stain
removal and cuts by half the amount of detergent needed, thus saving money,
reducing waste and extending the life of washing machine parts like hoses
and filters, according to the manufacturer.
Welcom International: France, 43 97 95 07.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2227</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGABAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Technology (Worth Watching): Shining example of laser's
speed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
COPPER CABLES are a bulky and expensive way of transmitting voice and data,
so in many countries telephone traffic is being switched to lightweight
optical fibres the width of a human hair.
A new type of laser light pulse generator has been developed by Pirelli, the
Italian tyres and cables group, which allows more than 80 times as much
information to be packed into fibre-optic telecommunications lines. The
pulse generator enables the capacity of fibre-optics telecommunications
links to be boosted to 600,000 telephone channels from the present 7,000.
In a fibre-optic telecommunications link, coded bursts of laser light are
fired down the line to be picked up and decoded at the other end. Pirelli's
new laser light pulse generator is able to fire bursts of light 10,000 times
shorter than current systems, allowing more signals to be packed into a
single line.
Pirelli: Italy, 2 85351.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2228</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAA9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Technology (Worth Watching): Stopping an arc before it
starts
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ACCIDENTS CAUSED by arcs which develop in electrical switchgear and
distribution boards account for about one third of all electrical accidents
in industry. When arcs occur on land-based equipment they can damage plant
and cause injuries, but off-shore arcs jeopardise the lives of everyone
working on a platform.
When an arc develops it resembles an explosion with temperatures reaching
20,000 deg C, and light intensities 2,000 times stronger than office
lighting systems. The traditional solution on offshore drilling and
production platforms has been to enclose distribution panels in metal
cabinets.
The enclosure contains the explosion, but does nothing to protect the
electrical circuitry. To tackle the problem ABB Control, part of the Asea
Brown Boveri group, has developed the TVOC optical-based monitor which
disconnects faulty electrical equipment in less than two milliseconds - less
than the time it takes for an arc to fully develop. Because the ABB solution
prevents arcs rather than containing them, special arc-proof containers are
not needed, and repair times are cut or eliminated.
ABB Control: UK, 0203 368500.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2229</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAA8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Technology (Worth Watching): Cancer drug gains approval
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AS BIOTECHNOLOGY has provided the means to prepare commercial quantities of
the proteins which regulate the human immune system, medical attention has
been focused on these 'biological response modifiers' (BRMs) and their
potential role in the treatment of cancer.
One particularly promising BRM was called the T-cell Growth Factor when it
was discovered in 1976 and subsequently renamed Interleukin-2. In Europe,
EuroCetus has used recombinant DNA technology to produce large quantities of
Interleukin-2 in the form of its first commercial product  - Proleukin.
Now, after completing medical trials, EuroCetus has won marketing approval
in the UK for Proleukin which has proved effective in the treatment of renal
cell carcinomas, the most common cancer of the kidney. It is notoriously
difficult to treat and is relatively insensitive to current forms of
chemotherapy and radiotherapy.
Proleukin appears to work indirectly by stimulating the immune system rather
than by direct attack on cancer cells, and researchers hope that it may also
prove effective in treating other cancers.
EuroCetus: UK, 0895 824087.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2230</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAA7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Technology (Worth Watching): Superconductors won't slow down
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE NEXT GENERATION of superfast telecommunications and computer equipment
will require higher speed components utilising the rules of quantum
mechanics and techniques like superconductivity.
Sanyo Electric, the Japanese electronics group, has developed what it claims
is the world's first superconducting transistor that uses 'tunnel-effect'
oxide superconductors. The new device has a theoretical speed 10 times
faster than current semiconductors and uses less than one-hundredth as much
electricity.
It is built around a thin high-temperature superconductor film made of
barium potassium bismuth oxide deposited on an oxide semiconductor so that
it is only one crystal wide. The film creates a junction in which electrons
move under the laws of quantum mechanics, rather than conventional electron
flow, resulting in high speeds and low power consumption.
Under the 'tunnel-effect' phenomenon electrons are able to 'tunnel' through
thin barriers at very high speed in certain conditions. By varying those
conditions, the flow of electrons through the transistor can be regulated.
Other companies have developed superconducting transistors as well as
tunnel-effect semiconductors, but Sanyo says its transistor is the first
that is both superconducting and uses tunnel-effect oxides.
Sanyo Electric: Japan, 06 991 1181.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2231</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAA6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Shares to be affected by election already on
the move
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Shares that might gain from a Labour victory rose strongly yesterday while
those that might gain from a Tory win dropped. 'Labour gainers' are now less
that half a percentage point below their level on the day the election was
announced. Unpolitical factors are partly responsible: BAT Industries, the
tobacco and insurance company, rose most, after raising its dividend on
Wednesday. All but one other Labour gainer rose. 'Conservative gainers' are
4 1/2 percentage points below their announcement-day level.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2232</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAA5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Greens plan charge on all packaging materials
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JIMMY BURNS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE GREEN party yesterday announced its radical alternative to the three
main parties in an attempt to reverse its declining fortunes.
It proposes a significant shift away from taxes on income to 'green' taxes
aimed at cutting the amount of non-renewable energy and raw materials
consumed in the economy.
As part of its commitment to cut carbon dioxide emissions by between 60 per
cent and 80 per cent by early next century, the party wants a significant
move away from the use of private cars towards public transport and
bicycles.
The manifesto, printed on recycled paper in two sections, was presented in
the cramped offices of the London Ecological Centre by the party's new
shared leadership: chairwoman Ms Sara Parkin and 'joint speakers' Ms Jean
Lambert and Mr Richard Lawson, both of whom are standing for parliament. 'We
know that the Greens in power can make a difference,' Ms Parkin said.
'Unlike the other political parties, this manifesto faces up to the real
issues.'
Mr Lawson, a GP who is fighting Weston-super-Mare, said: 'The brains of the
country's political economists are malfunctioning to such an extent that
they are destroying our renewable resources.'
The party has just Pounds 75,000 - and no contributions so far from any
company - to spend on its national campaign. But Ms Parkin was in a upbeat
mood, claiming the Greens were the 'fastest-growing movement the world has
ever seen'. The party will field 250 candidates, many in constituencies
where there are controversial environmental issues.
Green speakers yesterday rejected the suggestion by what it termed the
'grey' parties that they should urge their supporters to vote tactically
rather than 'waste' votes. Ms Lambert said: 'We shall tell our supporters to
vote Green.'
Mainly because the recession has overshadowed environmental issues, Greens
have seen their support decline from their peak in the European elections of
1989 when they polled 15 per cent of the vote, but failed to win a seat. In
the last general election they polled 1.5 per cent of the vote.
Ms Parkin yesterday criticised opinion polls which classify the Greens among
'other political parties' including the Monster Raving Loony Party. The
'others' group is trailing with a collective share of about 3 per cent.
Manifesto highlights are:
Taxation. 'Green' taxes on carbon fuel and all packaging materials;
increased petrol and diesel duties; zero value-added-tax rating on goods and
services that promote sustainable development and luxury rating on those
that do the reverse; basic Income Scheme to replace all allowances, benefits
and relief. Energy saving. Proceeds from closure of nuclear power programme
to be spent on energy conservation and home insulation schemes; government
partnership with private sector to develop offshore wind and wave power.
Transport. Cancellation of all but most essential road-building schemes;
priority to public transport and cycle paths. Global warming. Move from
fossil fuels to solar sources; immediate ban on ozone-depleting gases except
for specific and limited medical uses.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2233</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAA4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Candidates take out cover
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AT LEAST 500 parliamentary candidates are taking out insurance to cover the
cost of any legal battles arising from the election campaign.
Legal Protection Group, a subsidiary of Sun Alliance, and Careassist, which
is owned by Royal Insurance, provide legal expense policies tailored to the
needs of candidates. These cover costs arising from libel or defamation
claims as well as actions under the Representation of the People Act.
So far, LPG - which is selling a policy valid for the period of the campaign
 -has received requests from 242 candidates. Careassist, which sells a
policy covering all local and parliamentary elections over a 12-month
period, says that it has sold a block scheme covering all Liberal Democrat
candidates. It also has 300 Conservative and a handful of Labour candidates
on its books.
LPG is set to pay a Pounds 50,000 claim to finance legal action by Labour
candidates who sued Liberal Democrat opponents over a bogus Labour council
by-election document in Tower Hamlets, London. The Court of Appeal found in
favour of the Liberal Democrats last week.
Mr Reg Brown, whose syndicate at Lloyd's has underwritten the LPG policy for
1983 and 1987 general elections, says there have been 45 claims on the
policy, most of which are for a few hundred pounds.
Mr Stephen Manton, at Careassist, says his company has paid 15 claims since
1986.
Most claims arise from actions under the Representation of the People Act,
when political parties breach the limits on electoral spending.
Premiums are standard for all candidates. LPG is charging a flat Pounds 55
which provides Pounds 50,000 of cover. Careassist's annual policy costs
between Pounds 108 and Pounds 130, depending on the size of the excess.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2234</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAA3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Blair deep in concentration
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Labour intensive: employment spokesman Tony Blair offers a study in
concentration as he considers his response to yesterday's rise in the
unemployment figures
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT921-2235</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CCTBGAA2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920320
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 MAR 92 / Election 1992: Tories' business pledge to Scots
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BUXTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Scottish Conservative Party pledged yesterday to bring business rates in
Scotland in line with those in England and Wales in the lifetime of the next
parliament.
The promise is contained in the Scottish version of the Tory manifesto which
was launched by Mr Ian Lang, the Scottish secretary, in Edinburgh.
Mr Allan Stewart, local government minister, said that by the new financial
year the Tory government would have reduced the burden of business rates on
Scotland by Pounds 370m from what they would otherwise have been. This would
be achieved through subsidies, instructions to local authorities and by
banning business-rate increases greater than the inflation rate.
However, the Scottish National party argues that Pounds 400m is needed to
close the gap between Scottish and English business rates, and business
organisations put the remaining gap at more than Pounds 350m.
In 1989, when the government embarked on harmonising rates between Scotland
and England, Mr Malcolm Rifkind, then Scottish secretary, said that the
process would take 'five years, or possibly a little more'. Harmonisation
would involve removing the differences in the valuing of property between
the two countries.
The Scottish manifesto states that the party stands unequivocally for the
union of the UK and rejects Labour's plan for a devolved Scottish
parliament, as well as independence. However, the party is 'willing to
consider ways of improving the government of Scotland'.
Mr Lang yesterday offered no new ideas on improving Scotland's government
and said it was vital that any proposals 'maintained the integrity of the
union'. Discussions with other parties on constitutional improvements were
always possible, he said.
Among other new pledges, free transport is to be provided for secondary
school children whose parents wish to send them to schools other than their
neighbourhood comprehensive. It will be made illegal to carry knives in
public, apart from 'certain penknives' and sgian dhuibhs (ceremonial
knifes).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
